
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
Harry Potter and the Sorcerer’s Stone
Harry Potter
&
Magic Place
By JK Ruling
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
CHAPTER ONE
THE LIVING CHILD
m r. and Mrs. Dursley, of number four, Privet Drive, were proud to say .
that they were flexible, thank you very much. They are the ultimate humans .
Would you expect to be involved in something strange or bizarre, because they just
He never caught so easily.
Mr. Dursley was a director of a company called Grunnings, which invented
vibes. He was a big, fat man with no head, though he had
Very large mouth. Mrs. Dursley was sweet and blonde and had nearly twice the
the size of her head, which came in very handy as she spent a lot of it
Time craning over the fence line, menacing around the neighborhood. The Dursleys had a
The youngest son was named Dudley and in their opinion there was no better boy anywhere.
The Dursleys had everything they wanted, but they also had a fortune, and
Their biggest fear is that someone will find out. They don’t think
He could make it up if someone found out about the Potters. Mrs. Potter was a Mrs.
the Dursley's sister, but they hadn't met in years; In fact, Mrs. Dursley
She pretended she didn't have a sister, because her sister was so useless
Man they were as unDursleyish as could be. The Dursleys were angry.
He'd think about what the neighbors would say if the Potters arrived down the street. the
The Dursleys knew that the Potters had a young son as well, but they didn't even
He saw it. This child is another good reason to make the little ones beautiful; they
Dudley didn't want to be mixed up with a boy like that.
When Mr. and Mrs. Dursley woke up on a bright, gray Tuesday, our story
It starts, nothing about the cloudy sky outside would suggest that it’s gloomy and
Strange things will soon be happening across the country. Mr. Dursley
he said as he chose his most annoying tie for work, it was Mrs. Dursley .
she exclaimed as she bumped into Dudley tossing in his high chair.
None of them noticed a large, dark blue eagle flying overhead.
At half past eight, Mr. Dursley picked up his plate and approached Mrs.
The Dursleys on the pillow, and promised to kiss Dudley goodbye but missed, because
Dudley was now panting and throwing his bread at the walls.
“Little tyke,” Mr. Dursley said as he left the kitchen. He got into his car.
And he got out of car number four.
It was in the middle of the street that he saw the first sign of
Something strange — the cat reads the map. For the second time, Mr. Dursley didn't
He realized what he saw—and then turned his head to look again. there
There’s a stuffed cat standing in the middle of Privet Drive, but there’s no map in the
sight. What could he be thinking? It must be a trick of
LIGHT. Mr. Dursley blinked and stared at the cat. She looks back. Like Mr. Dursley
He drove around the corner and pulled off the road, watching the cat in his mirror. compliance
Now they read the sign that says Privet Drive — no, they’re looking at the sign; cats
I can’t read maps or signs. Mr. Dursley gave himself a little hug, and replied
A cat out of his mind. As he drove into town, he thought of nothing but a
the great order of gifts he was hoping to get that day.
But in the city center, they pulled a few things out of his mind the screams
else. As he sat at the bus stop in the morning, he couldn’t care less about that
Turns out there are a lot of people wearing luxury costumes on. People in suits. Sir.
The Dursleys can’t have people wearing amazing clothes — getups you .
They saw about the youth! He thought this was some crazy new concept. he
Pressing his fingers against the steering wheel, his eyes fell on a pair of these.
weirdos standing too close together. They were having fun together. Sir.
The Dursleys were furious to see that two of them weren't normal at all; Why, this
A man should be older than her, and wear an emerald necklace! the
his nerve! But then it occurred to Mr. Dursley that this was probably something of a scam .
Stunt —these people were obviously meeting for something…yeah, that would
to be. The tour continued and a few minutes later, Mr. Dursley arrived in the
Grunnings the parking lot, his mind returns to the rehearsals.
Mr. Dursley always sat with his back to the window in his office on
Ninth floor. If he hadn’t, he might have found it harder to focus on dating
That morning. He didn’t see the deer passing by in broad daylight, though
People down the road did; They showed up and stared open mouthed like a bull after
owl quickly overhead. Most of them have never seen an eagle even at night. Sir.
However, the Dursleys had a butter-free afternoon. He screams at five
Different people. He made a lot of precious phone calls and shouted quite a bit.
further. He was in a very good mood until lunchtime, when he thought he would
his feet and walked across the street to buy himself bread from the bakery.
He was aware of all the people in suits until he passed a group of
ten next to the baker's. He watched them proudly as he passed. He doesn’t know.
Why, but they made him uncomfortable. This group was excitedly calculating, too, and
He couldn’t see any collection tables. He was on his way back passing them,
He held a large loaf of bread in a pocket, that he held some words of what were
they were saying.
“The Potters, of course, that’s what I heard —”
“ — yes, their son, Harry —”
Mr. Dursley stopped dead. Fear filled him. He turned and looked at the
She believed he seemed to want to tell them something, but thought better of it.
He hurried back across the street, stormed into his office, slammed his
The secretary undeterred picked up his phone, and was about to finish
through his home office when he changed his mind. He returned the phone.
down and wiped off his cock, thinking...no, he was being silly. red
It wasn’t such an unusual name. He was saying that there were a lot of people called Potter
who had a son named Harry. Come to think of it, he wasn’t even seeing his nephew
called Harry. He didn't even notice the boy. Maybe it was with Harvey. either
Harold. There was no point in provoking Mrs. Dursley; She always doubted the
Some reminder of his sister. He didn’t blame her—if only he had a sister like that…
But all the same, those people in suits….
He found it a lot more likely to focus on the performances that evening and when
He left the building at five o’clock, still nervous enough to walk straight ahead.
In the one just outside the door.
“I’m sorry,” he murmured, as the little old man stumbled and nearly fainted. compliance
A few seconds before Mr. Dursley realized the man was wearing green
The coat. He didn’t seem upset at all because he was about to fall to the ground. in
Just like that, his face split into a huge smile and he said in a low voice that made
The passers-by frown, “Don’t be sorry, my lord, for nothing can trouble me to-day!
Rejoice, for You knowWho is gone last! Even Muggles like you
It should be a celebration, this happy, happy day!”
And the old man hugged Mr. Dursley on the corner and left.
Mr. Dursley stood rooted to the spot. He was obsessed with a perfect
strange. He also thought that he was called a Muggle, whatever that was. he
He was screwed. He rushed to his car and drove home, hoping to think
Things, he had never hoped for before, because he didn't believe
Imagination.
As he pulled into the driveway of number four, the first thing he saw — .
And it didn’t improve his mood—it was the same stray cat he’d seen that morning. it
He was now sitting on his garden wall. He was sure he was all alone; have
the same marks over his eyes.
“Cu!” Mr. Dursley said aloud.
The cat did not move. He just gave her a stern look. Was this cat authentic?
trip? Mr. Dursley asked. He tried to pull away, letting himself
At home. He was still determined not to say anything to his wife.
Mrs. Dursley had a good, normal day. She told him about the whole dinner.
About Mrs. Next Door’s problems with her daughter and how Dudley has
Learning a new word (“Never!”). Mr. Dursley promised to do as well as possible. When Dudley
He was put to bed and entered the hall in time to catch the final report
In the morning news:
“And finally, ornithologists everywhere have announced that the public
the eagles were behaving unusually today. Although spiders primarily hunt in
night and almost invisible in daylight, there are hundreds of reflections
of these birds flying in all directions since the dawn of the sun. Experts cannot
Explain why the mice suddenly changed their sleep patterns.” the
of the press allowed himself to smile. “A lot of secrets. And now, to Jim
McGuffin with the weather. There will be some insect snow tonight.
Jim?”
“Well, Ted,” said the weatherman, “I don’t know about that, but it’s not
Only the potatoes were doing the opposite today. Commentators differ from each other as Kent,
Yorkshire, and Dundee were phoning to let me know that instead of raining I
They promised yesterday, they have infectious stardust! Maybe people
They were celebrating bonfire night early — not until next week, folks! but
I can promise a date night tonight.”
Mr. Dursley sat frozen in his crib. Hot stars across Britain?
Animals flying by daylight? Mysterious people in costumes all over the place? And a
Shut up, shut up about the Potters….
Mrs. Dursley came into the living room holding two cups of tea. compliance
No good. He had to tell her something. He cleared his throat in despair. “Er
'Petunia, dear—you haven't heard from your sister lately, have you?'
ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵉ ⵜⵉⴷⵢⴻⵙⵎⴻⴽⵜⴰ, Massa Dursley ⵜⴻⵜⵜⴱⴰⵏⴷ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵃⵓⵍⴼⵓ ⵙ ⵍⵅⵓⴼ ⴷ ⵍⵖⵉⴹⴰ. After all,
They were acting as if her sister never had one.
“No,” she insisted. "why?"
“Funny stuff on the news,” Mr. Dursley muttered. “Animals…shot
The stars…and there are so many funny looking people in town today….”
"so?" said Mrs. Dursley.
“Well, I just thought…well…it was about…you .
They know…his people.”
Mrs. Dursley sucked on her glass through her parted lips. Mr. Dursley asked.
If he could tell her he’d heard the name “Potter.” He decided not to do it.
You love. ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⵎⴽⴰⵏⵉⵙ ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ, ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵉⵣⴻⵎⵔⴻⵔ, “Mmitsen — ⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⵍⵉ ⵇⵔⵉⴱ .
Dudley’s age now, isn’t he?”
“I suppose so,” Mrs. Dursley insisted.
“What’s his name again? Howard, isn’t that right?”
“Harry. Nasty, a generic term, if you ask me.”
"Oh, yes," Mr. Dursley said, his heart sinking nervously. “Yes, I
agree."
He didn't say another word on the subject as they climbed upstairs to bed.
While Mrs. Dursley was in the bathroom, Mr. Dursley crawled into the bedroom .
window and looked down into the front garden. The cat is still there. compliance
She looked at Privet Drive as if waiting for something.
Was he imagining things? Could this all have something to do with
ears? If it did…if it came out that they were related to the two of — well, he didn’t .
She thinks he can push it away.
The Dursleys climbed into bed. Mrs. Dursley fell asleep quickly but Mr.
ⴷⵓⵔⵙⵍⴻⵢ ⵢⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴼⴻⴳⴳⵉⴹ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴱⴻⴷⴷⵉⵍⴻⵏⵜⵜ ⴰⴽⴽ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵡⴰⵍⵍⴰⵖⵉⵙ. His last thought, he sighed
Before sleeping that even if stones were involved, no
The reason to get close to him was Mrs. Dursley. The audience knows best
What he and Petunia thought of them was their type….He couldn't see how the
And Petunia could blend in anything that might have happened—him .
He yawned and turned — he couldn’t hurt them….
How very wrong.
Mr. Dursley may have been drifting off into a restless sleep, but the cat about
The outer wall showed no signs of sleep. She was sitting as a
statue, its eyes staring unfocused at the corner of Privet Drive. It wasn't like that.
Much like the screech when a car door closes on the next street, even when a couple of
swooped overhead. In fact, it was almost midnight before the cat moved at all.
There appeared to be a man in the corner that the cat was watching, it looked like this
Suddenly and silently you’d think it had just popped out of the ground.
The cat's voice trembled and her eyes narrowed.
Nothing like this guy was spotted on Privet Drive. He was hot.
thin, and very old, judging by the fur of his hair and beard, which was both
Long enough to cling to his pants. He was wearing a long robe, a gray robe i
sweep the floor, and high-heeled, heeled boots. Her blue eyes were light.
It’s bright, and shiny behind the half-moon roses and the nose is very long
And it cracked, like it had been broken at least twice. This guy’s name was
Albus Dumbledore.
Albus Dumbledore didn’t seem to realize that he had just arrived in a
A street where everything from his name to his vote is incredible. was
Busy rummaged through his bag, looking for something. But he seemed to realize
He was wary, because he looked quickly at the cat, still
They watched him from across the street. For some reason, the view of
The cat seemed to bother him. He laughed and smirked, “I should know.”
He found what he was looking for in his inner pocket. It looks like a
cigarette ashes. He opened it, held it in the air, and snapped. the
The nearby streetlight came on with a little flicker. He took it out again — the next one .
The silver glows in the dark. Twelve times Putouter pressed, until
Only lights remained on the street and a couple of small lights in the distance, which
There were cat eyes watching her. If someone looks out their window
Now, even Mrs. Dursley's bleary-eyed, they couldn't see anythin
It was happening down the hallway. Dumbledore puts the Potter back
Inside his coat, he made his way down the aisle to number four, where he sat
down the wall in front of the cat. He didn't look at it, but after a moment,
He called to her.
“Love seeing you here, Professor McGonagall.”
He turned to smile at the woman, but she was gone. Instead he was looking at
A serious looking woman, she was wearing square earrings perfectly
the shape of the markings the cat has on its eyes. She, too, was wearing
the dress, that of emerald. Her black hair was pulled into a tight bun. Look
in a different way.
“How did you know it was me?” she asked him.
“My Professor, I’ve never seen a cat sit so still.”
“You’d be a hero if you sat on a brick wall all day,” he says .
Professor McGonagall.
“All day? When can you celebrate? I need to pass a
Dozens of screams and screams on my way here.”
Professor McGonagall smiled proudly.
“Oh yes, I’m fucked, okay,” she exclaimed. “You’d think
They would have been a little more careful, but no —even the Muggles had noticed .
Something is going. It’s in their news.” She tilted her head back towards
The window of the Dursleys' living room. “I heard it. Teams of animals...shooting
The stars…Well, they weren’t completely stupid. They were bound to see
some. Shooting the stars down in Kent — I’m going to bet that was Dedalus Diggle. he
It doesn’t make much sense.”
"You can't blame them," Dumbledore snapped. “We have value
Few will celebrate eleven years.”
“I know that,” Professor McGonagall said bitterly. “But that’s no excuse .
We’ll lose our heads. People are literally mad, out in the streets in
Broad daylight, they’re not even wearing Muggle clothes, they’re breaking up fights.”
She cast a quick, sideways glance at Dumbledore here, as if .
She hoped he would say something to her, but he didn’t, so she moved on. “The punishment
The thing would be if, on the same day you know who seems to have lost
Eventually, the Muggles found out about all of us. I think it really went well,
Dumbledore?”
"It certainly seems so," Dumbledore said. “We have a lot to be thankful for .
for. Would you like a drop of lemon?”
“Oh what?”
“Lemon drop. It’s my favorite kind of Muggle garden.”
"No, thank you," Professor McGonagall said coldly, as if she hadn't noticed .
Think this is the time for lemon caps. “Like I said, even if you know-who .
He went —”
“My Professor, surely a sane person like you could have called it a .
His name? All this 'you-know-who' crap — eleven years I've been
They’re trying to convince people to call him by his real name: Voldemort.” teacher
McGonagall shrugged, but Dumbledore, who was pouring two lemon drops,
He clearly didn’t mind. “It all gets creepier if we keep saying 'YouKnowWho.' I don’t see any reason to be afraid to say Voldemort’s words .
name."
"I know you don't," Professor McGonagall said, half-voiced .
It hurt, half warm. “But you have changed. Everyone knows you are a
Just one you know- oh, well, Voldemort, who’s wrong.”
“You’re flattering,” Dumbledore whispered. “Voldemort has the power to do it .
I haven’t.”
“Only because you’re too — well — smart to use them.”
“It’s a good thing because it’s dark. I haven't been shipping much since Mrs. Pomfrey.
She told me she liked my new ears.”
Headmaster McGonagall shot a quick look at Dumbledore and said “A
the eagle was nothing in front of the raging conflict. You know what
they say? Why did he fail? About what’s been stopping him lately?”
It seemed Professor McGonagall had come to the conclusion that she was quite
she liked to debate, the real reason she was waiting on a cold, hard wall at all
Ass, because neither as a cat nor as a wife had she prepared Dumbledore with such a
view of the beam as it is now. It was obvious that whatever “everyone” says,
She wasn't going to believe it until Dumbledore told her it was true.
However, Dumbledore was choosing another lemon drop and didn't answer.
“What they say,” you observed, “is that yesterday Voldemort .
She appeared on Godric's ship. He went to find the ears. Word is that Lily
and James Potter are — are — that they are — dead.”
Dumbledore shook his head. Professor McGonagall sighed.
“Lily and James…I can’t believe…I don’t want to believe…Oh, .
Albus…”
Dumbledore reached out and patted her shoulder. “I know…I
They know…” he said seriously.
Professor McGonagall's voice trembled as she continued. “That’s not all.
They say he tried to kill Potter's son Harry. But he couldn't. he
He couldn’t kill the little boy. No one knows why, or how, but they say so
When he failed to kill Harry Potter, Voldemort’s power somehow unraveled — and
That’s why he left.”
Dumbledore nodded sorrowfully.
“It’s — is it?” Professor McGonagall said. “After all he's done…
All the people he’s killed…couldn’t he have killed a little boy? It’s just amazing…n
All things to stop…but how in heaven’s name did Harry live?”
“We can only speculate.” Dumbledore said. “Maybe we’ll never know.”
Headmaster McGonagall pulled out a lace handkerchief and tapped it.
eyes beneath her spectacles. Dumbledore gave a huge sigh as he received a gold
with a glance from his pocket and examined it. It was a very strange hour. She has twelve.
Faces but no numbers; Instead, the little planets were moving around. it
It must have made sense to Dumbledore, though, because he put it back in
his pocket added, “Hagrid is late. I thought he told you I would be here, s
way?"
"Yes," Professor McGonagall said. “And I don’t think you’ll go .
Tell me why you’re here, of all places?”
“I came to take Harry to his aunt and uncle. They are just family.
He’s out now.”
“You don’t mean – can’t you mean the people who live here?” He shouted
Professor McGonagall, leaping to her feet, glared at number four.
“Dumbledur—you cannot. I watched them all day. She didn't find it.
Two people left like us. And they've got this son — I saw him kicking
His mother all the way up the street, drinking milk. Harry Peter is Coming
And live here!”
"It's the best place for him," Dumbledore insisted. “His uncle is .
Uncle will be able to explain everything to him when he grows up. Gold
Send them a letter.”
"letter?" Professor McGonagall said softly, sitting back down on
The wall. "Really, Dumbledore, do you think you can explain all of this in a letter?"
These people will never understand it! To be a dissident — a myth — I
It’s no surprise that this day became known as Harry Potter Day in the future —
There will be books written about Harry — every child in our world will know
His name!”
"right." Dumbledore said, looking very hard on the tip of his cock .
Half-moon roses. “It’s going to be a head-turner for any kid. Known before
He can walk and talk! He’s famous for more than he even remembers! You can
See how much better he’ll be, growing up away from it all until he’s ready
Will he get it?”
Professor McGonagall opened her mouth, changed her mind, swallowed,
and then he said, “Yes — yes, you are right, of course. But how does the child get
Here, Dumbledore?” She looked at his head suddenly as if she thought he could
Be hid Harry underneath.
“Hagrid brought it.”
“You think it’s—wise—to trust Hagrid with something as important as
this?"
"I would trust Hagrid with my life," Dumbledore said.
"I'm not saying his heart isn't in the right place," the teacher said .
McGonagall grumbled, “But you can’t act like he’s not worried. It protects
to — what is that?”
A loud crackling sound broke the silence around them. It grew
loudly as they looked up and down the street for any sign of
headlights; it ended with a smile as they both looked up at the sky — and a giant snowflake .
A motorcycle fell out of the sky and landed on the road in front of them.
While the motorcycle was great, it was nothing to the man sitting on it.
It was nearly twice the length of a normal man and at least five times the width. he
it just looks too big to be abandoned, and it’s wild — the long lines of rose-black
Hair and a beard hid most of his face, he had arms the size of cookie cutters, and
His feet in their leather shoes were like baby dolphins. In his big, clawed hands
He was carrying a bunch of dishes.
"Hagrid," Dumbledore said, his voice soft. “In the end. And where
Do you have the motorcycle?”
"Borrow it, Professor Dumbledore, sir," said the hero, rising .
Carefully he got off the motorcycle as he spoke. “Young Sirius Black loaned it to me. I have
He got it, sir.”
“No problems, are there?”
“No, sir—the house was about to collapse, but I got him out well before .
The Muggles began to stir. He fell asleep while we were flying
Bristol.”
Dumbledore and Professor McGonagall moved to the front of the heap of
The whips. Inside, it just seemed, was a little boy, fast asleep. Beneath a coat of jet-black hair on his forehead a pear-shaped cut, like a
lightning.
“And where —?” Professor McGonagal said.
“Yes,” Dumbledore said. “He’ll have that scar forever.”
“Can’t you do something about it, Dumbledore?”
“Even if I could, I wouldn’t. Scars can come in handy. I have one myself.
Above my left shoulder is a perfect map of the London underground. Well -
Give it up here, Hagrid—we’d better get this over with.”
Dumbledore took Harry in his arms and turned towards the Dursleys.
house.
“Can I — can I say goodbye to him, sir?” Hagrid asked. He closed his.
A big, luscious cock on Harry and gave him what must have been a very nice
With violence, with a smile. Then, suddenly, Hagrid lets out a hurt-like scream
dog.
“Chch!” Professor McGonagall said, "You're going to wake up the Muggles!"
“I’m sorry,” Hagrid sighed, pulling out a large, rimmed parchment and .
He buried his face in it. “But I can’t stand it—Lily and James are dead—poor
Little Harry is out ter living with Muggles —”
“Yes, yes, it’s all very strange, but hold yourself, Hagrid, or we shall be .
Found,” Professor McGonagall whispered, taking Hagrid gently by the arm as .
Dumbledore pushed past the oak fence and walked towards the front door. he
He gently leaned Harry against the door, took a letter from his pouch, and placed it inside
Harry's dishes, then back to the other two. For one full minute
Three of them stood looking around the little shrine; Hagrid's shoulders slumped,
Professor McGonagall looked pleasantly surprised, a particularly bright light
the glow from Dumbledore's eyes seemed to disappear.
'Well,' said Dumbledore at last, 'that's it. We have no business staying
here. We might as well go out and join in the fun.”
“Yeah,” Hagrid said in a very confused voice, “I’ll take Sirius for his ride .
back. Goodnight, Professor McGonagall — Professor Dumbledore, sir.”
Wiping his twinkling eyes on his jacket sleeve, Hagrid braced himself
on a motorcycle and sparks the engine into life; With a ship that rose to
The air is off at night.
"I'll see you soon, I expect, Professor McGonagall," she said .
Dumbledore, with a smile on his face. Professor McGonagall wrinkled her nose in response.
Dumbledore turned and walked back down the street. In the room he
He paused and pulled out a silver Put-Outer. He removed it once, and twelve balls of
The lights quickly returned to their streetlights so that Privet Drive suddenly appeared dark.
And he could see a spider cat roaming around on the other end of the
way. He could just see the background of scars on the top of number four.
“Hi, Harry,” he smiled. He turned on his heel and with a
A swish of his fist, he was gone.
The wind rattled the beams of Privet Drive, which lay quiet and polished
Under a blue sky, the last place to expect surprises
happen. Harry Potter rolled over inside his covers without getting up. one
The little hand closed on the letter at his side and slept, not knowing if
Overall, I didn’t know it was popular, I didn’t know it would wake up in a few days
Twenty-four hours to Mrs. Dursley's surprise when she opened the front door to fan
pig skin, even to spend the next few weeks being tanned and
He was convinced by his cousin Dudley….He couldn't know that at this very moment,
People are secretly meeting all over the country they were locking their shields and
He said in a hushed voice, "For Harry Potter—the boy who lived!"
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
CHAPTER TWO
HANGING FLOWER
n earlier ten years had passed since the Dursleys woke up to find out .
nephew on the front steps, but Privet Drive has hardly changed at all. The sun
He got up on a beautiful front garden and lit hook number four on
the Dursleys' front door; You went into their living room, which was right next to
Just like it was that night when Mr. Dursley saw the sad news
Report on Animals. Only the photos on the cemetery really show
How much time has passed. Ten years ago, there were many pictures of
What looks like a giant pink beach ball wearing different colored tops —
But Dudley Dursley wasn't naked, and now the photos showed a
The big red boy rode his first bike, on a carousel at the fair, playing a
Computer games with her father, hugging and kissing her mother. the
The room bore no sign at all that another child lived in the house, either.
But Harry Potter was still there, asleep at the moment, but not for long.
Aunt Petunia woke up, and it was her low voice that made the first noise.
n day.
"Down! Get up! Now!"
Harry woke up with a start. Her aunt knocked on the door again.
"up!" she screamed. Harry heard her walk into the kitchen and
Then the sound of a gun being placed on the fire. He fell to his knee.
And he tried to remember the dream he was having. She was a good one.
It involves a flying motorcycle. He had the strange feeling that he had
Another dream before.
Her aunt came back outside the door.
“You still awake?” she demanded.
“Almost,” Harry said.
“Well, lead the way, I want you to take care of the bacon. And you don't
Dare I let it burn, I want everything to be perfect on Duddy’s birthday.”
Harry shouted.
“What did you say?” Her aunt pushed through the door.
“No, no…”
Dudley's birthday — how could he forget? Harry slowly walked out.
of the bed and started looking for a couch. He found two under his bed and, after
They pulled spiders from one of them and threw them away. Harry was avoiding spiders, because
The cupboard under the counter was full of them, and that’s where he slept.
After getting dressed he walked out of the hall into the kitchen. table
It was almost hidden underneath all of Dudley's birthday presents. It looks like
Dudley got the new computer he wanted, not to mention the second one .
A television and a race car. Why Dudley wanted a race bike and
Lucky for Harry, since Dudley was very old and hated physical exercise — unless it was true .
It involves torturing someone. Dudley’s favorite cup was Harry’s, but
Couldn't take it anymore. Harry didn't look at him, but he was speeding away.
Maybe it had something to do with living in a basement, but Harry .
He was always small and skinny for his age. It looks smaller and
worse than he actually was because all he had to wear were old clothes n
than Dudley, and Dudley was about four times older than him. Harry has a sweet
Face, chubby cheeks, black hair, and bright blue eyes. He wears blue clothes.
Taken along with a lot of Scotch tape because of all the times Dudley had
He holds it in his head. The only thing Harry liked about his looks.
He was a very tight lump in his throat that was shaped like a bolt of lightning. he
He’d had it for as long as he could remember, it was the first question he could ask
Remember they asked Aunt Petunia how he got it.
“In a car crash when your parents died,” she said earlier. “And don't ask .
questions.”
Don’t ask — that’s the first rule for living a silent life with a woman .
The Dursleys.
Uncle Vernon walked into the kitchen as Harry was kneading the potatoes.
“Cool your hair!” he said, with a hint of morning sickness.
About once a week, Uncle Vernon flips through the front of his newspaper .
And he screams that Harry needs a haircut. Harry should have more than
The other boys in his class joined in, but it made no difference, his hair
It definitely grew like that — all over the place.
Harry was frying eggs when Dudley arrived in the kitchen with his
mother. Dudley looks a lot like Uncle Vernon. He had a big brown face, not
Lots of freckles, small, watery blue eyes, and blond hair that lay loose
His head is dark brown. Aunt Petunia always said that Dudley looked like a little angel
'Harry often said that Dudley looked like a pig in a manger.
Harry put the plates of egg and cheese on the table, which was strange because
There wasn’t much space. Dudley, meanwhile, was counting his gifts. his
Face fell.
“Thirty-six,” he said, glancing back at his mother and father. “It’s two
Less than last year.”
“Honey, you didn’t count Aunt Marge’s gift, look, it’s here .
Under this greatness of Mother and Father.”
“All right, thirty-seven then,” said Dudley, going red in the face. Harry,
Who could see a huge specter of Dudley walking by and starting to grab his trunk
All right if Dudley turned the table.
Aunt Petunia obviously senses danger too, because she says bluntly,
“And we’ll buy you a couple more presents while we’re at it today. how is,
Bupkin? Two more gifts. Is that ok”
Dudley thought for a moment. It sounds like hard work. Finally he said
Simply, “Then I’ll have thirty…thirty…”
“Thirty-nine, sweetums,” said Aunt Petunia.
"Oh." Dudley sat up straight and grabbed the nearest wand. "you're welcome
so."
Uncle Vernon laughed.
“The little tyke wants his money’s worth, just like his dad. 'Here's a boy,
Dudley!” He ruffled Dudley's hair.
At that moment the phone rang and Aunt Petunia went to answer it .
While Harry and Uncle Vernon watch Dudley dismantle the race bike, and a video
a camera, a remotely piloted airplane, sixteen new computer games, and a VCR. he
He was clipping paper from the gold wristwatch when Aunt Petunia returned from
The phone looked both angry and worried.
“Bad news, Vernon,” she said. "Mrs. Figg broke her leg. She can't
Catch him.” She nodded in Harry's direction.
Dudley's mouth opened in shock, but Harry's heart froze. every
One year on Dudley's birthday, his parents took him and a friend for the day, to
vacations, hamburger stands, or movies. Every year, there was Harry
Left behind was Mrs. Figg, a frail old lady who lived two streets over. Harry
You hate it there. The whole house smelled like coffee and Mrs. Figg made it
Look at photos of all the cats she ever owned.
“Now what?” Aunt Petunia said, looking at Harry with interest as if
He had planned this. Harry knew he should be upset that Mrs. Figg broke
His back, but it wasn’t easy when he figured it would be a full year
before he had to look at Tibbles, Snowy, Mr. Paws, and Tufty again.
“We could phone Marge,” Uncle Vernon suggested.
“Don’t be silly, Vernon, she hates that boy.”
The Dursleys often talked about Harry like that, as if he wasn't there .
— or rather, it seems to be too complicated to understand
in them, as a mosquito.
“What about her what-name, your friend—Yvonne?”
“On holiday in Majorca,” Aunt Petunia said suddenly.
“You could just leave me here,” Harry replied hopefully (he could
Watch what he wants on TV for a change and maybe you’ll end up
Dudley Computers).
Aunt Petunia looks like she just ate a lemon.
“And to return to find the house destroyed?” She sniffed.
“I’m not burning the house down,” Harry said, but they weren’t listening.
“I think we can take him to the garden,” Aunt Petunia said quietly, “.
And they left him in the car….”
“The car is brand new, he’s not sitting in it alone….”
Dudley began to cry louder. In fact, he wasn’t really crying — he had
It had been years since he’d actually cried — but he knew that messing up his face
And he screamed, and his mother would give him what he wanted.
“Dinky Duddydums, don’t cry, mommy won’t let him spoil your special
Ass!" she yelled, throwing her arms around him.
“I…don’t…want…him…coming!” Dudley shouted between the adults,
They pretended to cry. “He always lost everything!” He shot Harry an evil laugh.
With the body in his mother’s arms.
Just then, the doorbell rang — “Good Lord, they’re here!” Auntie said
Petunia cheered—and moments later, Dudley's best friend, Piers Polkiss, .
He came in with his mother. Piers was an ugly boy with a face like an animal. he
He was usually the one holding people’s hands behind their backs while Dudley pressed
them. Dudley stopped pretending to cry suddenly.
Half an hour later, Harry, incredulous at his luck, sat in the
After the Dursleys' ride with Piers and Dudley, on the way to the woods for the
First time in his life. Her aunt and uncle could think of nothing else.
They would, but before they left, Uncle Vernon took Harry aside.
“I warn you,” he said, turning his big gray face right .
Close to Harry’s, “I warn you now, baby — every joke, everything in .
All — and you’ll be in that prison from now until Christmas.”
“I’m not going to do anything,” Harry said, “honestly…”
But Uncle Vernon didn’t believe him. No one ever did.
The problem was, sometimes strange things happened around Harry and there was
No there was no point in telling the Dursleys he didn't make them happen.
One time, Aunt Petunia, tired of Harry coming back from the moving pirates .
As if that wasn't enough, he took a pair of kitchen scissors and cut her
Her very short hair is almost bare except for her skirt, which she leaves on “to hide this .
lust for luxury.” Dudley laughed to himself stupidly at Harry, who had spent a sleepless
Night imagines school the next day, where they're already laughing at his
cycling clothes and sunglasses. However, the next morning, he woke up to
Finding her hair the way it was before she braided it Aunt Petunia had
He was given a week in his jail sentence for this, although he tried to explain
that he couldn’t explain how she came back so quickly.
Another time, Aunt Petunia was trying to force him into a rebellion .
Dudley's old sweater (brown with orange polka dot buttons). As she tries so hard
Pull on her head, as small as she seems, until finally she can have
disguised as a hand puppet, but certainly not Harry. Aunt Petunia decided.
He had to pee in the wash and, much to his surprise, Harry wasn't punished.
On the other hand, he got into serious trouble because he was found in
The roof of the school building. Dudley's gang followed him as usual when,
As surprised as Harry was as anyone, there he was sitting on
The fire hall. The Dursleys received Harry's letter with great anger.
the principal told them Harry had been climbing up the school building. But all he wanted
He tried to do (as he yelled at Uncle Vernon through his closed apartment door
breakfast) was jumping behind the large piles of food outside the kitchen doors. Harry
She assumed the wind must have caught him in the middle of the storm.
But today, nothing will happen. He was even worth being with
Dudley and Piers would spend the day away from school, his
coffee, or Mrs. Figg's coffee-smelling living room.
While driving, Uncle Vernon complained about Aunt Petunia. favourite
They complain about things: people at work, Harry, the council, Harry, the bank, and
Harry they were just some of his favorite subjects. This morning, it’s motorcycles.
“…they howl like maniacs, young assholes,” he said, as a
a motorcycle passes them.
“I had a dream about a motorcycle,” Harry said, remembering vaguely.
“She was flying.”
Uncle Vernon nearly fell into the chair next to him. He turned to the right.
instead and screams at Harry, his face like a giant spiked beetroot:
“ENGINERS WILL NOT LEAVE!”
Dudley and Piers shrugged.
“I know they didn’t,” Harry said. “It was just a dream.”
But he wished he hadn't said anything. If there was only one thing
The Dursleys hated even more his asking questions, talking about
Someone who is acting in an inappropriate way, no matter if it was in a dream or even
cartoon — as if they think it might lead to fun ideas.
It was a very sunny Saturday and the mall was full of families. the
The Dursleys bought Dudley and Piers giant chocolate ice creams at the door and
Then, since the woman looking at the van asked Harry what he wanted before
They could have fired him and bought him a cheap lemon ice pop. There is no
Bad, too, Harry thought, admiring it as they watched a frog shake its head
Which matched Dudley's appearance, except he wasn't so sweet.
Harry had the best morning he had in a long time. He was careful to
They went a little ways away from the Dursleys to catch up with Dudley and Piers, who was
They started feeding the animals till lunchtime, soon falling on their
hobby of his wife. They ate at the garden restaurant, and when Dudley
He was lucky because his knickerbocker joint didn’t have enough ice
Moving forward, Uncle Vernon buys him another one and Harry is allowed to finish
first.
Harry felt, later, that he should have known that everything was very good for
last.
After lunch they went to the poultry house. It was cold and dark in there.
with windows painted all over the walls. After glass, all sorts of snakes are
Snakes were scavenging and scavenging on pieces of wood and stone. Dudley and
Piers wants to see giant sharks and ugly, ferocious pythons.
Dudley quickly found the biggest snake in the place. It can become
feather twice on Uncle Vernon’s car and toss it into a garbage bag — but in
the timing does not move in the right direction. Of course, she was sleeping.
Dudley stood with his nose pressed against the glass, staring at the
the ears of the ears.
“Let him move,” he growled at his father. Uncle Vernon held on to the
gas, but the snake did not move.
“Do it again,” Dudley ordered. Uncle Vernon held the watch with skill.
with ease, but the snake just slipped away.
“This is ridiculous,” Dudley groaned. He left.
Harry looked at the front of the box and looked closely at the snake. he
Wouldn’t have been surprised if he had died of grief himself — no company
Except for stupid people tapping their fingers on the glass trying to ruin it all.
Long day. It was worse than having a closet like a bedroom, where only
Guest was Aunt Petunia hugging the door to let you in; At least he found
They’ll watch the rest of the house.
The snake suddenly opened its gray eyes. Slowly, very slowly, he picked up
his head until his eyes were on a level with Harry's.
She rolled her eyes.
Harry blushed. Then he quickly looked around to see if anyone was .
observe. They are not. He turned to the snake and frowned as well.
The snake nodded its head at Uncle Vernon and Dudley, then shrieked
His eyes to the ceiling. He gave Harry a look that simply said:
“I get that all the time.”
“I know,” Harry said with a glassy smile, though he wasn’t sure
The snake can hear him. “It should be really interesting.”
The snake nodded vigorously.
“Where did you come from, anyway?” Harry asked.
The snake pressed its tail against a small nozzle beside the glass. Harry stared at the
it.
Boa Constrictor, Brazil.
“Is there good there?”
The boa constrictor put its tail to the spell again, and Harry read:
This model is extended in the wild. “Oh, I see — so you’ve never been to .
Brazil?”
As the snake shook its head, a startling voice behind Harry made both
from which they leap. “BOY! Sir. The Dursleys! Come on LOOK AT THIS
snake! YOU WILL NOT BELIEVE WHAT YOU’RE DOING!”
Dudley came striding towards them as fast as he could.
“Out of the way, you,” he said, and grabbed Harry by the hair. captured by
With a groan, Harry landed heavily on the concrete floor. What came happened quickly.
No one noticed how it happened — one second, Piers and Dudley were leaning right .
Approaching the train, the next, they had jumped back with terrified cries.
Harry sat down and smiled; The glass front of the Boa Konstriktor boat has
He fell. The giant snake was slowly unwrapping itself, floating out onto the
floor. The people in the animal house screamed and started running around
Exits.
When the snake slowly passed him, Harry was able to yell in a low voice, whispering
The voice said, “Brazil, here I come.... Thank you, amigu.”
The guard of the engine room was in awe.
“But the coal,” he always said, “where did the coal go?”
The gardener himself made Aunt Petunia a strong, sweet cup of tea
while he promptly apologized. Piers and Dudley could only shrug. as
As Harry saw, the snake did nothing but claw at the
their confrontation as it went on, but at the moment when they all got back to Uncle Vernon's trailer,
Dudley was telling them how he almost broke his leg, and Piers was .
As a result she tried to strangle him to death. But worst of all, for Harry at least,
Piers was calm enough to say, “Harry was talking to her, not you,
Harry?”
Uncle Vernon waits until Piers is safely out of the house before
It started on Harry. He was so angry that he couldn’t speak. He managed to say,
“Go — booze — stay — no food,” before collapsing into a chair, and .
Aunt Petunia had to go get him a big brandy.
Harry sat in his heavy locker much later, wishing he had a lecture. It didn’t work.
He knew what time it was and it couldn't be that he and the Dursleys were still asleep.
Until they were, he couldn’t sneak into the kitchen to eat any food.
He lived with the Dursleys for nearly a decade, a miserable decade, as
For as long as he could remember, since he was a child and his parents died
In the car accident. He couldn’t remember being in the car when his parents were
dead. Sometimes, when he loses his commitment during long hours in his
prison, he came up with a strange discovery: a blinding flash of blue light and a
Pain filled his head. This, he says, is a downfall, though he
He couldn’t pinpoint where the blue light was coming from at all. He couldn't remember his own.
All parents. His aunts and uncles never talked about them, and of course there was
They are forbidden to ask questions. Their photographs were not in the house.
As a child, Harry dreamed and dreamed of some
unknown relationship going to get it, but it didn’t happen; the
The Dursleys were his only family. But sometimes he thinks (or maybe hopes) that
The strangers on the street seemed to know him. They were very nice foreigners.
also. A little man in a blue shirt had assaulted her once when he was out shopping.
and Aunts Petunia and Dudley. After Harry angrily asks if he knows the man,
Aunt Petunia hurried them out of the store empty-handed. An older green-looking woman, dressed all in green, waved at him furiously once on a bus.
A strange man with a very long gray shirt shook his hand in the street.
The next day then walked away without a word. The hardest thing of all
These people is that they seem to disappear the second Harry tries to get a
Look closer.
At school, Harry never had one. Everyone knew Dudley's team hated
That awkward Harry Putter in his old clothes and broken glasses, and nobody
He hated to disagree with Dudley's group.
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
Chapter Three
The letters don’t come from ANYONE
T he escape of the Brazilian bear got Harry his full attention .
The punishment. By the time he was let out of his cell again, it was summer
The holidays had started and Dudley had already broken in his new video camera,
He lost his plane to a missile, and, the first time he took off in his race car,
He hit old Mrs. Figg as she crossed Privet Drive in her car.
Harry was glad school was over, but no one was going to escape Dudley
gang, who visited the house every day. Pierce, Dennis, Malcolm, and
Gordon were all big and badass, but just as Dudley was the biggest and baddest in
the food, he was the leader. The rest were all too happy to join in
Dudley's favorite sport: Harry's hunt.
This is why Harry spent so much time outdoors,
He walks around and thinks about the end of the holiday, where he’ll see
One small hope. When September comes he goes to high school.
School and, for the first time in his life, he wasn't with Dudley. Dudley has
He was accepted into Uncle Vernon's old school, Smeltings. There’s Piers Polks
I’m going there too. Harry, on the other hand, was going to Stonewall High, which was a country school .
Public school. Dudley thought that was pretty funny.
"They bathe people's heads in the bathroom the first day at Stonewall," he said .
Harry said. “Do you want to come upstairs and practice?”
“No, thanks,” Harry said. “The poor cell has nothing like
frustration is like your head underneath — it could be sick.” Then he ran, ahead of Dudley
He can do what he says.
One day in July, Aunt Petunia took Dudley to London to buy her
the smeltings' dress, leaving Harry with Mrs. Figg. Mrs. Figg is not as bad as
usual. Turns out she broke her leg kicking one of her cats, and she
He didn’t seem to care about them as much as he used to. She let Harry watch TV and
She gave him a little chocolate cake that tasted like she had it for years.
years.
That night, Dudley ran a tour of the living room for the family in
his new clothes. The Smeltings boys are wearing blue, orange sweatshirts
knickerbockers, and flat straw hats called boxers. They also got knobbly
sticks, used to hit each other while the teachers weren’t looking. This was
It should be good training for later life.
As Dudley looked at his new jacket, Uncle Vernon said .
Pretty sure that it was the happiest moment of his life. Aunt Petunia burst into tears
And she said she couldn’t believe it was her Ickle Dudleykins, he looked like that
Beautiful and magnificent. Harry didn't trust himself to speak. He thinks both
His lips were probably already chapped from trying not to laugh.
* * *
There was a terrible smell in the kitchen the next morning when Harry went.
Deg for coffee. It sounded like it was coming from a big metal bucket in the kitchen. he
He went to see. The tray was filled with what looked like dirty dishes swimming in the
Gray water.
“What’s that?” Aunt Petunia asked. His lips thick as always.
He does if he can ask questions.
“Your new school computer,” she said.
Harry looked at the bottle again.
“Oh,” he said, “I didn’t realize it was supposed to be so heavy.”
“Don’t be silly,” Aunt Petunia said softly. “I’m cooking something from Dudley .
Old things are dirty to you. It’ll be like everyone else’s when I’m done.”
Harry seriously doubted that, but thought it best not to argue. sat
He reached the table and tried not to think about looking over his shoulder.
First day at Stonewall High — like he was wearing old pigskin boots,
might.
Dudley and Uncle Vernon walked in, both of them with lightning bolts due to the
The smell of Harry's new clothes. Uncle Vernon opened his journal as
usual and Dudley knocked his Smelting wand, which he carried everywhere, on
table.
They heard the click of the mailbox and the flop of letters on the doorbell.
"Bring the flag, Dudley," Uncle Vernon said from behind his coat.
“Let Harry take it.”
“Bring the mail, Harry.”
“Let Dudley take it.”
“Ignore him with your Smelting wand, Dudley.”
Harry packed up the Smelting and went to get the mail. Three things
Lying on the doorknob: a postcard from Marge, Uncle Vernon’s sister, who was
On holiday on the Isle of Wight, a brown envelope that looked like a bill, and —
A letter to Harry.
Harry picked it up and looked at it, his heart throbbing like a giant elastic
band. No one, to whom he had ever written, in his entire life. Who will be responsible? doesn’t have
Friends, no other relatives — it didn’t belong to the library, so it wasn’t even
He received countless texts asking for the books to be returned. But here it was, a letter, spelled like this
There can be no error:
Mr. H. Peter
The cupboard under the cabinets
4 Privet Drive
A small beard
Sorry
The ball was thick and heavy, made of white paper, and
The address is written in emerald green ink. There is no restriction.
Turning the envelope over, his hand trembling, Harry saw a green date
Seal bearing the flag of the country; The lion, the eagle, the eagle, and the serpent who
Capital letter H.
“Hurry, baby!” shouted Uncle Vernon from the kitchen. “What are you
He does, he checks for letter bombs?” He laughed at his joke.
Harry went back to the living room, still looking at his letter. He gave my uncle
Vernon bill and postcard, sat down, and slowly began to open the egg .
letter.
Uncle Vernon opened the bill, smiled wearily, and disappeared
The postcard.
"Marge is sick," he told Aunt Petunia. “Ate a funny whelk….”
"father!" Dudley said quietly. “Dad, Harry has something!”
Harry was about to decipher his letter, written on
A heavy piece of paper like an envelope, as it violently slipped out of his hand
Uncle Vernon's hand.
“It’s mine!” Harry said, trying to make it up.
“Who wrote to you?” said Uncle Vernon, shaking the letter.
He opened it with one hand and stared at it. Her face turned from red to crimson slowly.
above a set of road signs. And he didn’t stop there. Within seconds it was
It was a grayish white than the old one.
“PPTunya!” He's silent.
Dudley tries to grab the letter to read, but Uncle Vernon holds it back .
from his hand. Aunt Petunia picked it up excitedly and read the first paragraph. for one
moment it looked like she might melt. She held her voice and made a
Noise of suspension.
“Vernon! Oh my goodness—Vernon!”
They stared at each other, seemingly forgetting that Harry was
Dudley were still in the room. Dudley wasn't sure he was going to be awakened. He gave his
Pope a lightning bolt over his head with his Smelting spell.
“I want to read that letter,” he said aloud.
“I want to read it,” Harry said enthusiastically, “as if it’s mine.”
“Get out, both of you,” Uncle Vernon said, filling out the letter .
inside his briefcase.
Harry didn't move.
“I WANT MY LETTER!” he shouted.
“Let me see it!” demanded Dudley.
"out!" shouted Uncle Vernon, taking both Harry and Dudley over to the
Scruffs of their heads and threw them down the hall, slamming the kitchen door
Behind them. Harry and Dudley proceeded to fight furiously but silently over who
He would listen to the horn of the ship; Dudley won, so Harry, his jewels hanging from
One ear, he leaned on his stomach to listen to the gap between the door and the floor.
“Vernon,” Aunt Petunia said in a quivering voice, “look at the .
Address — how do they know where he lives? You don’t think
Do they see the house?”
“The root — by magic — might be following us,” he muttered to Uncle Vernon .
with difficulty.
"But what are we going to do, Vernon?" Should we write harder? Tell them we
I don’t want to —”
Harry could see Uncle Vernon's shiny black bands going up and down.
Kitchen.
“No,” he finally said. “No, we will ignore it. If they get no response...
Yeah, that’s great…we didn’t do anything…”
"but -"
"I don't have one at home, Petunia!" We never argued when we were
Got him to clean up that dirty mess?”
That evening when he came home from work, Uncle Vernon made something
He had never done it before; He visits Harry in his prison.
“Where’s my letter?” Harry said, at the same time Uncle Vernon hugged
Through the door. “Who’s writing to me?”
“No one. You were written to you by mistake,” Uncle Vernon snapped.
“I burned it.”
“It wasn’t a mistake,” Harry said angrily, “my punishment is on him.”
"silence!" cried Uncle Vernon, and two bells fell from the
top. He took a few deep breaths, then forced his face to smile, and
It seemed very ridiculous.
“Er—yes, Harry—about this court. Your aunt and I were
You think…you’re actually getting a little nervous about it…we think it might be best if you
She looked into Dudley's second room.
"why?" Harry said.
“Don’t ask!” said his uncle. “Bring this thing upstairs, now.”
The Dursley house had four bedrooms: one for Uncle Vernon and Uncle .
Petunia, one for visitors (usually Uncle Vernon’s sister, Marge), one where
Dudley sleeps, and one where Dudley keeps all the supplies and inconveniences .
In her first bedroom. It only took Harry one trip upstairs to lose everything he had
leading from the warehouse to this room. He sat up in bed, moaning.
in the middle of it. Almost everything here is broken. Video camera of the month
He was sitting on a small, working raft that Dudley drove once on the next
the next-door neighbor’s dog; In the center is Dudley’s first television set, which
He’ll turn a blind eye when his favorite program is cancelled; there
He was a great bird-keeper, who once caught a parrot which Dudley ranked in 100,000.
The wall for the actual air bomb, which was up a staircase with the whole end rounded because
Dudley was sitting on it. Other shelves are filled with books. They are the only
Objects in the room that look like they have never been touched.
From downstairs came the sound of Dudley snapping at his mother, I
I don’t want him there…I need that room…let him out…”
Harry sighed and leaned back on the bed. Yesterday would give
Something will be up here. Today, he better go back to his dungeon with the letter.
than here without him.
The next morning at dawn, everyone was a little quieter. Dudley was in shock.
He screamed, hit his father with his Smelting spell, and got sick the day of
target, beating his mother, and throwing her body through the roof of the jewelry store,
And he still hasn’t gotten his room. Harry was thinking about the moment.
Drowned and anxiously wishing he could open the letter in the hall. Uncle Vernon
And Aunt Petunia kept looking at each other with a smile.
When the mail arrived, Uncle Vernon, who looked like he was trying to be nice .
For Harry, he made Dudley go get him. He was heard hitting things with his
Smelting stick all the way down the hall. Then he shouted, “There’s another one!
'Sir. h. Potter, Smallest Room, Four Privet Streets —'”
With a suppressed gasp, Uncle Vernon jumped out of his seat and ran to the exit of the
Hall, Harry just behind him. Uncle Vernon had to wrestle Dudley to the ground.
Getting the letter was a challenge because Harry had
He grabbed Uncle Vernon by the neck from behind. After a minute of doubt
fight, in which everyone gets hit pretty hard with Smelting's spell, Uncle Vernon
Straight away, he's panting heavily, with Harry's letter clutched in his hand.
“Go to your closet — I mean, your bedroom,” he snapped at Harry.
“Dudley—go—just go.”
Harry walked around his new room. Someone knows he has
He popped out of his shell, as if they knew he hadn’t taken his first.
letter. Surely that means they’ll try again? And this time he will make sure that
He didn't fail. He had a plan.
The repaired alarm clock struck six o’clock the next morning. Harry turned around.
It off quickly and wore silently. He didn't have to save the Dursleys. steal
Downstairs without turning on a single light.
He was going to wait for the postman at the corner of Privet Drive and
Get the letters of the number four first. His heart raced as he ran past
The green room to the front door —
“Aaaarrrgh!”
Harry leapt into the air; He stepped on something big and bulky.
doorknob — something alive!
Lights creep in above, and to his horror, Harry realizes that the eldest,
Squashy something was his uncle's face. Uncle Vernon was sleeping in the
Front door back in a sleeping bag, Harry obviously didn’t
Exactly what he was trying to do. He screamed at Harry for about half an hour.
and then told her to go and make a cup of tea. Harry sadly walked off to
room and when he came back, a letter arrived, straight to Uncle
Vernon’s voice. Harry could see three letters written in green ink.
“I want —” he began, but Uncle Vernon was busy shuffling the letters to .
Eyelashes in front of his eyes.
Uncle Vernon didn’t go to work that day. He stayed at home, smelling
up the mailbox.
“See,” he explained to Aunt Petunia through a mouthful of braids, “if .
They can’t save them they’ll just give up.”
“I don’t think that’s going to work, Vernon.”
“Oh, these people’s minds work in strange ways, Petunia, they’re not like .
I’m you,” Uncle Vernon said, trying to squeeze into a strand with the ease of .
the oatmeal that Aunt Petunia had just brought him.
By Friday, Harry had received no less than a dozen letters. So that they cannot go
With the mail line pushed under the door, the window with
sides, and some even forced them out of the small window in the basement
shower.
Uncle Vernon stayed home as well. After burning all the mail, he found
I got out a hammer and nails and replaced the front and rear springs.
Doors so no one can leave. He praises “Tiptoe with Tulips” as he puts it .
It worked, and it covered the minimal noise.
On Saturday, things started to get out of hand. Twenty-four letters to Harry
They found their way home, rolled over and hid inside each of the two
A dozen eggs that their very ugly egg maker gave to Aunt Petunia
Living room window. If Uncle Vernon makes a frantic phone call to
The post office and the mail company are trying to find someone to complain to, Aunt Petunia
She tore up the letters in her food processor.
“Who on earth wants to talk so badly to you?” Dudley asked Harry in
Shame.
* * *
On Sunday morning, Uncle Vernon sat at the breakfast table looking
He was tired and so sore, but he was happy.
“No post on Sundays,” he proudly reminded them as he sighed .
Marmalade in her newspapers, “no junk mail today —”
Something came crawling down from the kitchen counter as he spoke and
He hit him hard on the back of the head. The next moment, thirty or forty letters
It came flying out of the fire like a bullet. The Dursleys are broke, but Harry
Leaping into the air to grab one —
"New! New!"
Uncle Vernon grabbed Harry by the waist and threw him down the hall.
When Aunt Petunia and Dudley walked out with their hands over their faces,
Uncle Vernon slammed the door shut. They could hear the letters still trickling down.
In the room, it grows from the walls and floor.
“That’s what it does,” Uncle Vernon said, trying to sound calm but pulling away .
Huge tufts from his head in an instant. “I want you all back here at five .
minutes ready to go. We're going. Just pack some clothes. No
right!”
He looked so dangerous with his half-fucked up shit that no one could.
argue. Ten minutes later they broke their way into the parking lot
Turns and they were in the car, speeding towards the main road. Dudley was interested in
rear seats; His dad hit him in the head for grabbing them while he
He tried to pack his television, VCR, and computer into his sports car.
They drove. And they succeeded. Even Aunt Petunia couldn't help wondering where
They were leaving. Every once in a while, Uncle Vernon would take a shortcut and
Drive in the opposite direction for a moment.
“Move them…move them,” he muttered whenever he did that.
They didn’t stop eating or drinking all day. By nightfall, Dudley was stirring.
He had never had such a bad day in his life. He was hungry, he owed her five
TV programs he wanted to watch, and he never went too long without
He wakes up a stranger on his computer.
Uncle Vernon finally stopped outside a quaint looking hotel in
the center of the great city. Dudley and Harry shared a room with two beds and
Black, black sheets. Dudley shouted but Harry remained relaxed, sitting on
body, looks down at the lights of passing cars and thinks….
eating old potato chips and cold canned tomatoes over breakfast in the morning.
The next day. They had just finished when the hotel owner came to their apartment
table.
“'Excuse me, but is one of you Mr. H. Potter? Only I have about ten
Six of them in the front yard.”
She held up a letter so they could read the blue ink address:
Mr. H. Peter
Room 17
Railview Center
Cookworth
Harry grabbed the letter but Uncle Vernon jerked his hand out of the
way. The woman smiles.
“I’ll take them,” Uncle Vernon said, standing quickly and following him .
From the dining room.
* * *
“Wouldn’t it be better if we just went home, sweetheart?” Aunt Petunia suggested.
quietly, hours later, but Uncle Vernon didn't seem to hear him. Exactly
He was searching, and none of them knew. He drove them to the edge of the forest,
He got out, looked around, shook his head, went back to the car, and off they went
again. The same happens in the middle of the fenced field, half way .
a shed of paint, and on the roof of a multi-level parking garage.
“My father is pissed off, isn’t he?” Dudley asked Aunt Petunia quietly.
That afternoon. Uncle Vernon parked at the beach and locked them all inside the
car, and crashed.
It started to rain. Large droplets were wet on the top of the car. Dudley sighed.
“It’s Sunday,” he told his mother. “Humberto the Great tonight. I
They want to sit somewhere with a TV.”
Monday. This reminded Harry of something. If it’s Sunday — it’s
You can usually count on Dudley to know the days of the week, due to
Television — and then tomorrow, Tuesday, is Harry’s eleventh birthday. sure,
His birthday wasn't exactly a surprise — last year, the Dursleys gave him a
cowboy hats and an old pair of Uncle Vernon’s. Still, you’re not eleven
ever.
Uncle Vernon had returned and was smiling. He also carried a long,
peanut butter and didn't answer when Aunt Petunia asked what he bought it for.
“I found the perfect place!” he said. "Player! Everyone out!"
It was very cold outside the cabin. Uncle Vernon was looking at what
It looked like a huge stone path protruding n into the sea. Perched on top of a rock was the tallest
the smallest prison of pain you can imagine. One thing was for sure, no
Television in there.
“Making a bubble for tonight!” Uncle Vernon said excitedly, tapping his arm .
All hands. “And this guy kindly agreed to lend us his boat!”
A toothless old man came up to them, looking at them, with a sign
Wicked grin, in an old wheelbarrow bobbing in the iron-tinted water below them.
“I already got us some presents,” Uncle Vernon said, “so all aboard!”
It was freezing in the pool. The belly of the sea with ice and rain rose from their sails.
And a cold wind brushed their faces. After what seemed like hours
He reached the rock, where Uncle Vernon, stumbling and staggering, led the way to the
Ruined house.
The interior was a mess; It had a strong smell of the sea sea, the wind
shot through holes in the wooden walls, and the fire was hot and
empty. There are only two rooms.
Uncle Vernon’s gifts became a bag of chips each and four
Bananas. He tries to light a fire but the empty cigarette butts only smoke and
It broke.
“Could do with any of those letters now, eh?” he said proudly.
It is in very good condition. Obviously, he thought no one stood
Chance we get them here at a party to deliver letters. Harry agreed privately.
Though that thought didn’t entirely relieve him.
As night fell, the storm they had been promised appeared. Sbry from
High waves splashed the walls of the room and harsh winds stirred up filth.
The doors. Aunt Petunia found some dirt racks in the second room and
He made a bed for Dudley in the mosquito-eaten can. She and Uncle Vernon went
He reached the bunk bed next to the door, and Harry sat down to find the softest piece of floor
He could squirm under the thick, thick blanket.
The storm grows stronger as the night progresses. Harry
He couldn’t sleep. He jumped and turned, trying to steady himself, his
Stomach churning with hunger. Dudley's screams were drowned out by low sobs.
of thunderstorms that started near midnight. Dudley’s clock tone, the
He was lying on the edge of the sofa on his big hand and told Harry to get to eleven
In ten minutes time. He lies and sees his birthday approaching, wondering if
The Dursleys would all remember and wonder where the letter writer was now.
Five minutes to go. Harry heard something shuffling outside. desire
The roof is not going to collapse in, although it could collapse if it does. Four minutes
I'm going. The Privet Drive office will probably be full of mail when they arrive .
Back that he would be able to steal one that way.
Three minutes to go. If it’s the sea, it crashes hard against a rock like
that? And (two minutes to go) what’s that terrifying crackling noise? was
A stone rolling into the sea?
One minute he's going to be eleven. Thirty seconds… twenty… ten…
Nine — probably to wake Dudley up, just to make him jealous — three… two… one…
BUM.
The kiss cut off completely and Harry sat back, staring at the door.
There was someone outside, knocking to enter.
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
Chapter Four
KEYKEEPER
B Um. They arrived again. Dudley perked up.
“Where’s the cannon?” He said through the bubble.
There was a commotion behind them and Uncle Vernon came staggering into the
room. He was holding a gun in his hands – now they knew what was in the
long, thin noodles he had brought with them.
“Who’s there?” he shouted. “I warn you—I’m surrendering!”
There was a pause. so -
SMASH!
She hit the door so hard it snapped off its hinges and
With a loud crack he fell to the ground.
A giant of a man was standing in the doorway. His face was almost
He hides it all with a long mane of hair and a spiky beard, but
You could see his eyes, glistening like black orbs under all the hair.
The giant stumbled his way into the hallway and landed so that his head just
Brush the ceiling. He bent down, lifted the door, and slid it easily back
in its context. The noise from the outside horn dropped slightly. He turned to look.
in all of them.
“Can’t you make us a cup of tea, can yeh? It wasn’t an easy journey.
…”
He trotted over to the sofa where Dudley sat frozen in fear.
“Budge up, yeh great food,” said the stranger.
Dudley yelled, running to hide behind his mother, who was grinning,
Strangely, after Uncle Vernon.
“An' slave Harry!” said the king.
Harry looked at the thin, pale, pale face and saw that
The alligator eyes widened in a blink.
“Las' time I saw you, you were just a baby,” said the squirrel. “Yeah look a
Much like yer father, but yeh've got the eyes of my mother's mother.”
Uncle Vernon made a weak noise.
“I suggest you leave immediately, sir!” he said. “You're getting angry and
You’re in!”
“Oh, shut up, Dursleys, yeh big apple,” said the owl; has reached
floor of the couch, knocked the gun out of Uncle Vernon’s hands, cocked it into a
easily as a paper, and placed it in a circle of
room.
Uncle Vernon made another funny noise, like a mouse was thrown at him.
"Whatever— Harry," the hedgehog said, nodding at the Dursleys, "a . . ."
Very happy birthday to yeh. Got summat fer yeh here — I can sit on it in
A few points, but it’ll make it all better.”
From an inside pocket of his black jacket he pulls a little scraper
box. Harry opened it with trembling fingers. Inside was a large, bound chocolate.
Happy birthday cake Harry wrote on it in green ink.
Harry looked at the woman. He wanted to say thank you, but the words
Falling on the way to his mouth, what he says instead is, “Who are you?”
The giant laughed.
“Of course, I didn’t show up. Rubius Hagrid, the Key Keeper and
Heaven at Hogwarts.”
He let out a huge hand, completely shaking Harry's hand.
“What about the tea then, eh?” he said, rubbing his hands together. "will
You wouldn't say no ter strong summat if yeh'vet, mind.”
His eyes fell on that damn hole with ripped pantyhose in it and he
I fought. It is associated with fire; They couldn’t see what he was doing.
But when he looked back a second later, there was a blinding heat there. Filled
The whole room exploded with flickering light and Harry felt a warmth wash over him
It was as if he had fallen into a warm bath.
The giant sat down on the sofa, which had collapsed under his weight, and
He started pulling all kinds of things out of his jacket pockets: a copper envelope, a
A squashy box of cookies, a poker, a frying pan, several pieces of chocolate, and a
a bottle of some amber juice that a shopkeeper brought before he started making tea.
Soon, the sound and smell of bacon burning filled the store. No one said a
Thing while the king was working, but as he saved the first six of light, fluffy, slightly
With a heavy sigh from the poker, Dudley shuddered slightly. Uncle Vernon said
Simply, “Don’t touch anything he gives you, Dudley.”
The king laughed darkly.
“Yer big son puddings they don’t need to clean up, Dursley, they don’t.
stress."
He passed the bowls to Harry, he was so hungry, he never ate
Something special, but he still couldn't take his eyes off the beast. Finally, like
One who didn’t seem to clarify anything said, “I’m sorry, but I still don’t
They really know who you are.”
The hero took a sip of tea and wiped his mouth with his saliva.
hand.
“Call me Hagrid,” he said, “everyone does this. As I told you, I
The Keeper of the Keys at Hogwarts — it's easy to know all about Hogwarts, really.
“Er — no,” Harry said.
Hagrid looked puzzled.
“I’m sorry,” Harry whispered.
"Sorry?" Hagrid said, turning to stare at the Dursleys, who had perked up .
Back to shadow. “They all should be jealous! I knew you wouldn’t make it.
Yer letters but never thought yeh you wouldn't even know abou' Hogwarts, fer
For crying out loud! Didn’t you ask where your parents learned it all?”
“And what?” Harry asked.
“ALL WHAT?” Hagrid growled. “Now wait jus' a second!”
He had jumped to his feet. In his anger he seemed to fill the whole house. the
The Dursleys were leaning against the wall.
“You mean ter tell me,” he growled at the Dursleys, “that this boy —
This boy! — Doesn't he know anything abou' — about ANYONE?”
Harry thought that was going a bit far. He was in school, after all,
And his brands aren’t bad.
“I know a few things,” he said. “I can, you know, do math and stuff.”
But Hagrid just shrugged and said, “About our world, I mean.
Your world. My world. Yer parents of the world.”
“What in the world?”
Hagrid looked like he was about to explode.
"DURSLY!" he shouted.
Uncle Vernon, who had turned out very pale, liked something that
It sounds like “Mimblwimbl.” Hagrid looks at Harry with a frown.
“But yeh you should know about yer mom and dad,” he said. “I mean, it
famous. You are famous.”
"What? My — Mom and Dad aren't strangers, are they?"
“Yeh I don’t know…yeh I don’t know….” Hagrid ran his fingers through hers .
Dance, gratifying Harry with a mischievous smile.
“Yeh don’t you know what you are?” he said finally.
Uncle Vernon suddenly found his voice.
"stop!" » he ordered. “Stop right there, sir! I warned you to tell the boy.
anything!"
A tougher man than Vernon Dursley would crumble under the best of luck .
Look Hagrid now gave it to him; When Hagrid spoke, his every syllable grew s
rage.
“You didn’t tell him? I never told him what was in Dumbledore’s letter
Did he leave him alone? I was there! I knew Dumblur had abandoned her, Dursley! And you kept it
From him all these years?”
“You caught what for me?” Harry said excitedly.
"Stop! I HATE YOU!” cried Uncle Vernon in despair.
Aunt Petunia gave a terrified gasp.
“Oh, go bend yer heads, two of yeh,” said Hagrid. “Harry — yer a
A magician.”
There was silence inside the store. Only the sea and the wind blowing
It can be heard.
“I what?” exclaimed Harry.
"A wizard, indeed," Hagrid said, and leaned back against the sofa, i
relaxed and fell further, “an' a good thumpin' 'un, I'd say, once yeh've .
He’s trained a little bit. With a mother an' father like yours, what else would yeh be?
An' I figured it was abou' time yeh read yer letter.”
Harry finally reached out to take the yellow envelope.
painted emerald green for Mr. H. Potter, Castle, Room on the Rock,
sea. He pulled out the letter and read:
HOGWARTS SCHOOL OF Wizardry & Wizardry
Principal: ALBOUS DUMBLIDOUR
(The Order of Merlin, Class 1, Grand Warden, Chf. Warlock, Supreme
Mugwump, the international community. of wizards)
Hi Mr Peter,
We are pleased to announce that you have been accepted into Hogwarts
School of Career and Skills. Please find a list of all requirements.
Books and materials.
The term begins September 1st. We expect your bug no later than July 31st.
Yours sincerely,
Minerva McGonagall,
School principal
Questions exploded inside Harry's head like fireworks and he couldn't
Decide who to ask first. After a few minutes he whispered, “What did he do .
Mean, are they waiting for my base?”
"Gallopin' Gorgons, that reminds me," Hagrid said, offering his hand to
His kick with enough force to knock over a buggy horse, and from another
pocket inside his jacket pulls out a mouse — real, live, looking animated
owl — a long, paper-thin beak. with his tongue between his teeth .
He wrote a note that Harry could read upside down:
Hi Professor Dumbledore,
He gave Harry his letter.
Going to buy his shoes tomorrow.
The weather is amazing. I hope you are doing well.
Hagrid
Hagrid crumpled up the letter and handed it to the owl, who held it in her mouth.
He went to the door and led the monkey out into the trap. Then he came back and
They remain just as good as talking on the phone.
Harry realized his mouth was open and shut it quickly.
“Where am I?” Hagrid said, but at that moment, Uncle Vernon, still
Ashen-faced but looking very happy, he looked into the firelight.
“It’s not going,” he said.
Hagrid groaned.
"I'd like to see a great Muggle like you stopped," he said.
“Oh what?” Harry said, excited.
'A Muggle,' said Hagrid, 'that's what we call folk who aren't as magical as they are.
An' it's bad luck you grew up in the richest family of Muggles I've ever put
Eyes on.”
“We promise when we introduce him we’re going to stop the bullshit,” he said .
Uncle Vernon, “he tried to get us out of it! A magician indeed!”
“You know?” Harry said. “Did you know I’m a — wizard?”
"recognize!" Aunt Petunia said suddenly. "He knows! Of course we do!
How could you not, my dratted sister is what it is? Oh, she has a letter.
Just like that and he came down to this — the school — and came home every
Holidays with her pockets full of dog beans, she turns teacups into fruits. I was
Only one saw her for what she was — a coward! But for my mother and
Dad, oh no, it's Lily this and Lily that, they're proud to have a witch in
family!"
She paused to take a deep breath, then continued to thrust. It appears
She had been wanting to say all this for years.
“Then she met that Potter at school and they moved out, got married and had
You are, and of course I know you’re going to be just as, just as awkward, just — like —
abnormal — and then, if you’re sorry, she went and infected herself and we
He came with you!”
Harry had gone very white. As soon as he found his voice he said:
“Dismissed? You told me they died in a car accident!”
“CAR TRACK!” yelled Hagrid, angrily jumping up to the Dursleys .
They scuttled towards them. “How could a car accident have killed Lily and James Potter?
It’s anger! Scandal! Harry Potter didn’t know his own story when every
Kid in our world knows her name!”
“But why? What happened?" Harry asked quietly.
Anger drained from Hagrid's face. He looked suddenly sorry.
“I didn’t expect that,” he said, voice low, worried. “I have no idea,
When Dumbledore told me there might be difficulty in catching you, how much
Yeh doesn't know. Oh, Harry, I don’t know if I’m the right person to tell —
But somebody must — yeh can’t leave ter Hogwarts don’t know.”
He threw a nasty look at the Dursleys.
“Well, it’s all right yeh you know as far as I can tell yeh — mind, I can’t tell .
Yeh everything, it’s a big secret, parts of it….”
He sat down, looked into the fire for a few seconds, and then said, “It’s .
It starts, I think, with — with a person called — but it’s pretty much yeh ur
They know his name, everybody in our world knows —”
"who?"
“Well — I don’t like saying the name if I can help it. No one does.”
"why not?"
“Gulpins, Harry, humans are still scared. Blimey, this is difficult.
See, there was this magician who went ...bad. So that you cannot go. bad.
What's worse than the iris. His name is…”
Hagrid grunted, but no words came out.
“Can you write it?” Harry suggested.
“Nah — can’t imagine. All right — Voldemort. ” Hagrid shouted. “Ur'
Let me say it again. Anyway, this — this magician, some twenty years ago now, .
They began to turn fer his followers. Got 'em, too — some scared, some just
He wanted a little o' his power, 'cause he was getting himself power, as it should be. black
Days, Harry. I don’t know who she trusts, I can’t wait to meet the stranger.
Wizards or witches…terrible things happen. He was following. 'Of course, some
stood before him — an' killed them. With fear. One of the only safe places left
There was Hogwarts. Consider it’s only Dumbledore you know who’s scared
of. He couldn't help but take over the school, not just then, anyway.
“Now, yer mother an' father were as good a witch an' wizard as I ever knew.
Head boy an' girl at Hogwarts back in their day! Supposedly the secret is why YouKnow-Who never tried to get them on his side before…maybe he knew they were
Too close to Dumbledore ter want anything to do with the dark side.
“Maybe he thought he could convince them…maybe he just wanted them .
From the road. Everyone knows, he's back in the village where you all were
They lived, on Halloween ten years ago. You only have one year. He came ter yer
The house is — is —”
Suddenly, Hagrid pulls out a very filthy, hole-stained tombstone and pushes
His nose sounds like a pipe organ.
“I’m sorry,” he said. “But it’s fun — you know Mom and Dad, it’s cool
Yeh people can’t find it — no matter what….
“You knowWho killed them. An' then — an' this is the real secret of .
Thing is — he tried to kill you too. I want to make a clean job of it, I guess,
Or maybe he just likes killin' until then. But he couldn't do it. I didn’t ask.
How did you get that balance in your head? That was no ordinary cut. It's okay
yeh get mad when a strong, bad curse hits yeh — take care of mommy and daddy
An' yer house, too — but it ain't working for you, an' that's why yer famous, .
Harry. Nobody's alive after he decides ter kill 'em, nobody but you, an'.
He killed some o' poor fellows in the fall of time — McKinnon,
Bones, Prewetts — an' you're just a baby, an' you're alive.”
Something very strange was going on in Harry's mind. Like the story of Hagrid
He came to a corner and again saw the flash of a green light, well beyond the
He remembers it once before — and he remembers something else, i
For the first time in his life: a loud, cool, brutal laugh.
Hagrid was looking at him sadly.
“I captured yeh from the ruined house myself, on Dumbledore’s orders.
Got yeh ter this food….”
“Pretty old tosh,” Uncle Vernon said. Harry jumped; He almost had
Forget that the Dursley's were there. Uncle Vernon really seemed to have
He regained his courage. He was staring at Hagrid and his brows furrowed.
“Now, you’re listening here, kid,” he whispered, “I agree there’s something .
worry for you, there’s probably nothing a good shot won’t cure — and
As for all this about your parents, well, they were awesome, there’s no denying it, and
The world is better off without them in my opinion — shoot all they got,
They are created and these kinds of landmarks — just what I expected, always
They knew they’d come to the end of the stick —”
But at that moment Hagrid leaped from the sofa and whipped out a beaten knight.
Umbrella from inside his flesh. He shows this to Uncle Fernon as a river, he
He said, “I warn you, Dursley—I warn you—one more word….”
In danger of being swallowed by a bearded giant on the end of the table.
Uncle Vernon's courage sank again; He leaned against the wall and
He's silent.
“That’s better,” Hagrid said, breathing heavily, and leaning back .
coffee, which he spilled this time to the ground.
As for Harry, he still had hundreds of questions to ask.
“But what happened to Vol-, I’m sorry — I mean, you know-who?”
“Good question, Harry. He fell. He fell. That same night he tried t
I'll kill you. Makes yeh more intelligent. This is a big mystery, look… there is
Gettin 'more an' more power — why did he go?
“Some say he’s dead. Codswallop, in my opinion. I don’t know if he had what it took.
Man remains in it to die. Some say he’s still out there, biding his time, it seems, but I
Don't believe it. The people around him became our ter. Some of them
He came out of the trance genre. They don’t think they can do it if he’s coming.
back.
“Most of us insist that he’s still walking around in there somewhere, but he’s lost his powers.
Too weak to continue. “Because something about you perfects it, Harry. there
There was something going on that night that he didn’t count on—I don’t know what it was,
No one does—but something about you makes it fun, all right.”
Hagrid looked at Harry with admiration and respect shining in his eyes, but
Harry, instead of feeling happy and content, felt sure that there was a
Horrible mistake. A witch? he? How could it be? He spent his life.
They'd been knocked out by Dudley, and they'd been crushed by Aunt Petunia and Uncle Vernon; If he
It was really magical, why not turn them into stuffed animals every time
They tried to keep him in his custody? If he had won one big time
Wizard in the world, how could Dudley always deceive him
Around like football?
“Hagrid,” he said quietly, “I think you may have made a mistake. I don't
I think I can be a witch.”
To his surprise, Hagrid laughed.
“Not magical, eh? You never made things happen when you were scared or
angry?"
Harry looked into the fire. Now come to think of it… every nonsense
The thing that made his aunt and uncle unhappy happened when
He, Harry, was either sad or angry… chased by Dudley’s gang, he was somehow
He finds himself out of their reach… scared to go to school with that creepy
haircut, managed to grow it back…that was the last time Dudley had
Did he beat him, had he not gotten his revenge, without realizing he was doing it?
Didn’t he put a boa guard on her?
Harry looked at Hagrid, smiling, and saw that Hagrid was okay
He beams at her.
"see?" Hagrid said. “Harry Potter, you are not a wizard — you wait, you would be .
famous honor at Hogwarts.”
But Uncle Vernon was not going to surrender without a fight.
“Didn’t I tell you it wasn’t going?” He's silent. “Going to the Rock
High and he would appreciate it. I read the letters and he needs all sorts of
vanity — with book metaphors and buttons and —”
“If ter wants to go, a big Muggle like you won’t stop him,” he growled .
Hagrid. "Stop Lily and James Potter's son going to Hogwarts!" Place mad. his
His name was lost from birth. He was in the best school of
women and girls around the world. Seven years there and he didn’t know
His hands. to be the younger of his kind, fer a change, an' to be under
The Headmaster of Hogwarts who had Dumbled Albus—”
“I’M NOT PAYING FOR SOME OLD CRACKPOT FUCKERS TO .
TEACH HIM THE BACKGROUNDS!” shouted Uncle Vernon.
But lately, he’s gone too far. Hagrid gripped his drum and spun it.
Over his head, “NOT GOING —” he whispered, “— ASSULT — ALBUS — .
DUMBLEDURE — READ — FORWARD — SAY!”
got the flag swinging in the air to signify the
Dudley — there was a flash of violet light, a sound like a firecracker, a sharp cry .
squeal, and the next second, Dudley was dancing on the spot with his hands
He bent over his fur floor, wheezing in pain. Turning his back on them,
Harry saw the frozen pig's tail biting into a hole in his trousers.
Uncle Vernon shouted. Dragging Aunt Petunia and Dudley into another
room, he took one last nervous look at Hagrid and closed the door behind him
them.
Hagrid looked down at his wand and stroked his beard.
“She shouldn’t have lost my temper,” he sighed, “but it didn’t work .
anyway. I wanted to make him a pig, but I thought he looked too much like a pig
Anyway there’s not much left ter do.”
He took a sideways glance at Harry under his thick glasses.
“Be thankful if yeh didn’t mention that ter one at Hogwarts,” he said.
“I — er — shouldn’t do magic, after all. I was invited to do a
Bit ter follow you and get your mail for you an'stuff — one of the reasons I'm so
Keen ter to take on the job.”
“Why shouldn’t you do magic?” Harry asked.
“Oh, well — I was at Hogwarts myself but I — er — got kicked out, ter tell .
Yeh true. In my third year. Snapped me wand in half an' everything.
But Dumbledore allowed me to stay as a waiter. Great man, Dumbledore.”
“Why did they kick you out?”
"It's getting late and we have a lot to do tomorrow," Hagrid said aloud.
“Got to get up ter town, get all the books yer an' this.”
He took off his thick black coat and tossed it to Harry.
“You can kip under that,” he said. “Don’t mind if it’s a little irritating, I guess
I still have two doorbells in a row.”
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
Chapter Five
THE DIAGON LETTER
H arry woke up early the next morning. Although he may think it's daylight,
He kept his eyes tightly shut.
“It was a dream, he told himself firmly. “I dreamed of a prince called Hagrid
He came to tell me to go to the Wizarding School. When I open my eyes I be
At home in my prison.”
Suddenly, there was a loud bang.
And there was Aunt Petunia knocking on the door, Harry thought, his heart .
The fall. But he still didn't open his eyes. It was such a nice dream.
tap. tap. tap.
“Alright,” Harry smirked, “I’m up.”
He sat up and Hagrid's heavy cloak fell off him. The room was filled with
Sunlight, the steam finished, Hagrid himself was asleep on the sunken sofa,
And there's a mouse kicking its paw on the window, a newspaper stuck in its paw
Mouth.
Harry rose to his feet, so happy, he felt like a giant wall.
He was melting inside her. He walked straight to the window and quickly opened it. the
An owl comes in and throws a newspaper at Hagrid, who doesn't wake up
up. Then the dragon flew across the ground and started to bite Hagrid's head off.
“Don’t do that.”
Harry tried to push the voice out of the way, but it cut his mouth.
firmly on him and continued to hold the dress.
“Hagrid!” Harry said aloud. “There’s a bug —”
“Pay him,” Hagrid growled softly into the sofa.
"what?"
“He wanted to pay fer the delivery of the paper. Look in pockets.”
Hagrid’s suit seemed to be made up of nothing but pockets — buttons of
Keys, keychains, keychains, peppermint vaporizers, teacups… finally, Harry
He pulled out a handful of weird-looking syringes.
“Give him five Knuts,” Hagrid said sleepily.
"animal?"
“The Silver Little Mermaids.”
Harry counted down to fifteen little copper minutes, and the voice poked his foot like this
Harry was able to put the money in a small leather pouch attached to it. Then he flew away.
With the window open.
Hagrid sighed loudly, sat up, and blushed.
"Okay, Harry, too much to do today, I need to get up for London and buy all
Yer things fer school.”
Harry was looking at the wizard's potions and smiling. He had just had
He thought of something that made him feel like a balloon of happiness inside him
He had a voice.
"Um—Hagrid?"
“Mmm?” said Hagrid, who drew his big paws.
“I have no money—and you heard Uncle Vernon last night…he .
He’s not paying me to go learn magic.”
“Don’t worry about that,” Hagrid said, standing up and extending his arm .
head. “D'yeh you think yer parents didn't leave yeh anything?”
“But if their house burns down—”
“They don’t keep their gold at home, kid! No, the first stop for us is
Gringotts. The Witch Bank. You'll have a hat, they ain't bad colds — an' I would'.
Say no to teh little o' yer birthday cake, too.”
“Wizards have banks?”
“Just one. Gringotts. They run from the monsters.”
Harry dropped the piece of cake he was holding.
"animal?"
“Yeah — so yeh'd be a fool ter tried an' robt, I'd tell yeh that. Never screw it up
With animals, Harry. Gringotts is the best place in the world fer anything yeh
I wanted ter to be safe — 'cept maybe Hogwarts. ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜⵜ, ⵉⵍⴰⵇ ⴰⴷ ⵥⵔⴻⵖ
Gringotts anyway. For Dumbledore. The Hogwarts thing.” Hagrid pulled himself together.
With pleasure. “It usually gives me ter to do important things feras. I’ll take you —
He got stuff from Gringotts — he knows he can trust me, see.”
“Do you have everything? Come on, then.”
Harry followed Hagrid out onto the rock. The sky was pretty clear now.
And the sea sparkled in the sunlight. The boat that Uncle Vernon rented is still
There, with a lot of water on the ground after the storm.
“How did you get here?” Harry asked, looking around for another boat.
“Fly,” Hagrid said.
"flew?"
“Yeah — but we’ll get back into that. I don’t think I’d use magic now that I have
Got yeh.”
Sitting in the boat, Harry was still staring at Hagrid, trying to
Imagine it flying.
“Seems a shame ter row, though,” Hagrid said, handing Harry another of .
He looked aside. “If I’m ter — er — I’ll slow things down a bit, you’ll have a mind .
Didn’t I mention it at Hogwarts?”
“Of course not,” Harry said, eager to see more magic. Hagrid came out.
The blue flag again, caught her twice on the side of the boat, and they went fast
to the ground.
“Why bother trying to rob Gringotts?” Harry asked.
“Spells — spells,” Hagrid said, flipping through his journal as he .
called. “They say there are dragons who guard the highest vaults. And then yeh
We’ve got to find yer way — Gringotts is hundreds of miles below London, see. deep
Down Underground. Yeh'd die of starvation you tried to leave, even though yeh did
Follow ter to get yer hands on the summat.”
Harry sat thinking about this while Hagrid read his journal, the
Christmas every day. Harry learns from Uncle Vernon that people like to be left
alone while doing this, but it was so hard, he didn’t have that many
questions in his life.
“The Ministry of Magic discusses business as usual,” Hagrid said, turning .
The page.
“There’s a Ministry of Magic?” Harry asked, before pausing
His hands.
“'Of course,” Hagrid said. “They want Dumbledore as minister, o'.
True, but he couldn't leave Hogwarts, so old Cornelius Fudge got the job.
A bungler if ever there was one. Hence, he surprises Dumbledore with worms every morning.
Askin' for advice.”
“But what does a Ministry of Engineering do?”
“Well, their main job is to protect him from the Muggles that he still exists .
Witches an' witches up an' down.”
"why?"
"For what? Blimey, Harry, everyone's going to want a magic solution for themselves
Problems. Nah, we’d better be alone.”
At this moment the boat crashed gently against the fort wall. Hagrid
He unfolded his newspaper, and they climbed the stone steps to the street.
Passersby stared at Hagrid a lot as they walked through the small town to
The station. Harry couldn't blame them. Not only is Hagrid twice as tall as
Everyone else is constantly looking at trivial things like parking meters and
He said aloud, “See that, Harry? Things these Muggles are looking for, eh?”
“Hagrid,” Harry said, hesitating slightly as he ran to continue, “you said .
Are there dragons at Gringotts?”
"Well, that's what they say," Hagrid said. “Crikey, I want someone to give me a dragon.”
“You like someone?”
“I’ve wanted one since I was a kid — here we go.”
They reached the station. The train to London was at five
minutes of time. Hagrid, who doesn’t understand “Muggle money”, as he calls it,
He gave the bills to Harry to buy their presents.
People move more than ever before on the train. Hagrid took two seats and
They were ripping what looked like a little canary circus tent.
“Do you still have your letter, Harry?” he asked as he counted the circles.
Harry pulled a paper ball out of his pocket.
“Okay,” Hagrid said. “There’s a list there of everything you need.”
Harry unfolded the second card he hadn't seen that night.
After, and read:
HOGWARTS SCHOOL OF Wizardry & Wizardry
uniform
First-year students will need:
1. Three simple work pieces (black)
2. One short (black) dress for day wear
3. One piece of protection (dragon tail or similar)
4. A winter coat (black, silver details)
Please note that all student uniforms must have name tags.
COURSE BOOKS
All students should have a copy of each of the following:
The Book of Essays (Volume 1) by Miranda Goshawk
A History of Magic by Batilda Bagshot
Magical Theory by Adalbert Waffling
A Beginners Guide to Switching by Emeric Switch
A Thousand Mushrooms and Magical Bugs by Phyllida Spore
Patterns and Magic Recipes by Arsenius Jigger
Favorite Animals and Where to Find Them by Newt Scamander
Dark Forces: A Guide to Self-Defense by Quentin Trimble
OTHER REPORT
1 stick
1 cup (stone, special size 2)
1 set of glass or crystal teapot
1 Telescope Set
1 copper scale
Students can also bring in a turtle or a cat or a turtle.
PARENTS ARE REMINDED THAT THE EARLY YEARS ARE NOT
THEY HAD THEIR ROOMS
“Can we afford all this in London?” Harry asked aloud.
“If you know where you’re going,” Hagrid said.
Harry had never been to London before. Although Hagrid seemed to know
Where he's going, he obviously didn't mean to get there in any ordinary way
way. He stuck to the ticket counter at the Undermetro, and complained
loudly that the seats are too small and the air conditioning is too cramped.
"I don't know how Muggles manage without magic," he said when they were .
He climbed a crumbling escalator that led down to a street lined with shops.
Hagrid was so tall that he parted the crowd easily; All Harry had to do was
He was sitting close behind her. They passed bookstores and music stores,
Hamburger restaurant and cinema, but nowhere that looks like it might sell
You are a magic wand. This was just an ordinary street full of ordinary people.
Could there really be deposits of faint gold buried for miles beneath? He was there.
Really stores that sell coloring and painting books? Maybe this isn’t at all something
the biggest joke cooked up by the Dursleys? Had Harry not known that
The Dursleys were uneasy, he might have thought so; Still, even
Despite everything Hagrid had told him so far was unbelievable, Harry couldn't
Help build trust.
“That’s it,” Hagrid said, coming to a stop, “Leaky Girl. and a
A familiar place.”
It was a small, rough-looking mansion. If it hadn’t been for Hagrid’s intervention, Harry
He didn’t realize he was there. People passing by simply didn’t bat an eye.
Their eyes shoot from the large bookstore on one side to the record store on the other.
Another is like they can’t see the Leaky Cauldron at all. In fact, Harry had
It felt most important that only he and Hagrid could see him. Before he can
Mention that, and Hagrid was leading him inside.
For a familiar place, it was very dark and gloomy. Some older women are
They sit in a corner and drink tiny tea cups. One of them was smoking a
A long stone. A little guy in a big shirt was talking to the old bartender, who was
very dry and looks like toothless walnuts. The small voice of conversation stopped.
When they entered, everyone seemed to know Hagrid; Shocking and silent.
at him, and the butler reached for a cup and said, “The usual, Hagrid?”
“I can’t, Tom, I’m on Hogwarts business,” Hagrid said, biting into his massive beard .
His hand on Harry's thigh and made Harry's lips curl up.
“Good Lord,” the bartender said, looking at Harry, “that’s it — that could be it .
—?”
Leaky Cauldron had suddenly looked completely calm and quiet.
“Bless my soul,” the old bartender snapped, “Harry Potter…what the
honor."
He stormed out from behind the bar and ran up to Harry, grabbing his
Hand, tears in her eyes.
“Welcome back, Mr. Potter, welcome back.”
Harry didn't know what to say. Everyone was staring at him. ancient
A woman with a pipe flies past him without him realizing that she has disappeared. Hagrid
He was beaming.
Then there was a big crunch of chairs and the next moment, Harry .
He found himself looking out for everyone in the Leaky Cauldron.
"Doris Crookford, Mr. Potter, I can't believe I'm finally meeting you."
“As proud as I am, Mr. Potter, I am only too proud.”
“Always wanted to shake your hand — I’m all for smiling.”
“Fortunately, Mr. Potter, I just couldn’t help but tell you, Diggle’s name, Dedalus .
Tell me.”
“I saw you earlier!” Harry said, as the top of Dedalus Diggle collapsed into
His joy. “You bumped into me once in a store.”
“He remembers!” shouted Dedalus Diggle, glaring at everyone.
“Did you hear that? He remembers me!” Harry frowned again and again —
Doris Crookford keeps coming back for more.
A blond young man made his way forward, very nervous. One of them
The eyes were closed.
“Professor Quirrell!” Hagrid said. "Harry, Professor Quirrell would be one . . ."
of your teachers at Hogwarts.”
"PP-Potter," Professor Quirrell whispered, taking Harry's hand, "I can't tell you how happy I am to meet you."
“What kind of magic do you teach, Professor Quirrell?”
“You are a defender against the dark arts of Darkness,” he muttered to Professor Quirrell, as .
although he wished he didn't think about it. “Not that we need it, yes, PPPotter?”
He laughed nervously. “You will have all your belongings, I suppose? I have
I got to pdf a new book about vampires, miman.” He looked nervously at the
The very thought.
But the others wouldn't let Professor Quirrell take Harry for himself. it
It took him almost ten minutes to get rid of them all. In the end, Hagrid manages to
He made himself listen on the pillow.
“You’ve got to get it — a lot ter buy. Come on, Harry.”
Doris Crookford shakes Harry's hand one last time, and Hagrid bids them farewell
into the bar and out into a small fenced-in courtyard, where nothing
But it’s a hole in the wall and some grass.
Hagrid whispered to Harry.
“She said yeh, didn’t I? Told yeh you were a mess. Even Professor Quirrell
Was getting ter meet yeh — mind you, he’s usually getting better.”
“Was he always growing like this?”
“Oh, yes. Poor guy. Beautiful head. He was fine while studying.
outta books but then took a year off ter get some experience of his own ….
Say he meets vampires in the Black Forest, and there’s a nasty problem with
A hag — he hasn’t been the same since. He was afraid of the students, afraid of himself.
Subject — now, where is my ink?”
Vampires? Hogs? Harry's head was swimming. Hagrid, meanwhile, was
They counted the bricks in the wall above the chimney stack.
“Three up…two down…” he muttered. “Of course, stand back, Harry.”
He tapped the wall three times with the butt of his fist.
The birk he’s holding twitches—tears—in the middle, a
A small explosion appeared — growing higher and higher — a second later they were
past a hallway big enough even for Hagrid, a hallway across a gravel path
The road twisted and disappeared from sight.
“Welcome,” Hagrid said, “on Diagon Street.”
He smiled at Harry's surprise. They pass through the crossroads.
Harry slowly looked over his shoulder and watched the narrow path instantly widen.
Return to the solid wall.
The sun is shining brightly on a stand of cookies outside the nearest store.
Cauldrons — All Sizes — Copper, Copper, Copper, Silver — Self Storage —
Collapsible, says a sign attached to them.
“Yes, you’ll need one,” Hagrid said, “but we’ve got to get your money
first."
Harry wished he had at least eight more eyes. He put his head in every
view as they walked down the street, trying to see everything at once: and
Shops, things outside of them, people doing their shopping. The elderly woman
Outside a nun shakes her head as they walk by and says, “Dragon .
liver, seventeen ounce Sickles, neglected….”
A low, soft whisper came from a green shop with a sign that said Eeylops .
Emporium of charms — tawny, screek, barn, frog, and snow. Many children of
For Harry's age they were pressed nose-to-nose against a window with sharp blinds in
it. “Look,” Harry heard one of them say, “The new two-thousand nimbus — .
Most definitely —” There were shops selling clothes, shops selling telescopes and .
The finest silver tools Harry had never seen before, the handles lined with
bombs of pigskin and pigs eyes, boxes of knitting books, knitting, and
Paper cups, medicine bottles, moonshine strings….
"It's Gregorian," Hagrid said.
They reached a snow-white building that towered over another.
Small shops. Standing beside its polished silver doors, wearing a
Red and gold, there was —
“Yeah, it’s a beast,” Hagrid whispered as they walked across the plain .
The stone steps beside it. The goblin was a head cut off from Harry. have
Fair, smart face, bushy beard and, Harry noticed, very long fingers and
feet. He collapsed as they walked inside. Now they were facing the second of
The doors, silver this time, with words carved on them:
Enter, stranger, but be careful
In what concerns the sin of lust,
For those who touch, but do not receive,
They have to pay a lot in their turn.
So if you’re looking for our underground
The treasure is not yours,
Thief, you have been warned, beware
of finding more treasure there.
“Like I said, Yeh'd be mad ter trying to get rid of him,” Hagrid said.
Two clocks set off from the silver doors and were in a
The grand marble fireplace. About a hundred other animals sat on high chairs.
Behind the long counter, filling in ledgers, weighing coins on a copper scale,
She examined the precious stones in the blink of an eye. There are many ways to
They counted up the hall, and more animals were pointing people in and out
of these. Hagrid and Harry immediately ordered for the launcher.
“Lightning,” Hagrid said to a free mouse. “We came to get some
Money from Mr. Harry Potter’s wardrobe.”
“Do you have a key for it, sir?”
“Got it here somewhere,” Hagrid said, and began unpacking his own .
jig on the counter, spreading a handful of dirty dog ​​biscuits on
The Goblin Book of Numbers. The goblin wrinkled his nose. Harry looked
the goblin on their right orbits a large ruby ​​jug like flowing glass.
“You got him,” Hagrid said at last, holding up a small golden box.
The goblin looked at her closely.
“That seems to be in order.”
"An' I've also got a letter here from Professor Dumbledore," Hagrid said .
Importantly, he kicks his chest. “It’s about you-know-what’s in store .
Seven hundred and three.”
The monster read the letter carefully.
“All right,” he said, adding to Hagrid, “I’ll have one .
It will lead you to two dungeons. Griphok!”
Griphook was a different beast. Once, Hagrid filled the dog up completely.
Biscuits back inside his pockets, he and Harry followed Griphook to one of the
Windows leading from the hall.
“What is it You-Know-What’s at the top of seven hundred and thirteen?”
Harry asked.
“Can’t say yeh that,” Hagrid said mysteriously. “A lot of secrets. Hogwarts
business. Dumbledore trusted me. More'n my precious work ter tell yeh that.”
Griphook held the door open for them. Harry, who expects more
Marble, surprised. They were in a narrow corridor of steam-lit rock.
Festivals. It slopes steeply downwards and there are some iron bars in the
floor. Griphook smiled and a small car came rushing down the tracks towards the
them. They climb in — Hagrid with some difficulty — and leave.
At first they just wandered around in a maze of twisted streets. Harry tried
He would remember, left, right, right, left, center of the cluster, right, left, but he couldn’t.
The creeping chariot seemed to know its way around, because Griphook wasn't
Wisdom.
Harry's eyes stung as cold air rushed past them, but he held them
Wide open. Once, he thought he saw a flare of fire at the end of a corridor and
They get tested to see if it’s a dragon, but it’s too late — they fall even
deep, passing through an underground lake where giant stalactites and stalagmites grow .
from the ceiling and floor.
“I don’t know,” Harry called Hagrid over the noise of the car, “what
The difference between a stalagmite and a stalactite?”
"The stalagmite has an 'm' in it," Hagrid said. “Don’t ask me
Right now, I think I’m going to be sick.”
He looked very green, and when the car finally stopped next to a young
door in the spaceship, out comes Hagrid and has to lean against the ship to stop
His legs from resting.
Griphook unlocked the door. A lot of green smoke billowed,
And as it turned out, Harry moaned. Inside are golden cupcakes. The ships of
silver. Heaps of small bronze Knuts.
“All yours,” Hagrid smirked.
All of Harry’s — it’s incredible. The Dursleys couldn't watch
therefore or they will get it from him more quickly than a smile. How many times has he
Complaining how much Harry paid them to keep him? And all the time he was there
It was a little secret that was hers, buried deep beneath London.
Hagrid helped Harry gather some of it into a bag.
“The gold ones are Galleons,” he explained. “Seven Sickles Silvers for .
One Galleon and twenty-nine Knuts to a Sickle is pretty easy. Of course, you should
Be enough for a couple o' terms, and we'll keep the rest safe for yeh.” He turned to
Griphok. “Vault seven thirteen now, please, and we can go further .
slow?"
"Just one thing," Griphook said.
They were walking more now and gathering strength. The air became
They cool off significantly as they round tight corners. They went and knocked on a
underground, and Harry bent over the side to try and see what was underneath
In the dark, but Hagrid snarled and pulled him back by his
neck.
Vault seven thirty-three does not have a check-in counter.
“Stand back,” Griphook growled. He touched the door briefly.
with one of his long legs and just melted away.
“If anyone but a Gringotts hero dares to attempt this, they will be immediately expelled .
gate and he’s trapped there,” Griphook said.
“How often do you check if anyone is inside?” Harry asked.
"About once every ten years," Griphook said with a sly grin.
Something extraordinary must be inside this high-security enclosure,
Harry was exhausted, and leaned forward casually, expecting to see the beautiful landscapes.
At least — but at first he thought it was a trap. Then he saw a monster
A little box wrapped in brown paper lies on the floor. Hagrid picked it up.
And he threw it deep inside his bag. Harry wanted to know what it was, but he knew
Better to ask.
“Come on, get back in this goddamn car, and don’t talk to me on the street .
Besides, I’d better keep my mouth shut,” Hagrid said.
A gravel drive later they stood smiling in the sunlight outside Gringotts.
Harry didn't know where to run first now that he had a bag full of money. he
He didn’t need to know how many Galleons were in a pound to know that he
He had made more money than he had in his entire life—more money than
Dudley had too.
“You better get your clothes,” Hagrid said, nodding at Madam .
Malkin robes for every occasion. “Listen, Harry, if I hear
off fer a pick-me-up at the Leaky Pond? I hate them with Gringott wheels.” did
Still looking a bit ill, Harry went into Mrs. Malkin's room alone and felt
nervous.
Madam Malkin was a smiling, twinkling witch, dressed in all magical attire.
“Hogwarts, sweetheart?” she said, as Harry began to speak. “It took a lot
Here — another young man has just been ordained, in fact.”
At the foot of the stairs, a pale, pale-faced boy stood on a
Footsteps while a second woman combed her long black skirt. Ms. Malkin
Harry stood on a stool next to her, draped a long cloak over her head, and began to
To adjust to the required length.
“Hello,” said the boy, “Hogwarts too?”
“Yeah,” Harry said.
“My father next door sells my books, and my mother is in the street
They’re looking at the windows,” the boy said. He had a low, shrill voice. “Then I
He would take them out and hit the toy circle. I don’t know why first years can’t
They have their own property. I think I'm going to convince my dad to get me one and register it
somehow."
Harry seriously reminds Dudley.
“Do you have your own kit?” The boy continued.
“No,” Harry said.
“Playing Quidditch together?”
“No,” Harry said again, wondering what on earth Quidditch could be.
“I — Dad says it’s a curse if I’m not picked to play for my house, .
And I have to say, I agree. Do you know what house you’ll be in by now?”
“No,” Harry said, feeling weirder by the minute.
“Well, no one really knows until they get there, or not, but I know they will .
Being in Slytherin, our whole family was — imagine being in Hufflepuff, I guess .
I’m going, aren’t I?”
“Mmm,” Harry said, wishing he could say something a little more .
interesting.
“I said, look at that guy!” The boy said suddenly, cocking his head forward.
window. Hagrid was standing there, looking at Harry and glaring at the two eldest
Ice creams to show he couldn’t enter.
"It's Hagrid," Harry said, excited to know something the boy didn't.
“It works at Hogwarts.”
“Oh,” said the boy, “I hear him. He’s kind of a hero, isn’t he?”
“He’s the game-breaker,” Harry said. He was slowly loving the boy.
Every second.
“Yeah, exactly. I've heard he's kind of an idiot - he lives in a cellar at school.
Earth and every time he gets drunk, tries to do magic, and ends up
He set his bed on fire.”
“I think he’s an idiot,” Harry said coldly.
"do you?" said the boy, with a slight sneer. “Why is he with you? where
Is it your parents?”
“They’re dead,” Harry said quietly. He didn’t feel much joining the
The issue is this child.
“Oh, sorry,” said the other, who didn’t sound apologetic at all. “But they were ours .
Good, isn’t it?”
“They were a witch and a wizard, if that’s what you mean.”
“I really don’t think they should let anyone else in, do they? They just
Not the same, they weren’t brought up to know our ways. Some of them
They hadn't even heard of Hogwarts until they got the letter, mind you. I think they are
He should keep it in the old wizarding families. What’s your surname, anyway?”
But before Harry could answer, Mrs. Malkin said, "That's what you've accomplished, .
Sweetheart,” and Harry, not asking for an excuse to stop talking to the boy, nodded .
Down from the back.
“Well, I’ll see you at Hogwarts, I guess,” said the stalker.
Harry had smiled as he ate the ice Hagrid had bought for him.
(chocolate and raspberry with chopped nuts).
"what's up?" Hagrid said.
“No,” Harry confirmed. They stopped to buy paper and food. Harry
He was a little happy to find a bottle of paint that changed color just like you wrote.
When they left the tavern, he said, “Hagrid, what’s Quidditch?”
“Blimey, Harry, I keep forgetting how little you know — you don’t know.
About Quidditch!”
“Don’t make me feel worse,” Harry said. He told Hagrid about the novel.
Child in Mrs. Malkin.
“— and he says people from Muggle families shouldn’t be allowed either .
in -"
“Yer not from a Muggle family. If only he knew who he was — he
He's reached the fame yer name if his parents are wizardin' folk. You see what
Everyone in the Leaky Cauldron was like when they saw yeh. Anyway, what
He knows about it, some of the best I’ve seen are just the ones who have
Magic in 'em in a long line o' Muggles — look at yer mother! Look what she has
Fer my sister!”
“So what’s Quidditch all about?”
“It’s our sport. The Magic Sports. It’s like — it’s like football in the Muggle world
— everybody takes Quidditch — played in the air on conch shells and
There’s four ball — sorta hard ter explain the rules.”
“And what about Slytherin and Hufflepuff?”
“Schoolhouses. There are four. Everyone says Hufflepuff is a lot o'.
Duffer, but —”
"I wish I was in Hufflepuff," Harry sighed.
"A Hufflepuff is better than a Slytherin," Hagrid muttered darkly. “There is no one
A wizard or wizard gone bad that wasn't in Slytherin. You knowWho
He was one.”
“Vol-, I’m sorry —you know-who’s at Hogwarts?”
“Years and years ago,” Hagrid said.
They bought Harry’s school books at a store called Flourish and Blotts .
Where shelves are stacked up to the ceiling with huge books as a route
stones attached to clothing; postage stamp-sized books in glass shelves; Books
full of strange symbols and some books with nothing in them at all. also
Dudley, who had never read anything, would be keen to get his hands
Some of them. Hagrid is about to pull Harry out of Curses and
Countercurses (charm your allies and scare your enemies with
Ultimate Battles: Liver Break, Jelly Legs, Tongue Rip and Much, Much More)
by Professor Vindictus Viridian.
“I was looking for a way to curse Dudley.”
“I’m not saying that’s not a good idea, but yer not ter using magic in
The Muggle world except in very special circumstances,” Hagrid said. “An' whatever,
You can't do any of them, you'll need a lot of study send
Get ter of that level.”
Hagrid wouldn’t let Harry buy a solid gold wand, either (“He said
pewter on yer list”), but they did get a nice ring for the gloss balance
tubes and a rolling brass telescope. Then they visited the Doctor,
It was amazing to make up for his horrible smell, a mixture of bad smell
Eggs and rotten coffee. Barrels of sharp objects stood on the floor; vegetable bags,
Dried roots, and bright powder hung on the walls; feather caps, bones of
Flags, and feathers hung from the ceiling. While Hagrid asked the man
Behind the machine to deliver some basic potion ingredients to Harry, Harry
Personally supplied the Silver Horses with twenty-one Galleons each and
Small, glistening beady eyes (five Knuts a scoop).
Outside the Apothecary, Hagrid checked Harry's list again.
“Just yer wand left — Oh yeah, an' I still ain't got yeh birthday
present."
Harry felt himself turn red.
“You don’t have to —”
“I knew I shouldn’t have done it. Tell yeh what, I'll bring yer cattle. It’s not an animal,
Animals went out of fashion years ago, yeh'd be laughed at you — I don't like cats,
They make me snore. I'll bring yer an owl. All the kids wanted animals, they died
useful, bring yer mail an' everything.”
Twenty minutes later, they emerged from the Eeylops Owl Emporium, which was
He was pale and full of sweat and tears, and the eyes were bright as grapes. Harry now gets a
The big cage holding a beautiful guinea pig, sleeping soundly with her head underneath
wings. He can’t contain his sarcastic thanks, he sounds like a professor
Quirrell.
“Don’t mention it,” Hagrid said sternly. “Don’t expect to have much
gifts from the Dursleys. Only Ollivanders is left now — only a place fer the toys,
Ollivanders, and you should have the best wand.”
A magic wand…that was exactly what Harry had been expecting.
The last episode was small and narrow. Cutting gold lettering on the door
Read Ollivanders: Magic Shieldmakers from 382 BC A bell rests on a
A thin piece of cloth in the window of the bathroom.
A lightning bolt fell somewhere on the hallway floor as they continued .
inside. It was a small place, empty except for a gray chair that Hagrid pointed out
Sit down and wait. Harry felt terribly like he had walked into a very dark library;
Swallowing the many new questions that had just come to his mind, he looked
Instead in thousands of heavy boxes stacked carefully up to the ceiling. for
For some reason, the back of his head was scratched. Dusty and quiet here
He seemed to be bursting with some secret magic.
“Good afternoon,” said a soft voice. Harry jumped. Hagrid should have
He jumped, too, because there was a loud cracking noise and he slowly flew out of
The rocking chair.
An old man stood in front of them, his big, blue eyes shining like
Moon through the aisle.
“Hi,” Harry whispered.
“Oh yes,” said the man. “Yes, yes. I think I'll see you soon.
Harry Potter.” It wasn't a question. “You have your mother’s eyes. It appears only
Yesterday she was here herself and bought her first coat. Fourteen of
Inches long, swishy, ​​made of grass. Nice wand for needlework.”
Mr. Oliver approached Harry. Harry hoped to blush.
Those silver eyes were a little hazy.
“Your father, on the other hand, likes a diamond cock. eleven
Inches. is protected. A bit more power and good for a change. So, I said
Your father loves him—it’s really the wand that chooses the Wizard, of course.”
Mr. Ollivander got so close that he and Harry almost touched
nose. Harry could see himself reflected in those blue eyes.
“And that’s when…”
Mr. Ollivander touched the blade on Harry's forehead with a
A long, white finger.
“I’m sorry to say I sold the cock that did it,” he said quietly. “Three and a half inches. Yew. A powerful weapon, very powerful, and in abundance
Hands…well, if only I knew what that needle went out into the world to do.
…”
He cleared his throat and then, to Harry's surprise, looked at Hagrid.
“Rubius! Rubius Hagrid! How did I see you again….Oak, sixteen
Inches, by the way, isn’t it?”
“That’s right, sir, yes,” Hagrid said.
“Nice stick, that one. But I think they both broke up when you
Driven away?” Mr. Ollivander said, quietly.
"Er—yes, they did, yes," Hagrid said, rubbing his temples. “I still have
details, though,” he added cheerfully.
“But you don’t use them?” Mr. Olivander said quietly.
“Oh, no, sir,” Hagrid said quietly. Harry noticed he retained his pink.
Umbrella very strongly as stated.
"Hmmm," Mr. Ollivander said, giving Hagrid a curious look. "Well,
Now — Mr. Poter. Let me see.” He pulled a long lead through the silver.
marks left his pocket. “Which is your right hand?”
“Er — well, I’m right-handed,” Harry said.
“Hold out your hand. That’s it.” He took Harry off his shoulders and
A finger, then a hand to the back, shoulders to the floor, knees to the back and back of his head.
As he points out, “Every Ollivander armor has essentially a powerful handle .
Magic stuff, Mr. Potter. We use unicorn hair, phoenix raven feathers, and
the heartbeats of dragons. No two Ollivander sets are the same, just as no
Two ravens, dragons, or phenomena are quite alike. And of course, you do
Never will you get such good results with another magician’s magic.”
Suddenly, Harry realized that the tape measure, which was measuring
Between his lips, he was doing this himself. Mr. Olivander was flying
At the bottom of the shelves, they get crowns.
“That’ll do,” he said, and the screen’s balance froze over .
floor. “Very well, Mr. Potter. Try this one. Beechwood and the heartbeat.
Nine inches. Nice and reasonable. Just grab it and give it a whirl.”
Harry took the wand and (feeling silly) twisted it a bit, but Mr.
Ollivander took it out of his hand almost instantly.
“Maple is a soft tree. Seven inches. Very whippy. try -"
Harry tried—but he barely picked up the wand when he, too,
it was recommended by Mr. Ollivander.
“No, no—here, lobster bones are unicorns, eight inches and a half, and spring.
Go on, go on, try it.”
Harry tried. And he tried. He had no idea what Mr. Ollivander was expecting
for. A set of twisted ropes hung higher and higher on the round chair.
But the more Mr. Ollivander pulled the curtains from the shelves, the happier he
He appears to be back.
“A cheater, eh? Don’t worry, we’ll find the perfect match here
Somewhere — I think, now — yes, why not — an unusual combination — holly .
and a phoenix feather, eleven inches, fine and delicate.”
Harry took the wand. He felt a sudden warmth in his cheeks. upsetting
the bat above her head, she brought it swinging through the dusty air and a
A river of black and gold fabrics shooting from the end like a fiery, drifting
They danced beams of light across the walls. Hagrid sighed and shook hands with the Master.
Ollivander cried, "Damn it!" Yeah, sure, ah, very good. Well, well, well…how
curious…How very curious…”
He put Harry's wand back in his pocket and wrapped it in a brown paper.
He was still mumbling, “Asyrian…asyrian…
“Sovey,” says Hari, “And what is it hard for?”
Mr. Ollivander explained to Harry with his own smug expression.
“I remember every wand I sold, Mr. Potter. Every single buck. it
It so happens that the phoenix with its head feather in your bow gave another
Rice — just one more. It’s actually pretty amazing that you should be hired for
this baby when my brother—why, my brother gave you that spell.”
Harry swallowed.
“Yes, thirteen and a half. Yew. Really curious how these things
happen. The wand chooses the wizard, remember…I think we should hope for the best
Stuff from you, Mr. Potter….Anyway, Who-Must-Be-Named did great
Things — terrible, yes, but great.”
Harry grinned. He wasn't sure he liked Mr. Ollivander very much. he
He paid seven Gallons of gold for his wand, and Mr. Ollivander squeezed them out of his pocket .
store.
The late afternoon sun sat low in the sky as Harry and Hagrid did their thing .
The path back to Diagon Alley, back to the wall, back to Leaky
The cup, now empty. Harry didn't speak at all as they walked down the street; he
I don’t know how much people look up to them in the underground.
filled as they were with their funny-shaped, snowman-sized bags
He slept in his cage on Harry's shoulder. Up another lift, I was off to Paddington
station; Harry only realized where they were when Hagrid hit him on the
shoulder.
“Got time fer a bite to eat before yer train leaves,” he said.
He bought Harry a hamburger and they sat on plastic chairs to eat.
them. Harry sat looking around. Everything seemed beautiful, somehow.
“Are you okay, Harry? Yer very quiet,” Hagrid said.
Harry wasn't sure he could explain. He just had the best birthday ever
Alive — and yet — he chews his hamburger, trying to find the words.
“Everyone thinks I’m crazy,” he said finally. “All those people in
The steaming coffee, Professor Quirrell, Mr. Ollivander…but I didn’t see a thing
About all magic. How can they expect great things? I’m famous and I can’t
Even you remember what I’m known for. I don’t know what happened when Vol-,
Sofri — I wanted to say, nights in parents.”
Hagrid leaned over the table. After his beard and eyes, he
He wore a very nice smile.
“Don’t worry, Harry. You will learn quickly. Everyone starts at
It starts at Hogwarts, you'll be just fine. Just be yourself. I know it’s hard.
Yeh've been divorced, an' that's always hard. But you’ll have a great time at
Hogwarts — I did — I still do, 'cause.”
Hagrid helped Harry onto the train that would take him to
Dursleys, then handed him an envelope.
“Yer a ticket to Hogwarts,” he said. “First of September — the origin of the king .
— It's all in yer ticket. Any problems with the Dursleys, send me a letter with
Yer owl, she’ll know where to find me….You’ll see yeh soon, Harry.”
The train left the station. Harry wants to see Hagrid until
He was out of sight; He rose in his seat and pressed his nose against the window, but
He blinked and Hagrid walked away.
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
Chapter Six
TRAVEL FROM THE THIRTY-THIRD FLOOR
H arry's last month with the Dursleys had not been pleasant. Of course, Dudley was now so
They were afraid Harry would never stay in the same room, while Aunt Petunia and
Uncle Vernon didn't lock Harry in his dungeon, force him to do anything, or .
They yelled at him — in fact, they didn’t talk to him at all. Half fear, half
Fortunately, they act as if any chair with Harry in it is empty. though
This was an improvement in many ways, it became a little more interesting after the
while.
Harry stayed in his room, with his new girlfriend for company. He decided to
They called her Hedwig, a name he finds in the History of the wizard. Her school books
They were so amazing. Staying in bed reading late into the night, Hedwig
It flies out the open window as it pleases. She was lucky that her auntie
Petunia never came in to vent, because Hedwig kept bringing
Dead mice. Every night before he went to sleep, Harry spelled out another day about
A piece of paper he taped to the wall, counting down until September
first.
On the last day of August, he thought he had better call his uncle and
Uncle about getting to King Cross Station the next day, so he headed down to
The living room where they were watching a questioning show on TV. He cleaned his property.
A noise to let them know he was there, and Dudley screamed and ran from
room.
“Er—Uncle Vernon?”
Uncle Vernon growled to show he had been listening.
“Er — I have to be in King's Cross tomorrow to — go to Hogwarts.”
Uncle Vernon rushed back.
“Would it be okay if you gave me a lift?”
Grunts. Harry thought that meant yes.
"thank you."
He was about to go back upstairs when Uncle Vernon actually spoke.
“The usual way to get to the Wizarding School is by train. Magic boards are all
evidence, are there?”
Harry didn't say anything.
“Where’s this school, anyway?”
"I don't know," Harry said, realizing this for the first time. He pulled
The ticket that Hagrid had given him from his pocket.
“I’m just taking the train from the ninety-three quarter past eleven .
night,” it read.
His aunt and uncle watched.
“A circle what?”
“Nine and three quarters.”
“Don’t talk nonsense,” Uncle Vernon said. “There is no ninth wave and .
Three parts.”
“He was in my offer.”
“Barking,” Uncle Vernon said, “stirred up the mood, a lot of them. You'll see.
You just wait. So, we're going to take you to King's Cross. We are going to
London tomorrow anyway, or I won’t bother.”
“Why go to London?” Harry asked, trying to get a grip on things.
friendly.
“Take Dudley to the hospital,” grow Uncle Vernon directed. “I should have
the blue scarf he took off before he went to Smeltings.”
Harry woke up at five the next morning, he was so happy and
nervous to go back to sleep. He stood up and pulled his jeans because he didn't know.
He wanted to enter the station in his Wizard's garb—change into the train.
He checked his Hogwarts portfolio again to make sure he had everything he
needed, he saw that Hedwig was safely enclosed in her cage, and then walked into the room,
Waiting for the Dursley's to get up. Two hours later, Harry’s huge, fat lobster
They were bundled up in the Dursley's carriage, Aunt Petunia called Dudley in
They sat down next to Harry, and set off.
They reached King's Cross at half past ten. Uncle Vernon disappeared
Harry's baby on a crate and taken into the pond for himself. Harry thought
This was hilarious until Uncle Vernon stopped dead and faced the platforms
with a wicked grin on his face.
“Well, there you are, baby. Ninth Circle — Tenth Circle. Your platform
It’s supposed to be somewhere in the middle, but they obviously didn’t build it, they do
they?"
He was right, of course. There is a large plastic number nine above
One key and a big plastic number ten on the one next to it, and in the
middle, nothing at all.
“Have a good time,” Uncle Vernon said in a more serious manner. he
He sat down without another word. Harry turned around and watched the Dursley's leave. all
Three of them were laughing. Harry's mouth went dry. What on earth
Will it work? He was starting to pull a lot of funny looks, because of
Hedwig. Someone has to ask.
He blocked a passing guard, but failed to mention the ninth platform and
Three quarters. The guard had never heard of Hogwarts and when Harry failed
Even if you tell him what area of ​​the country he’s in, he starts to cringe, like
Although Harry was incredibly reluctant. When he failed, he asked Harry
the train left at eleven, but the guard said no. in
The guard finally stroded, looking over the time wasters. Harry was trying now
It’s hard not to be affected. According to the big clock on the wedding plaque, he had ten
He had minutes left to get on the train to Hogwarts and he had no idea how to do it; he
He was trapped in the middle of the station with a pack he couldn’t lift, a pocket
Full of fucking money, and a big mouse.
Hagrid probably forgot to tell him something you had to do, like
Click the third brick on the left to enter Diagon Alley. He wondered if
He should pull out his wand and start pecking away at the ticket inspector’s stand between
positions nine and ten.
At that moment a group of people passed just behind him, holding a
Fewer words than what they were saying.
“— stuck with Muggles, of course —”
Harry turned around. The voice was a blonde woman talking to
Four boys, all with glowing red hair. Each of them was taxing the same
Harry next to her — and they have a beast.
His heart warming, Harry pushed his cart after them. They stopped and so
He did, just barely hearing what they were saying.
“Now, what’s the serial number?” said the boys' mother.
“Nine and three-quarters!” said a young girl, also red-headed, who was
He holds her hand, “Mom, I can’t go…”
“You’re not old enough, Ginny, now shut up. So, Percy, you go
first."
As for the big boy, he went to the ninth and tenth floors.
Harry smirks, careful not to wince in case he misses it—but just as the boy says .
reached the barrier divided between the two classes, many fans
He came with a hook in front of him and by the time the last basket was gone
Away, the boy was lost.
“Fred, you’re next,” the blonde said.
“I’m not Fred, I’m George,” the boy said. “Honestly, lady, you call
yourself our mother? Can’t you tell I’m George?”
“I’m sorry, George, sweetheart.”
“No kidding, I’m Fred,” the kid said, and walked away. His twin called
Behind him to try, and he had to do so, because a second later, he had
He survived — but how did he do it?
Now the third brother walked slowly towards the wall he was
It was almost there—and then, suddenly, it was nowhere else.
There’s nothing else about it.
“I’m sorry,” Harry told the blonde.
“Hi, honey,” she said. “Your first time at Hogwarts? Ron is new, too.”
She recalled the last youngest of her children. He was tall, thin, and
Gangling, with muscles, large hands and feet, and a long tail.
“Yeah,” Harry said. “The thing is — the thing is, I don’t know how to —”
“How about getting into the bathroom?” She said goodbye, and Harry nodded.
“Don’t worry,” she said. “All you have to do is go straight to
the break between episodes nine and ten. Don’t hold back and don’t be afraid to fail.
recovery, this is very important. It’s best to do it in a bit of a run if you’re comfortable.
Go on, go ahead of Ron now.”
“Er — okay,” Harry said.
He takes his car out and looks around the courtyard. It looks very
solid.
He started walking toward her. People spit it out on their way to theaters
Nineteen. Harry walked more slowly. He was going to fall right into this.
court then would be in trouble — leaning forward on his bike, breaking into a
Tough running — the line was getting closer and closer — couldn’t
Stopped — the car went out of control — he was on one knee — he closed his eyes
Be prepared for an accident —
He didn't come...he kept running...he opened his eyes. Red powder
the engine was waiting beside a crowded table. said a sign headed
Hogwarts castle, at eleven o'clock in the morning. Harry looked behind him and saw a
A railroad operating where the bridge is located, in words Platform Nine
and three-quarters of it, he had done.
Engine smoke billowed over the heads of the chattering crowd,
while cats of all colors were injured here and there between their legs. The animals screamed.
to another in a sort of unconvincing way about taste and use of
Heavy loads.
The first few cars are already filled with students, some are boarded up
They came out of the tunnels to talk to their families, some fighting for positions. Harry
He pushed his cart down the stairs in search of an empty seat. passed a
A round-faced kid who says, “Gran, I’ve lost my mouse again.”
“Oh, Neville,” he heard the older woman gasp.
A boy with dreadlocks was surrounded by a small crowd.
“Give us a look, Lee, go on.”
The boy carried the top of a tree in his arms, and the people around him .
he yelled and screamed as something inside pushed out a long, bony foot.
Harry continued through the crowd until he found a baby.
Coffee near the end of the train. He put Hedwig inside first and then
He started rocking and swinging his trunk towards the train door. He tried to pick it up.
The stick however could not lift one end and twice he threw it painfully over his head.
foot.
“You want a hand?” It was one of the red haired twins following
The wall.
“Yes, please,” Harry whispered.
“Oh, Fred! C'mere help!”
With the twin's help, Harry's luggage was finally hung in a corner of
The shop.
“Thanks,” Harry said, brushing his sweaty hair out of his eyes.
“What’s that?” One of the twins said softly, pointing at Harry's
Lightning bolt.
“Blimey,” the other twin said. "are you -?"
“He is,” the first twin said. “Aren’t you?” he added to Harry.
"what?" Harry said.
“Harry Potter.” the twins were born.
“Oh, he is,” Harry said. “I mean, yeah, I am.”
The two boys stared at him, and Harry felt himself turn red. Then, read
wide awake, a voice came bursting through the open door of the train.
“Fred? George? are you there?"
“He’s coming, Mom.”
With a final glare at Harry, the twins exited the train.
Harry sat down by the window where, half hidden, he could see
The red-haired family in the kitchen and heard what they were saying. their
Mom just took off her veil.
“Ron, you have something up your sleeve.”
The little boy tried to move out of the way, but she grabbed him and
He started to lick the end of his nose.
“Mother — geroff.” He squeaked freely.
“Aaah, does ickle Ronnie have something on his head?” said one of the
Acne.
“Shut up,” Ron said.
“Where’s Percy?” their mother said.
“He’s coming now.”
The older boy came around. He had already changed to his.
Hogwarts uniforms glowed red, and Harry noticed a gleaming silver wand in his hand
Chest with the letter P on it.
“I can’t stay much longer, Mom,” he said. “I’m up front, the fans have .
Two pieces to themselves —”
“Oh, you’re the prefect, Percy?” said one of the twins, very airily
surprise. “You should have said something, we have no idea.”
“Hang on, I think I remember him saying something about it,” he said .
Another twin. "one -"
“Or twice —”
"minute -"
“All summer —”
“Oh, shut up,” said Percy, the pirate.
“How come Percy got new clothes, anyway?” One of the twins said.
“Because he’s a prefect,” their mother exclaimed. “All right, sweetheart, please,
Have a good time—send me a bear when you get there.”
She kissed Percy on his forehead and he left. Then she turned to the kitchen.
“Now, you two — this year, indulge yourselves. If I find another
owl told me you had — cleared the bridge or —”
“Did he miss a beat? We didn’t clear the bridge.”
“Great idea though, thanks, Mom.”
“It wasn’t surprising. And watch out for Ron.”
“Don’t worry, Ickle Ronniekins is safe with us.”
“Shut up,” Ron said again. He was almost as tall as the twin already and
His nose was still pink where his mother had licked it.
“Hey, Mom, guess what? Guess who we just met on the train?”
Harry sat quietly so they wouldn't see him move.
“You know that red-haired boy near us in the station? know
Who is he?”
"who?"
“Harry Potter!”
Harry heard the young girl's voice.
“Mom, can I go on the train and see him mom, eh please….”
“You’ve already seen it, Ginny, and the poor boy is not what you expect .
balance in a plant problem. Is that true, Fred? How did you know?”
“He asked. He saw her wound. It was really there — like lightning.”
“Poor dear—no wonder he is alone, I wonder. It used to be so
polite when he asked how to get to the bathroom.”
“Never mind that he remembers what YouKnowWho said .
Does it look like?”
Their mother suddenly became very weak.
“I dare you to ask, Fred. No, she is not afraid. He seems to need
She recalls that on her first day of school.”
“Alright, keep your head down.”
You heard a spring.
"hurry up!" their mother said, and the three boys climbed onto the
train. They leaned out of the window so she could kiss them goodbye, and their
My little sister started crying.
“Don’t do it, Ginny, we’ll send you a bunch of diapers.”
“We’ll send you a Hogwarts costume kit.”
“George!”
“Not kidding, Mom.”
The train started moving. Harry noticed the boys' mother looking d
My sister, half laughing, half crying, ran to follow the train until
She gathered several coughs, then fell back and sighed.
Harry watched the girl and her mother being taken away as the train turned on
elbow. The houses spill out in front of the window. Harry felt a deep sense of relief. he
He didn’t know what to do — but it had to be better than what it was
left behind.
The cellar door creaked open and the little red-headed boy
He came in.
“Is anyone staying there?” he asked, pointing to the seat in front of Harry.
“Everywhere else is full.”
Harry shook his head and the boy sat up. He glanced at Harry and
Then he looked quickly out of the window and pretended not to look. He saw Harry
He still had the black mark on his nose.
“Hi, Run.”
The twins were back.
“Listen, we’re going down in the middle of the train — Lee Jordan has .
Big tarantula down there.”
“Of course,” Ron nodded.
“Harry,” the other twin said, “have we shown up? Fred and
George Weasley. And Ron, our brother. I’ll see you later, then.”
“Bye,” Harry and Ron said. The twins locked the cell door
Behind them.
“Are you really Harry Potter?” Ron hurried out.
Harry nodded his head.
“Oh — well, I thought maybe it was one of Fred and George’s jokes,” he said .
run. “And you really — you know…”
He pointed at Harry's shoulder.
Harry pulled back his wand to reveal a lightning bolt. Ron smirked.
“So that’s where you-know-who —?”
“Yeah,” Harry said, “but I can’t remember it.”
"nothing?" Ron said cheerfully.
“Well — I remember a lot of blue light, but nothing else.”
“Wow,” Ron said. He stared at Harry for a few moments, then, as
Although he suddenly realized what he was doing, he looked up quickly from
Sequencing too.
“Is your family all witches?” asked Harry, who had just found Ron
Funny as Ron found it.
“Er — Yeah, I think so,” said Ron. “I think my mom has a second cousin
Who is an accountant, but we don’t talk about it.”
“Then you must already know the magic wand.”
The Weasleys were apparently one of those ancient wizarding families
The Kid on Diagon Street was talking about it.
"I heard you went to live with Muggles," Ron said. “How are they?”
“Amazing — well, not at all. Aunts and uncles and cousins ​​and
though. I wish I had three magical brothers.”
“Five,” Ron said. For some reason, he was looking nervous. “I’m a
Six in our family to go to Hogwarts. You could say I have a lot to live up to.
Bill and Charlie had already left — Bill was the head boy and Charlie was the captain .
of Quidditch. Now Percy was an asshole. Fred and George talk a lot, but
They still get really good ratings and everyone thinks they sound really good.
Everyone expects me to do the same, but if I do, it’s no big deal,
Because they did it first. You never get anything new, either, with five brothers.
I have Bill’s old shirt, Charlie’s old backpack, and Percy’s old hairbrush.”
Run reached inside his jacket and pulled out a large gray mouse, which was
asleep.
“His name is Scabbers and he’s useless, he barely flies. Brush
He got a rat from my dad because he was made a prefect, but they couldn’t aff — I
I mean, I’ve got Scabbers instead.”
Ron's cheeks went pink. It sounds like he’s saying a lot, because he
He looked out of the window again.
Harry didn’t think there was anything wrong with not being able to
afford an animal. After all, he had never had any money in his life until a month ago,
And he told Ron so, all he had to wear Dudley's old clothes and never
giving appropriate birthday gifts. This seemed to comfort Ron.
“…and until Hagrid told me, I didn’t know anything about being a .
The wizard or about my parents or Voldemort—”
Run shouted.
"what?" Harry said.
“You said you knew-what his name was!” Run said, sounding both nervous
And he was loved. “I’ll be thinking of you, of all people—”
“I’m not trying to be heroic or anything, saying that name,” Harry said, “I .
You just don’t know you shouldn’t. See what I mean? I have a lot of things to learn….I bet,”
He added, revealing for the first time something that deeply moved him .
Lately, “I bet I’m the dumbest in the class.”
“You are not. There were thousands of people who came from Muggle families.
And they learn quickly.”
While they were talking, a train took them out of London.
Now they were speeding past fields full of cows and sheep. They were quiet i
Once again, they watched the fields and roads disappear past.
About half-past twelve there was a loud crash outside in the
wall and a smiling, smiling woman pushed their door back and said, “Something .
By car, honey?”
Harry, who hadn't eaten any breakfast, jumped to his feet, but Ron's ears
He turned pink and looked that he had gotten sandwiches. Harry left.
On the road.
He didn't have enough money for a deal with the Dursleys, and now that
He had pockets glittering with gold and silver He was ready to buy a lot of Mars
Bars as far as he could get — but the woman had no Mars Bars. What she did
There are beans of every flavor from Bettie Bott, the best Drooble platform,
Chocolate chip cookies. cans of pumpkin, cans of coffee, cans of Licorice, and a
A strange number of other things Harry had never seen in his life. I don't wanna
He lost some, got some of everything and paid the woman eleven shekels.
Shekels and Seven Silver Knuts.
Ron watched as Harry brought it all back into the hallway and flipped .
It on a parking lot.
“You’re hungry, are you?”
“Hungry,” Harry said, taking a big bite out of a vegetable bowl.
Ron pulled out a bag of soup and unwrapped it. There are four
Sandwiched inside. He pulled one of them and said, “You always forget I’m .
I don’t like corned beef..”
“Replace you with one of them,” Harry said, holding up a packet. "carry on -"
"You don't want this, it's all disgusting," Ron said. “She doesn’t have much time,”
He quickly added, “You know, with five of us.”
“Go on, eat an apple,” Harry said, having nothing to share .
before or, indeed, whoever will join him. It was a good feeling, I sat there and
Ron, eating their way through all of Harry’s cupcakes, cakes, and cakes (t
The sandwich was forgotten).
“What are these?” Harry asked Ron, taking a bite of the Chocolate bar
Dogs. “They’re not really dogs, are they?” He begins to realize that there isn’t.
It would surprise him.
“No,” Ron said. “But look what the map is. I am worried about Agrippa.”
"what?"
“Oh, well, you never know—chocolate dogs have maps,
Within them, you know, they would collect — famous witches and wizards. I have about
Five hundred, but I have neither Agrippa nor Ptolemy.”
Harry unwrapped his chocolate lid and picked up the card. showed a
The face of a man. He wears half-moon earrings, has a long, curved, flowing nose
Silver hair, beard, and mustache. Underneath the picture was the name Albus
Dumbledore.
“So this is Dumbledore!” Harry said.
“Don’t tell me you’ve never heard of Dumbledore!” Run said. “I can have
Frog? Maybe I’ll bring Agrippa—thank you—”
Harry turned his card over and read:
Albus Dumbledore
NOW Headmaster of HOGWARTS
C onsidered by many to be the greatest wizard of modern times, Dumbledore is
He is particularly famous for fighting the dark wizard Grindelwald in 1945, for
The Discovery of Twelve Uses of Dragon Blood, and Its Work on Alchemy
and his partner, Nicholas Flamel. Headmaster Dumbledore liked the chamber's blue.
and tenpin balls.
Harry flipped the card back and saw, to his surprise, that
Dumbledore's face had lit up.
“He’s gone!”
"Well, you can't expect him to stay all day," Ron said. "to be
back. No, I got Morgana again and I got about six...Do you want her?
You can start collecting.”
Ron's eyes drifted to the pile of chocolate puppies waiting to be
He was not hanged.
“Help yourself,” Harry said. “But in, you know, the Muggle world, .
People just stay put in boxes.”
“Are they? What, they don’t move at all?” Ron sounded surprised.
"weird!"
Harry looked on as Dumbledore glanced at the picture on his map and
He gave her a small smile. Run was more interested in eating crackers than watching.
At the famous wizards and witches cards, but Harry couldn't keep his eyes off
them. Soon, he had not only Dumblur and Morgana, but Hengist's
Woodcroft, Alberic Gronnion, Circe, Paracelsus, and Merlin. He finally tore his
His eyes away from the Druidess Cliodna, who was wrinkling her nose, to open a
Bertie Bott's key to any variety of vegetable.
“You want to watch out for those,” Ron warned Harry. “When they say
Any weight, they say any weight — you know, you get all the normal ones
Like chocolate and mint and marmalade, but then you can get spinach and
The liver is tripe. George recounts that he had a booger bite one time.”
Ron picked up a green bean, looked at it carefully, and bit into a corner.
“Bleaargh — see? Pears.”
They got to eat the Every Flavor fruit. Harry found the toast.
squash, cooked fruit, strawberries, curries, herbs, cauliflower, sardines, and there was even
Bold enough to bend the end of a ridiculous bat Ron wouldn’t touch, which
He became a pepper.
The lake that now floated on the horizon was disappearing. the
The best fields were gone. Now there are forests, meandering rivers, and dark green
The doors.
There was a nail in their car door which was a round faced
The boy Harry passed the ninth floor and three quarters entered.
tears.
“Excuse me,” he said, “but did you see the whole squirrel?”
When they shook their heads, he shouted, “I lost it! He always takes
Get away from me!”
“He’ll show up,” Harry said.
“Yes,” the boy said sadly. “Well, if you see him…”
He left.
"I don't know why he's so upset," Ron said. “If I were to get an animal I would
As quickly as I can. Mind you, I brought in Scabbers, so I can’t talk.”
The beast was still panting for Ron's cock.
"He's probably dead and you wouldn't know the difference," Ron said in
Torture. “I tried to make it white yesterday to make it more interesting, but
The spell didn’t work. I’ll show you, see…”
He rummages through his wallet and pulls out a very beaten-looking buck.
A stick. It’s broken in places and some white stuff is shiny at the end.
“The Unicorn hair is almost done. anyway -"
He just picked up his wallet when the car door opened again.
The headless boy was back, but this time he was accompanied by a girl. She was already
She wore her new Hogwarts robes.
“Did anyone see a mouse? Neville lost one,” she said. She has a chairman
kind of voice, lots of gray hairs, and very large front teeth.
"We already told her we didn't see him," Ron said, but the girl
She didn't listen, staring at the bag in her hand.
“Oh, you do magic? Let’s see, then.”
She sat down. Ron looked taken aback.
“Er — all right.”
He cleared his throat.
“Sunshine, roses, sweet cheese,
Turn this stupid, dumb, yellow monster.”
He waved his wand, but nothing happened. Scabbers remains sharp and hard.
asleep.
“Do you think he’s a real wizard?” said the girl. “Well, it's not very good,
Is? I tried a few simple exercises just for practice and it worked perfectly for me.
No one in my family is magic at all, was it ever such a surprise when I found out
letter, but I was so happy, really, I mean, it was the best school of
The magic was, I heard — I learned all our textbooks by heart, n
Really, I just hope it’s relevant — I’m Hermione Granger, by the way, who
are you?"
She said all this in detail.
Harry looked at Ron, and frowned when he saw with his flushed face that he
He didn’t learn all the textbooks either by heart.
“I’m Ron Weasley,” Ron grinned.
“Harry Potter,” Harry said.
“Is that true?” Hermione said. “I know all about you, of course — I .
I have a few extra books, for photography, and you’re on Modern Magical
The history and rise and fall of the dark arts and the great magical events of
Twentieth Century.”
"am?" Harry said, confused.
“Well, don't you know, I would have found out all I could if I was .
There’s me,” Hermione said. “Do either of you know which house you will be in? I have
I was asking around, and I hoped I was in Gryffindor, it sounded rather nice; I
I heard Dumbledore himself was in on it, but I’m guessing Ravenclaw wasn’t even
Bad….Anyway, we better go look for Neville’s signature. You two are better than
Change, you know, I expect we’ll get there soon.”
She left and took the mouseless boy with her.
"Whatever house I'm in, I hope she's not in it," Ron said. He put his
Wand is back in his trunk. “The sex toy — George gave it to me, bet he knows it .
He was a dud.”
“What house are your brothers in?” Harry asked.
"Gryffindor," Ron said. Gloom seemed to be overtaking him again.
“My mom and dad are into it too. I don’t know what they’d say if I wasn’t. I don't
Saying Ravenclaw would be bad enough, but imagine if I was put in Slytherin.”
“It’s house Vol-, I mean, do you-know-who lives in it?”
“Yeah,” Ron said. He flopped back to his seat, looking exhausted.
"You know, I think the ends of Scabbers' tail are a little loose," he said .
Harry, trying to take Ron's mind off the houses. “So what do your older brothers do .
Now that they’re gone, anyway?”
Harry was wondering what the wizard did when he finished school.
“Charlie is in Romania studying medicine, and Bill is in Africa working .
Something for Gringotts,” Ron said. “Have you heard of Gringotts? There’s everything
About Everyday Christmas, but I don’t think you get that with Muggles —
Someone tried to rob a high security fence.”
Harry blushed.
"Really? What happened to them ?”
“Nothing, which is why it’s such great news. They were not caught. my
Dad says he must be a powerful dark wizard to storm Gringotts, but they
Don’t think they’re holding anything, quite the opposite. 'Of course, everyone gets scared
When something like this happens if you know-who’s behind it.”
Harry took this information to heart. He was beginning to catch a breath.
of fear whenever it is mentioned you-know-who. That's all.
Part of entering the world of magic, but it was a lot worse than saying
“Vuldemort” without exaggeration.
“What’s your Quidditch team?” Run asked.
“Er — I don’t know anybody.” Harry agreed.
"what!" Ron looked shocked. “Oh, wait, it’s the best game in 2019.
The world —” And he was off, explaining all about the four balls and the
seats of seven players, talks about famous games he attended and his
Brothers and the kitchen he would want to get if he had the money. There was only
He gets Harry in the minor points of the game when the barn door
He’s opened up again, but it’s not Neville the chickless boy, or Hermione Granger
This time.
Three boys walked in. Harry recognized the middle one at once: the
The shopkeeper belonged to Madam Malkin. He was looking at Harry with a
Much more effective than what he showed afterwards in Diagon Alley.
“Is that true?” he said. “They were all saying on the train that Harry .
Potter in this episode. So you are, are you?”
“Yeah,” Harry said. He was looking at the other boys. Two of them were
Thickset and very poor looking. Standing on either side of the sweet boy, they
Looks like bodyguards.
"Ah, and Crabbe and Goyl e," said the dwarf vainly,
She looked where Harry was looking. “And my name is Malfoy, Draco Malfoy.”
Ron gave a light grunt, probably hiding a snigger. Draco
Malfoy looked at him.
“You think my name is funny, don’t you? You don’t have to ask who you are. my
My father told me that all the Weasleys had red hair, freckles, and more children than
They can afford it.”
He turned to Harry. “You’ll soon come across a few wizarding families .
There are plenty of others, Potter. You don’t want to go make friends with
The wrong kind. I can help you there.”
He reached out to shake Harry's, but Harry didn't take it.
"I think I can tell which are the wrong types for myself, thank you," he said .
With the cold.
Draco Malfoy was no longer red, but a hint of pink appeared on his pink cheeks.
"I'd be careful if I were you, Potter," he whispered. “If you’re not a little
politer to go as your parents went. They don't know what's right.
For them, too. You hang out with riffraff like the Weasleys and that Hagrid,
And it’s going to blow you away.”
Harry and Ron stood up.
“Say that again,” Ron said, his face as red as his hair.
“Oh, you’re going to fight us, aren’t you?” Malfoy scoffed.
“If you don’t get out now,” Harry said, more bravely than he felt, because .
Crabbe and Goyle were much older than her or Ron.
"But we don't have legs like walking, do we boys?" We ate all our food.
And it looks like you still have some.”
Goyle reached over to the chocolate puppy next to Ron — Ron jumped .
Forward, but before he could touch Goyle, Goyle let out a scream of surprise.
Scabbers The mouse was hanging from his finger, sharp little teeth sunk deep
In Goyle's lap — Crabbe and Malfoy retreated as Goyle snapped .
Scabbers twisted and turned, and when Scabbers finally appeared, he disappeared .
The window, the three of them disappeared at once. Maybe they think there
There were more mice lurking among the bushes, or perhaps they heard footsteps,
because a second later, Hermione Granger entered.
“What happened?” she said, looking at all the sweets
floor and Ron stabbing Scabbers with his fist.
"I think he's stabbed," Ron told Harry. A closer look at the
Scabbers. “No — I don’t believe it — he’s gone back to sleep.”
And so he has.
“Have you met Malfoy before?”
Harry explained about their meeting on Diagon Street.
“I’ve heard about his family,” Ron chuckled. “They were some of the first
She'll return to our side after you-the-snowfall falls. He said they were
Bewitched. My father didn’t believe it. Malfoy's father said he didn't need
A reason to go to the dark side.” He turned to Hermione. “We can help you
With anything?”
"You'd better hurry and get dressed, I'm only up to
ahead to ask the driver, he said we were almost there. You’re not
A struggle, have you? You’ll be in pain before we even get there!”
"Scabbers was fighting, weren't we," Ron said, smiling. "will
Do you mind leaving while we switch?”
“All right — I only got in here because the people outside were walking around .
Very girly, running up and down the corridors,” Hermione whispered .
sound. “And you have food in your head, after all, you know?”
Ron watched as she left. Harry peered out the window. compliance
Darkness fell. He could see mountains and valleys under a deep blue sky. the
The train seemed to be slow.
He and Ron took off their jackets and pulled on their long black coats.
Ron's were a little shorter, you could see his sneakers underneath.
A voice on the train confirmed, "We will arrive at Hogwarts at five o'clock."
minutes of time. Please leave your luggage on the bus, it will be taken to
School separately.”
Harry's stomach heaved and Ron, he noticed, looked pale under
His claws. They lined their pockets with sweet deductions and increased
Crowds throng the street.
The train slowed sufficiently and finally stopped. People posted their
Path to the door and out into a small, dark hallway. Harry jumped into
The cool night air. Then came the torch flashing over the heads of the disciples, and
Harry heard a familiar voice say, "The Firs years!" Firs years here! All right there,
Harry?”
Hagrid's big hairy face glowing over the sea of ​​heads.
“C'mon, follow me — a few more firs years? Head yer trip, now! The first
The years followed me!”
Slipping and stumbling, they followed Hagrid down what appeared to be a
A tough, hard road. It was so dark all around them that Harry thought there
There must be thick trees there. Nobody talked much. Neville, that boy is always wrong
his bat, sniffed once or twice.
“Yeh you’ll get yer firs back to Hogwarts in a second,” Hagrid called over his
height, “jus' this narrow corner here.”
There was a loud “Oooooh!”
The narrow road suddenly opened up along a wide black trail.
lake. Perched on the top of a high hill on the other side, its views sparkle in
The starry sky was a huge castle with many spiers and towers.
“No more than four to a boat!” Hagrid called, pointing to a small van
The boats sat in the water by the shore. Harry and Ron are being watched at their apartment
the train of Neville and Hermione.
“Everyone in?” shouted Hagrid, who had a boat to himself. “Just .
- forward!"
And the fleet of little ships went all at once, sailing on the sea.
which is flat as glass. Everyone was silent, looking around the huge castle.
with the head. It towered over them as they paddled closer to the bridge on
in which he stands.
“Heads down!” shouted Hagrid as the first ships reached the station; They all
They broke their heads and were carried by small vessels in a hidden garden ball
large opening in the cliff face. They are loaded into a heavy vessel, which
He seems to be leading them under the castle, until they reach a sort of
of the underground courtyard, where they emerged on rocks and pebbles.
“Oy, you there! Is that your pet?” said Hagrid, who was watching
ship as people leave them.
“Trevor!” Neville shouted angrily, throwing up his hands. Then the
He reached a passageway in the rock behind Hagrid’s lamp and finally emerged
On dark, green lawns directly in the shadow of the castle.
They walked along a stone staircase and crowded into the large, grassy courtyard
The front door.
“Everyone here? You there, still got yer toad?”
Hagrid raised a large hand and knocked three times on the castle door.
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
Chapter Seven
SELECTION BOTTOM
T he door suddenly opened. Tall, black-haired witch in emerald green
clothes standing there. She had a very stern face and Harry's first thought was
This isn’t one to pass up.
"Primary years, Professor McGonagall," Hagrid said.
“Thank you, Hagrid. I will take them from here.”
She pulled the door shut. The entrance hall was big enough that you could walk inside.
All the Dursley house in it. The stone walls are polished by fire.
flats like Gringotts, the ceiling was too high to get out, and a
the massive marble wall surrounding them leads to the upper floors.
They followed Professor McGonagall onto the stone floor that covered the backdrop.
Harry could hear the echo of hundreds of voices from a door to the right —
The rest of the school should already be here — but Professor McGonagall showed up .
For the first few years in a small room, it was a mess by the hall. They gathered around him,
They stood as close as they usually did, staring at
With nervousness.
"Welcome to Hogwarts," Professor McGonagall said. “The beginning of the season
The ceremony will start soon, but before you take your seats in the main hall, you
They will be distributed in your homes. Election is a very important ceremony.
Because, while you are here, your home will be like your family
Inside Hogwarts. You’ll have classes and everything at your house, you’ll sleep in your
homestay, and spend your spare time in your living room.
"The four houses are called Gryffindor, Hufflepuff, Ravenclaw, and . . ."
Slytherin. Every house has its own interesting history and everyone drove .
nursing and nursing care. If you’re at Hogwarts, your success will
Earn your house points, while any violation of the rules will forfeit house points. In the end
year, the house with the most points is awarded the House Cup, a huge
honor. I hope each of you will be an inspiration to every home that becomes yours.
“The induction ceremony will take place in a few minutes in front of the
The rest of the school. I recommend all of you to refresh yourselves as much as you can.
While you wait.”
His eyes lingered for a moment on Neville’s desk, which was closed
Below his left ear, and Ron's flattened nose. Harry desperately tried to shrug.
Her hair.
"I'll be back when we're ready for you," Professor McGonagall said.
“Please wait silently.”
She left the room. Harry swallowed.
“How exactly did they sort us into houses?” Ron asked.
“Some kind of test, I guess. Fred said it hurt a lot, but I think it was
Jokingly.”
Harry's heart gave a frantic thump. test? In front of the whole school?
But he didn’t know any magic—what on earth was he going to do? he
He didn't expect anything like this the moment they arrived. He looked at her.
calmly and noticed that everyone else looked confused, too. No one is talking.
Most except for Hermione Granger, who rants about everything
spells she has learned and wonders which one she will need. Harry tried so hard not to
You will listen to him. Never was he more successful, never, not even when he had to
bring a school report home to the Dursleys saying that he somehow turned his husband
The teacher’s flower. He kept staring at the door. Every second now,
Professor McGonagall will return and take him to his dungeon.
Then something happened that made him jump about a foot in the air —
Several people behind him yelled.
“What the —?”
He sniffed. as well as those around him. About twenty ghosts have only
streamed from the back wall. Coral-white and slightly transparent, they
They glided across the room talking to each other and didn’t look at the first
years. It’s like they’re fighting. What sounded like a tall little monk was saying:
“Forgive and forget, I say, we should give him a second chance —”
“Friar boy, have we not given Peeves all the powers he deserves? he
He gave us all a bad name and you know, he wasn’t really even a ghost — I mean, what
Do you all work here?”
A ghost wearing a robe and tights suddenly spotted the first years.
No one answered.
“New students!” The Tall Branch said, looking back at them. “The value will be
Divorced, I guess?”
A few people shook their heads in anticipation.
“Hope to see you in Hufflepuff!” said the Officer. “My old home, you
know."
“Move now,” a soft voice said. “The distribution ceremony was on
It’s going to start.”
Professor McGonagall returned. One by one, the birds flew.
Through another wall.
“Now, line up in a circle,” Professor McGonagall told the first years, “and .
Follow me.”
Feeling mistakenly as his feet turned towards the boss, Harry got in line
Behind a sandy-haired boy, with Ron behind him, and out of the
room, up the other side of the hall, and through two double doors to the Great
hall.
Harry hadn't even imagined this wonderful and beautiful place. compliance
With thousands and thousands flying through the air on four
long table, where other students sat. These boards are placed
With ribbons and shiny gold plates. At the top of the stairs is another tall
The table where the teachers are sitting. Professor McGonagall conducts First Years
Up here, so that they go down in a line in front of the other students, the
teachers behind them. The hundreds of faces looking at them seemed to be blank.
silver in the flickering candlelight. Dotted here and there among the students,
The gardens glistened with a brilliant brilliance. Mostly to avoid all prying eyes, Harry looked
up and he saw a black velvet ceiling painted with stars. He listened to Hermione.
Remarking, “Its beitched to look like the sky outside. I read about it at Hogwarts,
history."
It was hard to believe that there was a ceiling there at all, and that the Great
The Hall is not only open to giants.
Harry quickly looked down again as Professor McGonagall smiled .
They placed a four-legged stool in front of the first years. On top of the chair she placed a
the Sorcerer's Front. This kitchen was battered and battered and very badly damaged. aunt
Petunia didn't let him into the house.
Maybe they should try to get the rabbit out of it, Harry thought grimly,
That’s definitely a kind of thing — you look at the fact that everybody in the hall is now .
He looks at the ceiling and looks at her too. For a few seconds, there was a continuous
silence. Then the belt stretches. The cut near the bottom opens as wide as the mouth —
And she began to sing.
“Oh, maybe you don’t think I’m pretty,
But don't judge what you see,
I’ll eat myself if you can find
Bark is better than smart.
You can leave your walls bare.
Your top buttons are heavy and expensive.
Because I'm a Hogwarts Sorting Trophy
And I can handle them all.
Nothing is hidden in your head.
The distribution cap cannot see,
So let me tell you
Where you need to be.
Maybe you’re in Gryffindor,
Where dwell the brave at heart,
Their courage, guts, and resilience
Put Gryffindor between them;
Maybe you’re in Hufflepuff,
Where they are humble and faithful,
that of these patients Hufflefoffs is true
And he’s not afraid of action;
Or still in stupid old Ravenclaw,
If you have a prepared mind,
where those of knowledge and learning,
He would always find their kind;
Or maybe in Slytherin
You will make your real friends.
Those smart people use every tool.
To achieve their goals.
So put me down! Don't be afraid!
And don’t go into a flap!
You are in safe hands (although I have none)
For I am a Thinking Cup!”
The entire room erupted in cheers as the choir continued her song. falls to
Each of the four dishes then became very challenging again.
“Well we just have to try on the stairs!” Ron hugged Harry. “I’m going to kill
Fred, he was going on about trolling.”
Harry. He smiled sadly. Yes, trying the hat is much better than having
to make a policy, but he prefers to be tried regardless of whether everyone
observe. The girl seems to be very demanding; Harry didn't feel brave or
Definitely or some of it at the moment. If the shoe had mentioned home
For people who feel a little bit of cheating, that would have been it.
Professor McGonagall now stepped forward holding a long roll of .
paper.
“When I call your name, you put on your mask and sit on the couch to be
Sort it out,” she said. “Abut, Hannah!”
A pink-faced girl with dark eyelashes stepped out of the shadows and threw
The hat, which fell straight over her eyes, sat on. Capturing moments —
“FUCK!” cried the hawk.
The painting on the right shocked and horrified when Hannah went to sit on
The Hufflepuff Table. Harry saw the ghost of the Fat Friar smirking at her.
“Bones, Susan!”
“FUCK!” said the hat again, and Susan hurried off to sit
Next to Hannah.
“But, Terry!”
“STORM!”
The second panel from the left breaks this time; Lots of Ravenclaws
He stood to shake hands with Terry as he joined them.
“Brocklehurst, Mandy” went to Rafenclaw too, but “Brown, Lavender”
He became the first new Gryffindor, and the plaque on the top left exploded with
cheers; Harry could see Ron's twin brothers grimacing.
"Bulstrude, Millicent" then became Slytherin. Maybe it was Harry’s
conjecture, after all he had heard about Slytherin, but thought differently
Many are useless.
He was starting to feel sick fairly quickly now. He remembers being elected
for teams during practices at his former school. was always last selected,
Not because he wasn’t good, but because no one wanted to think Dudley was
He loved it.
"Finch-cle, Justin!"
“FUCK!”
Sometimes, Harry noticed, the crew would leave the house at once, but in the
Others took a little longer to decide. “Finigan, Seamus,” the sea-haired boy
Next to Harry on the line, he sat on the chair for almost a full minute before
Hat turned into a Gryffindor.
“Granger, Hermione!”
Miunis was about to run to the chair and take the cup from him gently.
head.
“GRIFFINDUR!” cried the hawk. Run shouted.
A confused thought overtook Harry, as confused thoughts always do when
You are very nervous. ⴰⵛⵓ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷⵢⵉⵏⵉ ⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⴼⵔⴻⵏ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴽⴽ? What if he just sits there
With the veil over his eyes for ages, until Professor McGonagall pushed it out of his sight .
His boss said there was obviously a mistake and he better go back to
train?
When they called Neville Longbottom, the boy who kept losing his head,
He walked on his way home. cap takes a long time to be recognized by .
Nephilim. When she finally cried out, “AGRIFINDUR”, Neville fled still clothed .
It, and he has to repeat quickly between fits of laughter to hand it to “MacDougal, Morag.”
Malfoy stepped forward when his name was suggested and focused on
Once: the hat nearly caught his head when she screamed, “SLYTHERIN!”
Malfoy went to join his friends Crabbe and Goyle, looking pleased with
His hands.
There aren’t many people left now. “Moon”,…, “Nothing”….,
“Parkinson”…, then the two twin sisters, “Patil” and “Patil”…, then “Perks,
Sallyanne”…, then, finally —
“Butter, Harry!”
As Harry stepped forward, suddenly sounds emerged like a small whisper
Fire in the whole hall.
“Potter, did she say?”
“Harry Butter?”
The last thing Harry saw before the cloth fell over his eyes was
The hall was filled with people clamoring to get a good look at him. Next moment he was looking
Inside the black coat. He waited.
“Hmm,” said a small voice in her ear. "It's hard. Very hard. A lot of
Courage, I suppose. Not a bad mindset either. There’s talent, Oh my goodness, yes — and
a deep thirst to express myself, now that’s boring….So where do I put
you?"
Harry touched the sides of the bag and thought, not a Slytherin, not a
Slytherin.
“It’s not Slytherin, yeah?” The small voice said. “Are you sure? You can be
Great, you know, it’s all here in your head, and Slytherin will help you in
The road to greatness, no doubt about it — no? Well, if you care — you better be
GRIFFINDUR!”
Harry heard the hat shout the last word to the entire hall. Removed
hat and stomped off towards the Gryffindor common room. It’s much easier to have
He was chosen and not put in Slytherin, he barely noticed he was getting
With great pleasure so far. Percy the Prefect stood up and gave him a firm handshake, while
The Weasley twins shouted, “We’ve got Potter! We’ve got Potter!” Harry sat down.
The opposite of the ghost in ruff he had seen before. Hell took his hand and gave
Harry a sudden, horrible feeling just threw him into a pool of ice-like cold.
water.
He could see the highest plate perfectly well now. In the end he sat down close to her
Hagrid, who had caught his eye, frowned at him. Harry smiled again.
And there, in the middle of the High Table, in a great golden throne, sat Albus .
Dumbledore. Harry recognized him instantly from the map he pulled out of the
The chocolate chips in the pasta. Dumbledore’s silver hair was the only thing in the
An entire stage that glowed like hell. Harry glared at Professor Quirrell.
Not even that nervous young man from Leaky Cauldron. He was looking very
peculiar in a large brown turban.
And now there are only three people left to be chosen. "Thomas, there,"
A Black boy even taller than Ron joined Harry at the Gryffindor table. “Turbines,
Lisa,” he became a Ravenclaw and then it was Ron’s turn. It was soft green by
now. Harry ran his fingers under the table, and after a second, the fabric had
he shouted, “AGRIFINDOR!”
Harry clapped vigorously with the others as Ron sank into the chair next to the
he.
“Hi, Ron, it’s alright,” Percy Weasley smiled down at Harry .
Like "Zabini, Blaise," he was made a Slytherin. Professor McGonagall picked it up.
scroll and removes the Selection Button.
Harry looked at his empty gold plate. He just realized that
How hungry he was. Pumpkin pasties have been popping up for ages.
Albus Dumbledore was up on his feet. He was shining in
students, opening his arms wide, as if nothing could make him happier than
To see them all there.
“Good morning,” he said. “Welcome to the New Year at Hogwarts! Before we
Start our party, I want to say a few words. And here they are: Nitwit!
Blubber! Problem! Tweak!
"thank you!"
He sat down again. Everyone clapped and cheered. Harry didn't know.
Whether to laugh or not.
“Is he — a little mad?” Percy asked confused.
"mad?" Percy said casually. “He is a genius! The best wizard in the world! but
He's a little old, yeah. potatoes, Harry?”
Harry's mouth hung open. The tables in front of it are now stacked with
food. He didn’t see many of his favorite things on the same table: roasted beef,
Cooked chicken, pork and lamb chops, mushrooms, cheese and sauce, buy
potatoes, cooked potatoes, potatoes, Yorkshire pudding, onion, carrots, cheese, ketchup,
And, for some strange reason, peppermint humbugs.
The Dursleys never starved Harry, but he never starved.
He was allowed to eat as he pleased. Dudley always took something that Harry
He really wants to, even if He scares him. Harry set his plate down with a little
everything but the peppers and he began to eat. It was all dark.
“That seems right,” the genie in ruff said sadly, looking at Harry .
Cut his steak.
“Can’t you —?”
“I haven’t eaten in nearly fifteen years,” said the ghost. "I don't
They should, of course, but one doesn’t. I don’t think I showed up? Sir
Nicholas and MimsiePurpington at your service. Gryffindor Hell
The tower.”
“I know who you are!” Ron said quietly. “My brothers told me about .
You — you and Nick are Almost Headless!”
"I know you're going to call me Sir Nicholas de Mimsy—" hell .
He started slowly, but was interrupted by the pink-haired Seamus Finnigan.
“Almost headless? How can you be almost headless?”
Sir Nicholas looked very relieved, as if their little conversation didn’t go
In all the way he wanted.
“Likewise,” he sighed. He grabbed his left ear and pulled. all
His head snapped out of his skull and he fell on his back like he was on a pillow.
Someone had obviously tried to decapitate him, but didn’t do it right. They look
Pleased with the amused looks on their faces, the nearly headless Nick turned his
His head went back to his pillow, he smiled, "So — new Gryffindors!" bid
Will you help us win a home championship this year? The Gryffindors have
He didn’t go too long without winning. Slytherins won the cup six years in a
row! The Blood Baron had become nearly unbeatable — he was the Slytherin .
ghost."
Harry looked over at Slytherin's coffin and saw a sitting figure.
There, with terrible eyes, the face of the sword, appears with the blood of silver.
He had it next to Malfoy who, Harry was glad to see, didn't see much
I'm trying to organize the work.
“How did he get blood?” Seamus asked with deep concern.
“I didn’t ask,” said the nearly headless Nick slyly.
After everyone had eaten as much as they could, the rest of the food
She cleared off the tables, leaving them sparkling clean as ever. Shortly after
Scrolls appear. Ice blocks in every flavor you can think of,
Top of degrees, trit pieces, plates of chips and jam packets, trifle, pickle,
Jell-O, rice cakes…
When Harry helped himself to a photograph, the word returned to their families.
"I'm half and half," Seamus said. “My father’s a Muggle. Mom didn’t say
Him was a witch 'til after they got married. A little bit of a dirty trick about it.”
The others laughed.
“What are you, Nivil?” Run said.
"Well, my Gran raised me and she's a witch," Neville said, "but . . ."
The family thought I was all Muggle for ages. My great uncle Algie kept trying to
catch me off my guard and cast some magic on me — he freed me from
Down the Blackpool bridge once, I nearly fell — but nothing happened until I
There was eight. Great Uncle Algie came to dinner, and was begging me
of an upstairs window by the stairs when my Great Aunt Enid gave her a
meringue and left it with crackers. But I’m jumping — all the way to the bottom of the
Hell and on the road. Everyone is really happy, Gran is asking, it is
He was very happy. And you should see their faces when I walk in here — they .
Think I might not be magic enough to come, you see. Great Uncle Algie was
I’m so happy they bought me my pet.”
On Harry's other side, Pierce Weasley and Hermione were talking about
Lessons (“I wish they’d start right away, there’s a lot to learn, I
Especially you like Change, you know, turning something into
Anything else, of course, must be very difficult —”; “You’ll be
It started small, just interacting with smells and that kind of thing — ”).
Harry, who was starting to feel warm and sleepy, looked up
The board also. Hagrid was drinking slowly from his glass. Professor McGunagall
He was talking to Professor Dumbledore. Professor Quirrell, in all his awkward arrogance,
He was talking to a teacher with greasy black hair, a hooked nose, and pale skin.
That came a lot. This hook-made teacher saw
Quirrell's turban was right in Harry's eyes — a hard, hot, piercing prick .
the line on Harry's shoulder.
"Oh!" Harry clapped his hands over his head.
“What is it?” Percy asked.
"nothing."
The pain went away as it came. difficult to reduce and
The feeling Harry got from the teacher's gaze — a feeling he didn't like
Harry at all.
“Who’s that professor talking to Professor Berelle?” Percy asked.
"Oh, you already know Quirrell, don't you?" No wonder he looks so
Nerf, Professor Snape. He teaches Potions, but doesn’t want to —
Everyone knew he was after Quirrell's job. He knows a lot about dark
Arts, Snap.”
Harry looked at Snape for a moment, but Snape didn't look at him again.
Eventually, even the dishes disappeared, and Professor Dumbledore reached the
His legs too. The room was silent.
“Ahem—just a few more words now that we’ve all eaten and drunk. I
I have some first-hand information for you.
“First years it is important to note that the forest on the property is closed to all .
Students. And some of our older students would do well to remember that, too.”
Dumbledore's glittering eyes flickered towards the Weasley's
Acne.
“I have also been asked by Mr. Filch, the judge, to confirm all this to you .
No magic must be used between classes in the bars.
“Quidditch trials will take place during the second week of term. anyone
Those interested in playing for their home teams should contact Madam Hooch.
“And lastly, I have to tell you that this year, way back third base of
The right side is off limits for anyone who doesn't want to die too much
A sad death.”
Harry laughed, but it was one of the funniest.
“Isn’t he smart?” Percy muttered.
"It must be," Percy said, nodding to Dumbledore. “It’s absurd, because he
It usually gives us a reason why we’re not allowed to go somewhere — of the forest
It’s full of dangerous monsters, everyone knows that. I think he might have told us
prefects, at least.”
“And now, before we go to bed, let’s sing the school song!” He shouted
Dumbledore. Harry noticed that the other teachers' smiles had turned to
fixed.
Dumbledore gave his collar a little squeeze, as if he was trying to get a worm
from the end, and there protruded a long golden plate, which protruded far above the
It means and twists itself, like a snake, into the words.
“Everyone picks their favorite music,” Dumbledore said, “and then let’s go!”
And the school shouted:
“Hogwarts, Hogwarts, Hogwarts Warty Hogwarts,
Teach me something please.
If we are adults and a bag
Or a young man with broken legs,
Our brains can operate by filling
With some surprises,
For now they were naked and full of air.
deceased patients were animal tumors,
So teach us things that are worth knowing,
Bring what we forgot,
Just do your best, and we’ll do the rest.
And learn until all our brains are broken.”
Everyone finished the song at different times. In the end, only Weasley
The twins kept singing along with the very slow funeral procession. Dumbledore
He did their last few lines with his stick and when they finished, he was
One of the loudest sighs.
“Oh, music,” he said, wiping his eyes. “Magic beyond everything we do here!
And now, bedtime. Off you trout!”
The first years of Gryffindor followed Percy through the gossiping crowd,
They left the Great Hall, and up the marble staircase. Harry's lips were like diamonds.
Also, but only because he was so tired and full of dirt. He was sleeping a lot too
You’d be surprised that the people in those photos along the trails are jealous and
commented as they walked by, or that Percy had twice led them through hidden doorways .
Behind painted surfaces and painted surfaces. Galen more than the news.
They were shuffling and dragging their feet, and Harry was wondering just how much
They had farther to go when they came to a quick rest.
A set of walking sticks was floating in the air ahead of them, and just like
Percy took a step towards them and they started throwing themselves at him.
“Peeves,” Percy whispered to the first years. “It’s a fucking animal.” upsetting
his voice, “Peeves — show yourselves.”
It made a loud, indecipherable sound, as if the air had been let out of a box.
“You want me to go to the Bloody Baron?”
There was a pop, and a little guy with evil, blue eyes and a big
A shark appears, waving its claws wildly in the air, taking steps to the walk.
“Ooooh!” he said, with an evil grin. “First ickle! What a joy!”
He quickly released them. Together.
“Go away, Peeves, or the Baron will hear about this, I mean it!” He shouted
Percy.
Peeves stuck his tongue out and rolled over, dropping the walking sticks on
Nivil's head. He could be heard moaning, breaking into horns as he
passed.
“You want to watch out for Peeves,” Percy said, as they went their separate ways.
“The Blood Baron is the only one who can control him, he can’t even listen to
We are prefects. Here we are.”
At the end of the corridor hangs a portrait of a very pretty woman in a
Gray silk dress.
"password?" She said.
“Caput Draconis,” Percy said, and the screen flipped forward to reveal a .
A hole in the wall. They were all scrambling around in — Neville needed a leg up .
— And they found themselves in the Gryffindor common room, a dim, dark room .
full of squashy chairs.
Percy led the girls through a door to their bedroom, while the boys
with another. at the top of a spiral staircase — apparently they’re on one of the
Tower — they found their subjects at last: five shades of four lined with deep red,
Velvet shoes. Their ranks are already formed. I was too tired to talk.
Many, pulled on their pajamas and fell into bed.
“Great food, isn’t it?” Ron murmured to Harry with a grin. "get
Out, Scabbers! It clutters up my sheets.”
Harry was going to ask Ron if he had any pumpkin tarts, but he disappeared
He fell asleep almost instantly.
Harry must have eaten a little too much, because he had one very snack
dream. He was wearing the mask of Professor Quirrell, who kept talking to him,
He told him he had to transfer to Slytherin at once, because it was his destiny.
Harry told the woman he didn't want to be in Slytherin; He became heavier and
severe; He tried to shrug it off but gasped in pain—and there was Malfoy, .
She laughed at him as he struggled with her—and then Malfoy became the magician, Snape, his laughter became wide and cold—there was an outpouring of
A green light and Harry woke up, sweating and shaking.
He collapsed and went back to sleep, and when he woke up the next morning, he
I don’t remember the dream at all.
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
CHAPTER EIGHT
CLOCK CONTROLLER
T here, look.”
"where?"
“Next to the tall boy with red hair.”
“Are you wearing those glasses?”
“Did you see his face?”
“Did you see his expression?”
Whispers have followed Harry since he left his dorm the next day
day. People lined up outside classrooms stood on their feet to watch him, or
Doubling back to pass through the streets again, he smiles. Harry wished them
It wouldn’t, because he was trying to concentrate and find his way to class.
There are one hundred and forty-two beds at Hogwarts: they are massive,
those displaced; the sweet, sweet ones; Someone who got somewhere on a
friday; Something with a flying saucer halfway through you have to remember
leap. Then there are doors that won’t open unless you politely ask, or
They knock them in the right place, and doors that aren’t really doors at all,
But solid walls only pretend. It was also very hard to remember where
Something was, because everything seemed to be moving so much. People in
The keys kept going past each other, and Harry was sure the heroic balls
He can walk.
The ghosts didn’t help, either. It was always a nice touch when one of the
They literally glided through a door you were trying to open. Almost headless.
Nick was always happy to point new Gryffindors in the right direction, but .
Peeves Poltergeist had about two locked doors and a trick staircase if
Met him when you were late for school. He would put toilet paper bags on
your head, pull the sheets from under your feet, hit you with pieces of metal, or snuff your
Up behind you, invisible, you grab your nose and yell, “GOT YOUR CONK!”
Even Peeves is, if that’s possible, an asshole, Argus .
Felt. Harry and Ron managed to get rid of her wrong side on their first date
morning. Filch finds them trying to force their way through a portal i
Thankfully, it turned out to be an out-of-bounds gateway on day three
floor. He didn’t believe they were lost, he was sure they were trying to get in
frequently, and used to threaten to lock them in jail when they were
He was rescued by Professor Quirrell, who was passing by.
Filch has a cat called Mrs. Norris, a mischievous, dust-colored creature.
With the bottle, the arrow like eye like Filch's. She wandered the streets alone.
Break the rules in front of her, put just one foot outside the wall, she goes out for
Filch, who would emerge, crawling, two seconds later. Filc knew the secret.
Ways to school better than anyone (except maybe the Weasleys
twins) and can appear as easily as any of the ghosts. Students all hate it.
to her, and it is the dearest wish of many to give Mrs. Norris a good footing.
And then, when you do find them, there are classes
themselves. There’s a lot more to magic, as Harry quickly discovers, than
You waved your wallet and said something funny.
They should study the night sky with their telescopes every
Wednesday at midnight and learn the names of different stars and locations
the planets. Three times a week out to the greens after the
castle to study Herbology, and a cute little witch named Professor Sprout,
where they learn how to care for all dangerous plants and animals, and
He found out what they were used for. Easily the most challenging class was History of
The magician, who was the sole teacher of the ghost. Professor Binns was very effective
really old when he fell asleep by the staff room fire and woke up
The next morning to train, he leaves his body behind. Binns slips on and off
while spelling out names and dates, and got Emetic the Evil and Uric .
Mixed Oddball.
Master Flitwick, the Charms teacher, was a tiny little wizard who had
He would stand on a stack of books to look over his desk. At the beginning of their freshman year, he
He got a roll call, and when he got to Harry's name, he gave an excited squeal.
and was dropped from sight.
Professor McGonagall turned out to be different. Harry was right in
She thinks she’s not a teacher to pass. She cared and protected, giving them a word
the time they sat in his first class.
“Change is some of the weakest and weakest magic you
He will learn at Hogwarts,” she said. “Someone talking in my class would .
Get out and never come back. You’re insulted.”
Then she changed her office into a pig and she’s back again. They were all very
I was excited and couldn’t wait to get started, but soon realized they weren’t going
He would be replacing furniture with plants for a long time. After taking several
Difficult ideas, they’re each given a grade and start trying to turn it into a
chain. By the end of the lesson, only Hermione Granger had developed any
Difference to his satisfaction; Headmaster McGonagall showed the class how it went.
All silver and blue and he gave Hermione a soft smile.
The function everyone is really looking forward to is security .
against the dark arts, but Quirrell's lessons turned out to be a bit of a charm. his
The school smelled like garlic, which everyone said was a deterrent
He met a culprit in Romania and was afraid to come back and get him.
One of these days. His trophy, he told them, had been given to him by an African .
King and thanks for getting rid of the troublesome zombie, but they weren't
They really believed this story. For one thing, when Seamus asked Finnigan
Excited to hear how Quirrell fought the zombies, Quirrell turned blue and
He started talking about the weather; For another, they know that smell is funny
down on the couch, and the Weasley twins insisted it was full of
daggers too, so that Quirrell would be protected wherever he was.
Harry was very relieved to find that he wasn't miles behind everyone.
else. Many people came from Muggle families and, like him, had no
Any idea that they were witches and wizards. There is so much to learn
Even people like Ron didn’t have much of a head start.
Friday was an important day for Harry and Ron. Finally they were able to
They find their way down to the Great Hall for lunch without getting lost for a second.
“What do we have today?” Harry asked Ron as he placed the sugar on his hand.
mass.
“Double forests with Slytherins,” Ron said. “Snape’s head n
Slytherin House. They say he always loves them — we’ll be able to see if it’s .
true."
"I hope McGonagall likes us," Harry said. Professor McGonagall was
Head of Gryffindor House, but it didn’t stop her from giving them a big hug
homework the day before.
Just then, the mail arrived. Harry was used to that by now, but
It gave him a bit of a shock on the first morning, when about ten rats arrived
Somehow he made his way into the main hall at lunchtime, passing tables
Until they saw their bosses, and they were throwing letters and packages at their feet.
Hedwig hadn't gotten anything for Harry yet. She sometimes flies to
Cut off her ear and eat a little hot soup before she goes to sleep in the chicken coop with
Other school spiders. However, this morning, she was flying between
Marmalade and a spoonful of sugar and dropped a note on Harry's desk. Shared Harry
It opened at once. He said, in a less polite recording:
Hi Harry,
I know you have Friday afternoon off, so you want to come and have
A cup of tea with me at three?
I want to hear all about your first week. Send us a reply with
Hedwig.
Hagrid
Harry borrowed Ron's hat and wrote Yes, please, see you later in the hall
form, and sent Hedwig again.
He was lucky that Harry had tea with Hagrid to wait for him, because
The Potions lesson turned out to be the worst thing that ever happened to her
far.
At the semester's commencement ceremony, Harry got the idea that Professor
Snape didn't care. By the end of the first Potions lesson, he knew he was
wrong. Snape didn't like Harry—he hated him.
Potions lessons take place downstairs in one of the dungeons. It was colder.
Here beyond the main castle, and it will be very interesting
Rather, potted plants are scattered in glass jars all over the walls.
Snape, like Flitwick, begins reading with a roll call, and like
Flitwick, stopped at Harry's name.
“Oh, Yeah,” he said quietly, “Harry Potter. Our new — familiar.”
Draco Malfoy and his friends Krabbe and Goyle snuggle up behind their girlfriends .
sleeve. Snape finished saying the names and looked at the class. Her eyes
They were black like Hagrid's, but they didn't have Hagrid's warmth. They were cold.
And it was empty and made you think about the high walls.
“You’re here to learn the science of percussion and the art of percussion,”
begin. He spoke more earnestly than a whisper, but they caught every word
— Like Professor McGonagall, Snape has the quieting abilities of a class .
Without effort. “As there’s less smokescreen magic here, a lot of you will .
I don’t believe this is magic. I don’t expect you to really understand that beauty.
of slowly sizzling coffee with its glossy lips, gentle energy
of toxins that circulate through human tissues, stimulating the brain, stimulating the
Senses….I can teach you how to turn off fame, turn off glory, and even die —
If you’re not a big enough bunch of dunderheads I’m going to have to generally teach.”
More silence followed this small talk. Harry and Ron exchanged looks
With raised eyebrows. Hermione Granger was on the edge of her seat and looking
She’s eager to start proving that she’s no slouch.
"ear!" Snape said quietly. “What would I get if I increased the powder
The root of asphodel to a blowhole?”
A powdered root of what for an infusion of what? Harry looked at Ron.
who looked as dumb as he did; Hermione's hand had shot into the air.
“I don’t know, sir,” said Harry.
Snape's fingers twitched into a smile.
“Tut, tut — beauty apparently isn’t everything.”
He squeezed Hermione's hand.
“We will try again. Potter, where would you look if I told you to find me a
Bezuar?”
Hermione waved her hand high in the air as she walked without
It was out of place, but Harry hadn't the slightest idea what a bezoar was.
He tried not to stare at Malfoy, Crabbe, and Goyle, who were shaking with .
laugh.
“I don’t know, sir.”
“Think you didn’t open the book before you came, eh, Potter?” Harry
He forced himself to keep staring straight into those cold eyes. He was lookin
With his books at the Dursleys, but if Snape expected him to remember
Everything in a Thousand Magical Beasts and Beasts?
Snape was still ignoring Hermione's quivering hand.
“What’s the difference, Potter, between being a spirit and being a werewolf?”
At that, Hermione jumped up, her hand reaching for the wardrobe
top.
“I don’t know,” Harry said quietly. “I think Hermione did, though, why .
Haven’t you tried it?”
Some people laughed; Harry caught Seamus's eye, and Seamus blinked.
Snape, however, was not impressed.
“Sit down,” he whispered to Hermione. "For your own sanity, Potter, . . ."
asphodel and wormwood make a very powerful sleeping pill known as
Draft of the Living Death. The bezuar is a stone taken from the stomach of a goat .
And it will save you from most poisons. As for the monk and the fox, they
It’s the same pigment, which also goes by the name aconite. Well? Why aren’t they
You all making this up?”
There was a sudden relief from the bells and whistles. For volume,
Snape said, "And a point will be deducted from Gryffindor Hall for your cheek,
network.”
Things don’t get better for the Gryffindors as a Potions lesson
He continued. Snape put them both together and set them to look like a simple array
potion for healing bubbles. He ran through his long black hair, staring at them
Cut down the withered forests and break the jaws of the serpent, which devours almost everyone except
Malfoy, who seemed impressed. He was just telling everyone to look at
The perfect way Malfoy cooked his puppy dogs when the clouds were acid green
Smoke and loud explosions filled the temple. Neville somehow succeeded
Unfolded Seamus’ ship to a rotating barrel, and their steam was pouring out
the stone floor, burning holes in people’s feet. Within seconds, the entire class
He was standing on their toes while Neville, who was drenched in the liquid
When the can was knocked over, he screamed in pain as red balls of anger came out all
On his hands and knees.
“Stupid boy!” Snape said, wiping away the spilled juice with a
the wave of his ass. “I think you added bacon bits before you took
Coffee from the stove?”
Neville moaned as bubbles began to erupt all over his head.
“Take him to the hospital wing,” Snape barked at Seamus. Then he
turned on Harry and Ron, who were working alongside Neville.
"You—Potter—why didn't you tell him you weren't going to add food?" thought
It would make you look better if he didn’t understand, wouldn’t it? This is another point
You lost to Gryffindor.”
This was so unfair that Harry opened his mouth to argue, but Ron held
He's in the back of their car.
“Don’t blow it,” he smirked, “I’ve heard Snape can become quite stubborn.”
As they climbed the stairs from the dungeon an hour later, Harry's thoughts
He was resilient and his spirit was sweet. He lost two points to Gryffindor in
The very first week — why did Snape hate him so much?
“Have fun,” Ron said, “Snape always takes points from Fred and .
George. Can I come and meet you Hagrid?”
At five to three they left the castle and made their way across the
foundation. Hagrid lived in a small wooden house on the edge of the fort
forest. A dressing gown and a galosh are outside the front door.
When Harry knocked, they heard a loud crack from inside and
Lots of bottles. Then she cleared Hagrid's throat and said, "Back, Fang — .
back."
Hagrid's large, bearded face appeared in the reflection as he pulled the door open.
“Hold on,” he said. “Come back, Fang.”
He let them in, struggling to hold onto the neck of a .
A black wolf dog.
There was only one room inside. Hams and bacon were hung from
ceiling, a copper frying pan boiled over an open fire, and in the window stood a
Big bed with a comfortable blanket on it.
“Make yourself at home,” Hagrid said, leaving Fang, who was ready .
He went straight to Ron and started licking his ears. Like Hagrid, it turns out that Fang isn’t like
Fierce as he looked.
“This is Ron,” Harry said to Hagrid, who was pouring boiling water into a
Large station and putting stone cups on a pedestal.
“Another western, yes?” Hagrid said, pointing at Ron's shoulder. I spent
My half-life chasin' yer twin brothers away through the forest.”
Stone mushrooms were oily shapeless lumps that were almost rotten
teeth, but Harry and Ron pretend to enjoy them as they told Hagrid all
about their first lessons. Fang rested his head on Harry's shoulder and let out a full
On his clothes.
Harry and Ron were pleased to hear Hagrid call Filch “that old git.”
“An' am fer that cat, Mrs. Norris, I want to show her to Fang .
some time. D'yeh you know, every time I go to school, she follows me
Everywhere? He couldn’t take it off — Filch put it down to that.”
Harry told Hagrid about Snape's lesson. Hagrid, like Run, told Harry no
Admittedly, Snape hardly liked any of the students.
“But he seemed to really hate me.”
"rubbish!" Hagrid said. “Why should it be?”
But Harry couldn't help but think that Hagrid hadn't quite met his eyes.
Having said that.
“How’s your brother Charlie?” Hagrid Run asked. “I love him so much —
Great with animals.”
Harry wondered if Hagrid had changed the subject on purpose. while
Ron tells Hagrid all about Charlie’s activities with the dragons, Harry picks up a piece
of paper was lying on the table under the tea cozy. He was a cut from
Everyday Christmas:
GRINGOTTS' LAST ROOM
The investigation into the robbery at Gringotts on July 31 continues, heavily
They believe it is the work of Dark wizards or unknown wizards.
The ghosts of Gringotts today insist that nothing is taken. The room
It is sought was actually created the same day.
“But we’re not going to tell you what’s in there, so keep your nose open just in case .
Know what’s best for you,” a Gringotts spokesperson said this afternoon.
Harry remembered Ron telling him on the train that someone had tried to rob
Gringotts, but Ron made no mention of the day.
“Hagrid!” Harry said, “that Gringotts curse happened on my birthday!
It must have been happening when we were there!”
There was no doubt about it, Hagrid never met Harry's eyes
This time. He grinned and handed her another stone bread. Harry read the story.
again. The dedicated shelter was actually vacated earlier at the same time.
day. Hagrid brought out Room Seven Hundred and Thirteen, if you can call it
she breaks open, pulling out the damn little piece. If that was what the thieves said
Were they searching?
As Harry and Ron walk back to the castle for dinner, their pockets
Suffered by stone coffee, they were too polite to refuse, Harry thought
that none of the lessons he’s had so far have given him much to think about as
Tea and Hagrid. Had Hagrid collected the bundle just in time? Where is
now? And Hagrid knew something about Snape he didn’t want to tell
Harry?
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
CHAPTER THREE
NIGHTMARE DUEL
H arry never believed he would ever meet a boy who hated him more than Dudley,
But that was before he met Draco Malfoy. Still, first-year Gryffindors only have
Potions with Slytherin, so they didn't have to put up with Malfoy too much. either
At least, they didn't until they saw a notice posted in Gryffindor .
A common room that allows them all to relax. Flight lessons will start on
Thursday — and Gryffindor and Slytherin will be learning together.
“Typical,” Harry grinned. “Just what I always wanted. To make a fool of you.
of myself on a pillowcase in front of Malfoy.”
He was looking forward to learning to fly more than anything.
“You don’t know that you’re going to make a fool of yourself,” Ron said .
Reasonable enough. “Anyway, I know Malfoy always goes on about how good he is at .
Quidditch, but I think it’s just early.”
Malfoy did talk a lot about enlightenment. He complained loudly about
First years wouldn’t sleep in the Quidditch teamhouse and said long, proud
The stories that always come up end with him running away from Muggles in
helicopters. He was not the only one, however: as Seamus Finnigan put it,
He spent most of his childhood touring the country with his rifle.
A craft stick. Even Ron would tell anyone who would listen about the time he
A submarine almost hit Charlie’s old boat. Everyone from the magician
Families are always talking about Quidditch. Run had already had a terrible fight.
and Dean Thomas, who shared their living room, over football. Run couldn't see.
What’s so fun about playing with just one ball where no one is allowed to
treat. Harry caught Ron copying Dean's poster of the West Ham football team.
They’re trying to get the players to talk.
Neville has never been on a dime in his life, because his
His mother wouldn’t let him near anyone. Privately, Harry felt she had the best
Reason, because Neville managed to have an unusual number of accidents
Even with both feet on the ground.
Hermione Granger was almost as obsessed with flying as Neville was.
This is something you can’t learn by heart from a book — not that she
He didn't try. At breakfast on Thursday, she kept them all busy with flying advice.
It came out of a library book called Quidditch for centuries. Nephil
He was hanging on every word, feeling for anything that would help
Overwhelmed by his childhood afterwards, but everyone else was so happy when
Hermione's lecture was interrupted by the sound of mail.
Harry hasn’t had a single letter since Hagrid left, which i
Malfoy was eager to notice, of course. Malfoy’s secret circle was always
He received packages of sweets from home, which he happily opened in
The Slytherin table.
A barn rat brought Neville a small package from his grandmother. he
He happily opened it and showed them a glass ball the size of a large marble.
which seemed to be filled with white smoke.
“It’s a Memorial!” he explained. “Gran knows I forget things — this .
It tells you if you forgot to do something. See, you’re holding it tight like
This and if he turned red — oh…” His face fell, because Remembrall had .
Suddenly she blurted out, “…you forgot something….”
Neville was trying to remember what he had forgotten when Draco mentioned Malfoy,
who was leaning over the Gryffindor table and took the Remembrall out of her hand.
Harry and Ron jumped to their feet. They were half-hoping for a reason.
They would kill Malfoy, but Professor McGonagall, who could spot problems faster than
Every teacher in the school, was there in a flash.
“What’s going on?”
“Malfoy has my Remembrance, Professor.”
With a smirk, Malfoy hurriedly placed the Remembrall on the table.
“I’m just looking,” he said, and stormed off with Crabbe and Goyle .
After him.
At half past three that afternoon, Harry, Ron, and the other Gryffindors promptly arrived .
down the front steps to the ground for their first flying lesson. It was obvious,
It was a windy day, and the grass crunched beneath their feet as they walked down the
sharp dirt to a flat, central plain on the opposite side of the earth i
A forbidding forest, trees swaying through the shadows.
The Slytherins were already there, as were the twenty lightsabers hanging around .
In straight lines on the ground. Harry heard Fred and George Weasley complain
About school uniforms, he said that some of them start to itch if you’re out
Often, or always slightly off to the left.
Their nurse, Madam Hooch, arrived. She has short, brown hair, and
Yellow eyes like a pumpkin.
“Well, what are you all waiting for?” She shrieked. “Everyone stands next to each other .
A craft stick. Come on, quickly.”
Harry looked at his wand. It was old and some of the pieces stuck
off at the wrong angles.
“Stick your right arm out over your nose,” Madame Hooch says in the
before, “and say 'Arise!'”
“UP” shouted everyone.
Harry's body jumped into his hand at once, but it was one of the few
That's what he did. Hermione Granger's was just lying on the floor, and
Neville's didn't quite work. Maybe turtles, like horses, can tell when they
Scared, Harry thought; There was a hint of sarcasm in Neville’s voice that just said
It was very clear that he wanted to keep his feet on the ground.
Madam Hooch showed them how to cast their traps without
Slide off the end, and walk up and down the stairs stretching their legs.
Harry and Ron rejoiced when she told Malfoy that he wasn't doing enough.
years ago.
“Now, when I blow my whistle, you’re gonna blow it off the floor, hard,” he said .
Mrs. Huc. “Keep your toes down, lift a few feet, then come .
Straight back with angle forward slightly. On my knife — three — two
—”
But Neville, confused and jumpy and afraid of being left on
ground, was thrown hard before the blow touched Madam Hooch's ribs.
“Come back, baby!” she screamed, but Neville was getting straighter as
The well came out of the tub — twelve feet — twenty feet. Harry saw her fear.
White face looks down at the sinking ground, sees him faltering, rolling to the side
Remove the body and —
WHAM — a crash and a wicked jerk and Neville lands face down on the
grass in a pile. His tail socket was still too big, and he started
Drift slowly into the forbidden forest and beyond the view.
Madam Hooch was crouching beside Neville, her face as white as his.
“Arm is broken,” Harry heard her mumble. “Come on, baby — it’s all right, .
up to find out.”
She turned to the rest of the class.
“None of you move while I take this kid to the hospital wing! you
Leave the bodies where they are or you'll be out of Hogwarts before you can
Say 'Kuditch'. Come on, darling.”
Neville, his face smeared with tears, took her hand and walked out with
Madam Hooch, who shook her hand.
No sooner were they out of earshot than Malfoy burst out laughing.
“Did you see his face, big smile?”
The other Slytherins joined in.
“Shut up, Malfoy,” Parvati Patil growled softly.
“Ooh, did you trip over Longbottom?” said Pansy Parkinson, a stern-faced woman
The Slither Girl. “Don’t think of liking little bastards, Parvati.”
"look!" Malfoy said, stumbling forward and pulling out some of the
grass. “That’s that stupid thing Longbottom’s gran sent for.”
Remembrall sparkled in the sun as he caught it.
“Give this here, Malfoy,” Harry growled. Everyone stopped talking and
watch.
Malfoy smiled kindly.
“I thought I’d leave it somewhere for Longbottom to find—how to—.
Up the tree?”
“Give it here!” Harry shouted, but Malfoy jumped on his
And it disappears. He wasn’t lying, he could fly well. The congestion level s
Branches at the edge of a bush he called, “Come and get it, Potter!”
Harry held his body.
"No!" exclaimed Hermione Granger. “Madam Hooch told us not to move .
— You’re going to get us all in trouble.”
Harry ignored her. Blood was pounding in his ears. He rode on
Brum and gripped hard against the floor and up, up he went; air resistant
With her hair, and clothes tousled behind her — and in a moody scene .
joy knowing he found something he could do without being taught — this
It was easy, this was wonderful. He pulled his wand slightly to get her too
high enough, and heard the girls’ moans and groans from the floor and a whisper
Sound from Ron.
He raised his gun high enough to meet Malfoy in the air. Malfoy
Looking shocked.
“Give her here,” Harry called out, “or I’ll knock you off that spell!”
“Oh, yeah?” Malfoy said, trying to smile, but looking worried.
Harry knew, somehow, what to do. Press forward and press the
gun heavily in both hands, and she shot towards Malfoy like a dagger. Malfoy
Only just got out of the way in time; Harry made a quick face and held
The spring remains. Some people downstairs were nervous.
"No Crabbe and Goyle up here to save your ass, Malfoy," Harry called out.
The thought seemed to hit Malfoy.
“Catch him if you can, then!” He shouted, and threw the glass ball up.
into the air and slammed back to the ground.
Harry watched, as if in slow motion, the ball rise into the air and then
Start to fall. He leaned forward and pointed his index finger downward — the next
The second was gathering pace on a fast break, receiving the ball - the wind blew
In his ears, mixed with the shouts of onlookers — he stretched out his hand .
Hand — foot off the ground catches him, just in time to dij ebb his body
straight, and he landed awkwardly on the grass with Remembrall held
safely in his hand.
“HARRY PUTTY!”
His heart sank faster than it had just now. Professor McGonagall was
He runs towards them. He got to his feet, trembling.
“Never — in all my time at Hogwarts —”
Professor McGonagall was almost speechless from shock, and her symptoms
she finished angrily, “— how dare you — you might break your neck —”
“It’s not his fault, Professor —”
“Shut up, Miss Patil —”
“But Malfoy—”
“That’s right, Mr. Weasley. Potter, follow me, now.”
Harry watched the faces of Malfoy, Crabbe, and Goyle in relief as
He stepped out, walking gently into Professor McGonagall's arms as she walked towards the
castle. He would be fired, he just knew it. It means
Anything to protect himself, but there was obviously something wrong with him
sound. Professor McGonagall was watching him without even looking at him;
He had to walk away to keep going. Now he's done it. It didn’t even last two weeks.
He’ll have his bowls ready in ten minutes. What will the Dursleys say when they
Seen at the door?
with the front façade, the marble countertops inside, and still the master
McGonagall didn't say a word to her. She opened the doors and went
Onto the streets with Harry trailing weakly behind him. Maybe she was taking
He's for Dumbledore. He thinks of Hagrid, pushed around but left to stay as
Fan of the game. Maybe he could be Hagrid's assistant. Her stomach twisted as it was
remarked, watching Ron and the others become witches, while he drooled .
front of the castle carrying Hagrid's bag.
Headmaster McGonagall stopped outside a classroom. The door opened.
And stuck his head inside.
“Excuse me, Professor Flitwick, may I borrow Wood for a moment?”
wood? said Harry, startled; Is Wood the stick she was going for
Use on it?
But Wood became a human, a fifth-year boy of fat who came out .
the Flitwick corner looks shocked.
“Follow me, you two,” Professor McGonagall said, and they walked to .
Up the stairs, Wood looks at Harry curiously.
“In here.”
Professor McGonagall showed them to an empty room.
Except Peeves, who was busy writing random words on the board.
“Outside, Pives!” She exclaimed. Peeves puts the jewel in a slot, which
growled loudly, and walked away respectfully. Professor McGunagall insisted on
door behind him and turned to the two boys.
“Potter, and Oliver Wood. Wood — I found you a researcher.”
Wood’s expression changed from shock to anger.
“Are you serious, Professor?”
“Sure,” Professor McGonagall said quietly. “The kid is a natural.
I’ve never seen anything like it. Is this your first time hitting the window
plate?"
Harry nodded silently. He had no idea what was going on, but he
He didn’t seem to be thrown, and some of the feeling started coming back to
His feet.
“He’s got that thing in his hand after a fifty-foot fall,” the teacher says .
McGonagall told Wood. “He didn’t even move. Charlie Weasley can't
They did it.”
Wood was now smiling as if his whole dream had come true at once.
“Have you ever seen a Quidditch game, Potter?” he asked excitedly.
"The Wood Captain of the Gryffindor team," Professor McGonagall said .
he explained.
“He’s just a building block for Seeker, too,” said Wood, now walking .
Harry stared at him again. “Light—naturally—must be brought to justice .
gun, trainer—and nimbus two thousand or seven Cleansweep, I’d say.”
“I’ll talk to Professor Dumbledore and see if we can’t change the rules of the first year. Heaven knows, we need a better team than last year. It is revealed in this
The last Slytherin match, I won’t be able to look Severus Snape in the face for weeks….”
Professor McGonagall looked sternly over her shoulder at Harry.
“I want to hear you train hard, Potter, or I might change my mind .
On your punishment.”
Then, suddenly, she was silent.
“Your father would be amazing,” she said. “He was awesome .
Quidditch player himself.”
“You’re kidding.”
It was time for dinner. Harry had just finished telling Ron what had happened.
When he left the palace with Professor McGonagall. Run had a piece of meat
and kidney pie half his mouth, but he forgot all about that.
"search?" he said. “But first years never — you have to be young .
House player at about —”
“ — century,” Harry said, popping the potato in his mouth. feels
Especially tired after a morning nap. “The face told me.”
Ron was so surprised, so shocked, he just stared at Harry.
"I start training next week," Harry said. “No don't tell anyone, Wood .
He wanted to keep it a secret.”
Fred and George Wesley now came into the hall and saw Harry, and
quickly.
“Hello,” George said in a low voice. “Wood told us. We are in
The team too — the horses.”
“I’m telling you, we’re going to win that Quidditch Cup for sure this year,” he said .
Fred. “We haven’t won since Charlie left, but this year’s team will be
nasty. You’ve got to be okay, Harry, Wood almost threw up when he told us.”
“However we have to go, Lee Jordan reckons he found a new secret .
Way out of school.”
“Bet that’s who’s behind Gregory Smarmy’s coffin we found .
In our first week. bye."
Fred and George were nearly killed when someone less cheerful appeared.
Seen: Malfoy, followed by Crabbe and Goyle.
“Will you have the last meal, Potter? When do you get the boat back to
Muggles?”
“You are so much braver now that you have returned to earth and have
Your little friends with you,” Harry whispered. There is nothing in
All less about Crabbe and Goyle, but since the former table was full of fish,
Neither of them could do more than rub his back and shrug.
"I'll take you anytime by myself," Malfoy said. “Tonight, if
want. Wizard's Duel. Wands only — no relationship. What’s the problem? I haven’t heard
of a Wizard Duel before, I suppose?”
“Of course he has,” Ron said, driving past. “I am his second, who
Yours?”
Malfoy looked at Crabbe and Goyle and silenced them.
“Krabbe,” he said. “All-nighters okay? See you at the Cup
room; This one is always turned on.”
After Malfoy walked away, Ron and Harry looked at each other.
“What is a Wizard’s Duel?” Harry said. “And what do you mean, you .
My second?”
“Well, the second one’s there to take over in case you die,” Ron sighed, getting
He finally started on his cold hat. He took a look at Harry's face and added
Definitely, “But people only die in proper battles, you know, with real wizards. the
The most you and Malfoy will be able to do is flick licks at each other. Neither of you
He knew enough magic to do some real damage. I expect you to refuse.
anyway."
“What if I flick my wallet and nothing happens?”
“Kick him and punch him in the head,” Ron suggested.
"I'm sorry."
They both looked at each other. It was Hermione Granger.
“Can’t a man eat in peace in this place?” Run said.
Hermione ignored him and spoke to Harry.
“I can’t wait to hear what you and Malfoy—”
“Bet you can,” Ron murmured.
“— and you mustn’t wander about the school at night, think about .
points you would lose Gryffindor if you were caught, and you dared to be. is
Really very kind of you.”
"And it's certainly not yours," Harry said.
“You’re welcome,” Ron said.
After all, it’s not what you’d call a perfect end to the day, Harry
Thought, because he was awake much later he heard Dean and Seamus fall asleep .
(Neville never returned from the hospital wing). He spent the whole afternoon giving Run away.
Him advice like “If he tries to bite you, you better block him, because I
He can’t remember how to stop them.” There’s a good chance they’re
It would take Filch or Mrs. Norris, and Harry felt he was threatening his own .
Okay, he broke another school rule today. On the other hand, Malfoy's heat
A face always emerges from the darkness — this is his greatest opportunity to disappear
Malfoy face to face. He couldn't help it.
“Half past eleven,” Ron muttered at last, “we’d ​​better get going.”
They pulled on their swimsuits, picked up their umbrellas, and rode
The Tower Room, down the Pink Room, towards the Gryffindor Common
room. A few sparks still smoldering in the fireplace, all the chairs exploded
In suspended black shadows. They were about to reach the top corner when a
A voice called from the nearest chair, “I can’t believe you would do that,
Harry.”
The lamp gleams. It was Hermione Granger, wearing a green swimsuit.
D head.
"you!" Ron said cheerfully. “Go back to bed!”
"I was about to tell your brother," Hermione whispered, "Percy—he's a spy, . . ."
He’ll put a stop to that.”
Harry couldn't believe someone could be so involved.
“Come on,” he said to Ron. It took a picture of an old woman.
And he climbed out of the hole.
Hermione wasn't going to give up so easily. She followed Run to
the shadowy prison, counting them like an enraged fox.
"You don't care about Gryffindor, you only care about yourselves, I
I don’t want Slytherin to win the house cup, and you lose all the points I got
From Professor McGonagall for knowing about transformation spells.”
"go away."
“All right, but I warned you, you only remembered what I said when you were
On the train home tomorrow, you’re like this —”
But what they were, they did not find. Hermione turned to
pictures of the elderly woman to go back inside and find herself facing a monster
painting. The Dark Lady goes on a nocturnal visit and Hermione is terrified
From Gryffindor Tower.
“Now what do I do?” she asked softly.
"That's your problem," Ron said. “We need to go, be
late."
They hadn't even reached the end of the street when Hermione grabbed
in front of them.
“I’m coming with you,” she said.
“You’re not.”
"You think I'm going to stand here and wait for Filch to catch me?"
If he finds out the three of us I will tell him the truth, that I was trying to stop you, and
You can follow me.”
“You’ve got some nerve —” Ron said aloud.
“Shut up, you two!” Harry said quietly. I heard something.”
It’s kind of insane.
"Miss. Noris?” said Ron, peering into the darkness.
She was no longer Mrs. Norris. It was Neville. He was curled up on the floor, slowly.
He fell asleep, but jerked suddenly awake as they approached.
“Thank goodness for finding me! I’ve been here for hours, I can’t
Remember the new password to get into bed.”
“Keep your voice down, Neville. The password is 'elephant nose' but it doesn't apply
I helped you now, the old lady is out somewhere.”
“How’s your arm?” Harry said.
“Good,” Neville said, pointing at them. “Miss Pomfrey designed it in
About a minute.”
“So — well, look, Neville, we need to be somewhere, see you .
later -"
“Don’t leave me!” Neville said, scratching his chest, "I don't want to . . ."
Stay here alone, the Bloody Baron has passed through twice already.”
Ron looked at his watch, then looked angrily at Hermione and
Nephilim.
“If one of you attacks us, I won’t rest until I learn that conspiracy .
of Bogies Quirrell told us about, and he used it against you.”
Hermione opened her mouth, probably to tell Ron exactly how to use
Bogies' levity, but Harry motioned for her to be quiet and waved them all off
forward.
They glided through the streets lit by pools of moonlight from the ground
The doors. At every turn, Harry expected to run into either Filch or Mrs. Norris, but they
They were lucky. They hurried up to the third floor and made it on foot towards the
The medal room.
Malfoy and Crabbe weren't there. Crystal Medal Cases
They sparkled where the moonlight caught them. Bowls, shields, plates and statues
Silver and gold winked in the darkness. They line the walls, keep
Their eyes scanned the doors on either side of the room. Harry drew his wand if
Malfoy jumped in and started at once. The minutes pass.
“He’s late, he’s probably stormed out,” Ron joked.
Then a noise in the next room made them jump. Harry has only
He raised his wand as they heard someone speak—and it wasn't Malfoy.
“Sniff quickly, my sweet, they’re probably sleeping in a corner.”
It’s Filch talking to Mrs. Norris. Seized with fear, Harry blasted through the ghost.
in the other three to follow as closely as possible; They ran in silence.
Towards the door, away from Filch's voice. Neville’s clothes were almost unbeaten.
around the corner when they heard Filch enter the ballroom.
“They’re in here somewhere,” I hear him mutter, “they’re probably hiding.”
“This way!” Harry nodded to the others who, out of curiosity, started
she cultivated a long gallery full of noble clothes. They can hear Filch reaching
soon. Neville suddenly let out a frightened squeak and started running.
She stumbled, catching Ron in the throat, and the two immediately fell into a
dress of honor.
The shouting and screaming had spread throughout the castle.
"run!" Harry yelled, and the four of them dashed through the gallery, not
They look back to see if Filch is following — they are overtaken on the bridge .
door and dashed down one corridor and then another, Harry at the top, without
Any idea where they are or where they’re going — they’ve broken into a
tapestry and finding themselves in a hidden corridor, they broke through it and came
near their Charms class, knowing it was miles away from the soccer ball
room.
“I think we missed it,” Harry said quietly, leaning against the cold wall and .
He cleared his throat. Neville was breaking in half, rocking and flying.
I — I told you —,” Hermione said, clutching her wand to her chest,
“I — I told you —.”
“We should get back to Gryffindor Tower,” Ron said, “Quick as .
can."
"Malfoy has offended you," Hermione told Harry. “You do realize this, don’t
you? He wasn’t going to meet you — Filch knew something would be on .
The ball room, Malfoy must have tipped him off.”
Harry thought she might be right, but he wasn't going to tell her that.
"going to."
It wasn’t going to be that easy. They didn’t go more than a round.
steps when the doorknob rang and someone shot out of the classroom
in front of them.
It was Pives. He caught sight of them and gave an angry snap.
“Shut up, Peeves — please — you’re going to make us jump.”
Peeves shouted.
“Are you creeping around at midnight, Ickle Firsties? Hold, hold, hold. enemy,
Fool, you will be caught.”
“Not if you don’t give it to us, Peeves, please.”
"I should tell Filch, I should tell," Peeves said in a sacred voice, but his eyes
sparkling with emptiness. “It’s for your own good, you know.”
“Get out of the way,” Ron said, taking a swing at Peeves this and
Big mistake.
“STUDENTS OUT OF BED!” Peeves shouted, “STUDENTS FROM .
STAND UNDER THE CHARMS LEVEL!”
Ducking under the Peeves, they ran for their lives, until the end of the
corridor where they pushed a door — and it locked.
“This is it!” Ron yelled, as they pushed helplessly towards the door, “We’re .
It’s made for! This is the end!”
Hearing footsteps, Filch runs as fast as he can towards the
Peeves calls.
“Oh, come on,” Hermione whispered. She grabbed Harry's wand and hit
clothes, and whispered, “Alohomora!”
The window clicks and the door opens — together, they close
quickly, and cocked their ears at him, listening.
“Which way did they go, Peeves?” Filch was calling. “Quick, tell me.”
“Say 'please'.”
“Don’t mess with me, Peeves, now where did they go?”
“Don’t say anything unless you say please,” Peeves said in the chilling rant .
The voice of singing.
“All right — please.”
"No! Ha haaa! I told you I wouldn't say anything if you hadn't said
please! Ha ha! Haaa!” And they heard the sound of Peeves barking .
and Filch drooling in excitement.
“He thinks this door is locked,” Harry whispered. “I think we’ll be fine
'Get out, Nevil!' Because Neville was grabbing Harry’s arm
pasta for the last minute. "what?"
Harry turned—and saw, quite clearly, what. For a moment, he
He was claiming to have walked into a nightmare—that was too much, on top of
Everything that has happened so far.
They weren’t in the room, as far as he could tell. they are on the same track.
Prohibited Road on the third floor. And now they know why it was
forbidden.
They were looking straight into the eyes of a damn dog, a dog that
they fill all the space between the ceiling and the floor. It has three heads. Three of two
of the ear, of the ear; three skeletons, twisting and turning in their way; three
In the mouth of the tooth, saliva is stored in the bile ducts from the salivary glands.
She stood still, all six eyes on him, and Harry knew
The only reason they aren’t dead already is that they appeared too soon.
She took it by surprise, but quickly got worse about it, no
You’re confused as to what those blue flashes mean.
Harry pressed the doorbell — between Filch and death, he’d get
Felt.
They fell back — Harry locked the door, and they ran, arriving .
He almost left and went back down the hallway. Filch must have tried to look for
in them elsewhere, because they haven’t seen it anywhere else, but hardly
Practice — all they want to do is put as much space between
It’s the animal. They didn’t stop running until they reached the board of
Fat Lady on the seventh floor.
“Where on earth are you all?” she asked, looking at them
the burden of women was placed on their pale, sweaty chests and faces.
“Never mind that — pig’s head, pig’s head,” Harry growled, and the photo .
He reached forward. They enter the common room and fall asleep,
They grow, in chairs.
It was a while before either of them said anything. Neville, of course, looked
It was as if he would never speak again.
“What do they think they’re doing, maintaining such a thing in
school?" Ron said finally. “If any dog ​​needs a workout, this one does.”
Hermione regained both her breath and her bad sense of humor. "you
Don’t use your eyes, either of you, will you?” She said. “You don’t know what it
He was standing on.
"soil?" Harry suggested. “I wasn’t looking at her tits, I was too .
hanging on by her heads.”
“No, not early. She was standing on a sliding door. Of course he cares
some."
She stood up and looked at them.
“I hope you enjoy yourselves. We can all kill —
Or worse, thrown out. Now, if you don’t mind, I’m going to bed.”
Ron stared after her, his mouth open.
“No, we don’t,” he said. “You’d think we’d beat her,
You're not.
But Hermione had given Harry something else to think about as well .
He went back to bed. The dog was hunting something… What did Hagrid have
said? Gringotts was the safest place in the world for what you wanted
He’s hiding — except maybe for Hogwarts.
Harry seemed to have found out where the empty little box was.
From the floor seven hundred and thirteen it was.
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
Chapter Ten
Easter Festival
M alfoy couldn't believe his eyes when he saw that Harry and Ron were still
Back at Hogwarts the next day, he looked exhausted but perfectly happy. Indeed, by
The following morning, Harry and Run thought that the encounter with the three-headed dog had
It was a good hit, and they were anxious to have another one. in
Meanwhile, Harry filled Ron in on the cake that seemed to be
They moved from Gringotts to Hogwarts, and spent a lot of time wondering what
He may need such heavy protection.
"It's either really important or really stupid," Ron said.
“Or both,” Harry said.
But as everyone knows for sure about the mystery thing is that it’s
At two centimeters long, they’re less likely to guess what it is
Without further ado.
Neither Neville nor Hermione showed the slightest interest in what was .
Under the horns is the door of the horn. Whatever Neville holds dear is not going away
Closer to the dog as well.
Hermione currently refused to talk to Harry and Ron, but she was so
A bossy lets you know that they saw this as an added bonus. All they really want is
Now it was all the way back to Malfoy, and much to their delight, it was just such a way .
item arrived in the mail about a week later.
As the monsters streamed into the main hall as usual, everyone’s attention .
He was suddenly attacked by a long, thick arrow carried by six large horned owls.
Harry was as interested as anyone else to see what was in this grand store.
And he was surprised when bees flew out and dropped her right in front of him,
He throws his wand to the ground. They barely got off track when
Another hero dropped a letter on the ceiling.
Harry opened the letter first, which was fortunate, because it said:
DO NOT OPEN THE BOTTLE TO THE TABLE.
There’s your new Two Thousand Nimbus in it, but I don’t wanna
Everyone either knows you’ve got a belt buckle or they’d all want one. Ulifer
Wood will meet you on the Quidditch pitch tonight at sevenpm for the first time
Training session.
Professor McGunagall
Harry had trouble hiding his excitement as he handed the letter to Ron to read.
“O Nimbus Sin Toza!” Run really went up. “They didn't even
That one rules.”
They left the cell hurriedly, wanting to deflect the punch immediately.
after their first class, but halfway across the entrance hall they found a way
upstairs barred by Crabbe and Goyle. Malfoy took the ball from Harry and
He's buying it.
“It’s a magic wand,” he said, tossing it back to Harry with a smile .
of jealousy and hatred in his face. “You will be in this time, Potter, first years .
They don’t let them.”
Ron couldn't open it.
“It’s not some old magic,” he said, “it’s Nimbus Two Thousand.
What did you say you’ve got at home, Malfoy, a Comet Two Sixty?” run
He smiled at Harry. “Comics seem boring, but they’re not in the same league as
Nimbus.”
"What would you know about it, Weasley, you can't half trust . . ."
hand,” Malfoy replied quietly. “I think you and your brothers need to make amends .
Twig with a twig.”
Before Ron could answer, Professor Flitwick appeared to Malfoy .
elbow.
“I won’t be back, I hope, guys?” he squeaked.
"Potter was summoned a crook, Professor," Malfoy said quietly.
"Yes, yes, of course," Professor Flitwick said, looking at Harry.
“Professor McGonagall told me all about the special circumstances, Potter. and
What’s the sign?”
“Oh Nimbus Two Thousand, it is,” Harry said, fighting not to laugh at the .
The look of the door on Malfoy's face. “And it’s really thanks to Malfoy here that I’ve
He got it,” he added.
Harry and Ron tilted their heads upwards, stifling their laughter at Malfoy's .
Clear and strong answers.
“Wow, right,” Harry observed as they reached the Marble Staircase .
station, “If he hadn’t stolen Neville’s Remembrall I wouldn’t have been on the team.
…”
“So I take it you think it’s a sign of regular breaking?” He came up with .
A passing voice from just behind. Hermiun was shifting focus,
She looked closely at the cup in Harry's hand.
“I thought you weren’t speaking to us?” Harry said.
"Well, don't stop now," Ron said, "It does us a lot of good."
Hermione fled with her aunt in the air.
Harry has a lot of trouble keeping his mind focused on his day. it
He continued walking up to the orphanage where his new smile was lying underneath
his movie, or he plays to the quidditch pitch where he learns to play this
night. He bolted his dinner that evening without noticing what he was eating,
and then raced backwards with a run to deploy Nimbus Tu Tuzand in the end.
“Wow,” Ron murmured, as a blush hit Harry’s cheek.
Even Harry, who knew nothing about parallel paths, thought it was
It seems to be what it appears. Sleek and shiny, with a mahogany handle, it had a long tail of
The symbol, straight lines and nimbus to tane is written in gold near the top.
When it was nearly seven o'clock, Harry left the city to go to the fields.
toward the Quidditch field. Held never been inside the stadium before. Associations
The 10 seats were removed in the stadium’s center stands to accommodate taller spectators
enough to see what was going on. At each end of the field are three golden bones.
Police with Hubs at the end. Harry was reminded of the little plastic roads.
Muggle children are different, except that they are five feet tall.
He is very excited to go out again to wait for Wood, Harry gives him one of his novels.
and kicked off the ground. What is a source — out and from .
goal posts and then sped up and down the field. Nimbus Two Arrives
He turned wherever he wanted with his simple swing.
“Hey, Potter, come down!”
Oliver Wood arrived. It is a large wooden box underneath it
arm. Harry took it.
“Very nice,” said Wood, eyes glinting. “I saw the best McGonagall
It means… you guys are actually natural. I will teach you only these rules.
In the afternoon, then you join the team team three times a week.”
Open the card. Inside there are four different balls.
“Read,” said Wood. “Now, Quidditch is easy enough to understand, even .
Mk is not very good to play. There are 7 players on each side. Three are .
It’s called Caesarz.”
“3 n Chaserz,” Harry shouts, as Wood Wood pulls out a happy yellow ball.
The value of a football ball.
“This ball is called Kuffal,” Wood said. “Cars are sending him
Koffil between them and try to do it with one of the links to do something.
Ten points each time the Quaffle passes in one of the blocks. Follow me?”
“Chasers grab the Quaffle and put it through the hoops to score,”
Harry studied. “With that — this is kind of a ball in a fight with 6-year-old
Hubs, aren't you?”
“Is that football?” Wood said respectfully.
"There are no circumstances," Harry said in a straightforward manner.
“Right now, there is one other player on each side who is known as Kiber — I
Avoid Gryffindor. I had to get on our asses and stop the other team.
from the letter.”
“Three drums, one observation,” said Harry, who was determined to .
kty t all. “And they play with the Quaffle. Hey, take that. So that's what is
Are they there from there?” He mentioned the remaining three races within the score.
“I’ll show you now,” Wood said. “Do this.”
Harry gave a small smile, a bit like a short, short praise.
“I’ll show you what Bloodjerz does,” Wood said. “These two people
They were bloggers.”
Harry showed two different paths, a black jet and slightly smaller than
The red light. Harry saw that they were running to escape the
Pages protecting them inside the box.
“Stand back,” Wood Harry said. He began to free one of
Bludgers.
Suddenly, the red ball flew high into the air and then hurtled straight towards
Harry's face. Harry winked at her to stop him from breaking her nose, and
Send it zigzag into the wind — spinning over their heads and behind them
The sword in the wood, which comes out on top of it, turns it to the ground.
"see?" Wood sighed and pushed the struggling Bludger back into the saddle
and its safe use. “Bludgers run, they try to score .
The players got out of their uniforms. That’s why you have two starters per team — the
The Weasley Twins are ours — it’s their job to keep their side safe from the Bludgers .
And try to throw them towards the other team. So — you think you have all that?”
“Three Chasers attempted to score with the Quaffle; Defender cares
goal posts; The Beaters are keeping the Bludgers out of their group,” Harry growled .
off.
“Very good,” Wood said.
“Er — have the Bludgers ever killed anyone?” Harry asked, hoping to
With the sound of a whistle.
“Never at Hogwarts. We had two broken ribs but nothing.
It's more than that. Now, the final team member is the Seeker. are you. and
You don’t have to worry about the Quaffle or the Bludgers —”
“— if they don’t blow my head off.”
"Don't worry, the Weasleys are more than a match for the Bludgers — I
I mean, they’re like two very human Bludgers.”
Wood reached into the bag and pulled out the fourth and final ball.
Compared to Quaffle and Bludgers, it was tiny, about the size of a
Great harvest. It is bright gold and has little sparkling silver wings.
“This,” Wood said, “is the Golden Snitch, and it’s the most dangerous champion .
of food. It’s very hard to hit because it moves so fast and it’s hard to see. is
Research work to take. You have to get on and off shelves, obstacles,
Bludgers, and Quaffle to get ahead of the other team’s Seeker, because
Whoever catches the Seeker Snitch wins his team one hundred and fifty extra
points, so they almost always win. That’s why Seekers are so fulfilled. a
A Quidditch game only ends when the Snitch gets caught, so it can go on for ages
— I think the record is three months, they had to keep getting replacements so
Players can get some sleep.
“Okay, is that a few questions?”
Harry shook his head. He understands what he needs to do right, and
making it likely to be a problem.
"We don't practice with the Snitch anymore," Wood said, shutting it down loosely .
Back inside the car, “It’s so late, we could miss it. We will tempt you with some
of them.”
He pulled an ordinary bag of golf balls out of his pocket and some
Thirty minutes later, he and Harry were in the air, Wood throwing golf balls like
As deep as he could in either direction to catch Harry.
Harry didn’t miss a single one, and Wood was delighted. After half
Hours, night had really fallen and they couldn’t continue.
"That Quidditch Cup is going to have our name on it this year," Wood said .
cheering as they ran back to the castle. “I wouldn’t be surprised if you looked .
He turned out better than Charlie Weasley, and he could have played for England if
He didn’t go out and follow in the footsteps.”
Probably because he was now too busy, what with a Quidditch match .
Three evenings a week for his homework, but Harry couldn’t
Believe him when he finds out he's already been at Hogwarts for two months. the
The castle felt more like home than Privet Drive ever had. His lessons, too, were
They are becoming more and more common now that in established teachers.
On Halloween morning they walk with a happy table of entrance.
Bobkin is returning to the streets. More, Professor Flitwick
He mentioned in Charms that they thought they were ready to start moving things around,
Something everyone is dying to love since they saw him doing Nephil
taad Zoom to school. Professor Flitwick set his level to
do. Harry's leader is Simus Vengane (who is a show, as
Neville try to hold his eye). Ron, however, he wants to work with
Hermione Granger. It’s hard to say that Ron or Hermione is a snack
about this. She didn’t talk to one of them from the day he was with Harry Bruwrometh
They reach.
“Now, don’t forget that nice hand movement we’re doing!”
He was inspired by Professor Fleetwick, stood on the top of his book book like every time.
“Swich is Flek, Kick, cold and pleasure. It is spoken by the words of the story of Tass .
If it’s something that’s very important, too — not forget Wizard Baruvio, who said 'S'.
Instead of 'f', he found himself on the ground with a Puffalo on his face.”
ⵜⴳⴰ ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵙⴰ ⵉⵛⵇⵇⴰⵏ ⴱⴰⵀⵔⴰ. Harry and Seamus soshed and flickd, but the
The study should be called on the website.
He takes Simon unconscious and asks him with his hand and sets him on fire —
Harry needs to be snapped by his clothes.
Ron, at the next table, has no necessity.
“Wingardium Leviosa!” It’s cleaned, and takes his long arms as one
The wind.
“They’re saying it’s not wrong,” Harry spoke a sight. “And Wing-Gradium Levi-O-sa, make 'Gree’ good and long and long.”
“You’ll do, yes, if you’re very sick,” Ron talks.
Hermione put her hand back on her horns, and running up her arm, she said:
“Wygardium levios!”
Their hand leaves the field and hanging on four feet above
The heads.
“ⴰ, ⵡⴰⵀ, ⵀⴻⵢⵢⴰ!” He bought Professor Fleetwick, and falls. “Everyone see here,
Miss Ggerner, did it!”
Ron is in a very bad weather at the end of the school.
“It’s not a sense of no one can stop it,” he told Harry as well as it .
Their way on the rightway, “It’s a snack, of course.”
Someone passed into Harry when they were snapped. She was Hermione.
Harry got a glimpse of his face — he liked to see she was in
tears.
“I think she heard you.”
"so?" ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ-ⴷ ⵔⵓⵏ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴱⴰⵏ-ⴷ ⵛⵡⵉⵟ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵄⴻⴹⴹⵉⵍ ⴰⵔⴰ. “We need to see it .
He has no friends.”
Hermione is not supposed to be for the next platform and it is not all afternoon.
On their way to the big room for Halloween, Harry and Ron
I hear Barvati Batel and his girlfriend Layvender said that Hermione was slamming.
The girls’ office and they want to stay alone. Ron seems to be more
In this, but once later entered the big room, where Halloween .
Hearts put Hermione from their mind.
Twenty thousands live directly from the walls and fell while the thousand
More sowoped on the beds in black sky below, they make it hard at
The wheels are close. ⵜⴰⵎⴻⵖⵔⴰⵏⵏⵉ ⵜⴻⴼⴼⴻⵖⴷ ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵢⵉⴹⴻⴱⵙⵉⵢⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵡⵓⵔⴻⵖ, ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷⴻⴳ 19.00.
The end of the end of the year.
Harry was just silenced by Emanuel with a firefighty as a professor Quirell
It was slowly moved to the room, the deeper sand and feared on the face. all
He looked as he reached Headmaster Dumbledore's chair and knocked over the table,
And he smiled, “The troll — in the dungeons — thought you should know.”
two came to cent in a death.
There was confusion. She brought lots of fresh orange juice from
Professor Dumbledore finally shook his head to get silence.
“Prefects,” he barked, “take your Houses to the dormitories .
immediately!"
Percy was in his element.
“Follow me! Take care, first graders! No need to be afraid of trol if you
Follow my advice! Stay close behind me, now. Make way, the first years will come
through! Sorry, I’m a prefect!”
“How does a troll get in?” Harry asked as they climbed down the stairs.
"Don't ask me, they must be really bad," Ron said. "might
Peeves let her in for the Halloween costume.”
They passed different groups of people hurrying in different directions.
As they are looking for their way in a horrible Huffleffs, Harry .
Suddenly he grabbed Ron's hand.
“I just thought—Hermione.”
“What about her?”
“She didn’t know about the troll.”
Ron bit his lip.
“Oh, everything’s fine,” he corrects. “But Bircy didn’t see us.”
Together, they run into the Hufflepuffs going the other way, slipping .
down a deserted side street, and hurried to the girls' dormitory. they
They were just looking around when they heard quick footsteps behind them.
“Exchange!” Ron said, pulling Harry behind a large stone griffin.
However, when they looked, they didn't see Percy but Snape. passed
corridor and disappeared from sight.
“What’s he doing?” Harry whispered. “Why isn’t he in
prison and other teachers?”
“Look for me.”
As quickly as possible, they hurtled down the next corridor after Snape's
Flying feet.
"He's going to the third floor," Harry said, but Ron raised his hand.
“Can you taste something?”
Harry smiled and a foul smell reached his nostrils, a mix of the old
The cafe is kind of a public toilet no one seems to clean.
And they heard it — a crash of thunder, and the treads of the
Big feet. Ron pointed — at the end of a corridor to the left, something big .
He goes to them. They walk the streets looking like him.
they disappeared in a flash of moonlight.
It was an amazing sight. Twelve feet tall, his skin dark, granite gray.
Its big round body like a rock with its tiny bald head sitting on top like
food. It has short short legs as thick as tree trunks with sharp, hooked claws. The smell
derivation from it is unacceptable. She was holding a large wooden club, which
She dragged on the ground because her limbs were too long.
The troll stopped next to a door and peeked inside. He moaned along his length.
The ears, the structure of its small nose, returns in a clean way in the room.
“The keys in the bathroom,” Harry grinned. “We can tie it in.”
“That’s a good idea,” Ron said nervously.
They stared at the open door, their mouths dry, praying the troll was gone
He almost snapped out of it. With one giant leap, Harry managed to grab the key.
Slave the door, and with a closer.
"Yes!"
They came out with their success, and started back to the door, but like
They arrived at the corner Slan for some of them to stop their hearts — A .
A high, black slavery — and it comes from the room that only happens
It was established.
“Oh, no, no,” said Ron, Bale, Am Bardy Baron.
“It’s the bats of girls!” He used Harry.
“Hirmiron!” ⵏⵏⴰⵏ-ⴷ ⴷⴷⵓⴽⴽⵍⵉ.
It was the last thing they want to do, but what choice they have?
When they were snapped, they snapped their hand to the door and they got the key, they were smooth in 2016.
ⵍⵅⵓⴼⵏⵙⴻⵏ. Harry spoiled the door, and went onwards.
Hermione Granger rising against the wall against Agadar, looks like that
She was going to be happy. ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜ ⵉⵜⵜⴰⵣⵣⴰⵍ ⵜⵔⵓⵍ, ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⴰⵊⵊⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜ ⵉⵏⵏ ⵉⴽⴽⴰⵏ ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜ ⵉⵜⵜⴰⵣⵣⴰⵍⵏ ⵅⴼ .
schools assembled.
"measure!" Harry told Ron, and, when he took a car, he drove.
Given so they can vary.
Trullnni has stopped some legs from Hermione. He’s sick, he dies.
Indeed, let’s look at what led to this skiing. The few eyes watched Harry. it
She was afraid of two, and she was sacked in place, and the slain was sacked as a town.
“Ah, the grass of the trees!” Run had been advocating from the other side of the room, and he is
He gets a railway of the rail on it. Trollnni does not see the stoned stone
The head, but he heard of the left of his head and built again, and snapped his bad snacks to
Ron on the place, gave the time for Harry to be the possibility.
“That, go escape and fled!” ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⵖ ⵖⴻⴼ Hermione, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵄⴻⵔⵔⵉⴹ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜⵉⵊⴻⴱⴱⴻⴷ ⵖⴻⵔ
The door, but she couldn't move, she's still a slot against the wall, as her
Open with fear.
Readings and ears as an such as those those that bring up to the heart Bersirk. it
he shouted again and started to move towards Ron, who was getting closer and had no way to escape.
Harrey Emanne has been all very beautiful and great boy: Neetta.
He took a big pain and snapped his hands on the back of Trol
From behind. She couldn't succeed Harry and he's coming out there, but also a dream will
See if you have a long wooden part of her heat, and Harry’s wife is still a monster
In the Photo when it comes – she live directly to one of the ttrol.
It is prohibited from Miriah, lectures, and Hebrewed up voice, with Hari
They’re accused of the old life; ⵢⴰⵍ ⵜⵉⵙ ⵙⵏⴰⵜ, ⴰⴷ ⵜⵢⴻⵇⵍⴻⵄ ttrolnni ⵏⴻⵖ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵢⴻⵟⵟⴻⴼ
It was a great deal with the group.
Hermione has heard in the ground by prayer; ⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⴼⴻⵖⴷ Run ⵜⴰⵄⴻⴽⴽⴰⵣⵜⵉⵙ.
— He didn’t see what he would have heard of the ears to the first ear to
He went in the head : “Wingardium Leviosa!”
The team went up quickly from the hand of ttrol, snapped with luxury, with a dinner in
O'O, a little smooth — and he fell, with a twist, about his owner
head. Trollnni ⵢⴻⵡⵡⴻⴹ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⵎⴽⴰⵏⵏⵏⵉ, ⵙⴰⴽⴽⵉⵏ ⵢⴻⵖⵍⵉⴷ ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵡⵓⴷⴻⵎⵉⵙ, ⵙ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵙⵃⵉⵙⵙⴻⴼ ⵉ
He worked for all the rooms and expanded.
Harry left the legs. He was growing and the end of Defs. ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ Run
He stood there with his chin still raised, staring at what he had done.
and Hermione who talked to the first.
“Is he — dead?”
“I don’t think all of it,” Harry said, I think it’s just about.”
He was linked to Al-Qla, he took the female from the top of ttrol. She was buried.
In the case of hydraulic fluid.
“Urgh — fucking trolls.”
He wiped it on the troll’s belt.
One scene of the ear and the ears of the feet strongly lost to the future.
They didn’t realize what a racket they were making, but of course,
Someone under the country, maybe he was heard to the militia and troll. A A
Senior, Professor McGonagall came up in the room, and follows with the palace
By Snape, with Quirrell that acknowledges after. Quirrell took one look at the troll,
He snapped a skiing skiing quickly and sat down quickly on a skiing, holding the Lesse.
Snape lunged at the troll. Professor Makgunagall was singing in Run and
Hari. Harry is not accomplished with destruction. The horses were good. hopes of
The 5-point wins for Gryfeffindor was quickly out of the grass of Harry.
“And what’s how you think?” Professor Makgunagall, S
The mild skirts at the stage. Harry looked at Ron, who was still standing with his
wand in the air. “You have not you don’t like you. Why aren't you in yur
the orphanage?”
Snape gave Harry a quick, pointed look. Harry looked at the floor. he
The men will make Ron to the script.
Then a small voice emerged from the shadows.
“Because, a Professure McGonagall — were looking for me.”
“Marse Greger!”
Hermione got to her feet at last.
“I went to look for ttrolnni for me — I thought I could have been inspired in 2019.
Mine—you know, because I’ve read all about them.”
Ron dropped his wand. Hermiyun Granger, you really told one
teacher?
“If they hadn’t found me, I would be dead by now. Harry smashed the girl with a rhetoric
The army and Ron has found through ears. They don’t have time to meet
and everyone. It was almost perfect for me when they arrived.”
Harry and Ron tried to look like this story wasn't new to them.
“All — at the time …” Professor McGonagall, he was accompanied by in three .
Inside, “Massa Graanger, a woman’s girl, how you can think about confronting
Writing of Ohrl on Humans?”
Hermione hung har head. Harry was speechless. Hermion Was the last
A person would do something against the rules, and here she was, pretending she had, would
Remove from problems. The likes of Snape has been providing forests.
"Miss Granger, five points will be deducted from Gryffindor for this," he said .
Professor McGonagall. “We loved a lot. If she’s not completely injured,
Better go down to Gryffindor Tower. Students continue the party at their home
houses.”
Hirmiyun left.
Professor McGonagall visited Hari and Ron.
“Well, I still say you got lucky, but not many first years can have
He was arrested on a ttrol of slave mountains. Each one in Griffindor won five points.
This will be read for Professor Dumbledore. You can go.”
They stormed out of the room, not speaking at all until they
two weeks reached out. She was a farmer because you’ve been abandoned about ttrol’s rice, with a lot
With the other view.
“We should’ve gotten more than ten points,” Ron muttered.
“Five, you mean, once she gets rid of Hermione’s.”
“She’s good enough to get us out of trouble like that,” Ron agreed. "mind
Remember, we saved.”
“Perhaps you don’t need to rescue if we don’t stop the thing with .
Her,” he reminds Harry.
They arrived in the brilliant ladder.
“The Eve’s cruise,” said, enter.
The union room is full of sanctuary and there was a possibility. Everyone was eating food.
for which sold out. But Hermione stands in front of the door, waiting for
them. ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵃⴻⴱⴱⵓⵙⵜ ⵙ ⵍⵃⴻⵇ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ. ⵙⵢⵉⵏ, ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳⵙⴻⵏ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⴰⵍ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ
Others, all said all “Tanmmirt,” they managed to get out quickly to get the pleasures.
But since then, Hermione Granger became their friend. there
And some things you can’t do if you’ve been hanging out another, and
You shot a twelve-foot mountain troll with one of them.
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
Installation
KUIDTC
ⴰ ⵙ ⴽⴻⵛⵎⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵡⴰⵢⵢⵓⵔ ⵏ Nuvembir, ⵍⵃⴰⵍ ⵢⵓⵖⴰⵍ ⴷ ⴰⵙⴻⵎⵎⵉⴹ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ. The mountains .
ⵣⵣⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵖⴻⵔⴱⴰⵣ ⵢⵓⵖⴰⵍ ⴷ ⴰⵥⵉⴹⴰⵏ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵙ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵍⴱⴰⴱⵓⵔ ⴰⵎ ⵡⵓⵣⵣⴰⵍ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵎⴹⴻⵏ. Every morning.
The land is arrested with an array. Hagrid can be seen from the top of the top
The slopes of plants in the Quidditch interface, were closed in a long-time
vercoat, but fur fur, and the roads of the highways.
ⴰⵙⴻⴳⴳⴰⵙ ⵏ ⴽⵡⵉⴷⴷⵉⵜⵛ ⵢⴻⴱⴷⴰ-ⴷ. ⴰⵙⵙ ⵏ ⵓⵙⵉⴹⵢⴰⵙ, ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵔⴰⴷ ⵢⵓⵔⴰⵔ
ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⴻⵎⵍⵉⵍⵉⵜ-ⵏⵏⴻⵙ ⵜⴰⵎⴻⵣⵡⴰⵔⵓⵜ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⴷⴷⵓⵕⵜ ⵏ ⵓⵙⵍⴻⵖⵎⵓ: ⴳⵔⵉⴼⵉⵏⴷⵓⵔ ⵎⴳⴰⵍ ⵙⵍⵉⵜⴻⵔⵉⵏ. whether
Gryffindor won, add to the second place at home
Championship.
Everyone who saw Harry thought he was playing because Wood decided so, like
Their hidden tool, Harry must be careful, well, punch. ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⴰⵏⵖⵎⵉⵙ ⵏⵏⵉ ⵜⵓⵖⴰ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ .
Sicker's game was somehow out, and Harry didn't know who was
work — Individuals say to be a lawyer or people say they will be
He runs under his sights.
It makes a lot of sense that Harry now has Hermione as a friend. It didn’t work.
Know how he manages all his homework without her, what with all the
Quidditch work of the last minute Wood was making work. The summer also
He Quidditch for a while, which turned out to be a very relaxing read.
Harry learned that there were seven hundred laboring bars of
Quidetitch Full is that everyone happened in a World Cup game in 2018.
1473; ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ Seekers ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵙ ⵓⵎⴰⵜⴰ ⴷ ⵉⵎⵢⵓⵔⴰⵔ ⵉⵎⴻⵥⵢⴰⵏⴻⵏ ⴰⴽⴽ ⴷ ⵡⵉⴷ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵜⵜⴰⵡⵉⵏ ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⴷ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⵎⵓⵔ ⴰⵎⴻⵇⵔⴰⵏ
Serious Quidditch accidents seem to have happened to them; That although humans
Short if he has died Quidditch, they were advised and look like
months later in the Sahara desert.
Hermione gradually became more and more aware of the rules since
Harry and Ron snapped it from the mountain of mountain, and it’s very good
Based on that. Prior to the first game of Harry Cowedditch and three of them out in
The ice clock in the summer, and makes them a pleasant weather.
Fire which can be given in a jam can. They were standing with you.
He gets him, he felt, when Snape passed on the bar. Harry saw at a time
that Snape was cooperating. Harry, Ron, and Hermione died with
uncover the fire from the oven; They knew she wasn't going to give it back. unfortunately,
Some of their worried faces caught Snap's eye. Ismon. he
He didn’t see the fire, but was obviously looking for an excuse to tell her .
anyway.
“What did she do there, Potter?”
It was Quidditch by the way. Harry showed him.
“Textbooks should not be taken outside of school,” Snab said. "give
This to me. Five points from Gryffindor.”
“He’ll just make this rule,” Harry repeats in a cheerful way as he uses the snap
away. “Did you see what the scar on his leg was?”
"Don't worry, but I hope we can really use it," said Run wisely.
The Gryffindor common room was very quiet that morning. Harry, Ron, and
Hermione sat all next to a fountain. Hermione sees Harry and
Run Charms is eating them. They won’t leave (“how would you hear
Did you learn?”), but by asking her to read it, they got the correct answers .
anyway.
Harry was fidgeting restlessly. He plays quidditch regularly, he will win
He repeats his thoughts about his thoughts tomorrow. Why should he be afraid of Snape?
He left and told Ron and Hermione that he was going to ask Snape as soon as he could.
to him.
“There was you on me,” they all said, but Harry had an idea that .
It won't matter if there are other teachers talking.
He made his way to the staff room and laid down. it's not it's not
answer. He entered again. nothing.
Did Snab publish a book there ? is its value. Ibbi
The door was wide and narrow inside – and a clean sight met his eyes.
Snap and Filch are downstairs, alone. Snap is taking his ways up.
His hands. One of his fingernails is bloody and smeared with blood. Filch is pronounced snap.
roads.
“Blast thing,” says Snape. “How you should care
Eyes on all three of their heads at once?”
Harry wanted to close the door quietly, but —
"POTTER!"
The snap face was kept handy as he slowly lowered his socks to
Give his back. Harry stood up.
“I’m just suggesting if I can have my book back.”
“Get out! out!"
Harry left, before taking any more points from Snape from Gryffindor. he
It returns to the top.
“You know him?” Ron asked as Harry left. “What is the matter?”
In a low whisper, Harry told them what he saw.
“Do you know what this is?” It ended without a breath. “He tried to reach out to
A creature with three heads passed on Halloween! That’s where it’s going when we live
He saw — he was after what a magic! And I'm going to talk about my Brumtic leaving
This tull, will make a difference!”
Hermiun's eyes were fine.
“No — it won’t be, she said. “I know he’s not well, but he
I wouldn’t dare steal anything that Dumbledore would care to keep.”
"Really, Hermiun, you think all teachers are saints or something,"
Ron stood up. “I’m Harry. I won't put anything past the snap. But what is the
He after? Does he take care of the boys?”
Harry walked down the stairs by himself, looking for something. Nephil
He begged and begged, but Harry couldn't move. He wanted to express himself — he
He should be worried, he should have his first Quidditch match in a few hours – but
The look on Snape’s face when Harry saw his foot wasn’t easy to
forget.
The funeral that day was heavy and cold. The big house is like this
A unique collection of white flowers and a beautiful carpet of all things searching
In front of a good Quidditch match.
“You should eat something out.”
“I didn’t see anything.”
“A little bit of meat,” Hermione ventured.
“I’m not hungry.”
Harry is dreaming. In an hour of an hour he walks on the field.
“Harry, you need your strength,” Seamus Finnegan said. “Messengers are
They’re always exploitable by the other team.”
“Thanks, Seamus,” Harry said, watching Seamus pack his bag .
Silence.
By eleven o’clock the whole school seemed to have disappeared into the hallways.
Address of keywidtc. Many students have binoculars. If places are to be entered
He's up in the air, but it's still hard to see what he's doing sometimes.
Ron and Hermione joined Nephill, Seamus, and Din du West Ham.
On top of the top. As a statue for Harry, they made a big expose of a
the skabers' divisions pay. Peter told the president, there, that
He was good at drawing, he had made a giant Gryffindor horse underneath. so
Hermione is a tough little picture to fill a different painting.
Tickles.
Meanwhile, in the entrance hall, Harry and the rest of the group were .
They switch in their Quidditch ways (Slytherin will play in
green).
Wood lightened his ship on silence.
“Oh, guys,” he said.
“And the women,” Cassar Angelina Johnson said.
“And women,” he said. “This is it.”
“Great,” said Fred Wisley.
"The one we've all been waiting for," George said.
"We know that Ulifer's speech is heartfelt," Freed said, "we are in
Last year’s team.”
“Speak, you two,” said Wood. "This is the best Gryffindor team Gryffindor has ever had
In years. We will win. I know her.”
And they all went out, that they might say, Someone else.
"Right. It's time. Good luck guys, it's all up to you.”
Harry followed Fred and George out of the living room and, he hoped he
The hands will not give way, they enter the field to listen to Ishers.
Madame Hutch returns. It stands in the middle of the tunnel
Two groups were waiting for him, taking it in his hands.
"Now I want a good meeting, all of you," she said, when they were all
Gather it. Harry could see that she was talking specifically in
The Slytherin Captain, Mark Flint, is a sixth year. Harry thought that Flint looked like
There was some troll blood in it. Out of the corner of his eye he saw a flash
Banner high, waving Potter to the President over the crowd. son
skipped. He felt brave.
“Put your flies down, please.”
Harry took off on his Nimbus Two Thousand.
Madam Hooch gave a glimpse of her silver nipple.
Fifteen flames rose, thick and thick in the air. They were gone.
“And the Quaffle was immediately taken over by Angelina Johnson’s
Gryffindor — what a wonderful Chaser that girl is, and an attractive one too —”
“JORDAN!”
“I’m sorry, Professor.”
The Weasley twin’s best friend Lee Jordan was doing commentary for
That meeting, Professor McGonagall watched closely.
“And it really does get going up there, a smooth farewell for Alicia Spinnet, and
Good exit by Oliver Wood, last year only decent — returned to Johnson and —
No, the Slytherins took the Quaffle, the Slytherin Captain Markus Flint won
Quaffle and off he goes — Flint flies like an eagle up there — he goes .
Scr— no, he stopped with a good move by Gryffindor Keeper Wood and
The Gryffindors get a quaffle — that’s Katie Bell’s chase of Gryffindors there, excellent
You took off in Flint, it went up the field and — OUCH — that was supposed to hurt, hit in
The back of the head by a Bludger — the Quaffle that the Slytherins had taken — and that was it .
Adrian Pucey races towards the goal posts, but is ruled out for a second
The bludger — sent his way by Fred or George Wesley, he could not tell which — was excellent .
Played by the Gryffindor keeper, anyway, and Johnson again in possession of
quaffle, a clear field ahead and she’s off — really flying — driving a
Quick Bludger — the goalposts are ahead — come on, now, Angelina —
Guardian Bletchley has struck—he has struck—the GRYFFINDORS HOUSE!”
Gryffindor ceremonies filled the cold air, with moans and groans from
Slytherin.
“Budge up there and keep going.”
“Hagrid!”
Ron and Hermione shuffled around to give Hagrid enough space to
Join them.
“Ben watchin' from me hut,” Hagrid said, taking a big bite of
binoculars on his head, “But it's not the same as bein' in the crowd. No sign
The Snitch still, eh?”
“Nope,” Ron said. “Harry doesn’t have much to do.”
"Keep out of trouble, though, that's something," Hagrid said, raising
binoculars and looks up at the thing that is Harry.
Way above them, Harry was watching the game, looking at it
For some Snitch marking. This was part of his and Wood’s game plan.
"Keep off the road until you catch up with the Snitch," Wood said.
“We don’t want to attack you before you are.”
When Angelina scored, Harry made a couple of free throws to
Release her feelings. Now he’s back looking around the Snitch. Once he
I caught the gold ring, but there was only a spark from one of the elements
The Weasleys' wristwatch, and once Bludger decided to come and lie his way,
it looked more like a cannonball than anything, but Harry avoided it and Fred Weasley .
He came chasing him.
“You need to be there, A Hari?” He has time to scream, as he falls on Bludger
proudly alongside Markus Flint.
“Slithherin on the silver,” said Lee Jordan, “Prossing Posey guarantees .
Two Bludgeer, two Westley, and Chaser Bell, and quickly searched next to — roll A .
time — is that the Snitch?”
One season passed in the Glashi as Adrian Pocey Quaffle,
He very carefully looked over his shoulder at the gold band that crossed his left.
ear.
Harry looked at him. In one of the greatest attack, he fell downward below
The golden ring. Slytherin researcher Terence Higgs had seen it too. Head and neck
They quickly achieved the Snitch — all Shasers such as what .
They were like to work to work in the air to see.
Harry is faster than the Higgs — he can see the little round ball, the wings .
He flies, he flies forward — he takes another step of speed —
WHAT! An angry growl came from the Gryffindor below— Marcus .
Flint stopped Harry deliberately, and Harry’s body moved out of the way, Harry
Conserve the right life.
“A fool!” shouted the Gryffindors.
Madam Hooch talked with the indulgence for Flint, and then you asked a free one on
Gryffindor's goal. But in all the chaos, of course, the golden snitch .
He was out of sight again.
Down the hallway, Dean Thomas was yelling, “Bring it on, ref! red
A map!”
“What are you talking about, Dean?” Run said.
“Red carpet!” Dean said excitedly. “In football you will be shown a red card .
And you’re out of the game!”
"But this isn't football, Dean," Ron reminded him.
Hagrid, however, was on Dean's side.
“The rules should change. Flint could have knocked Harry out of the sky.”
Lee Jordan was having a hard time not taking sides.
“So — after that obvious and shocking lie —”
“Jordan!” Professor McGonagall exclaimed.
“I mean, after that open and invasive betrayal…”
“Jordan, I warn you —”
“All right, all right. Flint almost killed Amnadi of Griffindor, which can
You’ve been back to each, I think, yes for the prison for Gryfeffindor, was taken by Spinner, that
He put it on, no problem, and we continued the game, Gryffindor still in hand.”
That Harry dodged another Bludger, who went spinning .
well past his head, that it happened. His body gave out once,
Lorch was sick. For a split second, he thought he was going to fall. committed
The stranger with her hands and the answers. Thenny of announces as
that.
It happens again. The likes of the body that is trying to lose.
off. But the Nimbus Two Thousands didn’t suddenly think of satisfying their passengers.
Harry tried to turn back to the Gryffindor goal posts — he had half a mind .
He would ask Wood to call time — two understands that the potatoes was .
Completely out of his control. He could not sell. He couldn’t fully sum up. it
He was buried in the air, and each cups make the bottles
behaviors that almost made him lose his temper.
Lee is still calling.
“Listen on the Internet — Flint with Koufliff — Goes Spanish —
He passed Bell — hit so hard in the face by a Bludger, I hoped it broke his nose — no .
Master, Master — Slytherin is doing the spelling — a no..”
The Slytherins were cheering. No one noticed this
Harry's box sounded strange. She was slowly carrying him upwards, away
From playing, he jerks and snaps as he walks.
“Dunno what Harry thinks he’s doing,” Hagrid shrugged. He sees
By his method. “If I didn’t know, I would have thought he was going to resign
kissing…but he can’t have….”
At one point, people were talking about Harry all over the streets. his
Boro began to twist and turn, with only him helping to hold on.
Then the whole crowd fell silent. Harry's body gave a rest and Harry's
got out of it. Even now he goes back and forth, holding it with one hand.
“Did something happen to him when Flint stopped him?” Simon
cold.
“He can’t have,” Hagrid said, his voice shaking. “Nothing can contribute
With a novel without the thrill of pure darkness — no boy can do that to one
Nimbus Two Thousand.”
At these words, Hermione grabs Hagrid's binoculars, but instead of
She turned to Harry and began to wave excitedly at the crowd.
"what are you doing?" said Ron, gray-faced.
“I know,” Hermione whispered, “Snape—look.”
Ron held up the binoculars. Snabi is in the middle of standing.
against them. He was looking at Harry and he was looking relentlessly under
His breath.
“He’s doing something — he’s jinxing the gun,” Hermione said.
“Should we?”
“Leave it to me.”
Before Ron could say another word, Hermione was gone. run
The binoculars return to Harry. His horse keeps turning and turning, it's
He almost couldn't give her much time. The whole crowd was into
Footsteps, turning, panicking, as the Weasleys took off to try and pull Harry to safety
on one of their shots, but it’s no good – every time they get close, the
It greatly reduces the swelling even further. decreases below and below,
Obviously hope would hold him if lost. Mark Flint takes on Koufliffe and
The rule ran five times without anyone noticing.
“Come on, Hermione,” Ron growled.
Hermione fought her way across to the hallway where Snape stood, and
It is very thin on its hind side; Don't even count it.
Teacher Quirrel did her best in front row. reached out to Snap,
She reached down, stuck out her hand, squeezed some, sang well
mandatory. Strangled sounds escaped his throat over the edge of Snape's kisses.
It took maybe thirty seconds for Snape to realize he was on fire. a
Heya tells him that it's her job. Put it on low heat.
jar in his pocket, turned quietly around the window — Snape would never know .
What happened.
He came. In mid-air, Harry is suddenly able to turn back
to his brute.
“Neville, you can see!” Ron said. Nephil grows in
Hagred of Hagred in the last five hours.
Harry was satisfactory to the ground when her audience saw him.
Hand to his mouth like he doesn't fight — he takes the field off everything
Four — Increas — and some gold has grown in his hand.
“I have a snitch!” He's running on his wind, and the game
He found in a successful trap.
“ⵓⵔ ⵜ-ⵉⵟⵟⴰⴼ ⴰⵔⴰ, ⵇⵔⵉⴱ ⴰⴷ ⵜ-ⵉⵄⴵⴱ”, ⴼⵍⵉⵏⵜ ⵎⴰⵣⴰⵍ-ⵉⵜⵜ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵃⵓⵍⴼⵓ ⵉ .
Ten minutes later, but it made no difference — Harry didn't break any rules
And Lee Jordan still worried the results — Griffindor won him.
Twelve to sixty-two points. Harry heard some of that, though. he
A strong tea is served at Hagrid's house, with roon and
Hermione.
“It was was Snape,” Ron Was up, “Hermione and I sw him. was
He’s touching your Brubstick, he’s moving, he won’t take his eyes off you.”
“Robipc,” Hagrid said, he didn’t hear anything about what happened .
ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⴰⵎⴰⵙ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⵃⵓⵏⴰ. “Why would Snape do something like that?”
Harry, Ron, and Hermione see each other, asking about what I would say
he. Harry has asked the truth.
“I found something about it,” he told Hagrid. “He tried to get past
that three-headed dog on Halloween. He puns it. We nik he wastrying to steal
Whatever he was watching.”
Hagrid got out the top of the tea.
“How you know about Flovey?” he said.
"fluffy?"
“Yes — it’s mine — I bought it a Greek I had met in the bar
ⴰⵙⴳⴳⵡⴰⵙ ⵏ ⵍⴰⵙ — ⴰⵔ ⵜ ⵙⵙⴼⵍⴷⵖ ⵉ ⴷⵓⵎⴱⵍⴷⵓⵔ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵃⴹⵓ —”
"Yes?" Harry said excitedly.
“She’s, he’s not wondering me,” Hagrid said. “This is a great governor,
that is."
“But Snape is trying to steal it.”
“Robech,” Hagrid said again. “Snappy is a professor at Hogwarts, he’ll make
ⵓⵔⵀⵉⵏ' ⵏ ⵡⴰⵏⴰⵡ.”
“So why did he just try and kill Harry?” Ask Hermione.
In the afternoon it appeared that they had changed their minds about
Snap.
“I know a Jenx when I look at one, Hagrid, I read all about them! possess
It came to keep the eyelids, and Snap didn’t feel good, I saw it!”
“ⴰⵔ ⵇⵇⴰⵔⵖ 'ⵀ, ⵜⵅⵛⴷ!” said Hagrid hogly. “I’m not sure why.
ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⴳⴳⴰ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵢⴰⵏ ⵓⵏⴳⴰⵙ ⵣⵓⵏⴷ ⴰⵢⴰ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵙⵏⴰⴱ ⵓⵔ ⵔⴰⴷ ⵉⵔⴰⵔ ⵢⴰⵏ ⵓⵏⵍⵎⴰⴷ ⵏ ⵢⴰⵏ ⵓⵏⵍⵎⴰⴷ! now,
I’ve heard about it, all three yes — all Yother eddlin’ in things that I’m not ‘ Yes. is
difficult. ⵜⵜⵜⵓⵜ ⴰⵢⴷ, ⴰ'
Professor Dumbledore a' Nicola Flammal —.”
“Aha” He said Harry, “So there was a name of Nicolas Flamml,
Is it there?”
Hagrid looks like he’s heading to himself.
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
Installation
THE MIRROR OF ERISED
C hristmas was coming. ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⴼⴰⵡⵜ ⴳ ⵡⴰⵎⵎⴰⵙ ⵏ ⴷⵓⵊⴰⵏⴱⵉⵔ, ⵀⵓⴳⵡⴰⵔⵜⵙ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⴷⴷⵓ ⴰⵔ
He found himself covered in several feet of snow. The lake becomes faster and faster.
Clinical were warranted for absence of many snowmasters to follow
Quirell around, bounning of the back of his turban. ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵉⵡⴰⵍⵉⵡⵏ ⵉⴷⵔⵓⵙⵏ ⵏⵏⴰ ⵉⵙⵡⵓⴷⴷⵓⵏ
They sought their way through their way in the sky sky to succeed the letters should be satisfied back .
ⵉ ⵜⴷⵓⵙⵉ ⵏ ⵀⴰⴳⵔⵉⴷ ⵇⴱⵍ ⴰⴷ ⴼⴼⵖⵏ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⵍⵜ ⵢⴰⴹⵏ.
No one could wait for the celebrations to begin. ⵎⴰ ⴷ ⴳⵔⵉⴼⵉⵏⴷⵓⵔ
The common side and the largest room have fires, there are the first bars .
It's raining and a wind is blowing against the boards in schools. Good stuff overall.
They were Professor Snapp in Ed Telben, where their breath was higher in .
I’ve been ahead in front of them and continue to almost as well as their heads back.
“I feel sorry,” says Draku Malloy, and a Posts, “for all
People who have to stay at Hogwarts for Christmas because they don't
In the village.”
Harry watched as he spoke. Crabbe and Goyle are arguing.
Harry, who was the fishbowl of the times, didn't use them. Malfoy
There hasn't been a single point of difference since the kindergarten match. Revealed
If Slytherin didn't say it, he would do anything to see how a very big boy would laugh at Harry like Kiker. After drinking
That no one was happy, because they were all used on the road.
Harry went to sit on his book. As a result, Malfoy, Jealous and
He goes back, he goes back to Harry because he doesn't have a good family.
It was clear that Harry would not be returning to Privet Drive for Christmas.
Professor McGonagall came to us last week and made a list of
The students who will remain for the ceremonies, and Harry signed off on
one. He didn't feel sorry for himself at all; this would probably be the best
Christmas has nothing to do with it. Ron and his brothers are staying too, because Mr.
And Mrs. Weasley is going to Romania to visit Charlie.
When they ran out of money at the end of the negotiations, they found a huge exposure.
A tree blocking the road ahead. Two large feet sticking out of the inside.
And a very quiet audience member told them that Hagrid was after him.
"Hi, Hagrid, asking for any help?" Ron asked, clearing his throat with
elements.
“Nah, I’m the best, thanks, run.”
“Would you mind getting out of the way?” Malfoy came in cold.
from behind them. “Are you trying to buy some more money, Wesley? Hope
You will have the role of opening yourself up when you leave Hogwarts, I think — you will .
It should be obvious that Hagrid is like a castle versus what your family is used to.”
Ron jumped into Malfoy as Snape went to the ceiling.
“WEASLEY!”
Run let him go over Malfoy's legacy.
"It's invited, Professor Snap," Hagrid said, putting it well
The network is separated from behind the cover. “Malfoy is not just his family.”
"Because that's possible, fighting against the rules of Hogwarts, Hagrid," said "Hagrid," "Hagrid," he said, "It's a waste of resources.
Silence to silence. "Five points from Gryffindor, Weasley, and they feel it wasn't
further. Go, all of you.”
Malfoy, Crabbe, and Goyle are running near the tree, it's burning.
Demand everywhere is increasing.
“I’ll get to it,” Ron said, pressing his hair into Malfoy’s hair, “One of the .
These days, I’ll take it —”
“I hate them both,” Harry said, “Malfoy and Snape.”
"Come on, have fun, it's almost Christmas," Hagrid said. “I said what, what,
Come with me an'see the Great Hall, look and good.”
So the three of them were followed by Hagrid and its beach to the large room,
Where Professor McGonagall and Professor Fliitwick was working with the
Christmas stories.
“Oh, Hagrid, the last slavery — placed it in the outside, if you?”
The room looks great. Flelows of Damass and honor were also organized
According to the walls, they don’t have a twelve birthdays of Christmas and standing
A room, some sources with medals, some are hundreds of
A candle.
“ⴰⵛⵃⴰⵍ ⵏ ⵡⵓⵙⵙⴰⵏ ⵉ ⴽⴷ-ⵢⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎⴻⵏ ⴰⵍⴰⵎⵎⴰ ⴷ ⵍⵄⵉⴷ ⵢⴻⵔ?” Hagrid questions.
“Justate,” Hermione said. « ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⴰⵢⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵎⴻⴽⵜⴰⵢⵉⵢⵉⴷ — Hari, Ron, ⵏⴻⵙⵄⴰ .
He received a seventhing half before the clothing, we should be in the car.”
“Oh yeah, you’re right,” Ron said, and sneaks his eyes from the teacher .
Fleetwick, who had golden blessings leave his home and follows
them on the new tree elements.
“ⵜⴰⵎⴽⴻⵔⴹⵉⵜ?” ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ Hagrid, ⵢⴻⴹⴼⴻⵔⵉⵜⴻⵏⵉⴷ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵜⵣⴻⵇⵇⴰ. “ before
festivals? Beth I love, don’t you go?”
“Ah, we don’t work,” Harry said with the ear. “Since there’s
He mentioned Nicolas Flamiel we tried to find who he is.”
“You are what?” Hagrid looked puzzled. “ⵙⵍⴻⵎⴷ ⴷⴰ — ⵏⵏⵉⵖ-ⴰⵙ ⵢⴰⵀ —
Strength. ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴷ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵖⵓⵔⴽ ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⵉ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⴰⴷⴰⵔ ⵓⵇⵊⵓⵏⵏⵏⵉ.”
“We just want to know who Nicolas Flamel, is just that,” Hermione said.
“If you don’t like us to fight and tell us that they do?” Harry added. "we
Ghitt The books of the books has been unable to find.
Somewhere — just give me a point — I know I have called somewhere.”
“Then I’m not saying’ something, Hagrid said in a smoothly way.
“Only we need to know, then,” Ron said, and they came out with Hagrid .
The satellite tribe and was forced to evapoly with the car.
They were really books on the name of Flammi since that time
Hagarde has allowed it to live, because how we can find out what was Snapee
Does he try to hate? The trouble there is so hard to see the odds to change,
He didn’t see what Flameel could work to introduce faith in the book. it’s not
In the 10th century Wizards, or the names of the main articles of
time; ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵉⵅⵓⵚⵚ, ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ, ⵙⴻⴳ ⵜⵓⴼⴼⵖⵉⵡⵉⵏ ⵜⵉⵙⵃⵉⵔⵉⵏ ⵜⵉⵎⴰⵢⵏⵓⵜⵉⵏ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⴰⵏ ⴰⵣⴰⵍ, ⴷ ⴰ .
The study of the final intelligence in the technology. And they, of course, was
the size of the library; Twelve books; The results of the judgments;
Intellectuals of the Individuals.
Hermion has taken a keyboard and records for trying to look for .
While Ron went quickly on a book level, he started to break from
Please beats. Harry went back in the temporary sector. was
ⵜⵜⵅⴻⵎⵎⵉⵎⴻⵏ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵍⵡⴻⵇⵜ ⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ Flamel ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⵏⴷⴰⵏⵏⵉⴹⴻⵏ ⴷⵉⵏⵏⴰ. Unfortunately, you
A consolidated point is specifically needed from one of the teachers to see in any of the teachers
ⵉⴷⵍⵉⵙⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵃⴻⵔⵣⴻⵏ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵥⵔⴰ ⵓⵔ ⴷⵢⴻⵜⵜⴰⴼ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ. These are the books
It contains strong Darc Magic in Hogwarts, and not only read
The oldest students call Defs vaccines against terrorist arts.
“What is it awkward, a boy?”
“Not,” Harry said.
Madame Pence brings him a piece of bread.
“You need to leave, then. Go xf — out!”
Wondering if he was going to think of a story, Harry left the
library. He, Ron, and Hermione had already agreed they'd better not ask Madam
bins where they can find flamml. They say they will tell him,
But they can't make the snap explanation they know what they have.
Harry wanted to look out into the street to see if they found the other two.
anything, but he wasn't very hopeful. They had been trying for two days,
After a, but since they do not have time is not the time to protect is not a scary thing.
They found nothing. What they really needed was a nice long search without
Madame Binns turns around and returns.
Five minutes later, Ron and Hermione joined him, shaking their heads.
They went out into the day.
“You’ll keep looking while I’m gone, won’t you?” Hermione said.
“And please send it to me if you find anything.”
"And you can ask your parents if they know who Flam is," Ron said.
“It would be safe to ask them.”
"Very well, and so are these two doctors," Hermione said.
When the celebrations started, Ron and Harry were spending a lot of time ar
Think a lot about flamel. They had the dormitory to themselves and the
The Great Hall was more narrow than it had ever been before, so they could achieve this .
Sell ​​with fire. They could spear on a
hatasting fork — bread, English muffins, marshmallows - and they make ways of
We're listening to Malfoy, who's one to talk about even if we don't know you.
work.
Ron also started teaching Harry wizard chess. This was like
Mogle just wants the texts to be alive, which is a lot like
directing troops in battle. Ron's set was very old and battered. Like all
Another is when there is someone else in his family — in this
True, his father. However, old chessmen weren’t a drawback at all. run
He knows them so well he has no problems getting them to do what he wants.
Harry played with Chesman Seamus Finnigan wrong, and they
Don't think about it all. Not a very good player so far they are talking
different bits of advice at him, which was confusing. “Don't send her there, she can't
Do you see his conviction? Send him away, we can afford to lose him.”
On Jesus' birthday, Harry went to bed looking forward to the day he
Citi d ufra, but don't wait for any flowers at all. When struck early
But, in the morning, the first thing he saw was the small boat lake in
After his movie.
“Merry Christmas,” Ron called Harry Ibby from the bed and
Based on his battery.
“You too,” Harry said. “Will you look at this? I have some gifts!”
“What do you expect, groups?” Ron said, recovering from his lies, that
It was much larger than Harry's.
Harry picked up the parchment. It was wrapped in heavy brown paper and
Scrolling on it was For Harry, from Hagrid. Inside was a rough cut piece of wood.
The fleet. Hagrid had apparently cut it himself. Harry released it — it looked a bit
Like an animal.
The second, much smaller package contained a note.
We have the zinc and we have entered the Nuel cakes. from
Uncle Vernon and Aunt Petunia. Taped ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⴽⴰⵔⴹⴰⵏⵏⵉ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵍⵇⵉⴷⴰⵔ ⵏ ⵅⴻⵎⵙⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵢⵉⴷⵉⵏⴰⵔⴻⵏ.
“That’s what a walk,” Harry said.
Ron was loved by five sides.
"weird!" He said: “Acu of Signs! Is this money?”
“You can catch,” Harry said, laughing about how it’s like for abandoned Ron. “ⵀⴰⴳⵔⵉⴷ
And with Khalist and Khalti — yes who Dictians are?”
“I think I know who that one’s from,” Ron said, turning a bit pink and .
The keys with a monarchy has been fully intended. "mom. I said you don’t wait anything.
The cakes and — ah, Ala,” said by Larer, “You’ve worked for Weasley.”
Harry opened the box to find a thick, hand woven sweater in
Forests of the forest is a great powder of the home of the home.
“Every year she makes us sweaters,” Ron said, unwrapping his, .
“That’s always a green.”
“It’s really lucky from it,” said Harry, he is sorry, which is very lucky .
tasty.
The trips that are also in the coffee — a large Yiqjaan skier of Tcikla .
from Hermiyun.
This left only a potatoes. Harry is righted. She was very light.
Heseres.
Something is a green as a lights that are sanctifies to the ground where it was
In smooth circuits. Run shouted.
“I’ve heard those,” he said with the soves silence, and he snapped the script of .
ⵢⴰⵍ ⵍⴱⴰⵟⴰⵟⴰ ⵏ Flavor ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵡⵡⵉ ⵙⴻⴳ Hermione. “If I think —
They were really smooth, and they really have the fact.”
“What is it?”
Harryultis blamed the body, the title of the folk from the ground. was a time for
Holderism, as water covered in the matter.
“ⴷ ⴰⵄⴻⴱⴱⵓⴹ ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵥⴻⵔ ⴰⵔⴰ”, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Ron, ⵙ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ ⵏ ⵍⵅⵓⴼ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵡⵓⴷⴻⵎⵉⵙ. "I'm sorry
And — try.”
Harry smashed the christ on the legs and Ron gave a pilgrim.
"That's it! Look down!”
Harry’s mirror to the legs, but they weren’t. runs to
mirror. Indeed, the magnificent thinking, the answer is only the authority
In the sky, his body is completely invisible. He pulled the rod over his head and
The vision all left.
“There’s a letter!” Ron said quietly. “You have heard of a letter!”
Harry pulleed of the crloak and seized the letter. He wrote by the time, is Ahrafi
The writing it did not die as words:
The father left this in the mouth before sat.
It’s this wall with it.
use well.
A Nuel a well on very red.
There is no sign. Harry is buried to the letter. There was Run loves
The coat.
He said: “Ad I give something to one of them.” "No one. What is
matter?"
“ⵓⵍⴰⵛ,” ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Hari. He is very sadness. ⴰⵏⵡⴰ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⴽⵔⴻⵏ ⴰⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢⵏⵏⵉ? had
Indeed long before his father?
We decided to say or think something else, the youth door is banished .
Visit with Fred and George Weasley including Harry.
ⵙⴳ ⵜⵥⵕⵜ. It is not like divided into anyone.
"happy new year!"
“Hey, see — Harry has a Wesley’s, too!”
Fred and George were wearing headaches, one with a F
on it, others a G.
“Harie's better than ours, but,” Fred, took Harry
sweater. "She seems to put in more effort if you're not family."
“Why don’t you use it, run?” asked George. "series,
They are happy and joyful.”
“I hate Maron,” Ron half-heartedly put it out over his head.
“She won’t write you a letter about yours,” George corrected. “I think she was
I hope you don't forget your name. But we won’t be black — we know we’re collaborating
His name is Grid and Forge.”
“What is all this fuss about?”
Bersy Wesley blushed his head to the door, and he turned back to ski. he
It appears that he took half the road and did not respond to her advances as he, too, made a
The luxury of the lumbie on his mouth, which he got fried.
“P to PrecTech! Come on, Percy, come on, we're all wearing ours, even
Harry got one.”
“I’m — I’m not lucky — I wanted —” Peru said, as they stopped the cups.
He moves on his head, and he hates his slavery and asks.
"And you're not staying with the prefects today either," George said.
“Christmas is a time for family.”
The Fubge Percy who is one of the house, and brushing his hands to his side .
The heat.
Harry had never had a birthday party in his entire life. The ten seeds,
the head of the head; Potato Mountains and Black Potatoes; paintings of Cipoletas;
Cocoa bean farms, green, black and cocoa plantations –
and the screwdrivers each a few feet on the cover. good
The ceremonial foliage wasn't like the Dursley's muggle at all
In their, which has been taken of the sculpture of gladik and their illegal colors within the inside. Harry
He got a driver's license with Fred and not only started as a manager, he left with a car .
Like a cake it’s all snapped them in a red sand cloud, but from .
Interior of a post-second sin and many of the live, white rats. Up in the hay
Table, Dumbledore broken down the card of his deceased to a free punne,
And he goes back and forth with a picture in a novel Professor Flitwick read to him.
Follow the Christmas pills. It’s almost imposing his
It depends on a silver text made in his hand. Harry saw Hagrid and reached
red and red in the face when he called for more wine, in the end, cold
Professor McGonagall on the poem, which, for Harry's poem, was
Ibbi, his upper hand escaped.
When Harry finally left the table, he was slaughtered with a
Items from scrappers, including an unbreakable, glowing pack
The Blues, a member of Grow-Your-Own-Warts, and his new team CisD Cis. the
The white squirrels came out and Harry had a bad smell and they were walking.
Give him Mrs. Norris' dinner.
Harry and Wesley have made a fun party with a happiness
snowball conflict into the background. Seen, it’s a cold, brown, and feel smooth, Nutny
He returned to the fire at the Gryffindor Association, where Harry opened at home .
due to the new model with the poetry for Ron. doesn't
He slipped in a bad way if Pearsi didn’t like to get him too much.
They strengthened the Royal Turki, squham, Tireifle, and the Nueltime Heaven
Everyone infected and sleeped to work many the stage to remain refused.
Percy follows Free and George in Griffindor porch because merchant
Leaders of the President.
And the Noël day was the entire Harry Irishers. But something is
He approaches the body day Camel. Which is until when he got to the bed I was
This faithful freedom : The unsure of the unsure is that they are.
Ron, it filled a cannon, there will be a rebels that will be fired,
He fell in sleep almost as soon as I made the treasures of the slaughter of the rice. Harry
He joined his mother tongue, and added the historic under him.
ⴱⴰⴱⴰⵙ...ⵡⴰⴳⵉ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷ ⴱⴰⴱⴰⵙ. He allowed the Hajja to get out of the Winnis.
The hands, and are more smooth, light as a wind. Use it as well, the copy said.
It’s important to have it now. It was out of the bed, the daughter.
for self. When he joined the answer, only the light of water and the plant was seen.
It was a very good feeling.
use well.
ⴳ ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⵉⵣⵉ, ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵃⵢⵢⴰⵍ ⴰⵙ ⵢⴰⵏ ⵓⵏⵛⴽ ⵎⵇⵇⵓⵔⵏ. All Hogwarts all open for
Is in this color. Tsuits succeeds as he stood there in Tallam.
It’s silent. It can go to want where he wants in this, where he wants, and Filch can’t find .
know.
Ron went back on his sleep. Should Harry stopped him? Something he found
Return — his father’s turning — he feels that this time — the first time — he wants
Let’s use it their fingers.
He left out of the youth home, fell from at home, at the Union of the Union,
and left from the angle of the window.
“Who’s there?” He used Fat Lady. Harry said nothing. isdda
quickly in the road.
Where should he go? He stopped, Less feel, thought. and after
And he gave him. The edited section in the library. like reading a lot
For the worship, SKD should be finding who is Flamel. Ibby, portrayed the
It’s about the incredible view of the intent as if he went.
The library was a lot of control and much. Harry hoped to see the
The way on books of books. The cold looks like he leaves in
Mediyer, even though Harry may know his hand and help him, the perspective gave
She has sands.
The simultaneous part of the library is at the end of the library. course
By the point of the paper that separates these books on the rest of the library, he is
He got her a slot to read the songs.
They don't call it much. The branches of gold, gold, camels
words in languages ​​cannot be explained by Hari. Someone don’t have the whole title. one
The book has a diplomatic picture that had as sick as blood. bab
Harry’s ear was sliced. Maybe he thinks, perhaps even, but thought
It comes to a smooth essay from the books, as if they know something
There he shouldn’t be.
He had to start somewhere. Setting the window by handing on the ground,
He looks at an underneath place for a very interesting book. A major block
And the silver size holds his eye. He snapped it with slavery, because he was
It is very, very heavy, and, turning it over in his hand, he tears it open.
He shared a flesh of flesh, a flesh of blood on silence — the book is
Sugar! Harry blocked it, but the music kept running towards him, a louder,
unbroken, earsplitting note. He dropped back back and back on his palm,
which came out at one time. Panicking, he heard footsteps coming down the corridor
outside — puts the entry book on the board, asks for it. He passed
file in the portal; Filch says goodbye, the crocodile's eyes staring straight at him.
Harry climbed under Filch's arm and went back and forth along the road, as
They leave the books of the book ringing in his ears.
He came to a sudden stop in front of a tall suit of armor. He is a member.
He was walking back and forth from the library, not giving her directions to where he was.
going. She's angry because she's a girl, she doesn't know where everything is.
There are some lights on the side of the house, he knows, but there must be five places.
Over there.
“She asked me to come right away, Professor, if there was anything
He comes back at night, and someone in the library reports
section."
Harry feels the blood drain from his face. Wherever possible, it should
He knows a lizard, because his voice is happy, and he comes near, and to him
Hurr, it was Snape who replied, “The modified side? Although, they cannot be
By now, we’ll take them.”
Harry stood rooted to where Filch and Snape went on the stairs.
ahead. They can't see it, of course, but it's a radial path and what
He came so well they almost served him — the click didn’t stop him from
It looks very good.
He came silently when he could. A connecting door opened to his left. it
It was his only hope. He unraveled it, held his breath, and asked ur
I took it out, and to its display it came to be inside the house without
He sees something. They walked straight past, and Harry leaned against the wall,
They’re very sensitive, and they’re listening to their hands and die. This was close,
Very close. It was a few seconds before he noticed anything about the room .
Hide g.
It looks like an unused room. The simplest forms of forms are crosses
They were breached against the walls, and there was a meat of the back yard – but
He welcomed against Agadir , which he said was something that was not like
It was there, something looked like someone just put it there to protect
He's on the road.
It is a happy moon, like the cold, with a bright gold.
frame, standing on two hinged legs. There is a code developed on
Above: Strat Ihro Oit Ubi Kiefro was introduced to Oit Khaf Wohsi. It looks like its there now.
It wasn't Filch and Snape's voice anymore, Harry approached the mirror, wanted
Look at himself but he doesn't see the thought again. He stepped out in front of her.
He had to clap his hands to his mouth to stop himself from screaming. he
He turned around. His heart was beating furiously faster than it had been since the book
He had screamed—because he saw not only himself in the mirror, but the whole .
a crowd of people standing just behind him.
But the room was empty. Taking a deep breath, he quickly turned to
mirror.
There he’s, it’s like, it’s like, a white and simultaneously dips, and there,
Uncovered after him, there were at least ten more. Harry looked over his shoulder —
But still, no one was there. Or even Nutnie aren’t all seen? It is actually in one
The room is full of invisible people and the trick of this mirror is that it reflects them,
Invisible or not?
He has become a democratic in the middle. The woman has followed after
sight was moving and staring at him. He reached out and felt the air.
After him. Limmer is there for sure, to be careful, their ideas were all
Almost, but only felt hua – she and others were just in Lymmary.
She was a very beautiful woman. She had a silent red and snacks —
His eyes are just like mine, Harry thought, leaning a little closer to the glass. bright
Reds — with the skyscrapers, but they have thought that she was writing;
The deal, but she writes at a time. The long-lived man, a rigid, with the black hair standing
To her side he put his hand. Psychiatrics, and chocolate was very
It is not done. She stepped into the corner, as she held Harry's.
Harry approached Lyme now until he almost holds the sinners.
The one of his novel.
"mom?" he knows. "father?"
Mothers only, they are supposed. And slowly, Harry looked into the faces
other people in the mirror, and he saw another pair of blue eyes like his own, other
A nose like his, even a little old man who looked like he had Harry's
knobbly knees — Harry was staring at his family, for the first time in his life.
The Potters smiled and waved at Harry, who looked sadly back.
In them, his hands are pressed against the glass as if hoping to fall
With listening to him and reached them. He had stronger slopes within him, half
joy, half missing sorrow.
How long he stood there, he didn't know. The thought never went away.
And he looked and looked until a distant noise brought him back to his senses.
He couldn’t stay here, it must find a path to return to the bed. id eyes
From his mother’s face, he whispered, “I’ll be back,” and stormed out of the room.
“You can wake me up,” Ron said, desperately.
“You can come to the leg, to come back, I want to withdraw with.
“I want to see my mother and father,” Ron said with joy.
"And I'd like to see all your family, all the Weasleys, be able to . . ."
Remember your brothers and everybody.”
“You can see every old time,” Ron said. “The only one is going to be close to the house .
In the summer. After all, it probably only shows dead people. Shame on nothing
You found Flameel, though as. São some potato or something, a lot you don't
anything?"
Harry couldn’t eat. the words of parents and see.
Also the finger. Flamel almost be added. It’s not too clear
It doesn’t matter. Who cares what the three-headed dog guards? what
There is that Snape European, indeed?
“It’s so much?” Run said. “They’re going to be a child.”
What a lot is very much is that perhaps he could not find the tons.
The room too. With Ron covered in scars, too, they had to go a lot further
Definitely the other night. They tried to run away from Harry from the library.
They roamed the dark streets for almost an hour.
“I’m freezing,” Ron said. “Let’s forget about it and go back.”
"No!" He used Harry. I know that there was a little more.”
They passed the ghost of a tall witch floating in the opposite direction, but
He saw no one else. As Run begins to complain that his legs are dead cold,
Harry noticed the scar on the wall.
“It’s here—right here—yes!”
They pushed the door open. Harry set the bottle down from his side.
shrug and ran to the mirror.
There they were. His mother and father were relieved to see him.
"see?" Harry whispered.
“I can’t see anything.”
"Look! Look at them all…there are holes in them….”
“I can just see you.”
“Look into it right, go on, stand where I am.”
Harry stepped aside, but with Ron in front of the mirror, he couldn't see
Her family was gone, just Ron in his paisley suit.
Ron, however, was staring transfixed at his own picture.
“Look at me!” he said.
“Can you see your whole family standing around?”
“No—I’m alone—but I’m different—I look older—and I’m the boss .
boy!"
"what?"
“I — I’m wearing a badge as usual Bill — and I took .
The home cup is the Quidditch cup — I’m a Quidditch captain, too.”
Ron tore his eyes away from this beautiful sight to look angrily
Harry.
“Do you think this mirror shows the future?”
“How could he? My whole family is dead—let me take another look—”
“You had it to yourself all yesterday, give me a little more time.”
“You just grabbed the Quidditch Cup, what’s amazing about that? I
I want to see my parents.”
“Don’t push me—”
A sudden noise outside in the hallway put an end to their discussion.
They didn’t realize how loud they were.
"quickly!"
Ron turned the glasses on them as Mrs. Norris's eyes glowed .
He came through the doorknob. Ron and Harry stood perfectly still, both thinking the same
The thing is — does the suit work on cats? After what seemed like an age, she turned around and
left.
“That wasn’t safe — she probably went for Filch, I think she heard us.
series."
And Ron dragged Harry out of the room.
The snow still hadn’t melted the next morning.
“You want to play my brother, A Hari?” Run said.
"No."
“Why don’t we go down and see Hagrid?”
“No…you go…”
“I know what you’re thinking, Harry, that mirror. Don't go back.
tonight."
"why not?"
“I dunno, I just have a bad feeling about that — and how, you
Many rows of students are present. Filch, Snape, and Mrs. Noris are waiting
around. So what if they can't see you? Will they enter you? If you want
Drop something?”
“Looks just like Hermione.”
“I’m up, Harry, I’m not going.”
But Harry has only one thought in mind, which is to return to
in front of the mirror, and run will not stand.
That third night he found his way quicker than before. Is there a walk
He always knew he does more pain than he is a sin, but he didn’t meet
anyone.
And his mother and his father had dreamed evil, and there was one of the man.
ⵉⴱⴰⴱⴰⵜⴻⵏ-ⵏⵏⴻⵙ ⵜⵜⵄⴻⴷⴷⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵍⴼⴻⵕⵃ ⵙ ⵍⴼⴻⵕⵃ. Harry can stay on the ground in front of the
mirror. ⵓⵔ ⵉⵍⵍⵉ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵍⵍⵉ ⵔⴰⴷ ⵜ ⵉⵙⴱⴷⴷⵉ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵇⵇⵉⵎ ⴷⴰ ⴽⵓⵍⵍⵓ ⵉⴹ ⴰⴽⴷ ⵏⵏⵙ
family. There’s nothing about all.
except -
“So — they returned again, Harry?”
Harry feels that inside his ice cream. ⴰⵔ ⵜ ⵉⵜⵜⴰⵏⵏⴰⵢ ⴷⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⵏⵏⵙ.
Setting on one of the rivers with the wall is not others without Albus Dumbledore.
Harry has to go straight, so he is trying to get to the mirror .
She didn’t see him.
“I — I don’t see you, Lord.”
“Supporting how they faced not to be concerned about, it can help you,” he said
Dombledore appeared, and Harry to see he was supposed.
“Yes,” Dumbledore said, left the dirty to stay on the ground with .
Harry, “Con, like hundreds before you, you posted Merror’s lights
of the input.”
“I don’t know it was called, the Lord.”
“But I want you to be afraid what do you work?”
“For-This — that means my family —.”
“And she’s showing that your friend Roone itself is a child of self.”
“How you know —?”
“I don’t need a charcoal to become unexpected,” Dumbledore said indeed.
“Now you can think of what all Iris’s terrorism show us all?”
Harry explained himself.
“I’ll explain. The best man on the ground will be able to use
The opening of Erisde like a socialist line, or to see him and see
By himself like him. Does he helps who?”
Harry thought. ⴹⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⵡⴰⵢⴰ, ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ-ⴷ ⵙ ⵡⴰⵟⴰⵙ, « ⴰⵢⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴽⴰⵏⴰⵢ-ⴰⵖ-ⴷ ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵏⴻⴱⵖⴰ...
What we want…”
“Yes it’s no,” Dumbledore said silently. “That’s showing us only or less
ⵅⴼ ⵜⵏⵥⴻⵥⴷⵜ ⵍⵍⵉ ⴱⴰⵀⵔⴰ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵙⵎⵔⴰⵙⵏ ⴳ ⵡⵓⵍⴰⵡⵏ ⵏⵏⵖ. K, no
You know your family, check them out on you. ⵔⵓⵏⴰⵍⴷ ⵡⵉⵙⵍⵉ, ⵍⵍⵉ ⵖⵓⵔⵙ
It’s so smooth by Aitats, and sees himself standing alone, which is the best
for five of them. However, this merchanter hasn’t given us knowledge or real. men
Effective in front of him, they were suspended by what they were, or were guilty .
He doesn’t know, he didn’t know what to show is true or even maybe.
“It would be set up Mirror to a new house, A Harry, and I’m accused .
You don’t want to search for me again. If you’re ever going, you’ll be now
prepared. ⵓⵔ ⴷⴰ ⵉⵜⵜⴳⴳⴰ ⵃⵎⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵣⴷⵖ ⵅⴼ ⵜⵉⵔⵔⴰ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵜ ⴰⴷ ⵉⴷⵉⵔ, ⴽⵛⵎ ⵙ ⵎⴰⵏⴰⵢⴰ.
Now, why don’t you use it and go out to bed?”
Harry stands.
“Sir — Professor Dumbledore? ⵥⴻⵎⵎⴰⵔⴻⵖ ⴰⴷ ⵛⴻⴽ ⵙⵙⵓⵜⵓⵔⴻⵖ ⵛⴰ?”
“It’s obvious, you’re just so you,” Dumbledore said with a woman’s view. “You want to ask me
Another thing, but.”
“What’s you see when you’re looking at in the mirror?”
"For? Ise myself holding a pair of thick, woolen socks."
Harry blushed.
“One no one can have the necessary girls,” Dumbledore said. "another
Noël was accompanied by I did not come found of any courage. ⵔⴰⴷ ⵙⵜⵜⵉⵏ ⵎⵉⴷⴷⵏ ⵅⴼ 2066.
I have books.”
It was not just after he returned to the bed that he made Harry that
Maybe Dumbledor’s true. But then, he thought, as he did
pushed Scabbers out of his trance, it was a question in itself.
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
Installation
Nicholas Flamel
and the umbledur convinced Harry not to go looking for the Mirror of Erised .
Once again, and for the remainder of the Christmas holidays, the invisibility cloak remained
He came out inside his flesh. Harry wished he could forget what he saw in
peppermint easily, but not impossible. It started happening during the day. above and
He dreamed again about his parents fighting in a flash of blue light.
while a higher voice walks away laughing.
“You see, Dumbledore was right, the Mirror might let you do the same, he said.
Ron, when Harry told him about this letter.
Hermione, who returned the day before the semester began, took a different route
The way things are. She was torn between horror at the thought of Harry getting out of
bed, skipping school three nights in a row (“If only Filch had caught you!”), and
A pity that he didn't at least reveal who Nikola Flamel was.
They almost gave up hope of finding flamml in a library book,
though Harry was still sure he had read the name somewhere. A time has a time.
They started and went back to the book with the books ten minutes into their time.
Afra. Harry has even less time than the other two, because he practices Quidditch .
He started again.
Wood is used in groups more than once. Even the endless rain
He had changed the rain and could not feed his soul. Wesley residents appeal
that Wood was becoming an idiot, but Harry was on Wood's side. If they win .
Their next match, against Hufflepuff, they would beat Slytherin in the house
championship for the first time in seven years. As much as I want to win,
Harry found that he had fewer nightmares when he was tired after training.
After that, in a well-known and predictable moment of activity, wood
He gave the team a bit of bad news. He was just very angry at the Weasleys,
They were constantly bumping into each other and pretending to fall off their butts.
“Stop her asksw!” He preached. “This is kind of
Something that would ruin our match! Snape is an athlete this time, and he’ll be looking
For any reason that would deduct points from Gryffindor!”
George Wisconsin was right about his anger about this word.
“Snape’s bodyguard?” Again with a mouthful of milk. “With that .
Did he ever referee a Quidditch match? It wouldn’t be fair if we could
Passing Slytherin.”
The rest of the group dropped in beside George to complain, too.
"It's not my fault," Wood said. “We just have to make sure we play a
It's a clean game, so it doesn't take anything to decide for us.”
Which was all very well, Harry thought, but he had another reason to
He didn’t want Snape near him while he was playing Quidditch….
The rest of the team was left to talk to each other as usual in the end
party, but Harry went straight back to the Gryffindor common room,
Where he finds Ron and Hermione playing chess. Chess is just a thing.
Hermione doesn’t have anything, and what Harry and Ron believes are a very good about it.
“Don’t talk to me for a second,” Ron said as Harry sat down next to .
To him, “I’m going to use—” You took the view on Harry’s face.
"What happened to you?" You look terrible.”
He’s silently speaking so that no one else knows, Harry said two more
On the desire to Snape quickly, it quickly, in order to be the Quidditch guard.
“Don’t play,” Hermione said at once.
“Say you’re sick,” Ron said.
“He worked like the same as a junior guarantee,” Hemium.
“Of course, open a Greek,” Ron said.
“I can’t,” Hari said. “There is no Seker of the story. When I return,
Griffindor couldn't play all.”
At that moment, Neville disappeared into the club room. How he has
He managed to make a buried from the Native Tennessee was a victims of everyone, because the legs
They were all captured and what they know at once and LegLocker .
curse. He probably had to backpack all the way to Gryffindor tower.
They all fell on laughter without Hermione, who came out and
Iskr opposite. The feet of Niville are divided and reaching to his feet,
ⴰⵙⵉⵔⵎ. "what happened?" ⵜⴻⵙⵜⴻⵇⵙⴰⵜ Hermione, ⵜⴻⵡⵡⵉⵜ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎ ⵢⵉⴷⵙ
Harry and Ron.
“Malfoy,” Neville said with a devote. “I met outside the car. ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ
He was looking for whom to try on it.”
“Go to teacher Makgungal!” Hermione asked Neville. “Support!”
Neville had made himself.
“I don’t want more trouble,” he recalled.
“It’s be stuck in front of, A Neville!” Run said. “He's used to
You go all out for people, but that’s no reason to sleep around him and
Often this is easy.”
'You don't have to tell me I'm not brave enough to be in Gryffindor, .
Malfoy has already worked this,” Neville said with a week.
Harry was insulted in the company’s company, has found a Uqjuun of Tcikula, and
The latter had given him a large sum of money from Hermione's company for Christmas. ⵉⴼⴽⴰ ⵜ .
Neville, which looks like the nervous can write.
“You have about twelve Malfoy,” Harry said. “Asila hat sty .
ⴽⴻⵞⵞ ⵉ Griffindor, ⵎⴰⵞⵞⵉ ⴰⴽⴽⴰ ? And where Maloy? In consideration by Slenderin.”
Neville's vocals are closer to the ears of the pinch as they resolve the story.
“Thanks, Harry…I think I'm going to bed….D'you want a map, do you
asset, and;
When Nephil left, Harry saw the happy wizard's card.
“Dumbledor again,” he said, “It’s the first one that I’m no longer up —”
He sniffed. He’s simultaneously in the middle of the card. Then he looked at Run.
It was Hermione.
“ⵓⴼⵉⵖ ⵜ!” ⵉⵙⵇⵙⴰ. “I’ve found Flael! I told you I'd read
The name of some place earlier, I read it on the following threads — I linked to this:
''Dumbledore is best known for his victory over the late Ring
Greenwalt in 1945, for twelve uses of mountain blood, and
His work on alchemy with his collaborator, Nicholas Flamil'!”
Hermione came to her feet. ⵓⵔ ⵜⵥⵔⵉ ⴽⵉⴳⴰⵏ ⵙⴳ ⵍⵍⵉⵖ ⴳⴰⵏ
The solutions for their first part of the homework came back.
“Stay there!” she said, putting the cold pill to the girls.
Dormitor. Harry and Ron had no time to communicate with verbs before
She walks backwards, an old book in her hands.
“I never thought I’d be here!” She speaks in a kind way. “I bring this up
It’s been 10 years since automatic communication.”
"LIGHT?" Ron said, but Hermione was told to keep quiet until she saw
Somehow, it starts to develop in a positive way with age, and it becomes
she.
In the end she found what she wanted.
“I know it! I know it!”
“Are we planning to call yet?” said Ron gruffly. Hermione ignored
he.
“Nicolas Flammel,” she says in a positive manner, “is a well-known
The Surrer Stun!”
This doesn't have much of a desired effect.
“What is it?” Harry and Ron said.
“Oh, really, you two don’t read? See – I read that, there.”
She placed the book at them, and Harry and Ron at:
The classical study of alchemy is a work that will allow the explanation of Surreus,
A democratic society with good governments. Stone will change somewhat.
corn to pure gold. It also produces the elixir of life, which will make
Asusman is not dead.
There have been many reports of sore throat over the generations, but
The only last member currently in existence was Mr. Nicholas Flamel, who was mentioned
Alchemy and Obra. Mr. Flamil, who celebrated his sixty-sixth birthday last year, is living a quiet life in Difon with his wife, Bernielle (sixty
One hundred and fifteen).
"see?" Hermione said, as Harry and Ron left. “This boy should be
Flamel Magic Surrerer Stuner! It is said that Dumbledore asked him to protect him.
FES, because they are the buried and he knows Cha after, that’s why.
They want Stone out of Greenwich!”
“The genocide that makes I gold stops you from sometime and die!” Harry said.
“He has no doubt that snap behind him! Everyone will see it.”
“And there is no doubt that we were unable to detect flamel in that commercial survey.
Changes in Wizardry,” Run said. “It’s not what happened recently if it’s six years
One hundred and fifty-eight, isn't he?”
The next morning in the struggle against the ancient arts, at the time of the change.
Different ways of treating the streets, Harri and Ron are talking about .
What would they do with a sorcerer's stone if they had one. I wasn't until I said Run.
He would buy his Quidditch group who remembers Harry on Snap and
The next meeting.
“I’ll play,” he said to Ron and Hermione. “If I’m not, all
Slytherins will think I'm just too scared to face Snape. I’ll show them…I’ll
They really lit up their face plates when we won.”
"Just as long as we don't wipe you off the field," Hermione said.
However, as a nearby verb, Harry becomes more active,
All he told Ron and Hermione. The rest of the band wasn’t too lucky.
either. Slitherin’s slot idea at the home championship is .
Oddly, no one had done it for seven years, but they would be allowed to do it,
With a wall like that?
Harry didn't know if he was imagining it or not, but it seemed like
Keep running into Snape wherever he goes. Sometimes, he even wondered if he was .
Snape was following him, trying to catch him himself. Drug samples are
It became kind of the bully of the week, Snape was too nice to Harry. can
Snape probably knew that they had found out about the Sorcerer's Stone? Harry didn't
See how he can — but sometimes he has a nagging feeling that Snape can .
to the brains.
Harry knew, when they wished him well outside the dorm rooms
The next evening, Ron-nni and Hermione were wondering if they'd ever see
He returned to her alive. This is not what you would call funny. Harry didn't hear the
Wood’s voiceover as he pulled on his Quidditch armor and picked up his
Nimbus Two Thousand.
Ron and Hermione, meanwhile, found a spot in the stands near the
Neville, couldn’t understand why they looked so strange and disgusting, or why
They had both brought their babies to the party. Harry didn’t know that Run
and Hermione was secretly busy with the leg-luker course. Found
Malfoy's idea is to use it on Nephil, and he's ready to use it on Snape.
He showed some sign of Harry's intent.
“Now, don’t forget, that’s Locomotor Mortis,” Hermione pointed at Ron .
Slide his trunk back up.
“I know,” Ron said quietly. “Don’t deny.”
Back in the bathroom, Wood took Harry aside.
"I don't want to pressure you, Potter, but if we ever need an early break .
of the Snitch and now. Finish the game before Snape can favor Hufflepuff too
quite."
“The whole school is out there!” Fred Weasley said, looking up from the
gate. “Even — blimey — Dumbledore came to have a look!”
Harry's heart did a skip.
“Drum?” He said, rushing to the door to make sure. Fred was right.
There was no mistaking the silver-haired woman.
Harry could laugh out loud in relief He was safe. was
There was no way Snape could try to hurt him if Dumbledore
observe.
Maybe that was why Snape looked so angry as the teams walked .
On the field, that’s what Ron focused on, too.
"I've never seen Snape look so stupid," he said to Hermione. "look -
They were gone. Uh!”
Someone kicked Ron in the back of the head. It was Malfoy.
“Oh, sorry, Weasley, I didn’t see you there.”
Malfoy grinned down at Crabbe and Goyle.
“Can Peter stay the course this time? anyone
Want to bet? What about you, Wesley?”
Run did not return; Snape only gave Hufflepuff a shot because
George Weasley came to Bludger on him. Hermione, whose hands are all
It went into his hand, and was placed in a clean way in Harry, who was running away from the game.
Like a meat, it's looking for a snitch.
“You know how I think they choose people for the Gryffindor team?”
Malfoy said heavily a few minutes later, as Snape gave Huffleaf another
There is no one example. “It’s the people they worry about. See, there are butr,
Which is not parents, here are Wisley, they don’t have money — you
You have to be in the group, Longbottom, and you have no sense of mind.”
Neville he went and black with ear but is clean in place to face Malafoy.
“She is two years, Maloy,” he said.
Malfoy, Krabbe, and Goyle have been satisfied with the sight, but Ron, still not
He tries to take his eyes from the game, he said, “You know it, Neville.”
“Longbottom, learn there and I haven’t been a more singer than the Wasley, and .
That means something.”
The Run roots have previously been tested until they sought with the punch.
on Harry.
“I’m accustomed to you, Malloy — another word—.”
“Ron!” said Hermion sddenly, “Harry —”
"Desshaw? Where?"
Harry went back to a smooth, which brought the roofs and
He sat from the public. Hermiee saw, the numbers were seen in the order, like.
Harry stood to the ground as a dream.
“You’re on the field, Wesley, obviously Potters, obviously some money on $100.
Land!"" Malfoy said.
Ron left. Befre Malfoy knew wat was happening, Ron was on top
ⵣⵖ ⵏⵜⵜⴰ, ⴰⵔ ⵜ ⵉⵜⵜⵔⴰⵔ ⵉ ⵜⵢⵉⵎⴰⵏⵜ. Neville has risen, talking about
He turns to his place to help.
“Dad, Harry!” Reading Hermiion, surrounded on the scene to see
When Harry stopped directly in Snap — Maloy and Ron was also looking for
It’s going to be underway, or the slope and trees coming from the hairs of the fish
and Nevil, Krab, and Guyle.
In the air, Snap slipped on his palm just in time to see
Something was snacked, snapped it with Inc. — the second,
Harry out of the corner, the right-handed hand smashed, Snatch took in
His hand.
changes; ⵉⵍⴰⵇ ⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⵍⵉ ⴷ ⴰⴽⵍⵉⵙ, ⵓⵔ ⵉⵣⵎⵉⵔ ⴰⵡⴷ ⵢⴰⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵙⴽⵜⵉ ⴰⵙ
Snish was shot quickly.
“Run! Ron! where are you? The game finished! Harry won! We lovery!
Griffindor is in the novel!” Shrikick Hermione, and is going down in place.
and the Parvati Patti Pate in the lunch in front.
Harry came from his desert, a leg from the ground. He cannot believe
it. It was — the game ended; Not only remains five minutes. as
Grinffindors are hiding on the narrative, the words Snape has closed almost, in the white face
And a smooth hand — later Harry sings on his hand and watched to
The dominal face.
“Harry,” Dumbledore said quickly, as long as Harry will be listening to.
“You can see you don’t want to slide on this mirror... don’t keep the
He’s worked…and’s good…”
Snap teaches treasures about the offses.
Harry left the slavery room alone some time later, to get Nimbu two
Return to the table. He couldn’t believe he felt more joy.
It’s really something to explain right now – no one can say it’s just one
A well-known name. The ev neing air had never smeled so sueette. congratulations
On the hills of the snake, he turns out to the last minute in his head, which is a smooth slaughter:
Gryffindors running to lift him on the in the most; Ron and Hermione in
Ossume, sicking down, Ron is blessing with a smooth slot.
Harry arrived at the table. He leang agatives the doden door and
It overlooked Hogwarts, with its windows glowing red in the setting sun.
Gryffindor in chief. He did, showing Snape ….
And speaking of Snape…
A hooded figure came swiftly down the front steps of the castle. sure
He doesn't want to be seen, he walks in a clean way to the end of the forest of terror.
Harry's victory faded from his mind as he watched. Knows the meaning of the novel
It's going. Snape, sneaking into the forest while everyone else was at dinner
— What's going on?
Harry took it back to Nebos To Twenty and removed it. Gliding
Silence on the town he sees Snape entering the forest at once. Follow him.
The trees were so thick that he couldn't see where Snape was going. He left.
In the hills, down and down, the first elements of the snow fall.
My words. He glided towards them and landed noiselessly in a towering beech tree.
He climbed in a happy way on one of the branches, and he was very happy.
Bridtk, will soon see from behind.
Downstairs, at a music festival, the snap started, but it wasn't alone. Quirl
He was there, too. Harry couldn't put a smile on his face, but he was
It gets worse more than once. Harry struggled to take in what they were saying.
“…I don’t know why you wanted tad meet here of all pimukan, .
Sephirus….”
“Oh, I thought we were going to keep this private,” Snape said, his voice calm.
“The students don’t know about the Surcer Stone, after all.”
Harry stood forward. Quirrell was mumbling something. snap
he interrupted.
“How have you found out about this development of Hagrid so far?”
“But Severus, I —”
"You don't want your invitation, Kierre," Snap said, as she took a step
to him.
“II don’t know what yy—.”
“You know exactly what I’m going to tell you.”
An owl hooted loudly, and Harry nearly fell out of the tree. He continued .
Himself in time to hear Snape saying “— a little part of you hook-up-hooks. am
waiting."
“B-but d-t —”
“Very,” cut the snap. “Let’s have another small talk, when
You have time to think things through and decide where your priorities lie.”
He threw his cloak over his head and strode out of the clearing. compliance
It was closer now, but Harry could see Quirrell, standing much like him
He's a monster.
“Harry, where have you been?” Hermione squeaked.
“We won! She won! We won!” Ron asked, Harry was worried about
back. “And I had Malfoy a black eye, and Neville tried to take on Crabbe and
Goyle with one hand! It was still cold outside but Miss Pomfrey said it would be all
right — talk about showing off Slytherin! I’m waiting for you in the common room.
We had a wedding, Fred and George have rented some of the cars and what else from
Partnership.”
“Never mind that now,” Harry chuckled. “We will find a baby .
room, you wait 'til you hear this….”
making sure Peeves wasn't inside before closing the door behind them,
Then he told them what he had seen and heard.
“So we’re right, it’s the Sorcerer’s Stone, and Snape is trying to push
Quirrell to help him get it. He asks if he knows how to get past Fluffy — and he .
He said something about the Quirell' 'hocus' of Quirell — I think there are other things .
You were careful to the Flfy, prison prison, perhaps
Querrell will work some of the sensitive arts against the blue arts that Snape should look for .
through -"
“Yes you want me to say it’s just the sand of the stone Scod Quarrell stands to 1990.
Snap?” Hermione said in shock.
"She'll be gone by next Tuesday," Ron said.
Chapter Fourteen
NORBERT THE NORWEGIAN HERO
Q uirrell, however, must have been more powerful than was thought. In a week
This next one seems to be getting darker, but it doesn’t seem like
although it was still broken.
Every time they passed the third floor lobby, Harry, Ron, and
Hermione would press their ears to the door to see if Fluffy was still
It growls inside. Snape was grinning at his evil grin, which
Rather he is saying that the stone is still safe. Whenever Harry passes Quirrell these
Days gave him an encouraging sort of look, and Ron began to tell
People left because they laughed at Quirrell's antics.
However, Hermione had more than a Sorcerer's Stone in mind.
She started making study plans and color coding all of her tiles. Harry
And Ron wouldn't get it, but she kept nagging them to do the same.
“Hermione, exams have been around for ages.”
“Ten weeks,” Hermione said flatly. “It’s less about age, it’s about the second to
Nikulas Flame.”
“But we don’t have six decades,” Ron remembered. "anyway,
What are you studying, you already know you’re an A.”
“What am I studying? Are you strong? You know we have to get through.
These exams to enter the second year? They are so important, I must have
I started studying a month ago, not sure what got into me….”
Unfortunately, teachers seem to think along the same lines as
Hermione. They piled a lot of homework on them until the Easter holidays
Not nearly as fun as the Christmas ones. It was hard to relax with
Hermione in front of you reciting the Twelve Uses of Dragon Blood or screaming
The sounds of the whisper. Looking and smiling, Harry and Ron spent most of their free time
time in the library with her, trying to get all their extra work done.
“I don’t remember that,” Ron said one morning, drawing .
copy and gazed wistfully out of the library window. It was the first really
Best day they've had in months. The sky was clear, don’t forget me blue, and
There’s a feeling in the air of a coming summer.
Harry, who sees “the city” in a Toussaint Magic Herbs
and Fungi, who didn't notice until he heard Ron say, "Hagrid!" what are you doing
At the library?”
Hagrid stood in the picture, somewhat hidden behind his back. Stones .
He was often out of place in his pink coat.
“Jus' lookin',” he said, in a suggestive tone that got their interest at once.
“An' what have you got so much of ter?” He suddenly looks suspicious. “Yer not yet
You’re looking at Nicholas Flamel, are you?”
"Oh, we found out who owns the year," Ron often said. “And we
They knew if the monster was hunting, it was Surcer’s Asterisk —”
“Shhhh!” Hagrid looks around to see if anyone recognizes him.
“Dun' go with the pants on this, what's the matter with yah?”
"There are some things we want to check with you, it's a matter of fact," he said
Harry, “Of the what Stone protects about Flovy —”
“Chhhhhh!” Hagrid said again. “Listen — come to me, see me later, I’m not
Bromisin' I'll tell some place, Anlli, but don't go I'm walking here and there,
students aren's'pposed ter know. They’ll think I told them—”
“I’ll take you follow, yes,” Harry said.
Hagrid left.
“And what was he hides after the ear?” He told Hermione with a view.
“Do you think he has something to do with the stone?”
“I’m going to see what the part is,” Ron said, which would be very
of work. He came back a minute later with a stack of books in his arms and
They praise them on the table.
“Dragon!” Iwessus. “Hagrid was looking up stuff apot dragons!
See also: Types of Dragons in Great Britain and Ireland; From Eg
Inferno, Code of the Cypriot Dragon.”
“Hagrid always wanted to be a dragon, he told me that the first time I met
T, “ Harry said.
"But it's against our rules," Run said. “Dragon education was preserved for 100 years.
of the Warlocks' Charter of 1709, everybody knows that. Should it stop?
Mouls from our memoir if we kept living in the behind-the-band —
After all, you can’t love dragons, it’s awful. You weold See the bourns
Charlie came from the streets in Romania.”
“But aren’t there dangerous places in Britain?” Harry said.
“Of course they are,” Ron said. “Common Wilce Green and Hebrew
Blacks. The Ministry of Magic has a job waiting for them, I can tell you. our
Kind of had to keep casting spells on Muggles who saw them, to make them
forget."
“Well what’s what Hagrid say? Hermione said.
When they knocked on the door of my mother's house an hour later, they were exchanging
They were forced to see that all the dogs were closed. Hagrid called out “Who is it?”
Before he ignored them, and then quickly replaced the door.
It was getting hot inside. Even though it was such a hot day, there was
A roaring fire in the pit. Hagrid makes him tea and Frakh offers them
Sandwich, I Gin.
“So — yeh wanna ask me something?”
“Yeah,” Harry said. There is no benefit to get in the middle of the forest. “We were
I was wondering if you could tell us what guards the Sorcerer Stone besides
fluffy."
Hagrid nodded at him.
“O' truly I can't,” he said. “Number one, I don’t know myself. number
The two, he was a lot knowerly, yes I didn’t say it's oh if I can. The stone
Here fer good reason. It was almost stolen from Gringotts — I’m sure
Does that work an' at all? Beats me how yeh even you know abou' Fluffy.”
“Oh, come on, Hagrid, you may not want to tell us, but you know,
You know everything that goes on here,” Hermione said in a choked tone,
The voice of the horn. Hagrid's smile crinkled and they could tell he was smiling. "we
I just asked who was doing the trading, really.” Hermione continued. "we
He wondered who Dumbledore trusted to help him, other than you.”
Hagrid's chest tightened at these last words. Harry and Run fly into the
Hermione.
“Well, I don’t think it can hurt ter to say that…let’s see…he
Lend me Fluffy… and then some of the teachers did tricks…
Professor Sprout — Professor Flitwick — Professor McGonagall —” he announced .
He tossed them over his shoulders, "Professor Quirrell — it was Dumbledore himself who did it ."
some ', or ' truth. Wait, I forgot one. Oh yes, Master.
Snap.”
“Snap?”
“Yeah — yer not yet about abou' that, is yeh? See, Snape helped keep
The stone, it was not on ter to steal it.”
Harry knew Ron and Hermione were thinking the same thing. whether
Snape is in defense of the stone, it should be easy to get
How the other teachers treated her. He probably knew everything — except, .
Turns out, Quirrell's character and how Fluffy will pass.
“You are the only one who knows how to get past Fluffy. Not you,
Hagrid?” Harry said calmly. “And you won’t tell anyone, will you? not
Not one of the teachers?”
"Not a soul knows but me and Dumbledore," Hagrid said proudly.
“Well, it is,” Harry said nodding to the others. “Hagrid, we can
Do you have an open window? I’m bathing.”
"I can't, Harry, I'm sorry," Hagrid said. Harry watched him stare into the fire.
Harry looked at her, too.
“Hagrid—what’s that?”
But he already knew what it was. In the heart of the fire, beneath
The girl was a big white, red.
“Oh,” Hagrid said, rubbing his forehead nervously, “That’s — er…”
“Where did you get him, Hagrid?” Ron said, scrambling around the fire to get
Look closely at the egg. “Maybe he brought you a secret.”
“Win it,” Hagrid said. “Las night. I was in the village with some
Drinking an' got into a game o' cards with a stranger. Think he’s very happy with ter
Take it off, ter be honest.”
“But what are you going to do with it when it’s done?” Hermione said.
“Well, I got something to read,” Hagrid said, pulling out a large book .
from under his nose. “I got this out of the library — Dragon’s Rise for
Joy and Benefit — it's a little out of date, o' sure, but it's all here. keep
The egg in the fire, 'cause their mothers are crawling over em, to see, a' when she comes up,
You put it on a stick o' it that comes with the chicken's blood every half hour. Let's see
Here — how the fear reads the thoughts — is what I found to be a Turkish.
Ridgeback. They’re few, they’re the same.”
He's trying to behave himself, but Hermione doesn't.
“Hagrid, you live in a wooden house,” she said.
But Hagrid Wasn't Listening. He really regrets leaving the
hell.
As a result, for now, they have one more possibility to overcome: the possibility that
Hagrid discovers that someone is hiding an illegitimate secret in his name.
“It’s passed what’s a life of peace,” Ron explained, like the evening
After the evening they are looking for all the other homes they found.
Hermione had now begun to make study plans for Harry and Ron, as well. it
The birds help them.
After a moment of celebration, Hedwig scored Harry another point from
Hagrid. He had written only two words: It's hatching.
Ron wants to do Herbology and it goes straight to Hut. Hermione
He wouldn't listen to her.
“Hermiun, how many times in our lives are we going to look at an owl .
It continues?”
“We had lessons, we were going to get into trouble, and nothing was done about what .
Hagrid will be there when he finds someone doing—.”
"shut up!" He knows Hari.
Malfoy was only a few feet away and stopped dead. how
uch has hi heard? Harry didn't remember Malfoy's face entirely.
Ron and Hermione said all the way to Herbology and in the end,
Hermione agrees to run to Hagrid with the other two at dawn.
break. When the vehicle returned from the tower at the end of their lessons, three
of them put their soldiers at once and they were snapped in the head of .
edge of the forest. Hagrid made them, turning around and around.
"soon." He snapped them inside.
The ge was liing on the table. There are some old cracks in it. some
was moving inside; It comes to a smooth snack that comes.
Everyone made their plates to the table and watched with bated breath.
Everything at the same time there is a lunch of smoking and eggs and open. The baby
The guard returns to the table. He is not but an uncle ; Harry thought she was .
like a crumpled, black umbrella. ⵉⴼⴻⵔⵔⴰⵡⴻⵏ-ⵏⵏⴻⵙ ⵉⵚⴻⵃⵃⴰⵏ ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⴷ ⵉⵎⴻⵇⵔⴰⵏⴻⵏ ⵎⴳⴰⵍ-ⵉⵙ
The most commonly used jet spacecraft has a very long nose with very neutrophils, orbital plates and
He proclaims, Orange Eyes.
Turkey. A couple of sparks flew out of its snout.
“Isn’t it beautiful?” Hagrid growled. He put his hand out cautiously.
The train port. He reached for his hands and showed the mentioned leaves.
“Bless him, look, he knows hi momy!” Hagrid said.
"Hagrid," Hermione said, "how Norwegian Ridgebacks grow,
right?"
Hagrid is smooth when his color came out of a time from him
face — came to his feet and escaped down the hall.
“What is the issue?”
“Someone is seen walking into the streets — it’s a boy —
It’s smooth and he’s going to play it.”
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵉⵄⴻⴷⴷⴰ ⵙ ⵜⴻⵡⵡⵓⵔⵜ, ⵉⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍ ⵖⴻⵔ ⴱⴻⵕⵕⴰ. Even in a distance there is no
When she puts it down.
ⵎⴰⵍⴼⵓⵢ ⵜⵥⵕⴰ ⴰⴷⴰⴱⵓ.
Something about the picture is repeated on Malfoy's face in the next scene.
It made Harry, Ron, and Hermione smile. They did most of their paperwork.
Time in Hagrid's cold, trying to show him.
“I’d just let him go,” Harry admitted. “By using it the sea.”
"I can't have that happening," Hagrid said. “ⴷ ⵛⵡⵉⵟ ⵛⵡⵉⵟ. He will die.”
They looked at the beast. It tripled in length per
week. Smoke continues to leave her friends. Hagrid doesn't do it.
Play care services because the hospital is very protective of it. ⵜⵓⵖⴰ ⴰⵜⴻⵏ .
Empty car boxes and pieces of meat everywhere.
“I decided to call her November,” Hagrid said, when he saw him to talk about the jury .
With unhealed eyes. “He really knows me now, see. ⵏⵓⵔⴱⴻⵔⵜ! ⵏⵓⵔⴱⴻⵔⵜ! Wherever .
ⵎⵎⴰ?”
“I’ve heard the Marriomas,” Ron said in the ear of Harry.
“Hagrid,” Harry said in a pleased manner, “he’ll spend two days with Norbird going with
There shall be your house. Malloy can go to Dumbledore at any time.”
Hagriide blames his head.
“I — I know that I can’t frighten him forever, but I can’t let him go, I can’t.”
Harry quickly turned back to Ron. “Charli.” he said.
“It would be lost, too,” Ron said. “ⵏⴻⵛⵛ ⵔⵓⵏ, ⴽⴻⵞⵞ?”
“Ala — Charlie — Gmark, Charlie. ⴷⵉ ⵕⵓⵎⴰⵏⵢⴰ. ⵜⴰⵣⵔⴰⵡⵜ ⵏ ⵉⵣⵡⵓ.
We can send November. Charlie can keep it and put him
Back to the house!”
"nasty!" Run said. “ⴰⵎⴻⴽ, ⵀⴰⴳⵔⵉⴷ?”
And in the end, Hagrid agreed that they should send a dog to Charlie to the
ⵙⵙⵓⵜⵔ ⵜ.
The following week was sick. On the night of the slam was found Hermione and
Harry sits with his wife in the common room, long after everyone else goes to
bed. The reason on the wall was just left in the midnight when the sight of the image broke
open. Ron came out of somewhere from Harry’s inequality.
He was under the Hottrid Hut, helped him outline Norbert, who is now
They eat the dead sands with a car.
“ⵜⴱⴰⵏ-ⵉⵢⵉ-ⴷ!” he said, showing them his hand, which was presented in a
With blood. “I can’t get a car for a week. ⴰⵔ ⴰⵙ ⵇⵇⴰⵔⵖ
Remember, the house is awesome house I met, but the Hagrid Road
Walking on this, you'd think he was a happy little bastard. ⵎⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⵢⵉ ⵉⴱⴱⵉ
They were told to hear me. And when I left, singing it as a sharp.”
There’s a snack on the lantern.
“ⴷ ⵀⵉⴷⵡⵉⴳ!” Harry said, he was trying to go. “ⴰⴷ ⵖⵓⵔⵙ ⵛⴰⵔⵍⵉ
answer!"
The three people put themselves to read the point.
good afternoon,
how are you? Thanks for the tree — I’ll be happy to get to the Norwegian
Ridgeback, but it won’t be here. I think the best thing would be
It was sent it to some of my next friends to visit next week.
ⵜⵔⵓⴱⵍ ⴷ, ⵓⵔ ⵉⵍⴰⵇ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜ-ⵏⵥⵔⴰ ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⴰⵡⵉⵏ ⵖⵔ ⵢⴰⵏ ⵓⵏⴳⴰⵙ ⵓⵔ ⵉⴳⵉⵏ ⴰⵣⵔⴼⴰⵏ.
Can you get the Ridgeback to the long-time tour overnight?
They can meet you there and remove it when she remains a bottle.
She sent me the answer to abandon.
love,
ⵛⴰⵔⵍⵉ
ⵥⵕⴰⵏ ⵢⴰⵏ ⵡⴰⵢⴹ.
“We took a break,,” Harry said. “It shouldn’t be too much
It’s hard – I think he stands great to make both of us and Norberry.”
ⵉⴳⴰ ⵢⴰⵏ ⵓⵎⴹⴰⵏ ⵏ ⵎⴰⴷ ⵉⵅⵛⵏⵏ ⴷⴷⵓ ⴷⴷⵓ ⴷⴷⵓ ⵎⴰⵙ ⴷ ⵙⵉⵏ ⵢⴰⴹⵏⵉⵏ
Connected with it. Something Norbirt — and Malfoy — would release.
There is a house. Later that day, Ron's hand returns to
Twice his position was taken. He didn't know that this solution was going to Madame .
BUmphrey — Will you taste a dragonfly? By evening, however, he had
There are no signature. The department returned an unacceptable explanation of red. Looks like Norbirt's
The claws were poison.
Harry and Hermione sneaked into the hospital courtyard at the end of the day.
To find they in a smooth condition in the bed.
“It’s not just my arm,” he teased, “although that feels kind of like .
We will fall. Malfoy tells Madame Pomfrey that he wants to bury one of my books.
So why he could go and have a good laugh at me. He tries to tell me.
What really got me — I told her it was a dog, but I don’t think she’d believe me
'I shouldn't have had to deal with him in a Quidditch match, that's why he's doing this.'
Harry and Hermione tried to drag Ron downstairs.
"It will all end at midnight on Saturday night," Hermione said, but that wasn't enough .
Suit run everything. On the contrary, he stayed bolt upright and cut in a sweat.
“Imday is Saturday!” he said through a difficult communication. “Oh we didn’t — I have
she just remembered — Charlie's letter was in the book that Malfoy had brought, he was going .
They know we’re taking norbert.”
Harry and Hermione don't get a chance to answer. Madame Bumphrey
He came into the situation and let them leave, saying that Ron should go on strike.
"It's too late to reschedule now," Harry told Hermione. “We don’t have
Time to send another Charlie, and this may be a time when we just remove
Norbert. He'll let us do it. And we got the immobile device, Malfoy
He doesn't know about it.”
They found Fang, the Boarhound, living outside a half way
When they went to tell Hagrid, opened a opening to talk.
“I’m not letting you in,” he growled. “Norbert's in a difficult stage — not’ to .
he cannot bear it.”
When she was told about Charlie’s letter, her eyes filled with tears,
However, this may be because Norbirt sees it only on foot.
“Oh! All he's right, he ain't got my prize — jus' they're playin' — ain't nobody
Boy, after all.”
The child puts his hand on the wall, which means the slices to be slaughtered. Harry
And Hermione went back to town on Saturday and couldn't be fast enough .
enough.
They would count on Hagrid when the time came to tell .
Goodbye to Norbert if only they weren’t so stubborn about what they had to do. it
It's a very popular night, and it's often held at Hotrid Hut.
because they have to wait for Peeves to get out of their way in the entrance hall,
Where Nnis is playing on the wall. Hagrid has Norbert and
It is served in a large meatball.
"He's got a lot of tears of some national agency showing the way," Hagrid said in a station.
A muffled voice. “An' I got him his teddy bear in case it's gonna be lonely.”
From inside the car went the songs that passed to Harry Zund
though his strength return, he returneth.
“B-bye, Norbert!” Hagrid I was silent, when Hari and Hirmiyun wandered
Crate with the invisible shield and climb under it themselves. "mom
It is not!”
How did they manage to get the map back to the castle, they didn't
recognize. It was approaching midnight when Norbert was launched onto the marble pavement in
The load room and the length of the field. UP another tree, then another
– None of Harry’s methods make a job much easier.
“Read there!” Harry stopped when they reached the path under the
The biggest circle.
Then, one sudden movement in front of them, they almost lost
Krat. Forget that they weren’t seen before, they added to the presence,
They stared at the dark circles of two people fighting each other ten feet away.
away. A cold is over.
Professor McGonagall, in a battroop of Tartan and a field of wind, has Malfoy s
ear.
"inquiry!" she shouted. “It’s twelve points from Slitrene! Afrik
Ahead of the middle of the night, how to worship —”
“You don’t understand, Professor. He comes Harry Potter — he has one
The dragon!”
“What a boy it has become! How do you add such crimes! Come on — I’ll see
Professor Snape on you, A Malfoy!”
The tree climb to the top of the tower seemed the easiest.
The thing in the world after that. Not until they stepped out into the cool night air
They sit on the couch and try to listen carefully again. Hermione
He kind of did the jig.
“Malavio has a feeling! I can sing!”
“Don’t work,” Harry said.
They giggled at Malfoy, waiting, Norbert fidgeting in his
Threw. ⴰⵣⴰⵍ ⵏ ⵎⵔⴰⵡ ⵏ ⵜⴻⴷⵇⵉⵇⵉⵏ ⵎⴱⴻⵄⴷ, ⵓⵙⴰⵏⴷ 4 ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⵜⵜⴼⴻⴳⴳⵉⴹⴻⵏⵜⴷ ⵙⴻⴳ
darkness.
Charlie’s friends are a chiri cake. Out with Harry and Hermione.
the armor they had drawn, to pin Norbert between them. they
They all helped push Norbert safely in and then Harry and Hermione shocked
The hands with others and thank them so much.
Finally, Norbert was going…going…going.
They return to the flesh of flesh, their hearts are as light as they are
Hands, now that we are inform them. There are no other places — Malfoy in the park
— What can their joys?
The answer to this is expected to the foot of the car. As they go
Along the way, Filch's face was once from the dark.
“Well, well, well,” he chuckled, “we’re in trouble.”
They out of the uncertainty color on the town.
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
Installation
THE FORBIDDEN FOREST
They cannot be evil.
Filch leads them to Professor McGonagall's study on the first floor, .
Where they sat and waited without speaking a word to each other. There was Hermione.
Hope. Exposure, alibis, and land grabbing stories guarantee each other about
Harry's eyes, each one more beautiful than the last. Can't see how they are.
Will get out of trouble this time. They ate it. How can they have
It is very commonly used What will you forget the clone? There is no argument on the ground that
Professor McGonagall will acknowledge their exit from the system and movement
At school in the dead of night, this number is not usually a long nitronomy.
The town, which is outside the boundaries without schools. Plus Norbert is who
She doesn't wear it, and they can also belong to their vehicles.
Did Harry think things couldn't be worse? It's equal.
When Professor McGonagall left, she was kissing Neville.
“Harry!” Neville burst out, the moment he saw the other two. "I was
I'm playing to get to know you, I heard he'll catch you,
He said you had a test—”
Harry made himself scarce to bind Nfield, but the teacher
McGonagall stared. She saw more breath than Norbirt like him.
It's built on all three of them.
“I won’t blame any of you. Mr. Filch says there is
Up in the city of astronomy. He is an oooo lowl in Haklok. Explain yourself.”
It was the first time Hermione hadn't finished answering a teacher.
matter. She looks at her wings, as if she were a squirrel.
“Although I was able to communicate with what was happening,” the teacher said.
McGonagall. “It doesn’t take a genius to work it out. She listened to Draco Malfoy.
Some story of cook-and-work on a scene, they want to take it out of the house and in
trouble. I already caught it. I think it's a good thing that Longbotom
Do we hear the word and do you believe it?”
Harry caught Nephil's eye and tried to tell him without words that it was
It wasn't, because Nephil kept going back and forth. Not a musician, Abld
Nephilim — Harry knew what he had to do and he went back to find them in
It's hard for them.
“I doubt,” Professor McGonagall said. “Four students from beds in
Night! I've never heard of such a thing before! You, Miss Granger, I thought
Have more meaning. As for you, Mr. Potter, I think Gryffindor is more of a
you than this. All three will pass votes to you — well, you too, sir.
Lungbutum, he didn't give you anything that entitled you to go to school at night,
Particularly these days, it matters a great deal — and fifty points will be deducted from
Gryffindor.”
"fifty?" Harry did — they were going to hear the update, the update that he added to the
The last quidditch match.
“Fifty points each,” Professor McGonagall said, breathing heavily
With her long illness, she showed it.
“I wish — I pray —.”
“You can’t—”
“They don’t say what I can’t I can’t do, Peter. Now back to the movie, all
Tough on you. I never knew more than the Gryffindor teachers.”
Fifteen points scored. This puts gryffindor in last place. In a
At night, they would spend some time while Gryffindor was on the porch. Harry is dreaming.
It was like the ground had fallen out of his stomach. How could they ever
Fix that?
Harry didn't sleep all night. He could hear Neville crying through it
A pillow for what seemed like an hour. Harry couldn't think of anything to say
Heat it up. He knew Neville, like him, dreaded the morning. what
Will it happen when the rest of Gryffindor finds out what they did?
Early on, the Gryffindors go through the giant spikes that register the house
points the next day thinking there was a mistake. How could they suddenly
Are you one hundred and fifty points less than yesterday? And then the story begins
They will bear: Harry Potter, the famous Harry Potter, their Quidditch doubles hero
matches, he was missing all those points, he and two other swimmers first
years.
From being one of the most popular and admired people in school,
Harry was suddenly the favorite. Even the Ravenclaws and Hufflepuffs are cheering
To him, because everyone was desperate to see Slytherin lose the house cup.
Everywhere Harry went, people emphasized and soon raised their voices .
As they persecuted him. Slytherins, on the other hand, waved his hand as he crossed
they were, hooting and cheering, “Thanks Potter, we’ve got one for you!”
Only Ron stood by him.
“They’ll forget all about that in a few weeks. Fred and George lost a lot.
points in the entire time they’ve been here, and people still love them.”
“They never scored a hundred and fifty points at once, yet they had
They're nuts?" Harry said sadly.
“Well — no,” Ron agreed.
It was a little too late to repair the damage, but Harry promised himself he wouldn't
She moved on to what wasn't hers from now on. He'd had it with
They sneak around and sleep. He felt so ashamed of himself that he went to Wood
He also asked to resign from the Quidditch team.
"resign?" The animal is lost. “What’s the point of that? How do we go
Will we get any points back if we can’t win Quidditch?”
But even Quidditch had lost its interest. The rest of the band isn’t talking.
to Harry during lessons, and if they had to talk about it, they called
“The seeker.”
Hermione and Neville were busy, too. They never had such a bad time.
Like Harry, because they’re not famous enough, but nobody talks to them,
either. Hermione stopped drawing attention to herself in class and kept her
Head down and worked in silence.
Harry was almost glad the exams weren't far away. The whole call
He had to do keeping his mind off his pain. He, Ron, and Hermione sit
Themselves, working late into the night, trying to remember the ingredients in the
Difficult campaigns, learn spells and spells by heart, memorize the patterns of
Magical discoveries and monster resurrections….
Then, about a week before exams started, the new Harry
Decision not to participate in anything unrelated is enforced
unexpected text. When he returned from the library by himself one afternoon, he
I heard someone humming from a class out front. As he approached, he
Quirrell's voice was heard.
“No — no — not again, please —.”
It was as if someone had forced him. Harry frowned.
“Alright — alright —” he heard Quirrell whisper.
The next second, Quirrell came rushing out of the classroom and straightened up
His board. He was pathetic and looked like he was about to cry. He walked out.
of vision; Harry didn't think Quirrell even noticed. Wait until
Kierle's pieces appeared, then performed in the hall. compliance
They were not able to stand, but one door was standing on another side. Harry was halfway to it before
He remembered that he would give himself for not giving her a penny.
After all, he would have gambled the twelve Sorcerer Stones that Snape had
He had just left the room, and from what Harry had just heard, Snape would be going
With a new spring in his step — Quirrell seems to have finally resolved.
Harry returned to the library, where Hermione was testing Ron on
Astronomy. Harry told them what he had heard.
“Snape did it, then!” Run said. “If someone from Quirrell told him how to break
His registration against the Army Group —.”
"There's still Fluffy, though," Hermione said.
“We want to find out Snape how can he pass it without asking Hagrid”,
said Ron, looking at the thousands of books surrounding them. “I bet there was a
A book that tells us how to cook a meat of the three main dishes. so
What shall we do, Harry?”
The amused light was shining once more in Ron's eyes, but Hermione .
He replied before Harry could.
“Go to Dumbblur. This is something we should have done a year ago. If we try
Anything we ourselves will be sure to kick.”
“But we have no proof!” Harry said. “Quirrell was too scared to make us
up. Snape should just say he doesn’t know how that troll got in on Halloween
And that he wasn’t anywhere near the third floor — who do you think they’d believe,
Him or us? No matter how much we ask him, Dumbledore will think we have done it.
up to fix it. Filch won’t help us if his life depends on it, either
He was friends with Snape, and the more students were thrown around, the better, he would say.
And don’t forget, we don’t have to know about the stone or the element. and this
Get more exposure.”
Hermione looked convinced, but Ron didn't.
“If we just do a little bit of stretching —”
"Oh no," Harry said confidently, "We're giving it a shot."
He pulled a map of Jupiter next to him and began to learn the names of
Its months.
Earlier today, points were awarded to Harry, Hermione, and
Neville at the coffee table. are all the same:
Your stop will be at eleven pm.
Meet Mr. Filch in the entrance hall.
Professor McGunagall
Harry forgot they still had a trial to do in the fight over points
They are lost. He had half expected Hermione to complain that this was all night.
of study was confused, but she didn't say a word. Like Harry, she feels they deserve
What they have.
At eleven o’clock that night, we said goodbye to Run at the town hall
room and arrived at the entrance hall with Neville. Filch was already there
'So was Malfoy.' Harry had also forgotten that Malfoy had gotten a
Suspension, too.
“Follow me,” Filch said, lighting a torch and leading them outside.
“I think you would think twice about breaking the school rules again, wouldn’t you,
Eh?” He said, looking at them. “Oh yes…work and pain are the best teachers
If you ask me….It’s just a pity they let the old trial die…they’ll ban you
With your hands off the ceiling a few days ago, I still had the chains in my hand
office, keep them oiled in case they are ever needed…Of course, let’s go, and
Don’t think of running away, now, it will please you if you do.”
They marched off across the dark grounds. Neville kept sniffing. Harry
They wondered what their punishment would be. It must be something really
panic, or Filch wouldn’t have sounded so cheerful.
The moon was shining, but the clouds were looming around it and continuing to drown them
In the dark. Up ahead, Harry could see the lighted windows of Hagrid's apartment. so
They heard a distant noise.
“Is that you, Filch? Hurry, I want ter to get started.”
Harry's heart soared; Hagrid it
It wasn’t too bad. His relief must have shown in his face, because Filch said,
“I suppose you thought you would have fun with that oaf? So, think again,
Boy - Into the forest you go and I'm so wrong if you're coming at all
out in a flash.”
At that, Neville let out a little chuckle, and Malfoy stopped dead in his tracks .
studies.
"barley?" he repeated, and he didn't sound quite as cool as usual.
“We couldn’t get in there at night — there was all kinds of stuff in there — .
Animals, I hear.”
Neville grabbed the handle of Harry's wand and made a pounding noise.
“That’s your problem, isn’t it?” Filch said, his voice cracking with excitement.
“You should think them stupid before you get in trouble, you shouldn’t
you?"
Hagrid came trotting up to them from the darkness, Fang at his heels. he
He was carrying his big coat, and a bundle of blankets was draped around his waist.
“Abou' time,” he said. “I've been waitin' fer half an hour already. you're welcome,
Harry, Hermione?”
"I shouldn't be too friendly with them, Hagrid," Filch said coldly, they were .
Here to be punished, after all.”
“That’s yer late, right?” Hagrid said, nodding to Filch. “Go to the lector'
in them, yes? 'It's not your place to do that. Yeh've done yer bit, I'll take from
here."
"I'll be back in the morning," Filch said, "for the rest of them," adding .
gratefully, and turned back to the castle, his torch flickering
In the dark.
Malfoy turned to Hagrid now.
"I'm not going to that forest," he said, and Harry was glad to hear the
a hint of panic in her voice.
“Yeh are if yeh wants to stay at Hogwarts,” Hagrid growled. "Yes
He made a mistake an' now yeh've ter paying for it.”
“But that’s for pastors, not for students to do. I think we will be
Selling lines or something, if my dad knows I’m doing that, he’s—.”
“—He says this is what happens at Hogwarts,” Hagrid added. “Cobin's lines'!
What is the point of this ter anyone? He will either make a negative correction or he will leave. whether
She thought the Father' and you understand you, so let’s get back from the slave of the monsters’.
pack. Spirit.”
I didn't leave Malfoy. Hagrid looked pleased, but then he left.
perception.
“Back then,” said Hagrid, “now I listen with pleasure, ‘cause it’s important
What we’ll have tonight, A' I don’t want a dangers’. Follow me
Here for a moment.”
He came to them along with the forest. I took his shirt, he
Turned off a narrow, winding dirt road and landed on a dark red road
Trees. The body's bird went up with their attacks when they digest in the beach.
“See over there,” Hagrid said, “See that after they’re shinin’ on the ground? Sylphie
stuff? This is blood not blood. There is an entrance that is there and it turns in a way that doesn't work well.
It was the second time in a week. I found one died Wednesday. are
I'll try to find out what's wrong. Maybe we can put him out of his misery.”
“And if if you’re going to give me a snack that you’ll find a snack in the first place?” Malfoy said,
He could not stop fear from the angle.
“There’s nothing that lives in the forest that’ll hurt yeh if yer with me or .
Fang,” Hagrid said. “An'thed the way. So now, we’ll share the Internet
Both parties an' pursue a course in different directions. There are blood thereof
The place must have been bin stajrin' since last Tuesday.”
"I see Fang," Malfoy said flatly, looking at Fang's head.
“You should, but I love, is a child,” Hagrid said. “Yes I, Hari,
And Hermione will go through a way with Draco, Neville, and Fang to go with another. Now, if
Each of us got a unicorn, let’s produce red arrows, right? Release some tips
An' work now — that's it — an' if anybody gets in trouble, send red arrows,
An' we'll all come an' find yeh — then, take heed — let's go.”
The forest was a black and silent. A little way in which you get to a beach in the
The way of the country, and Hari, Hermione, and Hagrid took the right way while Malfoy,
Neville, and Fang holds the right.
They are struggling in the ground. Sometimes a
The moonlight from the branches above casts a silver-red blood spot on the
Fallen leaves.
Harry believed that Hagrid seems to have stopped a lot.
“Is it possible for a murderer to kill black people?” Harry asked.
“Not soon,” Hagrid said. “It doesn’t necessarily make tt with bunncorn, they’re available
Strong clay plants. I never knew he wasn't a hero before.”
They go on a brilliant trees tree. Harry can listen to the waters;
There should be another place in almost. Access points are still available
The blood here and there on the road of the road.
“Are you alright, Hermione?” Hagrid whispered. “Don’t worry, it can’t be
It's gotten too far if it's badly injured, an' then we can ter — GET BEHIND THAT
tree!"
Hagrid grabbed Harry and Hermione and dragged them out of the way behind him.
A wild flower. He took out a coin, put it in his pocket, and lifted it up,
Ready to fire. Sounds like three. Something is happening to the dead.
The leaves are close: it looks like a stomach crawling on the ground. Hagrid was
She glanced across the street, but after a few seconds the sound disappeared.
“I know,” he murmured. “There’s summat here that shouldn’t be.”
“Wolf?” Harry suggested.
“That wasn’t a wolf, nor was it any animal,” Hagrid said .
with enthusiasm. “Of course, follow me, but be careful, now.”
They walked more slowly, ears straining for the sound of thumping. suddenly,
In a flurry ahead, someone suddenly moved.
“Who’s there?” Hagrid called out. “Show yourselves — I’m listening!”
And into the woods he came — was he a man, or a horse? to the head, a
A man, with black hair and beard, but underneath is a shiny horse
The Family Family was absent, and the Tiberk. The Hari and Hermione slot is sick.
"Oh, it's you, Ronan," Hagrid said excitedly. “How are you?”
He walked forward and shook the centaur’s hand.
"Good evening to you, Hagrid," Ronan said. He was deeply sad
sound. “You were going to shoot me?”
"Can't be too careful, Ronan," Hagrid said, pushing his wand.
“There is summat bad loose in this forest. This is Harry Potter and Hermione.
Granger, definitely. Students to school. An' this is Ronan, you two. he
One project.
“We’ve been watching,” Hermione said quietly.
"Good afternoon," Ronan said. “Students, are you? And did you learn
Pretty much, up at school?”
“Erm—”
“Cheet,” said Hermione with a pride.
"little. Well, that’s it.” Runan sighed. He snapped the answer back.
And he looks at the sky. “Mars is blue tonight.”
“Yeah,” Hagrid said, looking up, too. “Listen, I’m glad we inter
Yeh, Ronan, 'cause there's a wounded unicorn bin — did you see anything'?”
Ronan didn't answer right away. He looks up and doesn't move, then
He was silent again.
“It’s always the white people who are the first victims,” he said. “So it was for
An age ago, this is how it is now.”
“Yes,” said Hagrid, “but have you seen anything Ronan? some
unusual?"
“Mars is shining tonight,” Ronan replies, while Hagrid watches him .
With impatience. “We’re not normal.”
“Yes, but I was saying something unusual closer to home, he said
Hagrid. “Yes it’s okay and you’re not real.”
Still, Ronan took a while to respond. Finally, he says, “The forest .
He hides a lot of secrets.”
A movement in the trees behind Runan caused Hagrid to lift his blade again,
But he was only a number two centaur, with black hair and -a body and a smug look
than Runan.
"Hello, Bane," Hagrid said. "you're welcome?"
“Good afternoon, Hagrid, I hope you are well?”
“Okay alright. Look, I just asked Ronan, did you notice anything odd about
Here lately? There’s a wounded unicorn bin—would you know anything about it?”
Bane went to stand next to Ronan. The co-founder to heaven. “Mars is
better tonight,” he said quietly.
"We heard," Hagrid growled. “ⴰⵀⴰ, ⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳⵡⴻⵏ ⵉⵡⴰⵍⴰ .
Something, let me know, won't you? Let’s go, then.”
Harry and Hermione followed him out of the greenhouse, looking over their
the height of Ronan and Bane until the trees blocked their view.
“It’s not,” Hagrid growled, “try to get a straight answer from a
century. The Starscreams Ruddy. She doesn’t like anything near the moon.”
“There are a lot of them here?” Hermione asked.
“Oh, some decency….they kept to themselves mostly, but they were .
Good luck on the turin' up if I ever want a word. Grows,
Centaurs…they know things…jus' not leaving much.”
“Do you think that’s the centaur we heard earlier?” Harry said.
“Does that sound like legs to you? No, if you ask me, it is
Bin killin' the unicorns – never heard of anything like that before.”
They walked through dark, dark trees. Harry sat up smiling.
He turns on his hand. He had a bad feeling they were being watched.
He was so glad they had Hagrid and his wand with them. They have it right now
He passed a fork in the road as Hermione took Hagrid's hand.
“Hagrid! look! Studies, others are in difficulties!”
“You two wait here!” Hangrid has succeeded. “Stay on the path, I'll be back .
For yeh!”
He was heard jumping from under the tree, standing
They looked at each other, so frightened, that they heard nothing but
the thickness of the leaves around them.
“Don’t you think they’ve just stolen it, are they leaving you?” exclaimed Hermione.
“I don’t care if Malfoy has, but if someone has Neville…it’s our fault .
He was here in the first place.”
Shorts were made. Their ears seem to be more likely than ever. Harry’s
The likes of the likes of the winds, each participant approaches. What was
Complete? Where are the others?
ⵜⴰⴳⴳⴰⵔⴰ, ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵍⵃⴻⵙⵙ ⴰⵎⴻⵇⵇⵔⴰⵏ ⵏ ⵜⴽⴻⵔⴽⴰⵙ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⵎⴻⴽⵜⴰⵏ ⵙ ⵜⵓⵖⴰⵍⵉⵏ ⵏ Hagrid. Malvey,
Neville, and Fang were with him. Hagrid was fuming. Malfoy, banking, has
sneaking up behind Neville, he took it as a joke. Neville arrived jowl
They brought in bodies.
“We’ll be lucky to catch some now, with the racket you two are
Don't. Of course, we switch groups — Neville, you stay with me an'.
Hermione, Harry, you're going with Fang and this bastard. The silence,” and Hagrid in a
He smiled at Harry, “but he’s going to have the hardest time scaring you, and he should
Make this.”
So, Harry set off into the heart of the forest with Malfoy and Fang. they
He walked for nearly half an hour, deeper and deeper into the forest, until the road
It became almost impossible to follow because the trees were so thick. Harry
She thought the blood seemed to thicken. There are sandwiches on the originals.
We were grateful, such as the slopes that are ruined by heavier.
Harry could see a park ahead, with the charred remains of an old
The pit.
“Look —” he muttered, reaching out to stop Malfoy.
Something bright white on the floor. They will almost become.
and he was not but all right, and he died. Harry never saw
Something beautiful and sad. Her long, thin legs were sticking out at different angles
where he landed and his fur was splattered white like pearls on the coarse leaves.
Harry took a step towards it when a shrill scream escaped him.
Freeze where he stands. A bush on the edge of the clearing quivered….Then, out
of shadow, a hooded figure came hovering over the ground like something
Passing the well. Harry, Malfoy, and Fang stood transfixed. The repeated face
He reached a bush, pressed his head against the wound in the side of the bush, and
He started drinking his own blood.
“Aaaaaaaaaaagh!”
Malfoy let out a terrified shriek and blushed—so did Fang. Hooded
The figure raised its head and looked directly at Harry—unicorn blood dripping
Under it. It got to its feet and came swiftly toward Harry — he couldn't
Bring on the pictures.
Then a pain like he'd never felt before his head was pierced; Although
His assembly was on fire. Half blind, he staggers backwards. ).
After her, the god, and something purer than Harry, is lying to the
figure.
The pain in Harry's head was so bad he fell to his knees. It was a minute
or two will pass. When he looked up, the file has gone. A centaur was standing.
over him, not Ronan or Bane; This seems small; It had blue wings.
and a palomino fountain.
“Are you okay?” The centaur said, pulling Harry to his feet.
“Yes—thank you—what’s that?”
The centaur didn't respond. He has amazing blue eyes, almost like blue
sppres. He looked at Harry in a pleased way, his eyes darting over the lies he was standing on.
off, livid, on Harry's lap.
“You guys are the Potter boy,” he said. “It went well with Hagrid.
The forest is not safe at this time — especially for you. Can you ride? to be .
It is very common in this way.
"My name is Firenze," he added, as he positioned himself in front of her .
Her legs so Harry could crawl on top of her.
They were at a time a sound of more pain from the other side of .
Review. Ronan and Ban came from the woods, their heads were sticking out.
and the silence.
“Frenz!” Pondor fell. "What are you doing? You have a man on his
Let your! Didn't you do anything? Are you a social animal?”
“Do you understand who this is?” Florence said. “This is the Potter boy. the
He's very happy with this garden, happy.”
“What do you call it?” Killer ban. ''Tskti, Fernz,
we are sworn not to set ourselves against the heavens. We don't study what the
Will it come in mythical places?”
Ronan patted the ground in shock. “I’m sure Firenze thought it was .
It is used for a happy state,” he said in his angry speech.
ⴱⴰⵏⴻ ⵢⴻⵟⵟⴻⴼ ⵉⴹⴰⵔⵔⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⵏ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⵙ ⵍⵖⵉⴹⴰ.
“For what good! What is that to do withs s? Centurs ae concerned withs
What was written! It’s not our job to run around like a dog after
Dangerous people in our forest!”
Fernese with something hesed up on the back legs with the slip, so it was important for Harry to
Grab her shoulders so she can sit on it.
“Didn’t you see that unicorn?” Firenze loves Bane. “If you’re not .
Do you understand why she was killed? Or did the planets not let you in on that secret? I
Set myself against what haunts this forest, Bane, yes, with humans
by my side if necessary.”
And Fireenze whiskied around; With Harry catching as much as he can,
They backed into the trees and left Ronan and Bane behind.
Harry had no idea what was going on.
“Why's Bane so angel?” he asked. “And what the thing you know .
From, whatever it is?”
Firenze stopped walking and warned Harry to keep his head down if
of square pieces, but he didn't answer Harry's question. They made their own
path through the trees in silence for so long that Harry thought Firenze would never recognize him
He asks to talk to him too. They were going through a very difficult time
patch of trees, however, when Firenze suddenly stopped.
“Harry Potter, do you know what the blood of a dragon is used for?”
"No," Harry said, startled by the odd question. “We just used a shell
and dragonbones in Potions.”
"That's because it's dangerous, to kill a mosquito," Firenze said.
“Only someone with nothing to lose, and everything to gain, would act like this
crime. The blood of a unicorn will keep you alive, even if you are an inch from
Death, but at a terrible price. You killed something pure and defenseless i
Save yourself, you'll only have half a life, a suspended life, from that moment
Blood gets to your bones.”
Harry stared at the back of Firenze's head, which was stone blue in
Moonlight.
“But who will be the same?” he asked aloud. “If you’re going to
Hanged forever, death is good, isn’t it?”
“Of course,” Firenze agreed, “except that all it takes for you is to stay alive longer .
Have a drink of something else — anything to restore you to your health .
and bouer — suething that will mean yo canver dee. Mr. Peter, you know
ⵜⴻⵥⵔⵉⴹ ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⵢⴻⴼⴼⵔⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⵖⴻⵔⴱⴰⵣ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⴻⵙⵡⵉⵄⵜⴰⴳⵉ ⴽⴰⵏ?”
“The Sorcerer’s Stone! Clear — the elixir of life! But I don't
rms man this —.”
“You can imagine nobody waited so many years to come back to power,
Who is holding on to life, waiting for their chance?”
It was as if an iron needle had suddenly pierced Harry's heart.
Through the clearing of the trees, he seemed to hear Hagrid say again
to her the night they met: “Some say he died. Codswallop, in my opinion.
Dunno if he’s got enough human stuff left in him to die.”
“You mean,” Harry stammered, “it’s Vol-”
“Harry! Harry, are you alright?”
Hermione was running towards them down the street, Hagrid flying
After him.
“ⵏⴻⴽⴽ ⵙ ⵍⵅⵉⵔ”, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Harry, ⵇⵔⵉⴱ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵥⵔⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵇⵇⴰⵔ. "the
the unicorn is dead, Hagrid, he’s in that space over there.”
“That’s where I’ll leave you,” Firenze murmured to Hagrid as he stormed off to .
use one mouse. “You’re safe now.”
Harry left the foot.
"Happy birthday, Harry Potter," Firenze said. “Planets are studied .
Wrong before now, even by centaurs. I hope this is one of those times.”
He fought, it became smoothly to the forest, left Harry .
He chuckles behind him.
Ron was struck in the middle of the average Union, waiting to return.
Some time harded to play Gudditch when Harry disseminated.
awake. In a matter of seconds, though, he was wide-eyed as Harry began to tell
He and Hermione what happened in the forest.
Harry couldn't sit still. He walked up and down in front of the fire. he
It’s still fascinating.
“Snape wants the stone for Voldemort…and Voldemort is waiting in the
The forest…and all this time we thought Snape just wanted to be rich….”
“Such a name will come in that!” said Ron in a terrifed withper, as ae he thoght
Voldemort could hear them.
Harry wasn't listening.
“Firenze saved me, but he didn’t have to do that….Bane was flying…
He was talking about getting involved in what the planets say will happen
The happened…..Ilaq to show that Voldemort will return....Banne thinks Fienne
He should have let Voldemort kill me….I think that’s written in the stars too.”
“You stop saying that name!” They ran to him and said.
“It’s all I have to go back and Snapee to come down with the same,” the Spirit Harry .
By physically, “they can Voldemort can take me ... Acu only, I .
Let’s say Bane will be happy.”
Hermione ⵜⴻⵜⵜⴱⴰⵏⴷ ⵜⴻⴳⴳⴰⴹ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵜⴻⵙⵄⴰ ⴰⵡⴰⵍ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵖⵔⴰ.
“Harry, each said it’s just a Dumbledore you’ve seen one.
You were scared of Dumbledore in the corner, you knew-who wouldn't touch you.
Whatever this is, who say that cheese are really there? The name of the Ammonary is something to say.
And Professor McGonagall says this is a very unprofessional sector.”
He had become a light before they stop the conversation. They went to bed
They are evil, they were closed. But the evening of the night was not over.
When Harry pulled up his covers, he found his invisible wand loaded
With them under them. There was a not pinnd to it:
If only.
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
twentieth
ⵙ ⵜⴻⵡⵡⵓⵔⵜ ⵏ TRAP
In the coming years, Harry would not remember all how he managed
To visit the examinations on Voldemoresourth decisions
ⵙ ⵜⵡⵡⵓⵔⵜ ⴳ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵉⵣⵉ. But the days when he was born , they could not help him
Suspicions that Fluffy was still alive and well behind the sealed door.
She was very careful, especially in the big class where they worked
Their are written. They were given new, new, for tests for tests,
Is with the Anticheating plant.
They had cognitive tests as well. Professor Fliitwick spoke one by
One in his room to see if they could make a pineapple scent in one place.
ⴰⵙⴻⵍⵎⴰⴷ McGonagall ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵍⵉⵜⴻⵏ ⵜⵜⴱⴻⴷⴷⵉⵍⴻⵏ ⴰⵖⴻⵔⴹⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵖⴻⵔⵙⵉⵡ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ — ⵜⵉⵏⴻⵇⵇⵉⴹⵉⵏ .
They are given for how beautiful the property is, but taken away if it has animals.
Snape made them all nervous, breathing down their necks while they tried to
Remember how to do the bite of oblivion.
Harry did his best, trying to ignore the pains of his
height, which had been bothering him ever since he left the forest.
Neville thought Harry had a bad case of exam nerves because Harry couldn't
Sounds good, but the truth is that Harry is constantly haunted by his old bad dreams,
Except now it’s worse than before because there’s a character with a beard
They are dripping with blood.
Probably because they didn’t know what Harry saw in the forest,
Or because they didn’t have biting scars on their noses, but Ron and
Hermione didn't seem as concerned about the Stone as Harry. the vision of
Voldemort did scare them, but he no longer visited them in dreams, and
They were so occupied with their studies that they did not have much time to worry about.
What Snape or someone else might think.
Their most recent exam was a history of surgery. One hour response
ⵉⵙⴻⵇⵙⵉⵢⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵢⵉⵙⴻⵃⵃⴰⵔⴻⵏ ⵉⵇⴱⵓⵔⴻⵏ ⵏ ⴱⴰⵜⵜⵢ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⵏⵓⵍⴼⴰⵏ ⵉⵖⴻⵔⵔⵓⴱⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⴻⵣⵣⵉⴱⴻⵏ ⵉⵎⴰⵏⵏⵙⴻⵏ ⴷ
They will be free, free for an entire week which is good until their test results come
out. When the ghost of Professor Binns told them to put down their quills and
Tearing up their paperwork, Harry couldn't help but cheerfully brag about something else.
“It’s a lot easier than I thought,” Hermione said as they .
They joined the crowd slowly streaming into the sunshine state. “I don’t have to learn
About the Wolf Behavior Act of 1637 or the rebellion of Elfric the Eager.”
Hermione always liked going through their exam papers afterwards, but
Ron said that made him sick, so they went down to the ocean and fished
Under the tree. The Weasley twins and Lee Jordan were tickling the tentacles of a
Great Suguid, who is grateful to the country. “ⵓⵍⴰⵛ ⵍⴻⵇⵔⴰⵢⴰ ⵏⵏⵉⴹⴻⵏ,” Ron .
he exclaimed, crossing the grass. “You can look happier,
Harry, we have a week before we find out how wrong we did, nothing
You should still be worried.”
Harry was rubbing his forehead.
“That’s seen what’s how it’s how!” He left angrily. “My scar keeps
It hurts — it’s happened before, but never like this.”
“Go to Miss Pomfrey,” Hermione said.
“I don’t feel sick,” Harry said. “I think it’s a warning…it means danger
coming…."
Ron couldn't work, she was too hot.
"Harry, calm down, Hermione's fate, the stone wand as long as it belongs to Dumbledore
around. Anyway, we've never has any proof Snap fond to how to tail
fluffy. He nearly had his leg ripped off once, he's not going to try it again in a
hurry. And Neville would play Quidditch for England before he left Hagrid
Dumbledore down.”
Harry furrowed his brow, but couldn't shake the hidden feeling that he was
Something he forgot to do, something important. When he tried to explain
This, Hermione said, was “just tests. I woke up last night and I was
I was halfway through my Edit missions before I remembered we were doing this
one."
Harry was sure the uncomfortable feeling had nothing to do with
Work, though. He saw a hero flying towards the school across the bright green.
Heaven, a single smile tugged at his mouth. Haggard was the only one who sold it .
chimneys. Hagrid would never betray Dumbledore. Hagrid would never tell anyone.
How do you get past Fluffy…not…but….
Harry suddenly jumped to his feet.
“Where you going?” Ron said sleepily.
“I just thought of something,” Harry said. He became white.
“We should go see Hagrid, now.”
"why?" panted Hermione, hurrying to keep up.
“Don’t you think it’s a little weird,” Harry said, hopping across the grass .
slope, “that what Hagrid wants more than anything is a monster, and a
A stranger showing up who just happens to have an egg in his pocket? how much
Is it against witch codes for people to sleep with dragon eggs? Good
He found Hagrid, don't you think? Why haven’t I seen it before?”
“What are you talking about?” said Ron, but Harry, sprinting across the
Deep into the forest, he didn't answer.
Hagrid was sitting in an armchair outside his house; His pants are
his clothes were ragged, and he was peeling peas in a large basin.
“Hullo,” he said, smirking. “Continued yer exams? Do you have time fer a drink?”
“Yes, please,” Ron said, but Harry cut him off.
“No, we are fast. Hagrid, I need to ask you something. You know
Did you win Norbert that night? What did the stranger you were playing cards with
Look like?”
“Dunno,” Hagrid sighed, “couldn’t take his coat off.”
He noticed the three of them looked confused and raised an eyebrow.
“It’s not unusual, yeh they get a lot of funny people in the Pig’s Head —
This is the fortress below the village. Migta is the midst of the men'sward, it is that not? I
He didn’t see her face, he held his head high.”
Harry landed next to the flower bucket. “What did you say to him
About, Hagrid? Did you mention Hogwarts at all?”
“Mighta come out,” Hagrid said, frowning as he tried to remember.
“Yeah…he asked me what I did, an' I told him I was a game warden here…he asked a
A little about the kind of people I came behind... I told... and told him what I would say
Always really wanted a dragon...an' then...I could' remember well, 'cause
He keeps buying me a drink... Let's see... yeah, then he says he has a dragon egg
An' we can play ferit cards if I want...but he was sure I could figure it out
It, didn't want to go ter any old house....So I thought, after Fluffy, it's a beast
It would be easy….”
“And he’s — he seems to have a crush on Fluffy?” Harry asked, trying to
Keep his voice soft.
“ⴰⵛⵓ ⴽⴰⵏ — ⵉⵀ — ⴰⵛⵃⴰⵍ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵇⵊⴰⵏ ⵙ ⴽⵔⴰⴹ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵇⴻⵔⵔⴰ ⴷ’ⵢⴻⵀ ⵜⵜⴻⵎⵍⵉⵍⵉⵏ, ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵣⴷⴰⵜ ⵏ .
Hogwats? ⵙ ⵡⴰⴽⴽⴰ ⵏⵏⵉⵖⴰⵙ, Fluffy ⴷ ⴰⵃⵔⵉⵛ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵍⴳⴰⵟⴰ ⵎⴰ ⵜⴻⵙⵙⵏⴻⴹ ⴰⵎⴻⴽ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵜⵜⴻⵙⴳⵓⵏⴼⵓⴹ.
downstairs, jus' play him a little music an' he'll go right out of ter sleep —”
Hagrid suddenly looked shocked.
“I sooldn'ta toold yh that!” he blurted out. “Forget I said it! Hey -
Where are you going?”
Harry, Run, and Hermione didn’t talk to each other at all until
He stopped at the entrance hall, which looked very cold and dark after the
foundation.
“We need to go to Dumbledore,” Hari said. “Hagred says for the forecast
How you will pass Fluffy, and and Snape or Voldemort under the sergeant —
It should be easy, when Hagrid is drunk. I just hope Dumboldur
He believed us. Firenze might overthrow us if Bane doesn't stop him. Where is
The Doumbldur porter?”
They look, as if hoping to see a sign showing them in the distance.
direction. They were not told where Dumbledore lived, nor did they know .
One who was created to behold.
“It would just be —” Harry began, but a voice suddenly sounded faint .
hall.
“What are you three doing inside?”
Professor McGonagall has taken over a large portion of the books.
“We want to see a teacher Dombdore,” said Hermione, in accordance with the
Harry and Ron wondered.
“Look at the teacher Dumbledore?” Professor McGonagal, like
This is something that’s the most common thing to want it. "why?"
Harry is full of — now and what?
“It’s a kind of government,” he said, but hopes in a time he didn’t give up, because .
Professor McGonagall's lips twitched.
"Professor Dumbledore left ten minutes ago," she said heavily. "he
He received a speedy eagle from the Ministry of Magic and flew to London at
one."
“We’re not going?” Harry said fully. "now?"
"Professor Dumbledore is a very great wizard, Potter, he has a lot of
Requirements on his time – ”
“But this is important.”
"Anything you have to say is more important than the Ministry of
Smar, a Potter?”
“Moqel,” says Harry, and you guarantee the wind to the wind, “Aselmad — and .
On the rock of Surr —.”
All that Professor McGonaghell meets, who is not that. Books
She was getting away from her arms, but she didn’t get them out.
“How you know —?” I have left.
“The teacher, I think — I saw — that Sn—that someone will help .
It’s a stone rental. I have to talk to the teacher Dombdore.”
She was snapped by a sand of pain and pain.
"Chairman Dumbledore will close tomorrow," she said at last. I don't
You know how you want to lie on the rock, but you're listening, nothing can be
You steal it, it’s very protected.”
“But Master —”
“Putter, I’ve seen what I say,” she said quickly. began under
and collected the books they read. I recommend you go abroad and you’re happy with
sunshine."
But they didn't.
“It’s tonight,” Harry said, noting that Professor McGonagall was .
from the ear. “Snap is going through this car tonight. They are silent .
Everything for the horrors, now brings Dumbledore from the road. He sent this .
Note, I think the Ministry of Magic will have a real shock when Dumbledore gets
up."
“But what we can —”
She was distributed Hermiyene. Harry and Ron added with slavery.
Snap was standing there.
“Good evening,” he said warmly.
and they sat down upon him.
“You’re not supposed to be inside on a day like this,” he says, in a nonsense, repeated expression .
smile.
“We were —” Harry began, unsure of what to say.
“You want to be more careful,” Snape said. “Shut up like that,
People will assume you have something. And Gryffindor really couldn’t give
missed another point, is it possible?”
Harry ran. They turned to go outside, but Snape spoke to them.
“Let’s remember, Peter — a few more nights a night and I’ll stay
Personally you’re sure you’re being kicked out. Good day to you.”
He lives in the area of ​​the workers' house.
Outside of the stone steps, Harry is busy with others.
“Right, here’s what we have to do,” he said quietly. “One of us .
He came to keep an eye on the snap — wait outside the staff room and follow him if
He left her. Hermione, you better do that.”
“Why me?”
"Of course," Ron said. “You can pretend to wait for the teacher .
Flitwick, you know.” He said loudly, “'Oh Professor Flitwick, when I was very
I remember, I think I’ve got the fourteen B and four B....'”
“Oh, shut up,” Hermione said, but she agreed to go and take care .
Snap.
“And we can stay outside the third road,” Harry told Ron.
"series."
But aat part of the pad didn't work. They failed
The door separates Fluffy from the rest of the school more than Professor McGonagall.
She reappeared and this time, she lost her temper.
“I think you thought you were trying to pass more than one box of .
enchantments!” It’s going to go. “Enough of this nonsense! zero I want I'm clean
Somewhere near here, I'm going in with fifty points from Gryffindor! Yes,
Weasley, from my own home!”
Harry and Ron returned to the common room, and Harry simply said, “Please
Except for Hermione in the snap rain,” when the scene opens with Lady’s ceremony .
And Hermione entered.
“I’m sorry, Harry!” she screamed. “The snap came out and he asked me why
It was working, I said I was looking at Flitwick, and Snap has the spirit of the spirit, and
I don't know, I don't know where Snape went.”
“Well, that’s it then, isn’t it?” Harry said.
The other two looked at him. He is brave and his eyes are bright.
“I’m out of here tonight and I’m going to try to get to the Rock .
first."
“You’re mad!” Run said.
“You can’t!” Hermione said. “After what McGonagall and Snape have
said? They’ll kick you out!”
“SO WHAT” Harry shouted. “Don’t you understand? If Snap
of the Stone, Voldemort will return! Don't you hear something like
when he was trying to take over? Nothing Hogwarts will be published
from! It will make it brighter, or it will be a gift to the old arts! cases of investment
It doesn’t matter, can’t you see? You think he’ll leave you and you
families alone if Gryffindor wins the house cup? If I get caught before I get
To the stone, yes, I have to come back to Dorsleys to add Voldemort to
Find me there, I'll never die another moment for who I'll be, because I've never been
She continues to the green side! I will go out at the door of the sand left, nobody.
You two said you were going to stop me! Voldemort killed the parents, you’re hungry?”
He stared at them.
“You’re right Harry,” Hermione said in a small voice.
“I’m going to use the uncertainty,” Harry said. “It’s just lucky I got it back.”
“But will he bury all three of us?” Run said.
“All of us—the three of us?”
“ⵓⵀⵓ, ⴽⵛⵎ-ⴷ ⴼⴻⵍⵍ-ⴰⵙ, ⵓⵔ ⵜⵅⴻⵎⵎⴻⵎⴻⵎ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⴽ-ⵏⴻⴵⴵ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⴷⴷⵓⴹ ⵡⴰⵀⴷⴻⵙ?”
“It’s true,” Hermione said quickly. “How do you think you’re going to get to .
Hello without us? I’d better go check my books, it might be
Some of us....”
“But if you get caught, you two will be deported too.”
“Not if I can help it,” Hermione insisted. “Flitwick told me in secret .
that I got a hundred and twelve percent on his exam. No heavily .
After this.”
Following the dinner sat with the slave with the guild with the accusations of the Union’s home.
No one sent them away; He had no one of Griffindor something to say to Harry
any more, after all. This is the first night he didn’t give him. Hermione
She remembers all her stories, and she hopes to get one of .
The enchantments were about to try to break them. Harry and Ron didn't talk much.
Both of them thought about what they were doing.
Gradually, the room was abandoned as people left for the night.
“Yes will find the story,” Ron said in view, when Lee Jordan ended, .
Asmatty and Repair. Harry ran upstairs to their upstairs bathroom. came out
the crew and then his eyes fell on the silver Hagrid had given him for Christmas.
He put in the lake to use Fluffy — he didn’t feel much like singing.
He ran back to the common room.
« ⵢⵉⴼⵉⵜ ⵎⴰ ⵏⴻⵙⵙⴻⵔⵙ ⴰⵄⴻⴽⴽⴰⵣⵏⵏⵉ ⴷⴰⴳⵉ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵏⵃⴻⵇⵇⴻⵔ ⴰⴷ ⴰⵖⴷ-ⵉⴹⴻⵍ ⴰⴽⴽ ⵙ ⵜⵍⴰⵜⴰ .
– Wheth Filch is one of our legs passing on the horses —”
"what are you doing?" He said a call from the room room. Nephil
He was out of behind a slaughter, and the Trifur Troveur, which is .
Even if he’s really hard for freedom.
“No, Neville, no,” Harry said, quickly putting the wand away .
After behind him.
Neville looks at their guilty faces.
“You’re going out again,” he said.
"No, no, no," Hermione said. “On, we’re not. Why don't you go to bed,
Neville?”
Harry looked at the grandfather clock by the door. They can’t be successful.
To save even more time, Snape can even now play Fluffy to sleep.
“You can’t leave,” Neville said, “you’ll be caught again. Gryffindor will
there is more difficulties.”
“Don’t worry,” Harry said, “that’s amazing.”
But of course Neverille was keeping himself to work something that doesn’t have to do.
I’m not going to let you do it,” he says, sprinting to stand in front of the painting .
hole. “I’ll fight you — I’ll kill you!”
“Nville,” Ron divided, “I’m out of the school and you will not be the storm .
—”
“Don’t call me stupid!” said Neville. I don’t think you should be
They broke some other rule! You are the one who told me to stand up .
people!"
“Yeah, but it doesn’t belong to us,” Ron says on the recording. “Neville, you don’t know
What you’re doing.”
He took a step forward and Nyfil released Trifor Trifor, which opened
from the vision.
“Go around and try to make it!” Neville said, shrugging. “I am ready!”
Harry turned to Hermione.
“Do something,” he growled.
Hermiun reached forward.
“Neville,” she said, “I’m really, really sorry about that.”
She waves her hand.
“Bethriphes Tutulus!” she said, pointing at Neville.
Neville's arms were clenched at his sides. His legs jumped all over. all
His body tensed, he tensed where he stood and then fell on his face, tense as
board.
Hermione ran to pick him up. Neville’s jaws were jammed together so
He couldn't speak. Only his eyes moved, widening them in shock.
“What have you done to him?” Harry whispered.
“It’s the perfect Body-Bind,” Hermione said sadly. “Oh, Neville, I’m so
Sorry."
"We have to, Neville, there's no time to explain," Harry said.
“You’ll figure out later, Neville,” Ron said as he was pushed away and .
He went out on an unchanged tree.
But it allows Nephil to be non-movement on the ground not like a
a good sign. In their nervous state, every statue's shadow looked like Filch, every
The distant breath of wind sounded like Peeves whistling at them. At the foot
of the first thunderstorm, they saw Mrs. Norris crouching near the top.
“Oh, let’s fuck her, just this once,” Ron said, stroking Harry’s shoulder, but .
Harry shook his head. As they moved slowly past her, Mrs. Norris turned .
Her silver-like eyes stared at them, but she did nothing.
They didn’t meet anyone else until they reached the top summit of the
Third floor. Peeves was bobbing halfway up, loosening the carpet so that people
He'll walk.
“Who’s there?” He said suddenly as they moved towards him. he
His evil black eyes narrowed. “They know you’re there, even if I can’t see you.
Are you a ghost or ghost or a wee student?”
He got up in the air and hovered there, looking at them.
“I need to talk to Filch, alright, if there’s anything that’s going to cause us to make an unprecedented move.”
Harry had a brief idea.
“Peeves,” he says, with a sly grin, “The Bloody Baron has his own .
Reasons for not seeing.”
Peeves almost fell out of the air in shock. He caught himself in time and
it moved about a foot from the ladder.
“So sorry, your bloody, Mr. Baron, Sir,” he said greasily. "my
Mistake, my mistake — I did not see you — indeed I did not see you, you are invisible —
Old Beefse used his little instructor, sir.”
“I have business here, Peeves,” croaked Harry. “Stay away from that
Place tonight.”
"I will, sir, of course I will," Peeves said, rising into the air.
“Hope your affair goes well, Baron, I won’t interrupt you.”
And scotch.
“That’s wonderful, Harry!” said Run.
A few seconds later, there they were, outside the third-floor lobby — .
The door was already open.
“Well, there you are,” Harry said quietly, “Snape has already crossed
fluffy."
The sight of an open door suddenly seemed to startle all three of them .
what was facing them. Under the covers, Harry turned to the other two.
“If you want to go back, I won’t blame you,” he said. “You can follow
Cloak, I won’t need it right now.”
“Don’t be ridiculous,” Ron said.
“We’re coming,” Hermione said.
Harry knocked on the door.
As the door closed, their senses met with the soft click of a lightning bolt. Three n
The dogs’ noses breathed weirdly in their direction, though she couldn’t see them.
“What is that at his feet?” Hermione whispered.
“Looks like an ornament,” Ron said. “I wish they had left her there.”
"He's supposed to wake up the moment you stop playing," Harry said. “Well, here
goes …."
He put Hagrid's feather to his lips and sucked. It’s not exactly music, but
From the first bite the animal’s eyes start drooling. Harry wasn't breathing.
Slowly, the dog’s barking subsided—he scratched his paws, fell to his knees,
Then, it hit the ground, very quickly.
“We played,” Ron Harry said as they left the club and
slid towards the trapdoor. They can smell hot, smelly dog ​​breath when they
They broke on the main axes. “I think we’ll be able to pull the door open,” he said .
Ron, looking over the dog's shoulder. “Do you want to go first, Hermione?”
“No, don't!”
"you're welcome." Run gritted his teeth and stomped gently on the dog's.
Feet. He divides and responds to the loss of the opponent, who came out open.
“What can you see?” Hermione said calmly.
“Nothing — just black — no way to roll, just roll .
It has to come down.”
Harry, still playing the flute, waved at Ron to get his attention
It shows itself.
“Do you want to go first? Are you sure?” Run said. "I don't know how deep
This thing works. Give the virus to Hermione so she can take care of it.”
Harry gave a sigh. Within seconds of silence, the dog lost
And it was funny, but when Hermione started playing, it went back to normal.
sleep.
Harry stepped off of her and looked down at the sliding door. was
There is no sign below.
He lowered himself from the ship until he was hanging forward
Finger tips. Then he looked at Ron and said, "If something happens to me, I won't . . ."
follow. Go straight downstairs and introduce Hedwig to Dumbledore, won’t you?”
"They passed," Run said.
“I’ll see you in a minute, I hope …”
And Harry let her. Cold, dry air rushed past him as he fell, down,
Below is —
FLUMP. With a funny sort of twist, he knocked over something
soft. He sat up, feeling dizzy, his eyes never used to sharpening. It looks like
He was sitting on some kind of tree.
"It's okay!" He called to light the size of a postage stamp, i
It was a sliding door opening, “it’s a soft fall, you can jump!”
Ron followed immediately. He went down, divided near Harry.
“Is that it?” ⴷ ⴰⵡⴰⵍⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⵉⵎⴻⵣⵡⵓⵔⴰ.
“Dunno, ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵚⵚⴻⵏⴼ ⵏ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵙⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵥⴻⴳⵡⴰ. ⵖⵉⵍⴻⵖ ⴷ ⴷⴰⴳⵉ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵔⵥⴻⵎ ⴰⵖⴻⵍⵍⵓⴳ.
Come on, Hermione!”
Distant music. There’s a brilliant sand from the sand, but
Hermiun had already fallen. She walked over to Harry's other side.
“We should be under the supervision of the school,” she said.
“This woodland thing might be here, actually,” Ron said.
"lucky!" said Hermione. “ⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍⴷ ⴽⵓⵏⵡⵉ ⵙ ⵙⵉⵏ!”
ⵜⵏⴻⴳⴳⴻⵣⴷ, ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵏⴰⴹⴰⵃ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵍⵃⵉⴹ ⵉⴱⴻⵣⵢⴻⵏ. ⵉⵇⵇⴰⵏⴷ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵏⵏⵓⵕⵥⵎ .
for the moment she landed, the old woman began to move like a snake.
The roads run over his head. As for Harry and Ron, their legs were already
They are carried out in a clean way in long distances without being destroyed.
Hermione managed to free herself before hitting the crop harder
her. Now she watched in horror as the two boys struggled to pull the weight for them,
But the more they put on it, the worse and worse the plant’s injury
in their midst.
“Stop walking!” Hermione begged them. “I know what that is — it’s .
The demon’s body!”
“Oh, I’m so glad we know what it’s called, it’s a big help,” he gushed .
Ron, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴽⴻⵍ ⵖⴻⴼ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵄⴻⵔⵔⵉⴹ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵃⴱⴻⵙ ⴰⵥⴻⴹⴹⴰⵏⵏⵉ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵇⴻⵔⵔⵉⴱ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⵖⴻⵔⵖⴻⵔⵜⵉⵙ. "shut
up, trying to remember how to kill him!” Hermione said.
“Here, quickly, I can’t get to lose!” Harry gasped, wrestling with it.
clung to his chest.
“The charity body, the body of the charity…What did the teacher Sprout? - favourite
Darkness and heat.”
“Yeah are buying fire!” Harry paused.
“ⵉⵀ — ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ — ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵓⵍⴰⵛ ⵍⵃⴻⵏⵏⵉ!” ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵔⵓ Hermione, ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵃⴻⵣⵣⵉⴱⵉⵜⵜ
sleeve.
“ARE YOU KIDDING?” Run shouted. “YOU’RE a magician OR
not?"
“Oh, right!” Hermione said, and pulling out her wand, waved it,
Looking at something, she sent a jet of fire of the same magic she used on
Snape in the woods. In some degrees, two markets felt out of the prison
As many of the light from the light. He is merching and sick, he is.
Following himself from their lives, they have managed to restore freedom.
“Good luck paying attention to zoology, Hermione,” Harry said as he .
He joined her against the wall and wiped the sweat from her face.
“Yes,” Ron said, “O Harry with lease doesn’t affect the question in a crisis —
'No ring,' honestly.”
“Kennary,” says Harry, and he remembered with a vessel road, which is .
The only way forward.
ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⴰⴽⴽ ⵣⴻⵎⵔⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵙⵍⴻⵏ ⵙⵉⵡⴰ ⵉⴹⴰⵔⵔⴻⵏⵏⵙⴻⵏ ⴷ ⵜⵉⵇⵇⵉⵜ ⵏ ⵡⴰⵎⴰⵏ ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ.
They are left out of the walls. The passageway sloped downward, and Harry was
She pointed at Gringott. With a suspension we don’t like in the heart, you’re right
The dragons are said to guard the stores in the Sorcerers Bank. They met one,
tragon with Calmalis — Norbert was evil...
“Can you hear something?” Run whined.
He listened to Harry. One woman and holy place, and what comes of the foundation.
ahead.
“Do you have been intelligent?”
“I don’t know…looks like wings to me.”
“There’s a light in front — I can see something close.”
They reached the end of the road and saw ahead of them a
A brightly lit room, its ceiling cracking high above them. It was full of little ones,
The beautiful birds like the forests, fly and silent in the room all the house. In his sentence
Next to the room was a heavy wooden door.
“Do you think they’ll let us know if we skip room?” Run said.
“That,” says Hari. “They don’t seem too bad, but I think if .
Sported all with once…ahat, no other…I’ll go back.”
The handmay, and the face of the place was brutary, and passed up.
On the other side of the room. He expected to feel the hard bones and nails poking at him some n
the second, but nothing happens. He made it to the door without getting caught. He pulled
The manual, but there was a closer.
The other two followed. The following and used the door, but
It wouldn’t stop, it’s not just when Hermione wants to try her homora.
“Now what?” Run said.
“The birds.... can’t just be here for the wedding,” Hermione said.
They see birds flying overhead, twinkling — twinkling?
“They’re not bird!” Harry said really. “And films! The one in the pictures.
'Look closely. Yes they should say....” Machines in the room and
other tw squinted up at the ful of kines. “…Yeah — look! Broomsticks! We've
He must hold the key to the gate!”
“But there are hundreds of them!”
Ron checked the doorknob.
“We’re looking for a big, vintage one — maybe silver, like the one from
handle."
Each of them took a powder and stood in the air, and snapped in .
center of the cloud of vehicles. The grabbed and snatched, bout the bewitched
Keys Darted and dive quickly that almost impossible to hold one.
However, not food and a blessed, Hary is the only largest Anadi is the largest in the palace. he
He has the ability to view things don’t have more people. After a minute of exploring
Over the swirls of purple feathers, he saw a large silver key
He had a strong, such as being arrested and illegal in
The keyhole.
“Well!” He is hearing for others. “That’s great — there — no, there
— with bright red wings — all men are used on one side.”
Ron quickly went in the direction Harry was pointing, diving into
Cold, and almost fell from his cell.
“We got closer to him!” Harry read, he didn’t take his eyes on the keys
with the damaged wing. “Ron, you come at him from above—Hermione, sit down .
Down and I would hold him down and try to catch him. now!"
Ron collapsed, Hermione stumbled backwards, the key hitting them both, and
Harry stood behind him; It’s up to the back, Hari snapped ahead and with one
The best, sickness slave, and he was sick and snapped with a hand with a hand. Ron and
Hermione's ghosts entered across the large room.
They were slowly, Harry sold to the door, the key fighting on the .
hand. Replaced it in the car and put it back – it worked. When the vehicle is
He entered the opening, the key ringing again and again.
They were arrested twice.
"ready?" Harry asked two more, his hand on the doorknob. they
He ran his head. He pulled the door open.
The next room was so dark they couldn’t see anything at all. But as
They entered it, and the light suddenly went out of its place to give a light.
sight.
They were standing on the edge of a large chessboard, behind the black
Chess members, who are all taller than them and consist of something like
Black Blue. Before them, way in the front of the room, were white lights. Harry,
Run and Hermiun put up a bit – the white users who hit didn’t have
faces.
“Now what do we do?” Harry whispered.
“It’s obvious, isn’t it?” Run said. “We have to play our way across the
room."
Behind the yellow pillars see another door.
"how?" Hermione said wisely.
“I guess,” Ron said, “we’ll have to be chess pros.”
He walked up to a black knight and reached out his hand to touch the knight's.
horse. Suddenly, the stone sprang to life. The horse hit the ground and
Knight turned his helmeted head to look down at Ron.
“Should we go in — er — with you to get through?” The Black Knight
she nodded. Ron turned to the other two.
"This needs to be thought about…" he said. “I think we should take
The place of the three red figures….”
Harry and Hermione sat in silence, watching Ron think. Finally he said:
“Now, don’t be sarcastic or anything, but neither of you are that good at chess .
—”
“We’re not offended,” said Harry quickly. “Just tell us what to do.”
“Well, Harry, you take that bishop’s place, and Hermione, you’re next .
to him instead of that castle.”
"how are you doing?"
“I’ll be a knight,” Ron said.
The chess players seemed to be talking, because in these words a
The knights, the bishop, and the castle put their feet on the white frames and went
they left the screen, leaving the three substitutes that Harry, Ron and Hermione had taken.
"White always plays first at chess," Ron said, looking at the board.
“Yeah…see…”
A white guard had walked in front of two supporters.
Ron started to talk about the red threads. They looked silently wherever
sent them. Harry's throat was growing. What if they lost?
“Harry — move fast four spaces to the right.”
Their first real stop came when their other knight was captured. The white
The queen knocked him to the ground and kicked him off the table, where he was lying
Still, face down.
“I have to let this happen,” Ron said, looking puzzled. “It leaves you free to
Grab that bishop, Hermione, and move on.”
Whenever one of their men fell, the white elements showed no mercy.
Soon there was a huddle of limp black players slumped along the wall. twice,
Ron noticed just in time that Harry and Hermione were in danger. he
Itself spun across the board, taking in nearly as many white frames as they had
The blacks arrived.
“We’re almost there,” he whispered. “Let me think — let me .
mind…"
The White Queen turned her pale face towards him.
“Yeah…” Ron whispered, “It’s just the way…They have to get me.”
"No!" Harry and Hermione shouted.
“It’s chess!” said Run. “You've got to make some sacrifices! I
Take a step forward and she’ll bring me — that leaves you free to date
The king, Harry!”
"but -"
“Do you want to stop Snape or not?”
“Run —”
“Look, if you don’t hurry, he’ll already have the stone!”
There is no loss.
"ready?" Ron called, his face pale but determined. “Here I go — now,
Don’t quit when you win.”
He stepped forward, and the white queen pounced. She hit Run hard.
Over the head with his stone hand, and he fell to the ground — Hermione .
She screamed but stayed put—the white queen nudged Ron to one side.
He looks like he’s been beaten up.
Shaking, Harry moved three moves to the left.
The white king came out of his body and begged at Harry's feet. They have
won. The chessmen split and retreated, leaving the door clear in front of them. With one
The latter turns around and sees Ron, Harry and Hermione being shown through the door
It's up the road of the road that went.
“If I'm not —?”
“It’ll all be fine,” Harry said, trying to calm himself down. “What did you
Guess who’s next?”
“We’ve had Sprout’s, that was the Devil’s Snare; Flitwick needs .
charms on the keys; McGonagall raised her children to keep them alive;
This leaves the quill letter, the snap.”
They reached another door.
"you're welcome?" Harry whispered.
“Go xf.”
Harry pushed it open.
A terrifying picture of them crossing their nipples, this causes the two of them to release it.
clothes up their noses. Eyes watering, they saw, flat on the floor in front of
Of them, a troll bigger than the one they picked, out cold with a bloody
It's running over itself.
“I’m glad we don’t have to worry about that one,” Harry whispered as they .
stepping carefully on one of his massive paws. “Come on, I can’t breathe.”
The next door opened, and they both didn't know what to do.
came after him - but there was nothing good about it, just a table with
Seven separate canopies are then erected in one pillar.
“Snab’s,” Harry said. “What did we come to do?”
They entered the field, returning at a time when a body was changed after
They are at the door. She is not a social worker either; Make it burble. In this
instant, black flames shot up in the doorway leading onward. They were trapped.
"look!" Hermione grabbed one of the parchment cards that was among the piles. Harry
Looking over her shoulder to read it:
Danger is ahead of you, if safety is behind,
Two of us will help you, who will help you,
One of us seven will keep you moving forward,
The other takes the drinker back instead,
two-thirds of us drink only winged wine,
Three of us are journalists, waiting to be used in the line.
Stay, if you don't want to stay here now,
ⵉⵡⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⴽⵏⵄⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⴼⵔⴰⵏⵉⴽ, ⴰⴷ ⴰⴽⴷ-ⵏⴻⴼⴽ ⵜⵉⴽⵜⵉⵡⵉⵏⴰⴳⵉ ⵙ ⵕⴻⴱⵄⴰ:
The beginning, as a Sun is trying to choose
ⴰⴷ ⵜⴰⴼⴻⴹ ⴷⵉⵎⴰ ⴽⵔⴰ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⴰⵎⴰ ⵜⴰⵣⴻⵍⵎⴰⴹⵜ ⵏ ⵛⵛⵔⴰⴱ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ;
Second, the standers on each side are different,
But if you walk here, he is not your friend;
Terrorist, as it was seen, all when he was viewed, all when he was viewed in the place.
It’s the story and the dying of the death in their own;
Fourth, second left and second right
They're twins you'll recognize, even though they're very different at first.
ⵀⵉⵔⵎⵉⵓⵏ ⵉⴼⴼⵖ ⵢⴰⵏ ⵓⵏⵛⴽ ⴰⵅⴰⵜⴰⵔ ⴷ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ, ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵃⵢⵢⴰⵍ, ⵉⵥⵕⴰ ⵉⵙ ⵜⴳⴰ ⵜⴰⵎⵙⴽⵔⵜ,
The very last thing he felt like doing.
“Brilliant,” Hermione said. “This isn't maggic — it's logic — a pzzle. a
A lot of great sensitive humisses have no knowledge, remain DGA
forever."
“But you also, not to all?”
“Of course she’s not going to answer her,” Hermione said. “Everything we’re dedicating here to that
paper. Seven pottles: three are poison; to are are; on will get us saefly
With the pillar, one will answer us with ear.”
“But how do we know which one to drink?”
“Give me a minute.”
Hermione reads a lot. Then it went up and down.
the sound of the bottles, murmuring to herself and staring at them. Finally, she clapped her hands
His hands.
“Do it”, she said. “The most smaller slot will be smoked by the car
Treasures — toward the stone.”
Harry looked at the smaller bra.
He said: “Yella’s only what they should have for one of us.” “This is not one
swallow."
Mohamen in the other.
“That when someone gets the right pieces?”
Hermione ⵜⴻⵙⵎⴻⴽⵜⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⴱⵓⵛⵉⴹⴰⵏⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⵍⴻⵎⵎⴰⵙⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵖⴻⵔⵖⴻⵔⵜ.
“You drink this,” Harry said. “No, Listen, get back and get Ron. grab
The discoveries from the snacks of the illustrated film, will be set up from the ear gate and go
Fluffs — go straight back to the midfielder, bring Hedwig to Dumbledore, we need .
he. I might be able to take Snap for a while, but I am not a conversation,
really."
“But Harry — what if You-Know-who's with him?”
“Well — I was lucky once, wasn’t I?” Harry said, pointing to his wand. "I
Maybe there will be another time.”
ⵉⵖⴻⵙ ⵏ Hermione ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵏⴻⵔⵏⵉ, ⵙ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵙⴰ ⵜⴻⴹⴹⴻⴼ Harry, ⵜⴹⴻⴳⴳⴻⵔⵉⵜⵜ
Arms in front of him.
“Hirmiron!”
“Harry — he’s a great wizard, you know.”
“I’m not good like you,” Harry said, with a lot, when I got .
he.
"we!" Hermione said. “Books! And Clevernis! There are more
The most important things — the friendship and the slavery is — that Harry — protect yourself!”
“You’ll kiss her first,” Harry said. “You know who, you’re not?”
“It’s fine,” Hermione said. She took a long ndrink from the rond bottle at
Finally, and it hurt.
“It’s not a cold?” Harry said proudly.
“Let — but the likes of the ice.”
“You’re, go, you don’t care about it.”
“Happy wind—hurry.”
"go!"
Hermione turned around and walked straight into the firestorm.
Harry took a deep breath and sucked in a small chuckle. He turned to
in front of the red fireplace.
“Here I come,” he said, and held out the little bottle in one swipe.
It was indeed as though ice was flooding his body. Put on a cap.
down and walked forward; He turned around and saw black lights reach his window.
Light, but he couldn’t feel them — for a moment he could see nothing but green fire
— Then he was on the other side, in the last room.
There was something there — but it wasn't a snap. It wasn’t even
Fuldmort.
HP 1 - Harry Putter and
Sorcerer’s Stone
Installation
The Two-Faced Man
I t with Quirrell.
"you!" exclaimed Harry.
Kurl sighed. His face wasn't twitching at all.
“I am,” he said wisely. “I suggest that if I pass you here,
network.”
“But I think — Snape —”
“Sephorus?” Quirrell laughed, and it wasn't his usual piercing treble,
Even, but cold and meat. “Yes, Severus does seem the type, doesn’t he? so
useful to have him swooping around like an overgrown bat. On his part, there was
Are you going to check the BB-hole, P-string P-Professor Quirell?”
Harry couldn't take it in. This couldn't be real, couldn't.
“But Snape tried to kill me!”
“No, no, no. I tried to kill you. Your friend Mrs. Granger please.
You’re afraid as it is going to enter Snape in the Quidditch game. she
He broke my eye contact with you. Another few seconds and I'd have got you off
that broom. I would have done before then if Snape wasn't looking a
counter-curse, trying to save you.”
“Was Snape trying to save me?”
"Of course," Quirrell smirked. “Why do you think he wants to .
referee your next match? He was trying to make sure I didn't do it again. funny,
Really...he shouldn't have bothered. I could do nothing with Dumbledore.
observe. All the other teachers thought Snape was trying to stop Gryffindor
From the profits, he was Ephean not loved people...though of what time, when
After all of this, I’m going to kill you tonight.”
Quirrell shrugged. Animals come out of thin air and hang
themselves hard on Harry.
“You have too much magic to live, Potter. Ssurrying arond the school on
Hallowowen all, for all I saw the time I was going to see what is available
They guard the stone.”
“Did you let the troll in?”
"Sure. I have a special gift with trolls — you've probably seen what I
Does it work for whoever is in the room up there? Unfortunately, while everyone else
It is singing on him, Snape, whom has just trembled up, the Spirit.
Straight to the third floor to piss me off — and it’s not just my troll he can’t hit .
You to the death, the three-headed dog failed to bite Snape's leg
properly.
“Now, wait a minute, Potter. I have to use this wonderful mirror.”
Only then did Harry realize what was standing behind Quirrell. it
He was the Prince of Erised.
“Lealigi is a stone’s exit production,” says Quirell, approaching .
his way around the frame. 'Trust Dumbledore to come up with something like .
That…but he’s in London...I will be lucky in time to return…”
What’s all that Harry can work is to allow Quirrell to talk and stop.
From looking in the mirror.
“I saw you and Snape in the forest —” he stammered.
“Yeah,” Quirrell said with the sight of the cocktails, he passed on the Livery to fight back.
“I was at the time, he’s trying to find how many I have done. I suspected
me all arong. He tried to frighten me—as if he could, when I had the Lord .
Voldemort by my side….”
Quirell has returned from behind the mirror, he was silently silent.
“I see the stone…I offer it to my master…but where is it?”
Harry tugged at the ropes that bound him, but they didn't give. he
Quirell should stop not to give all the cost to the mirror.
“But Snape always seemed to hate me the most.”
“Oh, he has,” Quirrell sighed, “Heavens, yes. He was at Hogwarts
and your father, don't you know? They hurt each other. But never
He wants you dead.”
“But I heard you snoring a few days ago—I thought Snape was .
They’re attacking you….”
For the first time, a smile of fear disappeared from Quirrell's face.
“Sometimes it is difficult for me to follow my master's orders,” he says.
— He’s a great wizard and I’m an idiot —”
“You mean he was there in class with you?” Harry is becoming.
« ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴰⴽⵉⴷ-ⵉ ⴰⵏⴷⴰ ⵎⴰ ⵔⵓⵃⴻⵖ », ⵖⴻⴼ ⵡⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⵢ ⴷ-ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ ⴽⵡⵉⵔⴻⵍ ⵙ ⵜⵙⵓⵙⵎⵉ. “I met him when I
He traveled the world. E young when he was only, he is worry
ideas about good and evil. Lord Voldemort showed me how wrong I was. there
There is no good and evil, there is only power, which are too rare to seek…Since
Sein, I used carefully, even though they had lost many times. he
He had to push me a lot.” Quirl returns at once. “No
mesaxes easley. When I couldn’t steal the stone from Gringotts, he was the one who
desplesed. He warned me…of course that he needed to keep an hour at the most
we.…"
Kirl's voice escaped. Harry remembers about his trip to Decagon
ALLY — How could it be all the worst? He saw Qurell there very much
day, they reached out to him at the Leaky Pot.
Quirl growls under his breath.
“I don’t understand…is that a stone inside a mirror? Should I break it?”
Harry head was growing.
What I want more than anything in the world right now is him
Think about it, is to find a drawing before doing a quill. So if I look in the mirror, I
ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⴼⴽ ⴰⴷ ⵡⴰⵍⵉⵖ ⵉⵎⴰⵏⵉⵡ ⵜⵜⴰⴼⴻⵖⵜ — ⴰⵏⴰⵎⴻⴽⵉⵙ ⴰⴷ ⵡⴰⵍⵉⵖ ⴰⵏⴷⴰ ⵜⴻⴼⴼⴻⵔ ! But mamk
Could I know without Quirrell knowing what I was thinking?
He wants to leave the left, to get in front of the slave without Cyrell
She looked, but the muscles around her legs were too weak: he fell, he fell.
Quirrell ignored him. It’s still speaking with himself.
“What does this mill do? How does it work? Help me, sir!”
And to Harry's horror, a voice answered, and the voice seemed to come .
From Quirrell himself.
“Use that boy…Use that boy….”
Quirl is worried about Harry.
“Yes — Potter — come here.”
He clapped his hands once, and Harry's tied brows fell out. Harry
He came often to his feet.
“Come here,” Quirrell repeated. “Look in the mirror and tell me what .
You see.”
Harry walked over to him.
I must be lying, he thought bitterly. I should know to lie about what I believe,
That's all.
Kerrill came after him. Harry appears in the happy novel that
ⵉⴱⴰⵏⴷ ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ ⴷ ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⴽⴽⴰⵏ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⴱⴻⵔⵜ ⵏ Quirrell. He closed his eyes and crouched in front of
mirrors, and opened them again.
He saw his reflection, pale and scared-looking at first. But one second
later, thought silenced him. She reached into her pocket and pulled out a
blood-red stone. She snapped Allnis, she went back to the car — and as she worked .
Well, Harry felt something hard hit his actual pocket. Either way — I’m not
— Stone came.
"Well?" Quirrel said absently. "What do you see?"
Harry screwed up his courage.
"I see myself joining hands with Dumbledore," he said. “ⵏⴻⴽⴽ — ⵏⴻⵛⵛ
He won the house trophy for Gryffindor.”
Quirrell was right again.
"Get out of the way," he said. As Harry stepped aside, he felt the
The Sorcerer's Stone against his back. Does he take a prison?
But he didn’t go to seven schemes two to speak a long story, even though
Quirrell wasn't moving his lips.
“He’s lying…he’s lying….”
“Potter, get back here!” Quirrell shouted. “Tell me the truth! What did he
Did you just see?”
The singer of death has once again called again.
“Let me talk to him…face to face…”
“Master, you are not strong!”
“I have enough power…for that…”
Harry didn't like the adlimance of T which was going on to stay. He couldn't
by the body. He stopped, and how it came to Quilrell’s breath, he began to succeed .
unwrap his turban. What was going on? The turban fell off. Quirrell's head
It looked terribly small without it. Then he turned sharply on the spot.
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⵖ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵣⵎⵉⵔ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⴼⴻⵖ ⵚⵚⵓⵜ. Where is
It should be a foot for Quirell’s head, there’s one face, it’s the most difficult
The face is not Harry. It was shalk white with glaring redes and slits for
Nose, like a lion.
“Harry Potter…” she whispered.
Harry tried to take a step back but the few were unsuccessful.
“See what I has ave become?” He said the face. “Mere would have been a bomb….I
I had the formula even if I can share another…but there are always
Those who want to let me go into their souls and mentality... odds of Uniorn have
I was surprised, Dorthagues that were supposed...that, the guareller's sins.
in the forest...and once I have the Elixir of Life, I'll be able to create a body
of self....Shere...Toe haven’t got the fight on the car?”
So he knows. The feeling suddenly surged back into Harry's legs. he
He was thrown upside down.
“Don’t be a coward,” the figure said. “Better save your life and get in .
I... or you'll meet the same end as your parents... died begging me for
mercy…"
“WILD!” Harry shouted suddenly.
Quirrell was walking slowly towards him, as far as Voldemort could still see .
he. The evil face was now smiling.
“How it hurts…” she whispered. “I always value bravery....Yes, boy, your
The parents were willing…I killed your father first; And he put a brave
I fought…but your mother didn’t need to die…she was trying to protect you…Now
Give me the stone, if you want to die in vain.”
"never!"
Harry moved towards the fire door, but Voldemort shouted “SEIZE .
He!" and the next second Harry felt Quirrell's hand close to his cheek. in
Once, a tingling pain burned Harry's cheek; his head felt as though it
was about to split in two; He screamed, struggled with all his might, and to his
With a sigh, Quirrell let go. The pain in his head decreased — he looked
he looked around frantically to see where Quirrell was going, and saw he was sadly distracted,
He looks at his feet—bumping before his eyes.
“Catch him! SEIZE HIM!” shouted Voldemort again, and Kuirrel
He lunged, knocked Harry off his feet and landed on him, both hands
In Harry's head— Harry's nose almost throbbed in pain, but he
He could see Quirrell writhing in agony.
“Sir, I can’t hold it—my hands—my hands!”
And Quirrell, despite pinning Harry to the ground with his feet, let him go .
of his head and stared, nervously, at his arms — Harry could see them .
Looking burned, raw, red, and shiny.
“Then kill him, fool, and let’s move on!” yelled Voldemurt.
Quirrell raised his hand to deal a fatal blow, but Harry, sensibly,
He reached up and grabbed Quirrell’s face —
“Aaargh!”
Quirrell stepped away from him, his face lighting up as well, and then he looked at Harry:
Quirrell dared not touch her bare skin, not without suffering great pain—his own .
The only chance was to hold onto Quirrell, causing him enough pain to stop
From the workshop.
Harry jumped to his feet, grabbed Quirrell by the arm, and squeezed tightly
as much as possible. Quirrell screamed and tried to put Harry down—the pain in the .
Harry's mind was building—he couldn't see—he could only hear Quirrell's .
With a roaring explosion and Voldemort’s cries of “KILL THEM! KILL IT!” and others
Voices, probably in Harry’s own head, crying, “Harry! Harry!”
He felt Quirrell's hand ripped from his grasp, saw everything collapse, and
He fell into darkness, down…down… down….
Some of the gold is going to precipitate. Snitch! He wanted to catch him,
But his hands are so heavy.
He rolled his eyes. He wasn’t a Snitch at all. It was a pair of glasses. how
strange.
He returned his eyes. The smiling face of Albus Dumbledore swam into the
A look beyond.
"Good afternoon, Harry," Dumbledore said.
Harry stared at him. Then he remembered, "Sir!" The rock! compliance
Quirrell! He has the stone! Sir, by the way —”
“Relax, dear boy, you’re a little behind the times,” he said .
Dumbledore. “Quirell doesn’t have a stone.”
“Then who did it? Sir, I —”
“Harry, please relax, or Miss Pomfrey will kick me out.”
Harry swallowed and looked away. I realized I had to be in the
hospital wing. He was lying on a bed in white linen slippers, and beside him
It is a dish that is made up of half a cup of meat.
“Notes from your friends and admirers,” Dumbledore said, beaming.
“What happened under the stairs between you and Professor Quirrell is something .
The secrecy continued, so, naturally, the whole school knew. I believe your friends
Mister Freed and George Wissley are the authors of the research let's you do them a job
seat. No doubt they thought it would turn you off. Ms. Pumfrey, however, felt
If he doesn't get too angry, he'll gather it.”
“How long have I been here?”
“Three days. Mr. Runald Wesley and Mrs. Granger will be in attendance
Surprised you came so fast, they were so anxious.”
“But sir, stun —.”
“I know you’re not ready to be distracted. All right, stone. teacher
Quirrell failed to take it from you. I arrived in time to prevent that,
Although you’ve been doing pretty well on your own, I must say.”
“You got there? Do you have Hermione’s pet?”
“We have to pass through the air. I never got to London
It became clear to me that the place I was supposed to be was the one I had just left. I
He arrived just in time to pull Quirrell off of you.”
"are you."
“I’ve decided to be very memorable.”
“You’re almost there, I can’t keep it off the rock for much longer –”
“It’s not the stone, boy, it’s you—the wounds involved almost killed you. for one
terrible moment there, I'm afraid it has. As for the stone, there is
It was destroyed.”
“Destroyed?” Harry said with a shrug. “But your friend—Nicholas Flamel—”
“Oh, you know about Nicolas?” Dumbledore said, in a kind voice
delighted. “You did the right thing, didn’t you? So, Nicholas and I had
They were talking for a bit, and agreed that everything was fine.”
“But that means he and his wife will die, doesn’t it?”
“They have enough stored Elixir to get their affairs in order and then, yeah, .
They will die.”
Dumbledore smirked when he saw the look of surprise on Harry's face.
“For someone as small as you, I’m sure it seems incredibly obvious, but for Nicolas it’s .
Perenelle, it sure is like going to bed after a very, very long day. First of all, read
a well-organized mind, death is just the next big adventure. You know, the Stone
It wasn’t really that strange. And as much money and life as you could
want! Two things many people would choose above all else — and poverty .
It’s, people have a knack for picking out those things that are completely wrong
them."
Harry sat there, lost for words. Dumbledore hummed a little and smiled.
on the ceiling.
"Sir?" Harry said. “I was thinking…sir — even if the stone were gone, .
Vol-, I mean, you know-who —”
“Call him Voldemort, Harry. Always use proper nouns. concern
of a name reduces the fear of the specific thing.”
“Yes, sir. Well, Voldemort would have tried other ways back, not so
he? I mean, he's not gone, is he?”
“No, Harry, he hasn’t. He’s still out there somewhere, probably lookin
For another body to share…he wasn’t truly alive anymore, he couldn’t be killed. Published
Quirrel is going to die; He showed as little mercy to his followers as he did to his enemies.
But, Harry, while you may have just delayed his return to power, it’s
He’ll just get someone else ready to fight what seems to be a threat
War next time—and if it’s delayed again, and again, why, it probably won’t last .
Back to power.”
Harry frowned, but stopped abruptly, because his throat hurt so badly. so
He said, “Sir, there are some other things I want to know, if you could tell me….
Things I want to know the truth about….”
"truth." Dumbledore sighed. “It is a beautiful and terrible thing, and
It should therefore be handled with extreme caution. However, I will answer
Questions unless I have a good reason not to, in which case I beg you to
I'm sorry. I’m not lying, really.”
“However...Voldemort said he was just killed my mother because she tried .
To stop him from killing me. But why would he want to kill me in the first place
place?"
Dumbledore was much quieter this time.
“No, the first thing you ask me, I can’t tell you. Not today. Not now.
You'll know, one day...put it out of your mind for now, Harry. When you are
Great…I know you hate to hear this…when you’re ready, you’ll know it.”
And Harry knew there was no point arguing.
“But why can’t Quirrell touch me?”
“Your mother died to save you. If there was one thing Voldemort couldn’t
Fish, is love. He doesn’t realize that love is as strong as your mother’s.
a piece of it. Not physical, no obvious sign... you'd love that
Deep down, even though the person who loves us is gone, it will give us something
Forever protection. It’s in your skin itself. Quirl, all crack, gread, and
ambition, sharing his soul with Voldemort, unable to touch you for this reason. it
It was sad when you touch a person who is reminded of something so good.”
Dumbledore now became very interested in a bird out on the windowsill,
That gave Harry time to adjust his eyes on the screen. When he found his voice
Once again, Harry said, “It’s an invisible wand—you know who led it to .
we?"
“Oh — your father happened to leave it in my hand, and I said .
You might like it.” Dumbledore's eyes changed. “Old things… your father
He mainly uses it to sneak into kitchens to steal food when he’s here.”
“And there’s something else…”
“With fire.”
“Kurrel said Snape—”
“Professor Snape, Harry.”
“Yes, he — Quirrell said he liked me because he cared about his father. Is this
true?"
“Well, they were neglecting each other. Do not compete with yourself and the master.
Malfoy. And then your father did something and he can’t surf”.
"what?"
“He saved her life.”
"what?"
“Yes…” Dumbledore said dreamily. “It’s amazing, the way people’s minds are .
Work, isn’t it? Professor Snape couldn’t want to be in your father’s shadow… I
Believe that he has worked hard to protect you this year because he feels this will
Let him be your father. Then he might go back to hating your father’s
Remembering in peace….”
Harry tried to understand that but it made his head frown, so he stopped.
“And sir, there’s one more thing…”
“Alone?”
“How did I get stunned out of the mirror?”
“Oh, now, I’m glad you asked me that. He was one of my very best.
Ideas, and between you and me, that's saying something. You see, only one who
He wanted to find a stone—to find it, but not to use it—to be able to get it,
If they see only themselves, they will lose the light of life. my
the brain confuses me too sometimes…Now, enough questions. I suggest you
They are doing a preview on these plates. Oh! The Bettie Bott of every bean sprout! I was
I'm very interested in my young people to make a happy novel, and since
Afterwards I was afraid I wasn’t at my best — but I thought I’d be proud of
good toffee, isn’t it?”
He smiled and popped the golden brown fruit into his mouth. Then he
They cried out, “Alas! Ear to ear!”
Madam Pomfrey, a nurse, is kind, but very strict.
“Just five minutes,” Harry demanded.
“Not at all.”
“You let Professor Dumbledore in….”
“Well, of course, being a principal is a lot different. They’re getting to.”
“I’m relaxed, see, I’m sleeping and everything. Oh, go on, ma'am.
Buumfri...”
“Oh, very nice,” she said. “But only for five minutes.”
and to aunt Ron and Hermione G.
“Harry!”
Hermione looked ready to put her hands on him again, but Harry .
She was glad she kept to herself because her head still hurt so much.
“Harry, we thought you were going to—Dumbledore was like that .
worried -"
"The whole school talks about him," Ron said. “What exactly .
happened?"
It's one of our few times when the story is more real
Preachers are happier than preached words. Harry told them all: Quirrel;
mirror; rule and Vuldimurt. Ron and Hermione are a very good match.
audience; They are used in all the right places, and when Harry tells them what
Under Quirrell's touch, Hermione cried out loudly.
“This is how stun went?” Ron said finally. “Just flamml die?”
"That's what I said, but Dumbledore thinks so—what is he?" - 'I
a well-organized mind, death is just the next big surprise.'”
“I always thought he was out of his rock messenger,” Ron said, sounding very suspicious
In many who are his opponents.
“So, what happened to you two?” Harry said.
“Well, I’m back all right,” Hermione said. “I took Ron by surprise — that .
He took a while — and we had we had we had we were going to meet Dumbledore
When we met him in the entrance hall — he already knew — he simply said, .
— Harry walked behind, so why? It was taken to the third level.”
“Do you think he wants you to do it?” Run said. “Sending you your
My father and all?”
“Well, ” said Hermione, “if it does — I mean it’s horrible — .
You can kill him.”
“No, it’s not,” Harry smiled. “He’s a lucky man, Dumbledore. I
Please think the likelihood to give me the situation. I’ve gotten knowing a lot or less.
Everything happening here, you know. I think he has a good idea.
They were going to try, and instead of detaining us, he taught us just enough to help. I
I don't think he's a guy who's going to let me find out how Mira works. is
It was almost like I think I have the right to face Voldemort if I could....”
“Hey, Dombdore of his spirit, all of it is good,” Ron said joy. "listen,
It’s important that you’re really trying tomorrow for the end of the year. Grades are all in d
Slytherin won, of course — you missed the last Quidditch match, we did .
I’m making a raffle-colour without a cone — but it would be a good meal.”
At that moment, Madame Pomphrey stood up.
“You have almost five minutes, now OUT” she said firmly.
After a good night, Harry feels almost going to go back to the normal sense.
I want to go to the party,” he said to Madam Pomfrey as she extended her hand .
Lots of cups of coffee. I can’t me?”
"Professor Dumbledore said you should let him go," she said.
It’s very easy, like in his opinion Professor Dumbledore doesn’t know how the weather
files coil. “You have a little more.”
“Oh, okay,” Harry said. “That?”
Hagrid rushed through the doorway as he spoke. As always when there
Arguably, Hagrid is getting too old to be given up. He sat down next to Harry and took
One look at it and she was in tears.
“It’s — all — mine — my — Rhodey — winduddy!” He measured himself, his face in his hands. I
He said to himself in terms of how Fluffy would pass! I tulld him! It was the Only hing h
He didn't know, an' I told him! Yeh coold've died! All fer a garon ggg! chose
Drink again! I’m supposed to be sterilized and brought back to live as a Muggle!”
“Hagrid!” Harry said, shocked to see Hagrid shaking in pain and
right, big tears rolled down her cheeks. “Hagrid, he would have found
As if, it’s Voldemort we’re talking about, it’s also found you even
It doesn’t come to him.”
“Yeh coold've died!” sobbed Hagrid. “An' don't say that name!”
“Vodimurt!” Harry belweed, and Hagrid was so shockcked, he
Stopped crying. “I met him and called her name. Please ceier up,
Hagrid, we cast a stun, he can't use it. Have a chocolate frog.
I have participating parts....”
Hagrid wiped his nose on the back of his hand and said, "That reminds
we. I'm oh yes.”
“It’s not a stoat sandwich, is it?” said Harry anxiously, and at last Hagrid
He gave a weak chuckle.
"nothing. Dumbledore gave me the day off yesterday ter to please him. 'Of course, he
suiulda have worked in place — as soon as possible, Yeh got this….”
It looks like a beautiful, leather-bound book. Harry opened it.
Coriously. It was full of wid phagegrams. I'm writing to him and he's taking it from
Each page is its mother and father.
“Find all the old friends of the parents of the parents, show photos…
He knows heyya has nothing to do with it… d'd like that?”
Harry couldn't speak, but Hagrid understood.
Harry made his way to the end of year party alone that night. have
Madame Pomfrey takes her over and asks her to give him a
The last review, so it’s still very common to the big room. It was decorated in
The silence of the silver and the fly to celebrate Slithaherin's win at the house
Every seventh year, then. A huge stage showing the legacy of Slytherin
You covered the wall behind the high table.
When Harry walked in, there was a brief silence and then everyone
He suddenly began speaking loudly. He falls somewhere between Run and Hermione
In Gryffindor dorms they try not to know they are humans.
Party will be successful
Happily, Dumbledore arrived behind him. Abbello died.
“Take another year!” Dumbledor said excitedly. “And I must be troubled
You’ve been with a brilliant armor before the face of us to use our bones to our 1939 area.
delicous fase. What a yar it has been! I hope your heads are all a bit better.
More than that...make all the summers first so you can make them well and
And they will begin the future....
“Right now, as I understand it, the top of the house is needed, and
the points stood as follows: In fourth place, Gryffindor, with three points and twelve .
hundreds in the third, Hufflepuff, with thirty-two; Ravenklaw has
Four hundred and twenty-six Slytherins, four hundred and seventy-two.”
A shoe rain and snacks have changed from the Slitrene table.
Harry could see Draco Malfoy tapping his thumb on the table. He was a tin.
sight.
"Yes, Yes, alright, Slytherin," Dumbledore said. “However, the latter
Events must be counted.”
The room went still. The Slytherin's smile softened slightly.
“Ahem,” Dumbledore said. “I have a few last minute points to clear up.
Let me see. Yes…
“First — for Mass Runald Wsli...”
Ron has become a pure in the face; It looks like Radis with the sun's hole.
“…For to the ball game that has been all of the best he saw Hogarts in several years ago, I .
Gryffindor house prize fifty points.”
The Gryffindor dance barely lifted the painted ceiling; The stars
It seems to be getting worse. Percy could be heard saying to the other prefects, “Brother, .
You know! Little Brother! He’s passed McGonagall’s giant chess set!”
Finally the silence returned.
“Secondly — to Mr. Hermione Granger…for the use of quasi-instrument in
Face the fire, I give Gryffindor House House worth 50 points.”
Hermione buried her face in her palms; Harry strongly suspected that she had
He burst into tears. Gryffindors up and down the aisle were next to them —
They were a hundred points ahead.
"The third—for Mr. Harry Potter…" Dumbledore said. the house goes .
Silence lives. “…for pure nerve and outstanding courage, I give the prize to Gryffindor .
House by six points”.
The din was deafening. The ones who can add up while having fun
Their selves somberly knew that Gryffindor had now four hundred and seventy-two
point — exactly like a Slytherin. connected for home coffee — if
Only Dumbledore gave Harry only one more point.
Dumbledore raised his hand. The room gradually became quiet.
"There are all kinds of courage," Dumbledore said, smiling. « ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⴼⴽ-ⴷ
Courage enough to stand up to our enemies, but enough to stand up to
Our friends. ⵉⵀⵉ ⵜⵜⴰⴽⴻⵖ ⵎⵔⴰⵡ ⵏ ⵜⴻⵏⵇⵉⴹⵉⵏ ⵉ Mass Neville Longbottom.”
Someone standing outside the main hall must have thought something .
The nature of terrorism, therefore, is a climate that emerges from
The cross of Gryffindor. Harry, Run, and Hermione got up to shout and cheer as
Neville, terribly white, disappeared under the shelter of people who loved him. he
He had never won so many points for Gryffindor before. Harry, still absorbing,
ⵉⵃⴻⵜⵜⴻⵎ Ron ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵖⵉⵍⵉⵙ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵎⴻⴽⵜⴰⴷ Malfoy, ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵣⵎⵉⵔ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍ ⵓⴳⴰⵔ .
he was shocked and anxious just in case a Body-Bind Curse was placed on him.
“What does it mean,” Dumbledore called over the bell of surprise, for even .
Ravenclaw and Hufflepuff were celebrating Slytherin’s downfall, “we need .
A little change of pace.”
He raised his hand. ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⴻⵙⵡⵉⵄⵜ, ⵓⵖⴰⵍⴻⵏ ⵍⵃⵉⴹ ⴰⵣⴻⴳⵣⴰⵡ ⴷ ⴰⵣⴻⴳⴳⴰⵖ.
Silver became gold; Slytherin’s giant snake had disappeared and a raccoon
The Gryffindor lion took his seat. Snape ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⴼⵓⵙ ⵏ ⵓⵙⴻⵍⵎⴰⴷ Makgunagall.
With a crisp, clean image. He caught Harry's eye and Harry knew at once that
ⵉⵃⵓⵍⴼⴰⵏ ⵏ Snape ⵖⵓⵔⵙ ⵓⵔ ⴱⴻⴷⴷⵍⴻⵏ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵙⴰ. That didn’t read Harry. it
Obviously life is going to revert to meaning next year, or one that never happens .
He was at Hogwarts.
It was the best afternoon of Harry's life, better than winning Quidditch,
Or Christmas, or the introduction of mountain trolls... I'll never forget it. Sometime this time for
tonight
Harry almost forgot the test results were still coming in, but they were coming in
ⴳⴳⴰⵏⵜ. ⴰⵔ ⴰⵙ ⵜⵜⵉⵔⵉⵔⵏ ⵎⵇⵇⵓⵔⵏ, ⵙⵉⵏ ⵉⵣⵔⵔⵉ ⵏⵜⵜⴰ ⴷ ⵔⵓⵏ ⵙ ⵜⵏⵇⵇⴰⴹ ⵉⵖⵓⴷⴰⵏ;
ⵀⴻⵔⵎⵉⵓⵏ, ⵉⴱⴰⵏ, ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵜⴻⵙⵄⴰ ⴰⵙⵡⵉⵔ ⵢⴻⵍⵀⴰⵏ ⴰⴽⴽ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵙⴻⴳⴳⴰⵙⴻⵏ ⵉⵎⴻⵣⵡⵓⵔⴰ. ⴰⵡⴷ ⵏⵉⴼⵉⵍ ⵉⵙⴽⵔ
With, his good herbology makes his novel a terrific one. they
They hoped that Goyle, who was almost a hero as far as meaning was concerned, could be
He was deployed, but it’s right, too. It’s simple, but as Run said, you can’t
Slow everything in life.
And at the same time, there are their essays not, their clothes are made,
They discovered that the prophecy of Nephili appeared in a rocky forest; Studies
For all the students, they are forced to avoid using silence in the Morocco (“I’m always hoping
It will not forget to give us that,” said Fred Wesley with sensitives); Hagrid was there.
They get them to the ships that left the lake; are
boarding the Hogwarts bus; Talk and laugh when it's a year.
Belder and atomics; Pittie Pot's every Flavovor Pins when they passed
Mogle boundary; They leave their wooden pills and raising jackets and slavery;
You run in the 19th and three-quarters in King's Cross.
The nights have been a time to get out of all of the offspring. Strange old
The sensation was with the car, allowed them to go at the door at both and
Three of the three so they weren’t going on and they’re all smoothly and break out from a brilliant wall at the same time
and insulting Muggles.
“You should go and stay this summer,” Ron said, “your two — they’ll leave you
Save with Paul.”
“Thank you,” Harry said, “I’ll need something to make me.” people
Please get them back to the door and back to Mogel .
world. Some of them spoke:
“Bye, Harry!”
“Look at you, Butter!”
“Mealet is known,” Ron said, he dies.
“It’s not where I’m going, I’m disappointing,” Harry said.
He, Ron, and Hermione went through the whole door. “Dina.
Is, my mother, there, see!”
She was Jenni Wizley, her younger sister of Ron, but she didn’t smooth
run.
“Harry Potter!” she screamed. “Look, Mom! I can see —.”
“I was silent, a Ginny, and it’s something we don’t like to show.”
Mrs. Weasley smiled down at them.
“A busy year?” She said.
“Very,” Harry said. “Thank you about Foodge and singing, Massa.
.”
“Oh, it’s okay, bye.”
“Ready, are you?”
He was a son Fernon, still still growing, still resisting
He answers Harry’s mind, and helps in a cottage in a company that included .
Ordinary people. Following him standing on the Outne Putonia and Dudley, and it seems to be worthwhile in 2019.
Hari’s vision with Mamais.
“You must be Harry’s family!” said Mrs. Weasley.
“With the wisdom of the fire,” said Aunt Vernon. “Boughly, my son, we so that
They don’t have all day.” He walked.
Harry has passed on the last word and Ron and Hermion.
“I’ll see you in the summer, then.”
“The labor will have — Er — a good day,” said Hermione, succeeds .
Not surprising after Xiali Vernon, stops everyone could have been unbreakable.
“Ah, I’ll work,” says Harry, and they are supposed to be inspired by the ear.
spadeing about his face. “Didn’t they know we weren’t allowed to use magic in
home. I’m going to have a lot of fun with Dudley this summer….



Harry Potter
and TUFFRA TAXXXAMT
by
JK Rowling
CHAPTER ONE
Birthdays ALL
It is for the first time, a circle in the evening at 10.00.
Number four, Privet Drive. Mr. Vernun Dursley had been dismissed in 1990.
The early hours of the morning with a high-pitched scream, coming from his nephew
Harry's room.
“Third time this week!” He yelled at the table. “If you cannot control .
that eagle, he must go!”
Harry tried, yet again, to explain.
“She’s tired,” he said. “She’s used to waking up outside. If I could
Just take it out at night—”
“Do I look stupid?” said Uncle Vernon, a little fried egg dripping.
It came out of his head. “I know what would happen if they released the base.”
He exchanged a glare with his wife, Petunia.
Harry tried to retort but his words fell with a long, high-pitched whine.
Belch from the Dursleys' grandson Dudley.
“I want more potatoes.”
"There's more in the fire, sweetums," Aunt Petunia said, turning
Wide eyes on his eldest son. “We have to build you up while we have
chance. . . . I don’t like the sound of that school food. . . .”
"Nonsense, Petunia, I wasn't hungry when I was at Smeltings," she said .
Uncle Vernon swears. “Dudley gets enough, doesn’t he, kid?”
Dudley, who was so tall, his bottom fell on either side of the
kitchen chair, he grinned and turned to Harry.
“Pass over the fireworks.”
“You forgot the magic word,” Harry growled.
The effect of this simple sentence on the rest of the family was
Unbelievable: Dudley sighs and falls out of his chair with a sickening thud
All kitchen; Mrs. Dursley shrieked slightly, wrapping her arms around the
his mouth; Mr. Dursley jumped to his feet, veins thrumming in his limbs.
“I wanted to say 'please'!” Harry said quietly. “I didn’t mean —”
“What did I tell you,” his uncle said, popping his forehead .
The board, “About THE SAYING OF THE 'M' WORD IN OUR HOUSE?”
“But I —”
“HOW DARE YOU FUCK DUDLEY!” shouted Uncle Vernon,
He hits the table with his hand.
“I just —”
“I TELL YOU! I DID NOT GET YOUR POINT
ABNORMALITY BELOW THE SKY!”
Harry looked from his red-faced aunt to his blond uncle, who was
He tries to lift Dudley to his feet.
“Alright,” Harry said, “alright . . .”
Uncle Vernon sat up, breathing like a rattlesnake and
She watched Harry closely out of the corner of her small, blue eyes.
Since Harry came home for summer vacation, Uncle
Vernon was looking at it like a bomb that could go off anywhere
Time, because Harry Potter wasn't a normal boy. In fact, he
It wasn’t as good as it could have been.
Harry Potter was a wizard — a new wizard from his first year in
Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry. And if the Dursleys were
He wasn’t happy I was taking him back on holiday, it was nothing to how Harry
felt.
He misses Hogwarts so much he seems to have the same attitude
Abdominal pain. Worse than the castle, with its secret passages and
Hell, his teams (though maybe not Snape, the Potions master), and
Mail arrives in a storm, eats meals in the big living room, sleeps in his apartment
Four-poster bed in the tower’s dorm, goes to the gamemaster, Hagrid, in the
His room faces the forbidden forest on the property, and, in particular,
Quidditch, the most popular sport in the Wizarding world (six feet
goal posts, four flying balls, and fourteen players on the goal post).
All of Harry’s books, his wand, his robes, his wand, and his hat
Nimbus Two hundred coins tied in a loop under
Uncle Vernon's clothes the moment Harry came home. What did he
The Dursleys care if Harry loses his place on the House Quidditch team because
Didn’t he work out all summer? What did it mean to the Dursleys if Harry went
He went to school without doing any of his homework? The Dursleys were
What wizards call Muggles (not a drop of magical blood in their veins),
And as they are, having a witch in the family is
A matter of deep shame. Uncle Vernon even locked Harry's window.
Hedwig, inside her cage, to stop her from sending messages to everyone in
The Wizarding World.
Harry didn't look like the rest of the family. Uncle Vernun was great.
and he was headless, with a great black beard; Aunt Petunia was horse-faced and hairy; Dudley was thin, pale, and pig-tailed. Harry, on the other hand
hand, he was small and thin, with blue eyes and black hair
This one was always unfixed. He wore earrings, and around his neck was a
thin, lightning-shaped.
It was this gesture that made Harry so unusual, even for a
Magician. This volume is the only hint at Harry’s mysterious past, n
The same reason he'd left it on the Dursleys' doorstep eleven years prior.
At the age of one, Harry somehow survived a curse from
The greatest wizard of all time, Lord Voldemort, his very name
Witches and wizards are still afraid to speak. Harry’s parents died in
Voldemort’s attack, but Harry escapes with his lightning bolt, and
Somehow — no one understood why — Voldemort’s powers were
They destroyed the moment he failed to kill Harry.
So Harry was raised by his dead mother’s sister and she
male. He had spent ten years with the Dursleys, he didn't understand .
Why does he always do odd things without meaning to, he believes in
The Dursleys story that he got his magic in the car accident that killed
parents.
And then, exactly one year ago, Hogwarts wrote to Harry, and
The full story was published. Harry took his place at the Wizarding School.
Where he was famous was his taste . . . But now the school year is over,
And back at the Dursleys for the summer, he returned to therapy .
Like a dog that fell into something smelly.
The Dursleys didn't even remember that this day coincided with
Harry's twelfth birthday. Of course, his hopes were not high; will
I’ve never given her a real gift, let alone a cake — but you’ll let
completely . . .
At that point, Uncle Vernon cleared his throat higher and said,
“Now, as we all know, today is a very important day.”
Harry looked on, unable to believe it.
"This could have been the greatest day of my life," he said .
Uncle Vernon.
Harry went back to his meditation. Of course, he thought bitterly, Uncle
Vernon was talking about the romantic dinner party. He was talking about
Nothing else for two weeks. Some rich builder and his wife were coming to
dinner and Uncle Vernon was hoping to get a big bill out of it (Uncle
The Vernon Company made trials).
“I think we should go through the program again,” Uncle said .
Vernon. “We have to be all in place by eight o’clock. Bitunia, you will be
— ?”
“In the dining room,” Aunt Petunia said quietly, “waiting to welcome them .
graciously to our home.”
“Good, good. And Dudley?”
“I’ll wait and open the door.” Dudley made an exception, praising
smile. “Can I have your coats, Mr. and Mrs. Mason?”
“They’ll love it!” Aunt Petunia said excitedly.
“All right, Dudley,” Uncle Vernon said. Then he turned to Harry.
"and you?"
“I’d be in my bedroom, not make a noise and pretend I wasn’t there,”
Harry said softly.
“Exactly,” Uncle Vernon insisted. “I’ll take them to the living room,
move you, Petunia, and pour them a drink. At eighty-five—”
“I’ll announce dinner,” Aunt Petunia said.
“And, Dudley, you’re going to say —”
“May I take you to the living room, Mrs. Mason?” Dudley said,
He offers his body arm to the invisible woman.
“My perfect little man!” said Aunt Petunia.
"and you?" Uncle Vernon said rudely to Harry.
“I’d be in my room, not making noise and pretending I wasn’t there,”
Harry said quietly.
"Exactly. Now, we should be able to get some good exercises in
dinner. Petunia, any ideas?”
“Vernon told me you were a wonderful golfer, Mr. Mason. . . . Tell me
Where do you buy your hat, Ms. Mason. . . .”
"Director . . . Dudley?”
“How about — 'We have to write an essay about our hero in class, sir.
Mason, and I wrote for you.'”
This was too much for both Aunt Petunia and Harry. Aunt Petunia shared.
in tears and hugged her son, while Harry ducked under the table to
Don’t see her laughing.
“Is that you, baby?”
Harry fought to keep a straight face as he pulled away.
"I'd be in my room, not making noise and pretending I wasn't there," he said .
said.
“Very sure, you will,” Uncle Vernon said firmly. “Egyptians don’t
They know something about you and it stays that way. When dinner is
All right, take Mrs. Mason to the break room for coffee, Petunia, and
Bring that topic back to the meals. With any luck, I’ll have a signed contract
and was brought before the court at ten o'clock. We will be shopping for a vacation home.
In Majorca this time tomorrow.”
Harry couldn't feel too happy about that. He never thinks about the Dursleys
They’ll love it in Mallorca just as much as they do in Privet Drive.
“Right — I’m off to town to get dinner jackets for Dudley and .
we. And you,” he snapped at Harry. “You stay out of your uncle’s way while
She cooks.”
Harry left through the back door. It was a beautiful, sunny day. he
He crossed the grass, knelt down on the garden bench, and sang under
breath:
“Hello me . . . Happy birthday to me. . .”
No cards, no gifts, and he’ll spend the afternoon pretending
It doesn't exist. He looks sadly around the store. Never felt like this
lonely. More than anything at Hogwarts, more games
Quidditch, Harry misses his best friends, Ron Weasley and Hermione
Granger. They, however, don’t seem to like it at all. None of them
They played for him all summer, even though Run said he was
He would ask Harry to come sit down.
Countless times, Harry had been in the midst of unraveling Hedwig .
magic cage and sends it to Run and Hermione in a letter, but
It’s not worth the risk. Underage wizards are not allowed to use magic.
Outside of school. Harry had never told the Dursleys this; He knew that only
Their fear of him turning them all into mud is holding them back
From imprisoning him at the bottom of the stairs with his rod and
A craft stick. For the first couple of weeks, Harry enjoyed
He muttered the unintelligible words under his breath and watched Dudley squirm
they left the room as fast as his broad shoulders would take him. But the long silence
From Ron and Hermione making Harry feel like he was being cut off from magic
The world that even the shocked Dudley had lost interest in — and now Ron was .
Hermione forgot her birthday.
What would he not now contribute to the Hogwarts message? from each
Witch or wizard? He almost reveled in the reaction of his archenemy, Draco
Malfoy, just to make sure it wasn't all a dream. . . .
Not that his entire year at Hogwarts had been fun. At the end of the
A moment ago, Harry came face to face with none other than Mr.
Voldemort himself. Voldemort may be a violation of his former self, but he
Still entertaining, still smart, still determined to take back power. Harry
She survived Voldemort’s clutches a second time, but she had
It had been a narrow escape, and even now, weeks later, Harry was still frozen in
Night, drenched in cold sweat, wondering where Voldemort was now,
He remembers her pale face, her big eyes, the scars —
Harry suddenly sat back down on the wooden bench. was
She stared mindlessly through the window — and the window was looking back.
Two big green eyes were out among the leaves.
Harry jumped to his feet just as a warning voice rang out over the grass.
“I know what day it is,” Dudley sang, looking up at him.
The big eyes flickered and disappeared.
"what?" Harry said, never taking his eyes off the spot where they
was.
“I know what day it is,” Dudley replied, coming right up to her.
“Hi,” Harry said. “So you finally learn the days of .
week."
“It’s your birthday today,” Dudley chuckled. “How come you don’t have
Any cards? Don’t you even have friends in that fucking place?”
“Then you won’t let your mother hear you talk about my school,” Harry said .
With the cold.
Dudley pulled up his pants, which slipped from his body
bottom.
“Why are you looking in the closet?” he said suspiciously.
"I'm trying to decide what would be the best inspiration to put in the fire," he said .
Harry.
Dudley stumbled back suddenly, a look of panic on his muscular face.
“You can’t — my father told you not to do your mmagic — he said he would .
You’ve been kicked out of the house — and you’ve got nowhere else to go —
You don’t have any friends to take you —”
“Jigger grab!” Harry said in a low voice. “Hokus focus —
Squiggly smiled —”
“MUUUUM!” Dudley yelled, stamping his feet as he ran
She went back home. “MUUM! It works you know what!”
Harry paid dearly for his moment of privilege. Just like Dudley wasn’t even
Hedge was hurt in some way, Aunt Petunia knew he didn’t really do it
magic, but he still had to jump because she managed to impale a heavy blade on his head with
A bowl of soapy water. Then she gave him a job to do, on her promise .
He doesn't stop eating until he's finished.
While Dudley was looking around and eating ice cream, Harry
Clean the windows, wash the car, mow the grass, cut the flower.
cut, pruned and watered the grass, and repainted the grass bench. the
The sun shone over his head, burning his scalp. Harry knew he
He shouldn’t have gone up to Dudley’s butt, but Dudley said the same thing
Harry was thinking to himself . . . He may not have friends in
Hogwarts. . . .
I wish they had seen the now famous Harry Potter, he thought vainly as he was
He weeded the flower beds, his leg hurt, sweat was running
His face.
It was seven-thirty in the morning, and finally, exhausted, he hea
Aunt Petunia calls to him.
“Get in here! And go for the newspaper!”
Harry looked gratefully around the gleaming kitchen. on top of the
The fridge stands over tonight’s pudding: a large mound of whipped cream and
Oranges with sugar. A roast pork chop was cooking in the oven.
“Eat quickly! The Egyptians will be here soon!” Aunt Petunia said,
She points to the two slices of bread and a slice of cheese on the kitchen table.
She was already wearing a salmon-pink cocktail dress.
Harry washed his hands and picked up his delicious dinner. The moment
He finished, and Aunt Petunia handed him her wallet. “Upstairs! hurry!"
Passing through the dining hall door, Harry caught a glimpse of
Uncle Vernon and Dudley with backpacks and dinner plates. He had only
He reached the top stairs when the doorbell rang and Uncle Vernon's
A happy face appeared down the stairs.
“Remember, baby — one shot —”
Harry tiptoed to his bedroom and went inside and closed the door,
And he turned to fall on his bed.
The problem is, someone is already sitting on it.
h
CHAPTER TWO
DOBBY'S GUEST
Arry managed not to scream, but it was close enough. Small
The creature on the bed had large mouse-like ears and protruding blue eyes.
the size of a tennis ball. Harry knew immediately that this was something
They watched him from the tree line that morning.
As they looked at each other, Harry heard Dudley's voice from down the hall.
“Can I have your coats, Mr. and Mrs. Mason?”
The creature leapt off the bed and fell backwards to the end of the
A long, thin nose touched the table. Harry noticed she was wearing what
It looked like an old shrine, with armrests and armrests.
“Er — hello,” Harry said nervously.
“Harry Potter!” The person said aloud, Harry was sure.
He’ll get it quickly. “Dobby’s been wanting to meet you for a while,
Sir . . . Such an honor. . . .”
“Thank you,” Harry said, leaning against the wall and sinking into his
The desk chair, next to Hedwig, who was sleeping in her huge cage. He wants to
Ask, “What are you?” But I thought it would be too silly, so instead he
“Who are you?” he asked.
“Bear, sir. Just a bear. Dobby the house elf,” the person said.
"oh really?" Harry said. “Er — I don’t mean to be rude or anything, .
But — it’s not a great time for me to have a homemade monster in my bedroom.”
Aunt Petunia's crooked, shrill laugh echoed through the living room. The elf
He bowed his head.
“It’s not that I wouldn’t like to meet you,” Harry said quietly, “but, er, it’s .
Is there any special reason you’re here?”
“Oh, yes, sir,” sighed Dobby. “Dobby came to tell you,
Sir . . . Difficult, sir . . . Dobby wonders where to start. . . .”
“Sit down,” Harry said politely, pointing to the bed.
To his horror, the elf burst into tears—very noisy tears.
"stay!" he shouted. "Orgeron . . . never never. . .”
Harry thought he heard the voices downstairs fading away.
“I’m sorry,” he whispered, “I didn’t mean to freak you out or anything—”
“Fuck Dobby!” He loved the elf. “They didn’t ask Dobby to stay .
down by a witch—like a dimension—”
Harry, trying to say “Shh!” And watch in amazement at the same time,
He carried Dobby back to bed where he sat snoring, looking like a
Big and very ugly. Eventually he managed to control himself, and stayed
With his wide eyes looking at Harry in a watery manner.
“You can’t meet too many decent wizards,” Harry said, trying to cheer up .
up.
Dobby shook his head. Then, without warning, he turned and began
He bangs his head furiously against the window, shouting, “Bad Dobby! bad
Bear!”
“Don’t — what are you doing?” Harry grinned, got out and pulled
Dobby went back to bed — Hedwig woke up especially loudly .
Screech and she was flapping her wings desperately over the railing of her cage.
“Dobby must beat himself up, sir,” said the rabbit, who had gone a little
Steady eyes. “Dobby barely speaks ill of his family, sir. . . .”
“Your family?”
“The wizarding family Dobby works, sir. . . . Dobby is a pet —
They were bound to share the same house with the same family forever. . . .”
“Do they know you’re here?” Harry asked curiously.
Dobby growled.
“Oh, no, sir, no . . . Dobby would have to punish himself very severely.
Because I came to see you, sir. Dobby should have stuck his ears in the oven.
gateway to that. If they ever knew, Sir —”
“But they won’t notice if you stick your ears in the oven door?”
“Dobby doubts it, sir. Dobby always had to punish himself for
Something, sir. They let Dobby get on with it, sir. occasionally
It reminds me to do extra discipline. . . .”
“But why don't you leave? escape?"
“A housefly needs to be released, sir. And the family will never change Dobby
free . . . Dobby will work for the family until he dies, sir. . . .”
Harry blushed.
“And I thought I’d be okay staying here for another four weeks,” he said .
said. “This makes the Dursleys sound almost human. No one can help
you? I can't?"
Almost instantly, Harry wished he hadn't spoken. Dobby froze again.
at the thanksgiving ceremonies.
“Please,” Harry pleaded, “please shut up. While the Dursleys
Listen to somebody, if they know you’re here —”
“Harry Poter asked if he could help Dobby . . . Dobby has heard of you.
Great, sir, but oh your goodness, Dobby doesn't know it. . . .”
Harry, who was feeling the heat obvious in the face, said, 'Whatever .
Hearing about my growing up was a load of dirt. I’m not even at the top of
My year at Hogwarts; It’s Hermione, she —”
But he stopped short, because the thought of Hermione was painful.
“Harry Potter is clever and clever,” Dobby said politely, his eyes like a blade lighting up. “Harry Potter doesn’t talk about his victory over someone who shouldn’t be named —”
"Voldeath?" Harry said.
Dobby folded his hands over his chubby ears and cried, “Oh, don’t talk .
That name, sir! Don’t speak that name!”
“I’m sorry,” Harry whispered. “I know a lot of people don’t like it. my
Friend Run —”
He stopped again. Thinking of Ron was painful too.
Dobby turned to Harry, his eyes wide as slits.
“Dobby heard word,” he said quietly, “that Harry Potter had met the Darkness .
Lord for the second time, just a week ago . . . That Harry Potter never ran away
again."
Harry nodded and Dobby's eyes suddenly glistened with tears.
“Oh, sir,” he groaned, obscuring his face with one corner of his mask .
The pillow he was wearing. “Harry Potter is strong and powerful! contains
Too much risk already! But Dubby came to defend Harry
Potter, to warn him, even if it meant sticking his ears in the furnace door
later. . . . Harry Potter should never have gone back to Hogwarts.”
There was a silence broken only by the sound of bells and whistles from
The low and muffled sound of distant Uncle Vernon’s voice.
"what is?" hit Harry. “But I have to go back — term starts on
First of September. It’s the only thing that keeps me going. You don’t know what it is
Like here. I’m not here. I’m in your world—at Hogwarts.”
“No, no, no,” cried Dobby, shaking his head violently up to his ears .
He was dismissed. “Harry Potter should stay somewhere safe. He’s pretty big, too
good, to lose. If Harry Potter returns to Hogwarts, he will be in death
hazard."
"why?" Harry said nervously.
“There is a suggestion, Harry Potter. A passion to do so many amazing things.
happened at Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry this year,”
exclaimed Dobby, suddenly all nervous. “Dobby knew it for
months, sir. Harry Potter should never have put himself in danger. Also he
It’s important, sir!”
“What horrors?” Harry said suddenly. “Who made them?”
Dobby made a funny breathing noise and then shook his head in frustration.
against the wall.
"you're welcome!" Harry shouted, grabbing a bare arm to stop him. "You can't
tell. understand. But why do you blame me?” moment, unpleasant
A thought struck him. “Hold on — this has nothing to do with Vol-
'I'm sorry - s you know-who, has?' You can only tighten or tighten,” he said
He quickly added as Dobby's head turned dangerously close to the wall again.
Quietly, Dobby shook his head.
“It’s not — it’s not He-Not-To-Be-Named, Sir —”
But Dobby’s eyes were bright and he looked like he was trying to give Harry a
hint. Harry, however, was completely lost.
“He doesn’t have a brother, does he?”
Dobby shook his head, his eyes widening more than usual.
“So then, I can’t imagine who else would have the opportunity to create
Strange things happen at Hogwarts,” Harry said. “I mean, there was
Dumbledore, for one thing — you do know who Dumbledore is, right?
Dobby shook his head.
“Albus Dumbledore is the greatest Headmaster Hogwarts has ever had.
Dobby knew it, sir. Dobby heard Dumbledore's powers clash with the
He-Who-Must-Not-Be-Named at the height of his powers. But, sir” —
Dobby’s voice dropped to a slight whisper—“there are possibilities .
Dumbledore didn't recognize him. . . Abilities No Good Wizard . . .”
And before Harry could stop him, Dobby jumped out of bed and grabbed
Harry's flashlight, and started hitting himself in the head with
yelps audibly.
A sudden silence fell in the distance. Two seconds later Harry, ul
Faintly, he heard Uncle Vernon come into the hall and call, “Dudley .
Gotta leave his TV on again, little tyke!”
"Quickly! In jail!” said Harry, stuffing Dobby and leaning back
door, and throws himself on the bed just as the doorknob turns.
“What — devil — are — you — doing?” Uncle Vernon said
Through gritted teeth, his face was eerily close to Harry's. “You just have
They spoiled the smooth rhythm of my Japanese golf melody. . . . Another sound is
You’ll swear you were never born, baby!”
He tiptoed quickly out of the room.
Shaking his head, Harry let Dobby out of the hallway.
“See what it’s like here?” he said. “See why I have to go back to .
Hogwarts? It’s the only place I have — well, I think I have friends.”
“Friends who don’t even write for Harry Potter?” Dobby said slyly.
"I expect they were just — wait a minute," Harry said, frowning.
“How do you know my friends don’t write to me?”
Dobby rubbed his shoulders.
“Harry Potter shouldn’t be mad at Dubi. Dobby did it for the best.
—”
“You been withholding letters from me?”
“Dobby’s got them here, sir,” the boss said. He stormed out of Harry’s apartment
He reached in and pulled a roll of dishes from inside the structure
He was wearing. Harry could see Hermione's handwriting, Ron's
A neutral voice, even a voice that sounds like it belongs to
Hogwarts Games Keeper, Hagrid.
Dobby snarled at Harry.
“Harry Potter shouldn’t have offended. . . . Dobby hoped. . . If Harry Potter
He thought his friends had forgotten him . . . Maybe Harry Potter wouldn’t want
Go back to school, sir. . . .”
Harry wasn't listening. He gets the mail, but Dobby
jumped out of hand.
“Harry Potter will have them, sir, if he gives his word to Dobby that he .
He would never return to Hogwarts. Oh, sir, this is a danger you must not face!
Say you’re never coming back, sir!”
“No,” Harry said angrily. “Give me the letters of my friends!”
"Then Harry Potter leaves Dobby no choice," the god said sadly.
Before Harry could move, Dobby ran to the bedroom door.
He pulled it open and dashed down the stairs.
Mouth dry, stomach churning, Harry jumped after her, trying not to
make a sound. He jumped the last six steps and landed like a cat down the hall.
carpet, looking around for Dobby. From the dining room he heard his uncle
Vernon said, “. . . Tell Petunia the funniest story about those.
American Plumbers, Mr. Mason. She was dying to hear. . .”
Harry ran down the hall to the bathroom, feeling his body give out.
Aunt Petunia’s art of a pudding, mountain of cream and
sugared violets, was floating up near the ceiling. over a block in the
quack Dobby.
“No,” Harry said. "You're right . . . they'll kill me. . . .”
“It must mean Harry Potter isn’t going back to school —”
“Dobie . . . please . . .”
“Say, sir—”
"I can't -"
Dobby gave him an amused look.
"Then Dobby must do it, sir, for the good of Harry Potter himself."
The bottle fell to the floor with a heart-stopping crash. Cream
The windows and walls cleared as the blanket cleared. With a partnership like
prison, Dobby disappeared.
There were footsteps from the dining room and Uncle Vernon came out in
well to find Harry, terrified, covered from head to foot in the
Aunt Petunia's care.
At first, it looked like Uncle Vernon was going to glue
It's all over. (“It’s just our nephew — he’s very restrained — meeting
Strangers are bothering him, so we keep him upstairs. . . .”) fired the
Surprised Masons went back to the dining room and promised Harry he would put
had him to within an inch of his life when the Freemasons left, and gave him
Photograph. Aunt Petunia got some ice cream from the freezer and Harry, still
Shaking, he began to load up the food.
Uncle Vernon might still have been able to make his vows—if only he hadn’t .
He was for the base.
Aunt Petunia was just having a cup of after-dinner mint when a
A giant spider flew through the dining room window, dropping a letter
over Mrs. Mason's head, and stormed off. Miss Mason screamed as
A banshee and ran from the house screaming at the bullies. Mr. Mason
They stayed just long enough to tell the Dursleys that his wife was mortal
They are afraid of birds of all shapes and sizes, and will wonder if this belongs to them
A funny idea.
Harry stood in the kitchen, holding his head for support, like Uncle
Vernon lunged at him, a devilish gleam in his little eyes.
“Read it!” He smiled graciously, looking at the letter the beast had delivered.
“Go on — read it!”
Harry took it. It does not include birthday greetings.
Hi Mr. Peter,
We’re confident that the Hover Charm is being used in your home
Restaurant Place this evening at twelve minutes past nine.
As you know, underage wizards are not allowed to cast spells
Outside of school, and other practical work on your part can bring
Leaving the school (2019 Suspension Decree).
The Magic of Underage Children, 1875, Plate C).
We also ask that you remember that any magical activity i
Announcement of accidents by members of the non-magical community (Muggles) and
Supreme Court under Article 13 of the ICC
of the Warlocks of the secret order.
Enjoy your vacation!
Yours sincerely,
Mafalda Hopkirk
IMPROPER USE OF THE MAGIC OFFICE
Ministry of Magic
Harry looked up from the letter and glared.
“You didn’t tell us you weren’t allowed to use magic outside of school,”
Uncle Vernon said, a smile dancing in his eyes. “Forgot to say .
it. . . . Slipped your mind, I guess. . . .”
He was charging at Harry like a giant tiger, all his teeth bared.
“Well, I have news for you, kid. . . . I’m holding you back. . . . You’re not
I would go back to that school. . . never . . . And if you try to force yourself
They’re out—they’re going to let you out!”
And laughing like a maniac, he dragged Harry upstairs.
Uncle Vernon was as bad as his word. The next morning, he paid
A man would slide bracelets onto Harry's back. He himself placed a cat box in the
bedroom door, so that some food can be placed inside the three
times a day. They took Harry out to use the bathroom in the morning and evening.
Otherwise, he was confined to his room by default.
Three days later, the Dursleys showed no signs of calming down, and
Harry could see no way out of his situation. He slept on her bed.
I watched the sun set behind the window and meditated.
Miserably what’s going to happen to it.
What was the point of disguising himself from his room if Hogwarts
Will he suck it up for doing it? But life on Privet Drive peaked earlier. Now that they knew the Dursleys would never be as .
fruit basket, he had lost his only gun. Maybe Dobby saved Harry
From the tragic events at Hogwarts, but as things stand, it will
He'd probably starve to death anyway.
The cat's voice shuddered and Aunt Petunia's hand appeared, claiming the blanket
of kerosene in the chamber. Harry, whose insides he was squirming with
Hungry, he jumped out of his bed and grabbed it. The bread was stone cold, but he
She drank half of it in one gulp. He then crossed the room to Hedwig's cage
And she threw those beautiful worms into the bottom of the bucket in her vanity.
The dining table. She ruffled her feathers and gave him a look of deep disgust.
“It’s no use turning your back on it — that’s all we’ve got,” he said .
Harry sighed.
He put the bowl empty on the floor near the cat’s window and fell asleep.
He went back to bed, suddenly even hungrier than he was before
soup.
Assuming he’s still alive in another 4 weeks, what w
Had he failed at Hogwarts? Someone will be sent to see why the
You're not coming back? Would the Dursleys be able to let him go?
The room was trembling. Tiredness, stomach cramps, mind
Staring at a series of unanswered questions, Harry fell into an uncomfortable state
sleep.
He dreamed he was at a monster show, with a card that said UNDERAGE
The WIZARD is locked in his cage. People stared at him in the streets as he was
He sat, starved and pale, on the straw bed. He saw Dubby's face in
crowd and shouted, asking for help, but Dobby spoke up, “Harry Potter is .
Safe there, sir!” And he fell. Then the Dursley's and Dudley's appeared .
Slamming the cage, she laughed at him.
“Stop it,” Harry groaned as pain throbbed in his aching cock.
“Let me . . . Cut it out. . . I'm trying to relax. . . .”
He opened his eyes. The moonlight shone through the streets of
window. And there was someone staring at him: a round-faced, redhead with a long nose.
Ron Weasley was outside Harry's window.
R
Chapter Three
THE STORM
On!"' said Harry, leaning over to the window and pushing it upwards as
They can exchange stores. “Ron, how did you — What the —
?”
Harry's mouth dropped open as the full shock of what he was witnessing hit
he. There was Run leaning out of the back window of an old turquoise car.
who was suspended in the air. Staring at Harry from the front seats were
Fred and George, Ron's older brothers.
“Alright, Harry?” George asked.
“What happened?” Run said. “Why aren’t you the answer
My letters? I asked you to stay about a dozen times and then my dad came
house and says you have an official warning about using magic before the
The Muggles —”
“It wasn’t me—and how did he know?”
“He works for the ministry,” Ron said. “You know you shouldn’t
Do tricks outside of school —”
“You need to talk,” Harry said, staring at the fading car.
“Oh, that doesn’t count,” Ron said. “We’re just looking forward to that. is
of my father, we do not honor him. But doing magic in front of those Muggles you
They lived and —”
“I tell you, I won’t—but it’s going to take a long time to explain now—look,
You can tell them at Hogwarts that the Dursleys banned me and
It won’t let me go back, and obviously I can’t magic myself, because
The department will say it’s the second procedure I’ve done in three days, so —”
“Stop joking,” Ron said. “We came to take you home with us.”
“But you can’t make me wake up either —”
“We don’t need to,” Ron said, nodding to the front seat and .
He's looking. “You forget who I have with me.”
“Tie this around the strings,” Fred said, sticking the end of a string to the .
Harry.
"If the Dursley's wake up, I'm dead," Harry said as he hung up the cord .
over the top of a bar and Fred drove the car.
“Don’t worry,” Fred said, “and stand back.”
Harry returned to the shadow next to Hedwig, who seemed to
They realized how important that was and remained calm and quiet. car
It got louder and louder and suddenly, with a loud noise, the streets
They were pulled clean off the grid as Fred launched straight up into the air.
Harry ran back to the window to see rocks hanging a few feet above the
soil. With a shrug, Ron carried them to the car. He listened to Harry
Silently, but no sound from the Dursleys bedroom.
Once the passengers were safely in the back seat with Ron, Fred put up as
as close as possible to Harry's back.
“Come in,” Ron said.
“But all my Hogwarts stuff—my wand—my wand—”
“Where is he?”
“He’s locked in the closet under the stairs, and I can’t get out of that .
room -"
“No problem,” George said from the front passenger seat. " via
Way, Harry.”
Fred and George climbed into Harry's arms with a smile.
You should give it to them, Harry thought, as George took an ordinary .
hairpin from his pocket and began to slice open the prison.
“A lot of wizards think it’s kind of funny, because they know this kind of Muggle .
Trick,” Fred said, “but we feel that these are skills worth learning, even though .
They’re a little too soft.”
There was a small click and the door opened.
“Okay — let’s get your trunk — you take whatever you need from your trunk .
room and give it to Ron,” George grinned.
“Watch out for the bottom layer — it’s burning,” Harry replied as quickly as .
The twins ended up out on the dark landscape.
Harry stormed through his room, gathered his things and passed them.
from the window to Ron. Then he went to help Fred and George lift his
Trunk up stairs. Harry heard Uncle Vernon cough.
Eventually, breathing heavily, they reached the window, then turned the bat s
Harry's room to the open window. Fred went back to the car to pull.
and Ron, and Harry and George pushed out from the direction of the bedroom. inch s
Inch, the train hurtled through the window.
Uncle Vernon went silent again.
“A little more,” Fred said, pulling from inside the car. "one
Good looking —”
Harry and George stomped their shoulders on the lobster and she was gone.
of the body in the back seat of the vehicle.
“Okay, let’s go,” George chuckled.
But when Harry climbed up to the window ledge, there suddenly came a loud scream.
shouted from behind him, followed immediately by Uncle Thunder
Vernon’s voice.
“THAT FUCKING GIRL!”
“I forgot about Hedwig!”
Harry stepped back across the room as the ship light dimmed— he .
He grabbed Hedwig’s cage, rushed to the window, and passed it i
run. He was heading towards the faces of the cars when his uncle came
Vernon pushed the unlocked door—and it fell open.
For a fraction of a second Uncle Vernon stood framed in the doorway; Then he
I let out a growl like an angry bird and it lunged at Harry, grabbing him by the arm.
ankle.
Ron, Fred, and George grabbed Harry's arms and pulled him along
can.
“Bitunia!” said Uncle Vernon. “It gets better! HELD
away!"
But the Weasleys gave a deep breath and Harry's foot came out of Uncle's.
Vernon’s voice— Harry was in the car—he slammed the door—
“Put your foot down, Fred!” Run shouted, and the carriage disappeared in an instant.
Next to the moon.
Harry couldn't believe it—he was free. He smashed the window,
The night air tickled his hair, and he looked back at the peaks of
Privet Drive. Uncle Vernon, Aunt Petunia, and Dudley were all hanging around,
Sighing, from Harry's window.
“See you next summer!” Harry shouted.
The Weasleys roared with laughter and Harry sat up,
They were grinning from ear to ear.
"Let hedwig out," he said to Ron. “She can leave behind us. She doesn’t have
righteousness will spread its wings for the ages.”
George gives the ring to Ron, and a moment later, Hedwig storms off
freaking out the window to fly to their side like a ghost.
“So — what’s the story, Harry?” Ron said calmly. “What was
occurred?"
Harry told them all about Dobby, the warning he gave Harry and
the fiasco of bubble wrap. There was a long, awkward silence when he
It's over.
“Too many fish,” Fred said at last.
“Sure, it’s crazy,” George admitted. "So he won't even tell you who the
Is he supposed to be planning all this stuff?”
“I don’t think he can,” Harry said. “I tell you, every time he came near .
To let something go, he started banging his head against the wall.”
He saw Fred and George looking at each other.
“What, you think he was lying to me?” Harry said.
“Well,” said Fred, “put it this way — pets are powerful .
Magic of their own, but they couldn't use it without their master's
permission. I think old Dobby was sent to stop you from coming back to
Hogwarts. The idea of ​​something funny. Can you think of anyone in school
Embarrassed for you?”
“Yeah,” Harry and Ron said together, in unison.
"Draco Malfoy," Harry explained. “He hates me.”
“Draku Malfoy?” George said, turning away. “That’s not Lucius Malfoy’s .
Son?”
“It has to be, it’s not a very common name, is it?” Harry said. "why?"
“I heard my dad talk about it,” George said. “He was great .
The boss knows-who.”
“And when he lost you-know-who,” Fred said, looking around quickly to .
Look at Harry, “Lucius Malfoy went back and said he didn’t mean any of .
it. The heat burden — Dad thinks he’s been smart inside YouKnowWho
circle."
Harry had heard these rumors about the Malfoys before, and they were
Not surprising at all. Malfoy made Dudley Dursley look like a type,
A thoughtful, nice kid.
“I don’t know if the Malfoys have a pet. . . .” Harry said.
“Well, the buyer would be an old Wizarding family, and would .
Be rich,” Fred said.
“Yes, my mother always wished we had a housekeeper who would make an audience,”
George said. “But all we have is a dirty old rat in the attic and
gnomes all over the garden. Home challenges come with big old homes and
Castles are such places; You wouldn’t keep one in our house. . . .”
Harry sighed. Given the fact that Draco Malfoy usually has
Worse than anything, her family was covered in sexual gold; He can only see
Malfoy points to a large tavern house. Family Worker Reporting
To stop Harry from returning to Hogwarts also seemed to
The kind of thing a Malfoy would do. If Harry had been stupid he would have taken Dobby
really?
"I'm glad we came to get you, anyway," Ron said. “I was really worried .
I was worried when you didn’t reply to any of my letters. I think it belongs to Errol.
Wrong at first —”
“Who’s Errol?”
“Our hero. He is old. It wasn’t the first time he’d fallen for someone
delivery. So then I tried to get Hermes back —”
"who?"
“Mom and Dad the dragon bought Percy when they made him prefect,” he said .
Fred from the front.
"But Percy won't owe me," Ron said. “He said he missed it.”
"Percy has been acting very creepily this summer," George said, frowning.
“And he was sending a lot of letters and spending a lot of time locked up .
In his room. . . . I mean, there’s only so many times you can erase a
The president’s secret. . . . You drive west a lot, Fred,” he added, pointing to
bubbles in the dashboard. Fred snapped back.
“So, does your father know you have the car?” Harry said, looking
answer.
“Er, no,” said Ron, “he has to work tonight. Hopefully we can
Take it back to the garage without my mom knowing we drove it.”
“What’s your father doing at the Ministry of Magic, anyway?”
“He worked on the most painful part,” Ron says. “The use of
The Bureau of Muggle Affairs.”
“What is that?”
'It's all about Muggle-made magic tricks, you know, .
If they end up back in the tavern or Muggle home. Like, last year, some
The old lady died and her tea set was sold to an antique shop. This animal
The wife bought it, took it home and promised to serve her friends tea in it. it
It was awkward — my dad was working overtime for weeks.”
"what happened?"
“The bowl went mad and spilled hot tea all over the place and .
One man ended up in the hospital with a sugar catheter attached to his nose.
Dad was going wild — just him and an old guard called Perkins
in the office — and they had to do Memory Charms and all sorts of things .
To cover up —”
“But your father—this car—”
Fred laughed. “Yes, my father is interested in all things Muggle-related;
Our shop is full of Muggle stuff. He catches her, puts spells on her, and puts
It was all back again. If he invades our home, he must turn himself in.
Under arrest. It pisses my mom off.”
“It’s a big street,” George said, looking down from the street of
Windmills. “We’ll be there in ten minutes. . . . On the contrary, it is increasing
LIGHT. . . .”
A gray fog was forming along the coast to the west.
Fred drove the car down, and Harry saw a patch of Hard Fields
and tree branches.
"We're a little outside the village," George said. “ Other St.
A platform.”
Down and down went the flying car. The island of glowing red sun was
Now it radiates from the trees.
“Stop!” Fred said as, with a loud thud, they hit the ground.
They landed next to a collapsed garage in a small yard, and Harry .
She looked at Ron's house for the first time.
It looks like it used to be a giant stone elephant house, but besides
They added rooms here and there until it got several stories high and
As a result, he seems to be possessed by magic (which, Harry
he reminded himself, maybe it was). Four or five cells are
On the red cap. A one-sided window sits on the floor in front of the
Gift reads, THE SPIRIT. At the front door, there was a rubber box.
the bottle is a very rusted pot. Several curly brown birds were disturbing.
Their way into the yard.
“Not much,” Ron said.
“It’s beautiful,” Harry said excitedly, thinking of Privet Drive.
They got out of the car.
“Now, let’s go upstairs quickly,” said Fred, “and wait for Mom to .
Call us for coffee. Then, Ron, you come downstairs and go,
'Mom, look who's out in the night!' And she will be happy to see
Harry is someone who doesn’t need to know that we took the car out.”
“Right,” Ron said. “Come on, Harry, I’m sleeping in — on the couch —”
Ron paced the ugly green color, his eyes scanning the house. the
Three others are sleeping.
Mrs. Weasley was walking around the yard, sorting vegetables, and i
A short, blonde, good-looking woman, it was surprising how much she was
It looks like a tiger with saber teeth.
“Oh,” Fred said.
“Honey,” George said.
Mrs. Weasley stopped in front of them, hands on her hips,
They looked from one woman’s face to another. She was wearing a bra with flowers.
with a knife sticking out of a pocket.
“Okay,” she said.
“Lightning, mother,” said George, in what he thought was evidently wishful thinking,
A winning voice.
“Do you have any idea how I’m feeling?” Ms. Wesley said in a
Wrapping up death.
“I’m sorry, Mom, but look, we need to —”
Mrs. Weasley's three children were taller than her, but they were
cowered as his feelings for them faded.
“The beds are empty! No note! A car left — potentially crashing — out of my yard
a worried mind — do you? — Never, as long as I live — you
Wait until your dad gets home, we've never had problems like this from Bill
Or Charlie or Bircy —”
“Perfect Percy,” Fred grinned.
“YOU CAN DO IT BY REMOVING A PIECE OF PERCY .
Have fun!"" Mrs. Weasley said, jabbing a finger into Fred's chest. "You
You can die, you can see, you can lose your father
His job —”
It seemed to last for hours. Mrs. Weasley shouted to herself in a whisper.
before turning to Harry, who stepped back.
"I'm so glad to see you, Harry, dear," she said. “Come in, have .
Some morning.”
She turned around and went back home with Harry, after the prom .
A glance at Ron, who signaled encouragement, followed her.
The girl was small and a little tight. There was one deleted
A wooden table and chairs in the corner, and Harry sat on the edge of the
his brow, looking around. He had never been in a foster home before.
The clock on the wall opposite has only one hand and no numbers.
all. Written around the middle are things like Time to grow, Time to .
Feed the birds, and you’re tired. Books stacked three on the floor on
mantelpiece, books with titles like Charm Your Bread, Charm
Of baking, and one-minute presentations — it’s magic! And except for Harry's ears
They were cheating, the old radio at the front of the hotel had just said that
turned out to be “Witching Hour, featuring the national singer, .
Celestine Warbeck.”
Mrs. Weasley was busy, cooking a little dinner
Quickly, she shoots evil looks at her children as she tosses pillows in the
The trophy. Each time she muttered things like “I don’t know .
What you think,” and “Don’t believe it.”
“I wouldn’t blame you, dear,” she assured Harry, pressing eight or nine .
food on his plate. “Arthur and I are worried about you, too.
Just yesterday we were going to come and get you ourselves ma
He hadn't written to Ron until Friday. But really” (she had now added
three fried eggs to his plate), “drives an illegal car halfway across .
The country — everyone can see you —”
She gently wiped her wand on the cushions in the salon, which began to
They cleaned themselves up, cowering gently in the corner.
“There’s a cloud, Mom!” Fred said.
“You keep your mouth shut when you eat!” Mrs. Weasley
he sighed.
“They were starving, Mom!” George said.
"and you!" Mrs. Wesley said, but she was in a rather relieved manner
voice that she started slicing Harry's bread and booting him.
At that moment there was an explosion in the form of a young, red-headed .
A face in a long nightgown, who appeared in the kitchen and offered a small
squeal, and ran again.
“Ginny,” Ron said quietly to Harry. “My sister. She was
They talk about you all summer.”
“Yeah, she’ll want your autograph, Harry,” Fred teased,
But he caught his mother’s eye and pressed his face against her plate without
Another word. He said nothing more until all four dishes were clean,
which took a very long time.
“Blimey, I’m tired,” Fred growled, throwing his knife and fork at .
last. “I think I’m going to bed and —”
“You won’t,” Mrs. Weasley said quietly. “It was your fault
All night. Hell would degnome me; They hold
Completely out of hand again —”
“Mom —”
“It’s you two,” she said, turning to Ron and George. “You can go to 100,000.
Bed, sweetheart,” she added to Harry. “You didn’t ask them to fly that flight
car -"
But Harry, feeling relieved, said quickly, “I’ll help Ron. I wasn’t
They saw a rest—”
"That's very sweet of you, dear, but it's sloppy work," Mrs. Weasley said.
“Now, let’s see what Lockhart has to say on the subject—”
And she took a blue book out of the pillow on the counter. George
I struggled.
“Mom, we know how to clean a room —”
Harry looked at Mrs. Weasley's book cover. I wrote about it in
The gorgeous gold letters were the words from Gilderoy Lockhart’s Guide to the Home
animal. There was a big picture on the front of a very nice person.
A wizard with blond hair and beautiful blue eyes. As always in
Wizarding world, the key was moving; Wizard, who Harry
pretending to be Gilderoy Lockhart, he kept looking at them all with a smile.
Mrs. Weasley glared at him.
“Oh, that’s interesting,” she said. “He knew his pets, all of them .
It really is a wonderful book. . . .”
“My mother misses him,” Fred said, in a very audible chuckle.
“Don’t be so sassy, ​​Fred,” Mrs. Weasley said, too much of a whisper .
pink. “All right, if you think you know more than Lockhart, you can go .
And get on with it, and woe to you if there’s a gnome in this
Hell when I wake up I’ll fix it.”
Squawking and cheering, the Weasleys rush outside with Harry
Behind them. The garden was magnificent, and in Harry's eyes, exactly what the
The garden should be. The Dursleys didn’t care — they were .
Lots of grass, and the grass needs mowing — but there are bushes
Trees near the walls, plants Harry had never seen sprouting from every
A cup of flowers, a big green bowl filled with frogs.
“Muggles have muggles too, you know,” Harry said to Ron as they .
He ran the campaign.
“Yeah, I know those things look wild,” Ron said, quietly .
Two with his head in a pillowcase, “like a fat little Santa Claus with .
Fishing structures. . . .”
There was a loud crash, the pumpkin tree shook, and Ron
through. “This is a gnome,” he growled.
“Shout at me! Let me go!” the gnome shouted.
It’s not about Father Christmas. He was small and leathery.
Looking, with a big, thick, bulbous nose proper. Caught by Run
in the back of the arms as she stroked him with her hot little fingers; committed
wrapping around her legs and turning her head.
“This is what you need to do,” he said. He lifted the gnome above him.
head (“Gerroff me!”) and starts swinging it around in big ass-like circles.
Seeing the shocked look on Harry's face, Ron added, 'They don't care .
— you just have to make it really hard for them to find their way
Back to the gnome pits.”
He kicked the gnome's legs: he flew twenty feet in the air and
He landed with a thud on the field above the barn.
“He’s cute,” Fred said. “I bet I can get mine over that hole.”
Harry quickly learned not to worry about gnomes. meant
Just to throw the first one he grabbed onto the window, but the gnome, feeling
Strangely, she sank her razor-sharp teeth into Harry's finger and he had a hard bite
work haunts him — until —
“Wow, Harry—it must have been fifty feet. . . .”
Before long, the air was thick with flying insects.
"See, they're not very bright," said George, holding five or six gnomes in the 100,000.
one. “The moment they know what is happening in degnoming they go down to 100,000.
Take a look. You would think they would have learned by now just to stay put.”
Soon, the hordes of gnomes on the field began walking into a
thin lines, their little toes were pressed together.
“They’ll be back,” Ron said as they watched the animals disappear into the .
the fence on the other side of the field. “They love it here. . . . Even my father
have fun with them; He thinks they’re funny. . . .”
Just then, the front door bursts open.
“He’s back!” George said. “My father’s house!”
They hurried through the garden and back home.
Mr. Weasley had slumped into a kitchen chair and taken off his glasses and his
Eyes closed. He was a thin man, he was getting skinny, but that little hair he had was
He was as red as any of his children. He was wearing a long green robe, which
they were dusty and worn in transit.
“What a night,” he murmured, leaning against the teapot as they all sat down .
in the middle of it. “Nine shots. nine! And old Mundungus Fletcher tried to put a
Hex on me when I tilted my head. . . .”
Mr. Weasley took a long sip of tea and sighed.
“Finding anything, Daddy?” Fred said excitedly.
“All I’ve got is some squeaky doorbells and a screeching car,” he joked .
Mr. Weasley. “There is something wrong with me .
Ministry, though. Mortlake was arrested for asking about some
Inconsequential ferrets, but a collection of experimental melodies,
Thank goodness. . . .”
“Why would anyone bother to move a doorknob and they would disappear?” George said.
“That’s just Muggle magic,” Mr. Weasley sneered. “Sell them a key that holds .
They settle for nothing so they don’t get when they need it. . . . of
Of course, it’s very hard to sue someone because no Muggle would admit
Their purse keeps growing — they’re going to have to just keep screwing it up. bless
In them, they'll go together to destroy magic, even if he's looking at them in
appearance. . . . But the fact that many of us have come to wonder is, you cannot
believe -"
“CAR PEOPLE, FOR EXAMPLE?”
Mrs. Weasley walked out and held a long poker like a knife. Sir.
Weasley's eyes narrowed. He looked at his wife guiltily.
“C-cars, Molly, sweetheart?”
"Yes, Arthur, cars," Mrs. Weasley said, her eyes lighting up. “Imagine a
The magician bought a rotten old car and told his wife everything he wanted to do.
He was going to grab it to see how it worked, while he was actually messing with it
To make him leave.”
Mr. Weasley rolled his eyes.
“Well, dear, I think you will find that it will be quite within the law to
He did so, even if — er — he would probably do better if he, um, told his own .
A real woman. . . . There’s a loophole in the law, you’ll find. . . . as long as
He had no intention of driving the vehicle, as the vehicle was unable to leave.
—”
“Arthur Weasley, you sure there was a baby when you wrote
the rules!” said Mrs. Weasley. “Just to keep up with the hype .
With all that Muggle junk in your closet! And for your information,
Harry drove up this morning and you had no intention of leaving!”
“Harry?” Mr. Weasley said with a grin. "Harry who?"
He turned, saw Harry, and jumped.
“Good lord, is that Harry Potter? Nice to meet you, Run told us
So much for —”
“Your sons drove the car to Harry’s house and back yesterday!” He shouted
Mrs. Wesley. “What do you have to say about that, eh?”
“You really know?” Mr. Weasley said excitedly. “Did it all go well? I - I
Mean,” he gasped as tears leaked from Mrs. Weasley’s eyes, “that—that .
He was very ugly, boys — very ugly indeed. . . .”
“Let’s leave them to it,” Ron told Harry as Mrs. Weasley disappeared .
Like an animal. “Come, I’ll show you my bedroom.”
They left the kitchen and walked down a narrow corridor to a
The incredible amount of coffee, which swept its way, zig-zagged down towards the house.
On the third floor, the door stood ajar. Harry just kept his gaze on the two
Blue eyes stared at him before locking them with a smile.
"Ginny," Ron said. “You don’t know how hard it is to be like that .
shy. You don’t normally shut up —”
They climbed two more flights until they came to a locked door .
perfume and a small note on it, written RONALD'S ROOM.
Harry stepped in, his head nearly reaching the crumbling ceiling, and
far away. It’s like walking through an oven: Almost everything in Ron .
The room looked like a shade of orange: the bedspread, the walls,
Even the ceiling. Then Harry realized that Ron had covered almost every
inch of wall empty with the coffins of the other seven wizards and
The magicians, all dressed in bright orange robes, carrying crowns of magic, and
powerful stories.
“Your Quidditch team?” Harry said.
“Chudley shorts,” Ron said, pointing to the orange bedspread, .
which is printed with two large red Cs and a rectangle
cannonballs. “Nineth in the league.”
Run's textbooks of textbooks are stacked untidy in a nook, next to a shelf
The 10 most notable cartoons are The Tales of Martin Miggs, the
A mad mug. Run's magic wand lay on top of a frog-filled fishbowl.
ended up in the window, alongside her long gray mouse, Scabbers, who was
snoozing in a sunbed.
Harry flipped over a stack of Self-Shuffling playing cards on the floor.
And looked out of the small window. In a much lower field, he can see a
The gang of gnomes staggered back one by one through the Weasleys' mansion.
Then he turned to look at Ron, who was staring at him almost in shock, as .
Though he was waiting for her reaction.
“That’s a little small,” Ron said quietly. “It’s not like that room you had with .
Muggles. And I was down to hell at the top; There’s always
They beat on the walls and groan. . . .”
But Harry, smiling, said: 'This is the best house I've ever been in .
in."
Ron's cheeks went pink.
l
Chapter Four
AT FLURISH D BLOTTS
While life at the Burrow was sufficiently different from life in Privet
drive. The Dursleys liked everything neat and orderly; the
The Weasleys' house came out with the unexpected. Harry heaved a sigh.
The first time he looked in the mirror on the kitchen counter and he
he yelled, “Tuc your shirt, scruffy!” The rat at the top screamed and
He dropped the networks whenever things felt too quiet, and few
Fred and George’s bedroom curtains are stunning
normal. What Harry found wasn’t unusual about Ron’s personality, though,
It’s not a talking mirror or a squirming monster: It’s the fact that
Everyone there seemed to love it.
Mrs. Weasley was concerned about the state of his hat and tried to persuade him to
Eat four servings at each meal. Mr. Weasley liked Harry to sit next to him
at the dinner table to pepper him with questions about
Living with Muggles, asking him to explain how things like magic and
The database service works.
"fascinating!" to say as Harry spoke to him using
Telephone. "Ingenious, really, how many ways Muggles have found .
They’re hard without magic.”
Harry heard from Hogwarts one sunny afternoon about a week after he
He arrived at the Burrow. He and Run went down for breakfast to find Master.
and Mrs. Weasley and Ginny were already sitting around the kitchen table. the
At the sight of Harry, Ginny defeatedly collapsed in her pink skirt to the
floor with a thin layer of paint. Ginny seems to be very prone to falling over things.
on whenever Harry walked into a room. She ducked under the table to answer.
the baby and went out with her face shining like the setting sun.
Pretending not to notice this, Harry sat down and took a toast to Mrs.
Weasley offered.
“Letters from school,” Mr. Weasley said, passing Harry and Ron .
Fig. 1 shows a cross-section of the box, with a green background.
"Dumbledore already knows you're here, Harry—he's not going to stop, . . ."
The man. You two have them, too,” he added, as Fred and George continued .
In, they were still in their pajamas.
For a few minutes there was silence as they all read their letters. Harry’s
He told him to catch the Hogwarts Express as usual from King's Cross Station
On the first day of September. There’s also a list of new books he’ll need
Next year.
SECOND YEAR STUDENTS WILL NEED:
Textbook of Spelling, Grade 2 by Miranda Goshawk
Break with a Banshie by Gildruy Lukhart
Gadding and Flowers by Gilderoy Luckhart
Holidays with the Hags by Gildruy Luckhart
Secrets and Trolls by Gildruy Luckhart
Adventures with Vampires by Gildruy Luckhart
Owls and Wolves by Gilderoy Luckhart
The Year and the Yeti by Gildruy Luckhart
Fred, who had finished his list, looked at Harry's.
“You were told to get all of Lockhart’s books, too!” he said. " common
A Defense Against the Dark Arts master should be a fan — bet a magician.”
At this moment, Fred caught his mother's eye and slowly worked himself up.
With marble.
“That lot won’t come right,” George said, glancing quickly at his wife .
parents. “Lockhart’s books are really expensive. . . .”
“Well, we’ll manage,” Mrs. Weasley said, but she looked worried. "I
Expect we’ll be able to pick up a lot of Ginny’s stuff second hand.”
“Oh, you’re starting at Hogwarts this year?” Harry asked Ginny.
She shook her head, looked down to the flowing roots of her hair, and put on her ring .
In the butter dish. Pretty much no one saw this but Harry, just because
Then Ron's older brother, Percy, entered. He was already dressed, his .
The Hogwarts president's badge was pinned to his leather jacket.
“Lightning, all,” Percy said quietly. “Happy Love.”
He sat down in the only chair left but jumped up again almost
Immediately, he pulled a gray feather tube from under him
'At least that's what Harry thought, until he saw that it was .
Breath.
“Fall!” Ron said, taking the stuffed monkey from Percy and pulling out a
A letter from beneath his wings. “Finally — he got Hermione’s answer. He wrote
to him she said we will try to save you from the Dursleys.”
He led Errol to a stand just inside the back door and tried to stand .
to him on it, but Errol came right back so Ron put him on
Steaming coffee instead, he mutters, “Pathetic.” Then he opened
Hermione's letter and read it aloud:
“'Dear Ron, and Harry if you were there, .
"'I hope everything went well and Harry is okay and you .
He didn’t do anything illegal to get kicked out, Run, because that would bring
Harry was in trouble, too. I was really scared and if Harry was okay,
You’ll tell me soon, but it might be better if you
Use a different node, because I think another transfer might end your
One rest.
“'I'm busy with school, of course' — What would it look like?” said
Ron was in shock. “We are on vacation! - 'And we're off to London next
Wednesday to buy my new books. Why don’t we meet on Diagon Street?
“'Let me know what's going on as soon as you can. Love from
Hermione.'”
“Well, that’s going so well, we can go get all your stuff then, too,”
said Mrs. Wesley, and began to clear the plate. “What are you all thinking
today?"
Harry, Run, Fred, and George were planning to climb the mountain to a small
property owned by the Weasley family. It was surrounded by dense trees
From a downtown perspective, it means they can teach
Quidditch there, as long as they don't fly too high. They can’t handle the truth.
Quidditch balls, which would be hard to ignore if they had
He fled and flew over the village; Instead throw apples to a
Another will catch up. They took their turn in Harry's Nimbus of two thousand,
which was easily the best perfume ever; Run’s former shooting star was ever-present
They are crossed by wandering ferns.
Five minutes later they were marching up the hill, guns on
Their shoulders. They ask Percy if he wants to join them, but he
He said that he had done. Harry had only seen Percy at nap time so far; he
He remained locked in his room the rest of the time.
“I wish I knew what he was talking about,” Fred said, frowning . “He wasn’t
His hands. Her test results came the day before you were supposed to; The OWL twelve
And he almost didn’t care at all.”
“Special magic tricks,” George explained, seeing Harry pale .
look. “Bill has twelve, too. If we are not careful, we will have another Head
Child in the family. I don’t think I can stand that embarrassment.”
Bill was the Weasley's older brother. He and his next brother, Charlie,
He had already graduated from Hogwarts. Harry had never met any of them, but knew
that Charlie was in Romania studying animals, while Bill was in Egypt doing
For the Wizarding Bank, Gringotts.
“Dunno how mom and dad are going to handle all our school stuff this
A year,” George said after a moment. “Five copies of Lockhart books! And Ginny
He needed hats and babies and everything. . . .”
Harry didn't say anything. He felt a little strange. stored in the underground
The Gringotts hall in London was a little secret left by her parents
he. Of course, only in the Wizarding world does he have money; you
He couldn't use Gallions, Cycles, and Knuts in Muggle shops. There was no
He mentioned his Gringotts bank account to the Dursleys; He didn’t think .
Their fear of anything resembling magic reaching a giant hole.
of gold.
Mrs. Weasley woke them all up early the following Wednesday. After a break
Half a dozen cheese sandwiches each, pulled on their clothes and Mrs.
Weasley took a vase of flowers from the kitchen counter and peeked inside.
“We’re drowning, Arthur,” she sobbed. “We need to buy something else
today. . . . Oh well, guests are great! After you, dear Harry!”
And she gave him a bouquet of flowers.
Harry looks at them all watching him.
“What should I do?” He said with a grin.
“He’s never drunk on Floo powder,” Ron said quietly. “I’m sorry, Harry,
forget."
"never?" Mr. Weasley said. “But how did you get to Diagon Alley to .
Did you buy your school supplies last year?”
“I went to the Metro —”
"really?" Mr. Weasley said excitedly. “Are there runaways? how
right -"
"Not now, Arthur," said Mrs. Weasley. “The Floo bubble is much faster,
Sweetheart, but my goodness, if you’ve never used it before—”
“He’ll be fine, Mom,” Fred said. “Harry, see us first.”
He took a handful of glittering powder from the flower pot and walked over to
fire, and threw the powder into the fire.
With a flick, the fire turned emerald green and rose above Fred,
Whoever walked straight in shouted, “Diagon Alley!” And he fell.
“You need to speak sooner, dear,” Mrs. Weasley said to Harry as George .
He dipped his hand into the bouquet of flowers. “And be sure to exit on the right .
The platform. . . .”
“Right what?” Harry said in shock as the fire shuddered and threatened
George doesn’t mind, either.
“Well, there’s a lot of wizards bullets to choose from, you know,
But as long as you speak openly—”
“He’ll be fine, Molly, don’t worry,” Mr. Weasley said, striving to .
Floo powder, too.
“But, dear, if he is lost, how can we explain to his uncle and .
not?"
“They won’t be,” Harry snapped at her. “Dudley would say that it was .
a better joke if I lose my cool, don’t worry about that—”
"Then . . . no worries . . . you go after Arthur," Mrs. Weasley said. "Now,
When you get into a fire, tell me where you’re going —”
“And keep r your back tucked in,” Ron advised.
“And close your eyes,” Mrs. Weasley said. "rock -"
“Don’t panic,” Ron said. “Or you might fall out of the blue .
fire —”
“But don’t panic and leave early; Wait till you see Fred and
George.”
Trying hard to keep all of this in mind, Harry took a handful of Floo powder .
And he walked right up to the edge of the fire. He took a deep breath and spread
powder in the oven, and proceed forward; The fire felt like it was hot.
wind; He opened his mouth and immediately swallowed a lot of warm fruit.
“Diagon Road,” he whispered.
It felt like they were being sucked into a big hurricane. It looks like
He would be moving faster—the noise in his ears was deafening—he tried
He would keep his eyes open but the blue heat made him feel sick —
Something heavy hit his shoulder and he kicked it hard, still
They twist and turn — now I feel like cold hands sting
His face — looking in his glasses he saw a vague stream of
temperatures and views of the rooms above — its bathroom .
They were crunching sandwiches inside him — he closed his eyes again wishing
to stop, and then —
He landed, face forward, on the cold stone and felt the dampness of his shins
snap.
The baby arrived, covered in fog, rose awkwardly to his feet and grabbed
His broken glasses up to his eyes. He was alone, but wherever he was, he
He had no idea. All he could say was that he was standing in the rock
the temperature of what looked like the Wizard’s Great Barn wasn’t too hot — but
Nothing here was supposed to be on a Hogwarts school list.
A glass bowl nearby held a withered hand on a pillow, a hand stained with blood
pack of cards, and staring glass eyes. Masks of evil stare down
From the ruins, there were various human bones on the grave, and
thick, thin materials hanging from the ceiling. Even more dark,
A narrow path, Harry could see through the dusty stall window.
Definitely not Diagon Alley.
The sooner he gets out of here, the better. The nose is still twitching where it was
Knocking on the stove, Harry made his way slowly and silently to the door.
But before he got halfway, two people appeared on top of each other
side of the glass — and one of them was the very last person Harry wanted .
He will meet when he falls, covered in mud, and wearing tattered clothes:
Draco Malfoy.
Harry quickly looked around and saw a large black cabinet beside him.
left; He shot inside it and pulled the doors closed, leaving a small gap for
peer s. A few seconds later, the bell rang, and Malfoy stepped into the
store.
The next guy could only be Draco's father. It has as
A pale, pale face and matching cold, blue eyes. Mr. Malfoy crossed
store, looking wistfully at the items on display, and ringing a bell on the canter
before turning to his son and saying, “Don’t touch anything, Draco.”
Malfoy, who had reached glass eyes, said, "I thought you were . . ."
You’re going to buy me a present.”
“I told you I’d buy you a ring,” his father said, mocking his father .
Fingers on the steering wheel.
“What’s the point of that if I’m not on the House team?” Malfoy said,
Looking sulky and bad tempered. “Harry Potter has Nimbus Two .
a thousand years ago. Special permission from Dumbledore to be able to play
For Gryffindor. It’s not even okay, it’s just because it’s popular . . .
It is known for its flavorful taste. . . .”
Malfoy looked up to see a closet full of skulls.
“. . . Everyone thinks he’s smart, a wonderful Potter with a magic wand and
his smile —”
"You've told me that at least a dozen times already," Mr. Malfoy said,
with a smug smile at her son. “And let me assure you that it’s not — .
She’s right — she’d seem less interested in Harry Potter, not when most of us
evil seen as the hero who caused the Dark Lord to fall — oh, sir.
Borgin.”
A bowed man appears behind the counter, adjusting his oil
Hair returned from his face.
" Sir. Malfoy, what a pleasure it is to see you again,” Mr. Borgin said in a
his voice is as olive as his lips. “With pleasure—and young Mr. Malfoy, too—.
He was shocked. How can I be of assistance? I need to show you, just today, u
Very reasonably priced —”
"I didn't smoke today, Mr. Borgin, but I did," Mr. Malfoy said.
“Will they sell?” The smile slightly left Mr. Borgin’s face.
“You’ve certainly heard that the department is doing more fairs,” he said.
Mr. Malfoy said, taking out a piece of paper from his inside pocket and .
she passed it to Mr. Borgin to read. “I have some — ah — stuff at home .
That might embarrass me, should the ministry call. . . .”
Mr. Borgin stuck a pair of tweezers in his nose and looked down at the
list.
“The Ministry does not count on troubling you, sir, am I right?”
Mr. Malfoy bit his lip.
“They never visited me. The Malfoy name still threatens some
Respect, but the ministry is getting harder and harder. There are comments
About a new Muggle Protection Act — no doubt Arthur Weasley was behind it as a spell-stricken, anti-Muggle fool —”
Harry felt a surge of anger.
“— and as you can see, some of these poisons can sense —”
"I understand, sir, of course," said Mr. Borgin. “Let me see . . .”
“Can I have that?” Draco interrupted, looking at the withered hand on the
His tolerance.
“Oh, the Hand of Glory!” Mr. Borgin said, leaving Mr. Malfoy's list .
And quickly to Draco. “Plug in a candle and it gives light only to
executive! A friend of pickers and pickers! Your son has good taste, sir.”
“I hope my son will be more than a thief or a pirate, .
Borgin,” Mr. Malfoy said coldly, and Mr. Borgin said quietly, “No need, .
Sir, no offense meant —”
"Even if his grades aren't improving," Mr. Malfoy said, more coldly still,
“This might be all I need—”
“It’s not my fault,” Draco replied. “Teachers all have favorites, that .
Hermione Granger—”
“I would have thought you would have realized that a girl with no wizarding family
He’s beaten you on every exam,” Mr. Malfoy said flatly.
“Ha!” Harry said under his breath, pleased to see Draco looking at both
Sad and angry.
"It's all the same," said Mr. Borgin, in his olive voice. “The magician
Blood counts hardly everywhere —”
“Not with me,” Mr. Malfoy said, his long eyelashes disappearing.
"No, sir, not with me either, sir," said Mr. Borgin, with a deep sigh.
"In that case, maybe we can get back to my list," Mr. Malfoy said quietly.
“I’m on something urgent, Borgin, I have important business .
Elsewhere today —”
They started dating. Harry watched in horror as Draco approached.
And closer to his hiding place, he looked at the items for sale. Draco
He paused to observe a long string of barbed wire and to study, looking,
The card is set on an opal ring, Attention: do not touch.
Cursed — he has taken the lives of nineteen muggle parents so far.
Draco turned around and saw the cabinet right in front of him. He went
Forward — stretches out his hand to hand —
“He does,” Mr. Malfoy said in a whisper. “Come on, Draco —”
Harry wiped his forehead against his forehead as Draco turned around.
“Good day to you, Mr. Borgin. I'll be waiting for you tomorrow at the funeral home.
Pick things up.”
The moment the door closed, Mr. Borgin turned on his oily walk.
“Good day to you, Mr. Malfoy, if the rumors are true, you .
You will not sell me half of what is hidden in your vault. . . .”
Peering around the corner, Mr. Borgin disappeared into a back room. Harry
Wait a minute in case he comes back, then, as quietly as possible,
He emerged from the cabinet, past the glass barrier, and out the cellar door.
Holding his broken glasses to his face, Harry smirked. have
It came out in a messy way that seemed to be made entirely of
shops devoted to the fine arts. Those he has just left behind, Borgin and Burkes,
It looked great, but across from it was an ugly window display of
The heads were shaved and, two doors down, a huge cage was alive with adults
Black spices. Two ominous-looking wizards were watching from
The shadows of a door, facing each other. Feeling nervous, Harry set
He leaves, trying to keep his lipstick straight and hoping against hope that there will be
He could find a way out of here.
An old boardwalk sign hangs over a shop that sells poison
The crew told him he was on the way to Knockturn. This didn’t help, as Harry was
I have never heard of such a place. He didn't speak properly.
With his mouth full of poison from the Weasleys. I’m trying to stay
He sighed, wondering what to do.
“Aren’t you lost, sweetheart?” A voice said in his ear, making him jump.
An old witch stood before him, holding a tablet of what looked
terribly like the entire human body. She peered at him, pointing to the murmur
teeth. Harry stepped back.
“I’m fine, thanks,” he said. “I just —”
“HARRY! What do you think yer doin' down there?”
Harry's heart jumped. So did the woman; Ear Disorder of the Toes
down on her knees and cursing like the giant form of Hagrid, an
The Hogwarts games custodian, he came in contact with them, his eyes were as black as a rabbit
Floating on his big swollen cock.
“Hagrid!” Harry yelled excitedly. “I was lost — Floo the detainee —”
Hagrid grabbed Harry by the collar and pulled him from
the nurse exclaimed, knocking the plate right out of her hands. She followed her call
Ten all the way across the twisted pavement out into the bright sunlight.
Harry spotted a familiar snow-white marble building in the distance —
The Bank of Gringott. Hagrid had directed him straight to the path of Diagon.
“Yer it’s a mess!” Hagrid said painfully, squeezing Harry's diaper hard.
He almost threw it in a rain dirt barrel outside a health product.
“The skulkin in the corner of Knockturn Alley, I don’t know—the fucking place, Harry—I don’t know.
I don’t want anybody ter see yeh down there —”
“I know that,” Harry said, grabbing it as Hagrid .
again. “I tell you, I panicked—what are you doing down there, .
anyway?"
“I was looking for a carnivorous bird stomach,” Hagrid snapped.
“They are damaging school balls. Yer not about himself?”
"I stayed with the Weasleys but we got separated," Harry explained.
“I have to go find them. . . .”
They all started on the street.
“How come yeh never wrote to me?” Hagrid said as Harry ran.
Beside him (having to take three steps to each step of Hagrid
larger bottles). Harry explained everything about Dobby and the Dursleys.
“Dirty mugs,” Hagrid said. “If only I knew —”
“Harry! Harry! here!"
Harry looked up and saw Hermione Granger standing at the top of the
the lightning bolt at Gringotts. She ran down to meet them, her pet
Brown hair flowing behind him.
“What happened to your glasses? Hey, Hagrid — Oh, that’s great for
I’ll see you two again—are you coming into Gringotts, Harry?”
"As soon as I find the Weasley's," Harry said.
“Yeh doesn’t have much of a wait,” Hagrid said with a smile.
Harry and Hermione stare at the crowded street
There were Ron, Fred, George, Piercy, and Mr. Weasley.
“Harry,” Mr. Wesley whispered. “We hope you only go one thing too
far. . . .” He flicked his shiny thumb. “Molly is excited — and
He’s coming now—”
“Where did you come from?” Run asked.
“Brilliant way,” Hagrid growled.
"excellent!" Fred and George said together.
“They didn’t let us in,” Ron hissed.
“I should be very ruddy I think not,” Hagrid said quietly.
Mrs. Weasley now came swiftly into view, her handbag swinging
With a spoon in one hand, Ginny just held on to the other.
“Oh Harry—my dear—you can be anywhere—”
She took a deep breath, pulled a large cloth brush out of her bag and
He began to pour out the heat that Hagrid hadn't managed to put out. Sir.
Weasley took Harry's glasses, gave them a flick of his thumb, and returned
Of them, they are as good as new.
“Well, we’ve got to go,” said Hagrid, whose arm was blocked by
Mrs. Weasley (“Black way! If only you couldn’t find it, Hagrid!”).
“See yer at Hogwarts!” And out he went, his head and shoulders taller than
Someone else on a crowded street.
“Did you see who I saw at Borgin and Burkes?” Harry asked Run and
Hermione as they made their way to Gringotts. “Malfoy and his father.”
“Does Lucius Malfoy have anything?” Mr. Weasley said firmly behind him
them.
“No, he was selling —”
“So he’s worried,” Mr. Weasley said with mischievous pride. “Oh, I
You’d rather bring in Lucius Malfoy for anything. . . .”
“Be careful, Arthur,” Mrs. Weasley whispered as she was interrupted .
In the bank by a doorbell. “That family’s problem. Don't go
You bite off more than you can chew —”
“So you don’t think I’m a match for Lucius Malfoy?” Mr. Weasley said
furiously, but he was dissuaded almost immediately by the sight of
Hermione's parents, who were standing nervously in front of the running counter
All in the great marble hall, waiting for Hermione to introduce them.
“But you’re a Muggle!” Mr. Weasley said excitedly. “We need to have a
drink! What is that thing you have there? Oh, you're changing Muggle money.
Molly, look!” He pointed gratefully at the ten-cent notes in Mr. Granger .
hand.
“We’ll meet you here,” Ron said to Hermione as the Wesleys and Harry .
They were chased to their underground bunkers by another Gringotts hero.
The caverns are accessed by small goblin-drawn vehicles and
They speed along the light rail tracks through the bank’s underground tunnels.
Harry enjoyed the tricky ride to the Weasleys’ den, but felt
luxury, much worse than what he had at Knockturn Alley, when it opened.
There was a very small jug of silver Sickles inside, and only one gold .
Galleon. Mrs. Weasley felt straight in the corners before sweeping
All the food in his car. Harry felt more at ease when they reached his quarters.
He tried to block his contents from view as he quickly pushed the hands of
coins in a single piece of leather.
Outside on the marble steps, they all stood out. Pierce said
vaguely about needing a new quill. Fred and George saw their property
His friend from Hogwarts, Lee Jordan. Mrs. Weasley and Ginny were going to
second-hand clothing store. Mr. Wesley was insistent on getting the Grangers
off to the Leaky Cauldron for a drink.
“We will all meet at Flourish and Blotts in an hour to get
Textbooks,” Mrs. Weasley said, leaving with Ginny. “And there’s no one .
Get off on Knockturn Road!” she shouted over the windows of the moving cabin.
Harry, Ron and Hermione ran out down the gravel, gravel road.
The gold, silver and bronze cup jingled merrily in Harry’s pocket
He was clamoring to be served, so he bought three large strawberry and peanut butter ice creams, nibbling happily as they wandered .
wall, peering out of the dark store windows. Run looks wistfully at the
A pair of Chudley Cannon leather jackets in the window of Quality Quidditch
supplies until Hermione took them down to buy the next ink and paper
gate. In the episode of Gambol and the Japes, they meet Fred, George,
and Lee Jordan, who is exploring Dr. Seuss’s credentials. The Fabulous Wet-Start filibuster, the No-Heat firestorm, and in a tiny junk shop full of broken junk,
a copper scale with no sides, an antique shell covered in medicine needles found
Percy, sunk deep into a small and very boring book called Prefects .
Who got the power.
“A study of Hogwarts prefects and their future,” Ron read aloud .
With the back cover. " weird. . . .”
“Go,” Percy growled.
““He’s really very stupid, Percy, he’s got the whole plan. . . . he
He wants to be the Minister of Magic . . .” Run told Harry and Hermione in a
Under the hood as they left Percy with her.
An hour later, they called up Flourish and Blotts. They weren’t
I mean the only ones that make their way to the bookstore. As they are
Approaching it, they saw to their amazement a large crowd skipping outside the
doors, trying to get in. The reason for this is illustrated by a .
A banner hangs on the upper window:
Gilderoy Lockhart
He will sign his life certificate
I AM MAGIC!
Today 12:30 a.m. to 4:30 p.m.
“We can actually meet him!” cried Hermione. “I mean, he wrote
Almost the entire book list!”
The crowd seemed to be mostly witches around Massa.
The age of Wezli. A concerned looking wizard stood at the door and said,
“By the way, please, ladies. . . . Don’t push, there . . . Keep the books.
now. . . .”
Harry, Run, and Hermione rummaged inside. A long rope is wound right to the
the store floor, where Gilderoy Lockhart was selling his books.
Each of them carried a copy of the book of magic spells, 2nd and 2nd levels.
They climbed the stairs to where the rest of the Weasleys were standing with
Mr. and Mrs. Granger.
“Oh, there you are, good,” Mrs. Weasley said. She appeared breathless.
And she kept stroking her hair. “We’ll see in a minute. . . .”
Gilderoy Lockhart slowly came into view and sat down at an adjacent table .
with huge pictures of her face, all smiling and beaming with a smile
White teeth in public. The real Lockhart was wearing forget-menot blue sunglasses that perfectly matched his eyes; His magician's cape is broken
at a jaunty angle over her auburn hair.
A short, rough-looking guy was dancing around taking photos.
With a giant red camera sending out plumes of gray smoke with each
Blind flash.
“Out of the way, there,” he growled at Ron, stepping back to get a better
shot. “This is for Everyday Christmas —”
“Great stuff,” Ron said, rubbing his back where the photographer was .
Throw at him.
Gilderoy Luckhart heard it. He looked down. He saw Ron — then he
He saw Harry. flat. Then he leapt to his feet and ominously shouted, “It’s .
Couldn’t it be Harry Potter?”
The crowd erupts, chattering excitedly; Lockhart stumbled forward, caught
Harry's hand, and pulled him closer. The crowd began to disperse.
Harry’s face burned as Lockhart waved at the photographer, who
He was grinning furiously, blowing smoke from the fire at the Weasleys.
"Good luck, Harry," Lockhart said, his teeth glistening.
“Together, you and I have front-page status.”
When he finally let go of Harry's hand, Harry could barely feel his hand
Fingers. He tries to retreat towards the Weasleys, but Lockhart fires a
His hand on her shoulders and he pinned her tightly to his side.
“Ladies and gentlemen,” he said loudly, moving so they’d be quiet. "what is
Extraordinary times this! That perfect moment to make a little
advertisement I've been sitting on it for a while!
“When young Harry walked in here today at Flourish and Blotts, he just
I want to buy my own biography — which I will gladly give her
Now, I swear —” the crowd cheered again. “He had no idea,”
Lockhart continued, giving Harry a little shake that made his cheeks redden .
By the end of his rant, “that he would soon get much, much more .
of my book, I Am Magic. He and his classmates will, of course, be
it really brings magic. Yes, ladies and gentlemen, I have a lot
Happy and excited to announce that in September, I will be taking
The position of Defense Against the Dark Arts Professor at Hogwarts School of
A witch and a wizard!”
The crowd cheered and applauded, Harry found himself
Presented with the complete works of Gilderoy Lockhart. It’s a little irritating.
Under their weight, he managed to slide from the mat to the
the center of the room, where Ginny was standing next to her new car.
“You’ve got these,” Harry told her, tossing the books into the pillow .
cup. “I’ll buy my own —”
“Bet you like that, don’t you, Potter?” said a voice that Harry didn't have
Developmental problems. He straightened and came face to face with himself.
and Draco Malfoy, who was wearing his usual scarf.
"The famous Harry Potter," Malfoy said. “I can’t even go into the bookstore
Without making the first page.”
“Leave him alone, he doesn’t want all this!” Ginny said. and the first
time she said in front of Harry. She was staring at Malfoy.
“Potter, you got yourself a girlfriend!” Malfoy said. Ginny went.
Scarlet as Ron and Hermione fight their way through, both holding baskets
of Luckhart's books.
“Oh, you are,” Ron said, looking at Malfoy as if he was something .
He didn’t like it in the leather of his pants. “Bet you were surprised to see Harry here, .
Eh?”
“I wasn’t as surprised to see you in the hallway, Weasley,” he replied .
Malfoy. “I think your parents are going to be hungry for a month to pay for everything .
those."
Ron went as black as Ginny. He threw his books on board, too.
And it starts with Malfoy’s reaction, but Harry and Hermione take a backseat to .
His jacket.
“Run!” Mr. Weasley said, struggling over Fred and George. "what
Do you? It’s too crowded here, let’s go outside.”
“Well, well, well — Arthur Weasley.”
It was Mr. Malfoy. He stood with his arm around Draco’s shoulders, shrugging
In just one way.
“Lucius,” said Mr. Weasley, coldly.
"Busy time at the Ministry, I hear," said Mr. Malfoy. “All those voices . . .
I hope they’re paying you overtime?”
He reached Ginny's bag and pulled her out, from the back of the shiny
Lockhart's books, a very old, heavily beaten copy of A Beginner's Guide to .
change.
"Obviously not," Mr. Malfoy said. “My dear, what is the point of being a
A disgrace to the Wizard name if they don’t even pay you shit for it?”
Mr. Weasley blushed even more than Ron or Ginny.
“We have a very different idea of ​​what concerns the name of the Wizard,
Malfoy,” he said.
“Clearly,” Mr. Malfoy said, his blue eyes darting towards the Lord and Mrs.
Granger, who was watching in horror. “The company you keep, .
Wezli . . . And I thought your family couldn’t fall below —”
There was a metallic clang as Ginny's car drove off; Mr. Weasley
He launched himself at Mr. Malfoy, knocking him backwards into a
A bookshelf. Dozens of heavy coloring books came riding on all their books .
heads; There was a chorus of “Get it, Daddy!” from Fred or George; madam.
Weasley was shouting, “No, Arthur, no!”; The crowd stumbles back.
take more photos; “Guys, please — please!” He shouted
The guardian, then, louder of all —
“Break it, there, gentlemen, break it—”
Hagrid was leading them through the sea of ​​books. suddenly
He was attracted to Mr. Weasley and Mr. Malfoy. Mr. Weasley has a short beard.
And Mr. Malfoy had a chain of clowns stuck in his eyes.
He was still holding Ginny's old book of Change. He pushed her to him,
His eyes glittered with mischief.
“Here, girl—give your book—that’s the best your father could give you .
—” Pushing himself out of Hagrid’s grasp he beckoned at Draco and whispered .
from the shop.
"Yeh you should have pulled over, Arthur," Hagrid said, almost picking up the Master.
Weasley from his knees as he fixed his cape. “Rotten ter of the earth, of .
The whole family, everyone knew that — no Malfoy was worth hearing ter —
Bad blood, that’s what it is — come on now — let’s get out of here.”
The guard looked like he wanted to stop them from leaving, but he
He was almost up to Hagrid's waist and seemed to think positively of him. they
Rushing to the street, the Grangers shake with fear and Mrs. Weasley .
in front of himself with pride.
“A good example to set for your children . . . Fighting in public . . . what
Maybe Gilderew Luckhart was thinking—”
“He liked it,” Fred said. “Didn’t you hear him while we were walking?
He was asking the guy from the regular Christmas if he could work
The struggle in his report — he says it’s all media stuff —”
But it’s the beleaguered team that returns to the fireside in Leaky .
The summit, where Harry, the Weasleys, and everything else would be sold
Walk back to the Burrow using the Floo powder. They said goodbye to
Grangers, who left the prison to the Muggle street in the opposite direction
appearance; Mr. Weasley started asking them how bus stops worked, but stopped
Quickly to the look on Mrs. Weasley's face.
Harry took off his coins and put them safely in his pocket before
He helps himself to Floo powder. It wasn’t his favorite way
travel.
the
Chapter Five
WILLOW CLOSED
he end of the summer holidays came too soon for Harry's liking.
He was looking forward to returning to Hogwarts, but his horse
At the Burrow he was the happiest he had ever been in his life. It was difficult not to feel
Jealous of Ron when he reflected on the Dursleys and the kind of upbringing he got
He can wait for his next appearance on Privet Drive.
On their last night, Mrs. Weasley had prepared a special dinner
It contains all of Harry’s favorite things, complete with a mouthful
spicy pudding. Fred and George ended the evening with a presentation
the Filibuster shooting; They filled the flag with red and green stars
leaning from the ceiling to the wall for at least half an hour. Then it’s time to
The last mug of hot chocolate and bed.
It took too long to start the next morning. They got up in the morning.
But somehow they still seem to have a lot to do. Mrs. Weasley
They race in the bad weather looking for the peaks and troughs of the draw; People keep
They crouched on the steps, half-circled with firebrands in their hands; and
Mr. Weasley nearly broke his neck, knocking over a stray chicken when he
He crossed the yard and carried Ginny's pack to the car.
Harry couldn't see how eight humans, six elder dragons, two dragons, and a
Rat was going to make it into a little Ford Anglia. He had calculated, n
Surely, without Mr. Weasley's added specials.
“Not a word for Molly,” he whispered to Harry as he opened the trunk .
And he shows her how he’s magically enlarged to taste potatoes
It is easily installed.
When they were finally all in the car, Mrs. Weasley looked at the car .
The back seat, where Harry, Ron, Fred, George, and Pierce all sat
kindly side by side, adding, “Muggles know more than we’re letting on .
their right, isn’t it?” She and Ginny got into the front seat, which
It had been raised to resemble a park bench. “I mean, never
You know this is the outhouse, you know?”
Mr. Weasley started the engine and they raced out of the yard,
Harry turned back to look at the house one last time. He barely has time to
I wondered when she’d see him again when they got back — George had
He forgot his Filibuster ignition key. Five minutes later, they
Skided to a stop in the yard so Fred could get in his car.
They were almost at the highway when Ginny announced that she was leaving
His diary. By the time she got back to the car, they were
They were running late, and emotions were high.
Mr. Weasley looked at his watch and then at his wife.
“Molly, dear —”
“No, Arthur —”
“No one’s going to see — this little butt here is a visual extension for .
set — that’s what gets us up in the air — and then we fly beyond the clouds.
We’ll be there in ten minutes and no one will be serious —”
“I said no, Arthur, not in broad daylight—”
They reached King's Cross at a quarter to eleven. Mr. Weasley fled.
across the street to get tires for their cars and they all hurried to
station.
Harry took the Hogwarts train last year. The downside
Space was reaching the thirteenth stage, there was no
Seen through Muggle eyes. All you have to do is walk around the
The barrier divides platform nine and ten. It doesn’t hurt, but it needs to be done
Carefully so none of the Muggles saw you passed out.
“Percy first,” Mrs. Weasley said, glancing nervously at the clock .
Basically, that means they only have five minutes to get comfortable
subtly.
Percy lurched forward and disappeared. Mr. Wesley walked over; Fred
And George followed suit.
“I’ll take Ginny and you two come right after us,” Mrs. Weasley said .
Harry and Ron, taking Ginny's hand, started off. In one chest
The eyes were gone.
"Let's go together, we only have a minute," Ron told Harry.
Harry made sure that Hedwig's cage was securely attached to his
trunk and turned his car around to face the load. It felt right.
confident; This is not nearly as uncomfortable as using Floo powder. both
whereupon they mounted the hands of their chariots and walked away.
Aim towards the horror, literally. A few feet away,
They broke into a walk and —
fall.
The two trolleys hit the wheel and rolled back; Lost the Run Battery
With a loud bang, Harry was knocked off his feet, and Hedwig's cage
she threw herself on the shining floor, stumbling, shouting angrily;
People all around them look and a guard nearby shouts, “What’s in the fire .
D'you think you do?”
“Lost parking lot,” Harry whispered, licking his lips as he reached .
up. Ron ran to get Hedwig, who caused such a scene that there
There are many stories about cruelty to neighborhood animals
crowd.
“Why can’t we get through?” Harry smiled at Ron.
"I don't know -"
Ron looked amused around. Dozens of curious people still looked on.
them.
“Let’s miss the boat,” Ron whispered. "I don't understand
Why does the door shut itself—”
Harry looked at the main clock with a sick feeling in the back of
His stomach. Ten seconds. . . Ninety seconds. . .
He pushed his car forward cautiously until it was in front of
Barrier and attack with full force. The tunnel remained tight.
Three seconds . . . Two seconds. . . One second . . .
“She’s gone,” Ron said, voice low. “The train left. If the mother
And Dad can’t come back by us? Do you have any Muggle money?”
Harry gave a bitter laugh. “The Dursleys never gave me a pocket .
Money for about six years.”
Ron pressed his ear against the cold sensation.
“I can’t hear a thing,” he groaned. “What are we going to do? I don't
They know how long it’s going to take mom and dad to get back to us.”
They looked around. People are still watching, especially since
of Hedwig's continuous cries.
"I think we'd better go wait by the dock," Harry said. "are
attracts a lot of attention —”
“Harry!” Ron said, his eyes sparkling. “That car!”
“What about that?”
“We can drive the car to Hogwarts!”
“But I thought —”
“We’re broken, right? And we have to get to school, right? and
Even underage wizards are allowed to use magic if it is a real case.
Nineteenth section or any suspension of business —”
“But your mother and father . . .” Harry said, pushing against the wall.
Also in the vain hope that it would give way. “How are they going to get home?”
“They don’t need the car!” Ron said calmly. “They know how to
handle! You know, just take off and come back home! They just send
With Floo powder and cream because we are all underage and not
He was allowed to Apparate still. . . .”
Harry's sense of panic suddenly turned to excitement.
“Can you take it out?”
“No problem,” Ron said, turning on his heels to face the exit.
“C'mon, let's go. If we hurry we will be able to catch the Hogwarts Express
—”
And marched off through the crowd of curious Muggles, from
station and they returned to the side street where the old Ford Anglia was parked.
Ron unlocked the cave maze with a single swipe from his wand.
They hauled their luggage inside, put Hedwig in the backseat, and drove
In the front.
“Make sure no one’s watching,” Ron said, starting to fire at .
another tap of his thumb. Harry pokes his head out of the window : Transporter
He was thundering down the main road ahead, but their course was flat.
“Okay,” he said.
Ron pressed a small silver disc into the dashboard. The car that passed them
It’s over — and so are they. Harry could feel the chair shift beneath him.
For him, he heard the engine, felt her hands on his shoulders and his lipstick on his
The nose, but for all he knew, it turned into a pair of legs, flashing a
A few feet above the ground in a narrow street full of parked cars.
“Let’s go,” Ron’s voice said from his right.
And the filthy ground and buildings on all sides fell down,
you drop out of sight as the car accelerates; Within seconds, the whole of London was,
with fire and brimstone, beneath them.
Then there was an explosion and the car, Harry, and Ron appeared again.
“U-hoh,” Ron moaned, trailing his thumb across the dwarf member. “It’s wrong —”
The two of them gasped. The car drove off. Then he turned back.
again.
"catch!" Ron sighed, and slammed his foot on the steering wheel; they
Shot straight into low clouds, with a face and everything became gray and
mist.
“Now what?” Harry said, looking at the cloud fog floating in
on them from all sides.
“We have to watch the boat to see what direction we’re going in,” Ron said.
“Dip back again — quickly —”
They fall under the clouds, they spin in their places,
They look at the ground.
“I can see it!” Harry shouted. “Right up—there!”
The Hogwarts Express was buzzing beneath them like a
snake.
“North,” Ron said, checking the compass on the dashboard. "okay,
We’ll only see him every half hour or so—hang on—”
And they ascended up into the clouds. A minute later, they emerged in
Sunlight.
It was a different world. The wheels of the ship swept the sea of ​​soul.
The cloud, the sky a brilliant, endless blue under a drifting yellow sun.
"All we have to worry about now are the planes," Ron said.
They looked at each other and burst out laughing; For a long time, they
He couldn't stop.
It was as if they were lost in a fantasy dream. this,
Harry thought, surely that was the only way to go — past the spells and the spells .
of snow cloud, in a car filled with hot, bright sunlight, with a pack of
toffees at the gas station, and a curious glimpse of Fred and
George’s jealous faces as they gracefully and impressively landed on
the fog in front of Hogwarts castle.
They do a daily check on the train as they fly farther and farther away.
north, each hole under the sky presented them with a different perspective. London
It was soon far behind them, replaced by lush green fields that gave way in
Tour around the wide, lush canyons, and a big city alive with cars as many colors
Ants, villages with small game churches.
Still, several hours uneventful, Harry had to admit that some
of joy was dissipating. The thirsts made them very thirsty.
They had nothing to drink. He and Run took off their suits.
But Harry’s t-shirt was hanging in the back of his bag and his shirts were rubbing
It slid to the end of his sweaty nose. He stopped watching
Fine cloud forms now and he was thinking calmly about the train miles
Below, where you can buy ice-cold pumpkin pie from an overturned truck
by a female nurse. Why can’t they get into the ninth orbit and
Three quarters?
“It can’t be much more than that, can it?” said Ron, later still, as he
The sun began to sink into their cloud base, staining it with a deep glow. "ready
For another chip on the train?”
She was still below them, maneuvering her way past a snow
mountain. It was very calm under the cloud cover.
Ron put his foot on the steering wheel and pushed them back up again, but am
He did so, and the engine began to vibrate.
Harry and Ron exchanged confused looks.
"Maybe it's just fatigue," Ron said. “It was never that far before. . . .”
And they both pretended to be oblivious to the growling louder and
louder as the sky grew higher and higher. The stars were blooming in the
red. Harry tugged on his jacket, trying to ignore how he
The blades of the wind were now painfully tight, as if in protest.
“Not far,” Ron said, more to the car than to Harry, “not far now,” and he .
grabbing the dashboard nervously.
When they flew back under the clouds a short time later, they had to
They moved in the darkness for a familiar mark.
"there!" Harry shouted, causing Ron and Hedwig to sneeze. "through
ahead!"
Silhouetted in the gray landscape, high in the mountains above the ocean, standing
The many bridges and towers of Hogwarts castle.
But the car started to accelerate and accelerate faster.
“Come on,” Ron whispered, giving the pillow a little squeeze,
“Nearly there, call —”
The engine is good. Heavy jets of steam were pouring from under the
hood. Harry found himself gripping the edges of his panties as tightly as they
She went out towards the sea.
The car gave an ominous shake. Watching Harry from his window,
the smooth, black, glassy bottom of the water a mile below. Run Boots
they were white on the carpet. The car shuddered again.
“Come on,” Ron murmured.
They were right on the beach — the castle was right in front of them — Ron put his .
Leg down.
There was a loud bang, a roar, and the whole engine died.
“Uh-oh,” Ron said, into the silence.
The nose of the car dropped. They were falling, gathering speed,
Straight into the strong castle wall.
“Aaaah!” Ron shouted, looking mischievous; they
He missed the dry rock wall by inches as the car turned into a wide bend.
They flew past the dark thatched huts, then the grain barn, then out
On black grass, the skin is removed all the time.
Run abandoned all saddlery and pulled his wand out of the
His back pocket —
"Stop! Stop!" he yelled, hitting the dashboard and the wind left.
But they were still flying, and the ground was splashing in around them—
“HOLD THAT SHOUT!” Harry shouted, straining for
cartwheel, but too late —
AKRUNCH.
With an iron nail on wood, they hit the heavy wooden beast
And he fell to the ground with a heavy thud. Steam was rising from the
under the broken cover; Hedwig was shivering with fear; A lump the size of a golf ball was bouncing on Harry's forehead where he hit it
The roar of the wind; And to his right, Ron let out a low, low smile.
“Are you okay?” Harry said quietly.
“My wand,” Ron said, voice shaking. “Look at my tail—”
She was shivering, almost both; The voice was deafening, picked up by a
Fewer cracks.
Harry opened his mouth to say he was sure they could fix it.
in school, but he hasn’t even started yet. At the same time,
Something crashed into her hull side with the force of a charging beast, sending
Him lurching sideways into Ron, just as an equally heavy blow hit the ceiling.
“What happened — ?”
Ron shouted, glancing at the windmill, while Harry looked around
Just in time to see a butterfly the size of an elephant crash into it. wood
They were beating he was threatening them. His body was smashed nearly in two, and
gnarled boughs were tearing up every inch of car she could reach.
“Argh!” Ron said as another twisted limb threw a large nail into the
His door; The air-space was now thickening under a hail of bullets from
Tail-like appendages and a rounded wing like a captured lion was lying
With interest on the ceiling, which looks like a cave —
“Run away from him!” Ron yelled, pressing his full weight against her entrance, but .
The next moment, Harry was being punched in the head by a stranger
uppercut from another piece.
“We’re done for!” He yelled as the ceiling collapsed, but suddenly
The car’s floor was vibrating—the engine had failed.
"reverse!" Harry yelled, and the car shot back; The tree is still there.
He tries to hit them; He could hear his veins twitching as he nearly ruptured
Himself up, he warns them as they run up and down the stairs.
“That,” Ron growled, “was close. Hey, car —”
However, the car had reached the end of its lifespan. with both hard
Clunks, the doors slid open and Harry felt his car sideways: Next
The thing he knew he was sprawled on the damp floor. a loud voice told her
that the vehicle unloads their luggage from the baggage claim; Hedwig’s cage is out
through the air and opened up; You woke up from it with a scream of pain and
She hurried off to the castle without looking back. Then he collapsed,
detached, and bursting into flames, the car disappeared into darkness, behind
The lights flashed angrily.
“Come back!” Ron yelled after him, looking at his broken nose. “My father
Kill me!”
But the car was out of sight with one last puff of its fuel.
“Can you believe our luck?” Ron said sadly, bending down to pick
up the Scaber. “Of all the trees we could knock on, we had to get one that would knock .
back."
He glanced over his shoulder at the old tree, still blooming
Its choices honestly.
“Come on,” Harry said sadly, “we’d ​​better get up for school. . . .”
It wasn’t quite the winning journey they envisioned. Hard, cold, and
They were wounded, seized the ends of their boats, and began to pull them backwards
garden floor, to the front gates of the main garden.
“I think the party’s already started,” Ron said, slamming his bat to
Stepping on the front steps and turning silently to look at the brightly colored
window. “Hey — Harry — come and see — it’s a Frog!”
Harry nodded and, together, he and Ron looked around the Great Hall.
Countless candles were floating in the air on four long, full
table, making plates and cups of shining gold. above,
The exposed ceiling, which always reflects the sky outside, sparkles with
The stars.
In the Forest of Black Cloaks at Hogwarts, Harry spotted a
Line of fear-looking first years filing in Hall. Ginny was between
for them, easy to spot because of his distinctive Weasley hair. meanwhile,
Professor McGonagall, a bespectacled witch with her hair in a tight braid,
He was placing the famous Hogwarts Sorting Cup on a chair in front of the
The newcomers.
Every year this traditional old, tattered, worn, and dirty cup is poured fresh
Students in the four Hogwarts Houses (Gryffindor, Hufflepuf,
Ravenclaw, and Slytherin). Harry clearly remembered putting it on, exactly
A year ago, and he waited, puzzled, for her decision as she murmured aloud in
his ear. For a few awkward seconds, he feared the trophy was going
Put him in slytherin, the brightest house of the hardest wizards and
Wizards than anyone else—but he had ended up in Gryffindor, along with .
Ron, Hermione, and the rest of the Weasleys. Final words, Harry and Run
He had helped Gryffindor win the House Championship, beating Slytherin by
First time in seven years.
A very young, grey-haired boy was invited out to put
hat on his head. Harry's eyes followed him to where the Headmaster was
Dumbledore, the headmaster, sat watching the Fragment from the staff table,
Her long silver beard and half-moon ornaments sparkled in the
Candlelight. Several seats up in the corner, Harry spotted Gilderoy Lockhart, wearing the uniform of
Akumari clothes. And there at the end was Hagrid, tall and hairy,
She drank deeply from her glass.
"stop . . .” Harry said frowning at Ron. “There was an empty chair in the
The staff table. . . . Where’s Snape?”
Professor Severus Snape was Harry's least favorite professor. Harry also
She happened to be Snape's least favorite student. cruel, magical, and uncaring
by everyone except the students of his (Slytherin) House, Snape
Teach Alcohol.
“He must be sick!” Ron said hopefully.
“Maybe he stayed,” Harry said, “because he failed Defense .
Against the work of the dark arts again!”
“Or maybe he’s fired!” Ron said cheerfully. "I mean,
Everybody hates him —”
“Or perhaps,” said a very cold voice just behind them, “he expects to .
Hear why you two didn’t get on the school bus.”
Harry turned around. There, her black dress billowing in the cold wind,
Severus snapped. He was a thin man with ruddy skin and a hooked nose.
It was greasy black, shoulder-length hair, and at this moment, he was looking
in a way that told Harry that he and Ron were in very deep trouble.
“Follow me,” Snape said.
Not even daring to look at each other, Harry and Ron followed Snape back
stairs to the sparkling, fire-lit great entrance hall
Festivals. The smell of delicious food was wafting from the Great Hall, but
Snape led them away from warmth and light, down a heavy rock
staircase leading to the shops.
"in!" He said, opening the door halfway down the cold street and
He's looking.
They entered Snape's office and knocked. The shadow walls were refined
with large glass dog-boxes, in which floated all manner of rebellion
Things Harry didn't really want to know the name of at the time. the
the fire was dark and empty. Snape closed the door and turned to look
them.
“So,” he said quietly, “the train isn’t good for famous Harry .
Potter and his union mate Weasley. I wanted to achieve a break, I did
Us, boys?”
“No, sir, it’s the court in King’s Cross, and —”
"silence!" Snape said coldly. “What did you do with the car?”
Run fell. It wasn’t the first time Snape had given Harry
the impression of being able to read minds. But after a while, he
You understood, as Snape unfolded today's Christmas Eve text.
“You watch,” he grinned, showing them the signature: FLYING FORD .
ENGLAND DESCRIBERS THE MUGGLENS. He began to read aloud, “Two patients .
In London, they were convinced they saw an old car flying over the Post Office
The tower . . . At noon in Norfolk, Mrs. Hettie Bayliss, while soaking her
Washing . . . Mr Angus Fleet, of Peebles, told the police . . . Six or
Seven Muggles in all. I believe your father worked in Muggle reception.
The Arts Office?” he said, looking at Run and smiling more
In vain. “Dear, dear . . . His own son . . .”
Harry felt like he had just been punched in the stomach by one of the
The large leaves of the juniper tree. If anyone found out Mr. Weasley had
She started the car. . . He didn't think about that. . . .
“I noticed, during my search of the cemetery, that the major damage seemed to be
They were made for a very valuable Whomping Willow,” Snape continued.
“That tree did more damage to us than we —” Ron stammered.
"silence!" snapped Snape again. “Unfortunately, you are not in my realm .
The house and the decision to kick you out are no longer with me. I'm going and
Find people who have that happy experience. You will wait here.”
Harry and Ron looked at each other, white-faced. Harry didn't feel
He’s not hungry anymore. He now felt very sick. He tried not to look at anyone
Something big, blue hanging in green preserve on a shelf behind him
Snape's desk. If Snape had gone to fetch Professor McGonagall, head of
Gryffindor house, they were hardly pretty. She could be fair
than Snape, but it was still very annoying.
Ten minutes later, Snape came back, and it was indeed Professor
McGonagall joined her. Harry looked at Professor McGonagall.
He got angry several times, but either forgot how sweet she was
The mouth might go, or he’d never seen her this happy before. She encourages her
Wand the moment she came in; Harry and Run both broke down, but she
She just pointed it at the empty fireplace, where bullets suddenly flew out.
“Stay,” she said, and they both moved into chairs by the fire.
“Explain,” she said, her glasses glittering dangerously.
Ron starts in the story, starting with the fence at the station
He refused to let them pass.
“— Then we’re okay, Professor, we can’t get on the train.”
“Why don’t you send us a sealed letter? I believe you have a pet?”
Professor McGonagall said coldly to Harry.
Harry stared at her. Now she says it, it’s obvious to
They did.
“I — I don’t think —”
Professor McGonagall said, “That’s obvious.”
There was a knock at the office door and Snape, now looking happier
than before, he opened it. There stood the headmaster, Professor Dumbledore.
Harry's entire body went numb. Dumbledur was looking unusually serious.
grave. He peered at them with his very pointed nose, and Harry suddenly
He found himself wishing he and Ron were still getting hit by
Willow squirming.
There was a long silence. Then Dumbledore said, "Please explain why ."
You did that.”
It would have been better if he had screamed. Harry hated
panic in her voice. For some reason, he couldn’t look
Dumbledore in sight, and he spoke instead with his fingers. He said
Dumbledore everything except that Mr. Weasley had the enchanted carriage,
He made it look like he and Run had found a flying saucer.
standing outside the station. He knew Dumbledore would see through this in
Once, but Dumbledore never asked about the bag. When Harry had
He finished, just continuing to glare at them.
“Let’s go get our stuff,” Ron said in a hopeless sort of voice.
“What are you talking about, Weasley?” Professor McGonagall exclaimed.
“Well, you’re taking us out, aren’t you?” Run said.
Harry looked quickly at the Dumbledore.
"Not today, Mr. Weasley," Dumbledore said. “But I have to confess .
You both are so serious about what you do. I will write to
Both your families tonight. I should also warn you that if you do any
On the contrary, I have no choice but to release you.”
Snape seemed to have Christmas cancelled. He cleaned his property.
His voice, he said, "Professor Dumbledore, these guys have fainted . . ."
Decree to Prohibit Underage Pregnancy Causes Huge Damage
to an ancient and valuable tree — indeed actions of this kind —”
"It will be up to Professor McGonagall to decide on these boys."
Prison, Severus,” Dumbledore growled sternly. “They were in his Room .
And that’s the bottom line.” He turned to Professor McGonagall.
“I have to get back to the kitchen, Minerva, I have to pick some things.
Come on, Severus, there's a delicious-looking candy tart I'd like to taste.
—”
Snape shot a look of pure venom at Harry and Ron as he left
himself to be escorted out of his apartment, leaving them alone with Professor
McGonagall, who was still staring at them like an angry fox.
“So you’re going to end up with the hospital wing, Weasley, you’re bleeding.”
“Not much,” Ron said, quickly wiping the cut over his eye with his tissue .
sleeve. “Professor, I want to see my sister divorced —”
"The sorting ceremony is over," Professor McGonagall announced. "your
My sister is also in Gryffindor.”
“Oh, okay,” Ron said.
"And speaking of Gryffindor—" Professor McGonagall whispered, .
But Harry interrupted, "Professor, when we got the car, the term hadn't started yet, so . . ."
'So Gryffindor shouldn't really have points taken away from it—should it?”
He finished, looking down at her.
Professor McGonagall gave her a confused look, but he was sure she
He almost smiled. His mouth seemed less than sweet, anyway.
"I'm not taking any points from Gryffindor," she said, and Harry's heart sank.
It melted heavily. “But you’ll both have a punishment.”
Better than Harry had imagined. As for Dumbledore’s writings to
the Dursley's, this was nothing. Harry knew very well that they would only be
He was disappointed that Whomping Willow hadn't scratched him deep enough.
Professor McGonagall raised her wand again and pointed it at Snape's .
desk. Large tray of sandwiches, two silverware, and a glass of ice
The pumpkin paste made it with a pop.
“You’re going to eat here, and then you’re going straight to your dorm,” she said .
said. “I have to go back to retirement too.”
When the door closed behind him, Ron let out a long, low sigh.
“I think we’ll have it,” he said, holding up a sandwich.
“Me too,” Harry said, and took one, too.
“Can you believe in our luck, though?” Run said quickly by a
The pig’s mouth is grass. “Fred and George must have flipped that car over
Five or six times and not a single Muggle has ever seen them.” He ate and took
another great compliment. “Why can’t we cross the threshold?”
Harry shrugged. “We’ll have to watch our process from now on, though,” he said .
He said, taking a grab an invite of chicken soup. “I wish we could get out
To the wedding. . . .”
“She doesn’t want us to show ourselves,” Ron growled. " won't
People will think he’s smart, he drives around in a flying car.”
After eating as many sandwiches as they could (the table sat
filled himself), got up and left the office, taking the familiar route to
Gryffindor Tower. The castle was quiet; It looked like the party was over.
They walked past moving pictures and heroic statues, and
They climbed up narrow expanses of rock, until at last they reached the
The street where he hid the secret entrance to Gryffindor Tower, after
Oil painting of a woman in gray silk dress.
"password?" She said when they got closer.
“Er —” Harry said.
They didn't know the New Year's password, having never met Gryffindor
prefect still, but help came almost immediately; They heard screaming footsteps.
Behind them and he turned to see Hermione approaching them.
“There you are! where are you ? Most interesting —
Someone said you were fired for driving a flying car—”
"Well, they didn't release us," Harry assured her.
“You’re not going to tell me you’re flying out here?” Hermione said, voicing
Almost as powerful as Professor McGonagall.
“Skip the lecture,” Ron growled, “tell me a new password.”
“It’s ‘wattlebird,’” Hermione sighed, “but that’s not the point .
—”
His words were cut off, however, as the blonde's shadow moved .
They opened and there was a wonderful parade. It looks like a
All of Gryffindor House was still awake, shielded in the ring
Common room, standing on squashy tables and chairs,
waiting to arrive. Hands reached out from the corner of the picture to pull
Harry and Ron inside, leaving Hermione to crawl in behind them.
"nasty!" shouted Lee Jordan. "favourite! What an entrance! It flashes a
Direct train to Whomping Willow, people will be talking about that one
Years ago —”
“Good for you,” said a fifth year Harry had never spoken to; one
He was patting him on the back like he had just won a marathon; Fred and
George pushed their way to the front of the crowd, and they all said, “Why .
We can’t come running, eh?” Ron was red in the face, chuckling
A shame, but Harry could see one person who didn’t look happy
all. Percy appeared over the heads of the first few years excited, and he
He seemed to be trying to get close enough to start telling them. Harry
a smile whispered in Ron's brows and he turned his head towards Percy. Found Run Point
All at once.
“I gotta go upstairs — I’m a little tired,” he said, and the two started .
They push their way to the door on the other side of the room, which leads
to a spiral staircase and bathrooms.
“'Night,” Harry replied to Hermione, who was wearing only a dressing gown .
Like Pierce's.
They made it to the other side of the common room, still having
Through their devotion, they achieved relative peace. They hurried
It, up to the top, finally reached the door of their old house,
which now has a mark on it that reads YES ISS TWO. They entered the
The familiar, dark room, with its five red-framed hung rectangular windows and
Its windows are tall and narrow. They were brought their injuries and
They stood at the heads of their beds.
Ron grinned right at Harry.
“I know I shouldn’t be enjoying this or anything, but —”
The dorm door flew open and another second year came.
The Gryffindor Boys, Seamus Finnigan, Dean Thomas, and Neville
Long bottom.
“Unbelievable!” exclaimed Seamus.
“Cold,” Dean said.
“That’s amazing,” Neville said, shocked.
Harry couldn't help it. He smiled, too.
the
Chapter Six
Gilderoy Lockhart
he next day, however, Harry almost smiled once. Things started
Go downstairs from the lounge in the Great Hall. The house is four long.
Tables loaded with tureens of prawn, plates of kippers, mountains of
toast, and dishes of eggs and cheese, under a recessed roof (today, a
heavy, cloud gray). Harry and Ron sat at the Gryffindor table in front of the
Hermione, who has her own Witchcraft and Vampire camp posted open
against a glass of milk. She was a little sneaky in the way she said
“Lightning,” telling Harry that she was still unconvinced of the way .
They had arrived. As for Nifil Lungbutum, he spoke for them
With pleasure. Neville was a round-faced boy and prone to accidents with
good memory of everyone Harry had ever met.
“The mail will be coming any minute — I think Gran is sending some stuff I forgot.”
Harry had just started his cake when, sure enough, there was a
A sudden sound overhead and a hundred or so birds coming, running for
hall and tossing letters and flyers into the traveling crowd. huge,
The coconut butter popped out of Neville’s head, and after a second, something
Large and thick they fell into Hermione's pan, drenching them all with milk and
feed.
“Fall!” Ron said, pulling the stumbling rabbit by the feet. mistake
He collapsed, unconscious, on the table, his arms in the air and bright red
The ball in his head.
“Oh, no —” Ron stammered.
"It's okay, he's still alive," Hermione said, shaking Errol gently .
With the snap of his finger.
“That’s not it — that’s it.”
Ron was staring at the blackboard. It seemed odd to Harry.
But Ron and Neville were both looking at her as if waiting for her to
It will divide.
“What’s wrong?” Harry said.
“She — she sent me a Howler,” Ron snapped.
"You'd better open it up, Ron," Neville smirked. " to be
It’s awful if you don’t. My gran sent me one once, and I ignored it and” — he
gulped — “it was awful.”
Harry looked from their stony faces to the black screen.
“What’s Howler?” he said.
But all of Ron's attention was focused on the letter, which began .
Smoke in the corners.
“Open it,” Neville urged. “It’ll all be over in a few minutes—”
Run reached out his shaking hand and wiped the envelope from Errol's mouth,
And hear it open. Neville put his fingers in his ears. A second division later,
Harry knew why. He thought for a moment that it had exploded; The scream of
Sound filled the large hall, shaking the dust from the ceiling.
“— YOU STOLE A CAR, I WOULDN’T BE SURPRISED IF .
SUCK YOU OUT, YOU WAIT UNTIL I TELL YOU, I
DON'T THINK YOU STOP TO THINK ABOUT WHAT YOUR FATHER AND
I GOT HERE WHEN WE SAW IT HAPPEN —”
Mrs. Weasley's screams, a hundred times louder than usual, made the sheets tremble
And the food crunched on the table, and screeched off the stone walls.
People in the audience were turning to see who got
Howler, and Ron slumped so low in his chair that only his red butt
A line can be displayed.
“— A LETTER FROM DUMBLEDORE LAST NIGHT, I LOVE YOU
THE FATHER WILL DIE WITH SHAME, WE WILL NOT BE ABLE TO
WORDS LIKE THIS, YOU AND HARRY COULD BOTH DIE —”
Harry was wondering when his name would come up. he
He tried so hard to look like he couldn’t hear the voice that was
It made his ears red.
“— AS I SPEAK — YOUR FATHER RECEIVES AN .
INTERVIEW FOR A JOB, IT’S ALL YOUR FAULT AND IF YOU FAIL
OTHER FOOT OUTSIDE THE CIRCLE WE WILL RETURN YOU STRAIGHT
home."
An awkward silence fell. The black cover, which descends from that of Run
A hand, burned in flames and reduced to ashes. Harry and Run were stunned.
It’s like a lightning bolt hanging right over them. Some people laughed.
And, gradually, a misunderstanding of words returned.
Hermione closed the Walks with Vampires, looking down at the top of
Head of Run.
“Well, I don’t know what you expected, Ron, but you —”
“Don’t tell me I deserve it,” Ron growled.
Harry cleared his throat. His insides were burning right.
Mr. Weasley was facing an investigation at work. After all Mr. and Mrs. Weasley
He worked for her over the summer . . .
But he had no time to dwell on that; Professor McGonagall was looking
Around Gryffindor, they were handing out course schedules. Harry took his
And he saw that they had Herbology second and the Hufflepuffs first.
Harry, Run, and Hermione left the castle together and crossed the green
patch, and made for greenhouses, where magic mushrooms were kept.
At least Howler did one good thing: Hermione seemed to think .
They were now properly punished and were perfect companions.
again.
As they approached the log cabins, they saw the rest of the gang standing around.
Outside, Professor Sprout waits. Harry, Ron, and Hermione only have
She just went along with them when she came rolling her eyes at the air,
Co-sponsored by Gilderoy Lukhart. Professor Sprout has his hands full with
noodles, and with another wave of guilt, Harry saw Whomping
Willow in the distance, many of its branches now in blooms.
Professor Sprout was a little witch who wore a magical wig
Her flowing hair; There was specifically a lot of dirt on his clothes.
And her feet would make Aunt Petunia cry. Gilderoy
Lockhart, however, was terrible at the high-end boards, his
Golden hair that shimmers under a gold-plated turtleneck
kidding.
“Oh, hello there!” he called out, pointing at the assembled students.
“He was just showing Professor Sprout the right way to heal a Whomping .
barley! But I don’t want you to run away thinking that I’m better at
Herbology above! I just happened to meet a lot of these losers.
Plants on my commute . . .”
“Tree room three today, chaps!” Professor Sprout, who was
She looked quietly disapproving, not at all her usual cheerful self.
There was a profitable break. They only work in
Tree one first — tree three has a lot of surprises
and complex patients. Professor Sprout took a large key from her belt and
He opened the door. Harry took a swig of damp earth and beans.
Mixed with the vibrant colors of some large disc-sized flowers
hanging from the ceiling. He was about to follow Run and Hermione
Inside when Lockhart's hand shot out.
“Harry! I want a word — you don’t have to worry if it’s both
Twenty minutes late, are you, Professor Sprout?”
Judging by Professor Sprout’s demeanor, she has a mind, but Lockhart says,
“That’s a gift,” and shuts the trash door in his face.
“Harry,” Lockhart said, his big white teeth gleaming in the sunlight like .
He shook his head. “Harry, Harry, Harry.”
Completely speechless, Harry said nothing.
“When I heard — well, it was all my fault. It can take
ego."
Harry had no idea what he was talking about. He was about to say that.
When Lockhart continued, “I don’t know when I’ve ever felt more comfortable.
A short flight to Hogwarts! Well, of course, I knew at once why you did that
it. It stood a mile away. Harry, Harry, Harry.”
It was amazing how he was able to show off each of those beautiful teeth.
Even then he wasn't talking.
“I gave you a taste of the press, didn’t I?” Luckhart said. “He gave you
bug. You got me to the first page of the paper and you couldn't
Wait and pick it up.”
“Oh, no, Professor, look —”
"Harry, Harry, Harry," Lockhart said, reaching out and grabbing his hand .
shoulder. " I understand. It's only natural to want a bit more when you've had this
First kiss — and I’m kicking myself for giving this to you, because it was closed
Going to your head — but look here, young man, you can’t start flying cars
To try and guess. Just relax, okay? A lot of time
For all that when you’re older. Yes, yes, I know what you’re thinking! 'is
Luckily, he's already a world-renowned sorcerer!' But when
I was twelve years old, and I was a nobody unlike you now. In fact, it would
Say I was more of a nobody! I mean, some people have heard of you.
Aren't they? All that business with Who-Must-Not-Forgot-Name!” he
She looked at the lightning bolt on Harry's coat. “I know, I know — it’s .
Not good enough to win a Witch Weekly Award
Five times in a row, as far as I’m concerned—but it’s a start, Harry, it’s a start.”
He gave Harry a hearty smile and stormed off. Harry stood surprised for a
A few seconds later, he remembers that he's supposed to be in the greenhouse,
He opened the door and stepped inside.
Professor Sprout was standing behind a trestle bench in the middle of the
green. About twenty pairs of different colored earrings were hanging
In the bank. When Harry took his seat between Run and Hermione,
“We’re going to make Mandrakes today,” she said. Now, who can tell me
the right of Mandrake?”
To no one's surprise, Hermione's hand was in the air first.
“The Mandrake, or the Mandrake, is the stuff of energy,” says Hermione,
Quietly as usual as if she had devoured a textbook. “It is used to
They returned changed or deformed people to their former state.”
"Good. Ten points for Gryffindor," Professor Sprout said. "T
Mandrake is an essential ingredient in most antidepressants. However, also
difficult. Who can tell me why?”
Hermione's hand roughly crossed Harry's cheek as he pulled away again.
“Mandrake bite is deadly to anyone who hears it,” she said .
quickly.
"Exactly. Let's take another ten points," Professor Sprout said. "Now, it's
The mandrakes we have here are still very young.”
She pointed to a series of deep shadows as she spoke, and everyone was confused
Forward for a better view. A hundred or so small, dark green plants
In popularity, they were rising there in ranks. They seem very unpredictable
Harry, who didn’t have the slightest idea what Hermione meant by
Mandrake’s “screaming.”
"Everyone gets a piece of gum," Professor Sprout said.
There was confusion as everyone tried to catch two that weren’t blue.
and the body.
“When I tell you to put them back, make sure your ears are completely open .
They’re lost,” Professor Sprout said. “When it is possible to remove them, I will .
I’ll give you the thumbs up. Of course — ears on.”
Harry put the ear cups over his ears. They made a sound.
completely. Professor Sprout put the mixed, rough pair on her ears.
She pushed up the sleeves of her robe and grabbed one of the hummingbirds tightly,
And he pulled hard.
Harry let out a grunt of surprise that no one could hear.
Instead of roots, it evolved from
floor. The leaves were growing out of his head. He had a delicious
His coat was green, thick, and visibly bleeding at the top of his thighs.
Professor Sprout picked up a large pot of herbs from under the table and dived into it.
Mandrake in it, burying it in the wet, sticky sand until
Tufted leaves were visible. Professor Sprout brushed the dust off her hands and gave
they all had scars, and she took off her own earplugs.
“That o ur Mandrakes are just moss, their calls don’t fight yet,” she says .
She said calmly as if she had done nothing more interesting than water a
Bungunya. “However, they will fuck you for several hours, and as far as I’m concerned .
Make sure neither of you wants to repeat your first day back, make sure that
the blades are securely in place while you work. I will draw your attention.
When it’s time to hire.
“Four to a plate — there is a great stock of tables here — food in .
clothes there — and watch out for the Venomous Tentacula, and
teeth."
She gave a pinch to a dark red scarf as she spoke, making it
pulled into her the long senses that were slowly creeping up her spine.
Harry, Ron, and Hermione were accompanied by a curly hair in their briefcase
The Hufflepuff boy Harry knew intuitively but didn't call out.
"Justin Finch-Fletchley," he whispered, shaking Harry by the arm.
“They know who you are, of course, the famous Harry Potter. . . . And you
Hermione Granger — always first at everything” (hermione glows as she
he had his hand cuffed too) “— and Ron Wesley. Isn’t this your plane?
car?"
Ron didn't shut up. Obviously, Howler is still on his mind.
“It’s that Lockhart thing, isn’t it?” Justin said excitedly as they started
They filled their animal boxes with snowflake litter. “Awful of courage chap.
Have you read his books? I would have died of fear if I had been trapped in a
phone booth by a werewolf, but he stayed cool and — zap — just
outstanding.
“My name is down at Eton, you know. I can’t tell you how happy I was.
I came here instead. Of course, my mother was a little disappointed, but
Since making her read Lockhart’s books I think she’s starting to see how
It would be useful to have a fully trained driver in the family. . . .”
After that they don’t have much of a chance to talk. Their ears were
Back on and they had to focus on the Mandrakes. teacher
Sprout had made it look so easy, but it wasn’t. Mandrakes
He didn’t like getting out of space, but he didn’t seem to want to go back to
He too. They bite, scratch, wiggle their delicate little fingers, and squeeze
their teeth; Harry spent an entire ten minutes trying to hypnotize one person in particular
Fat one into a jar.
By the end of high school, Harry, like everyone else, was sweaty, shivering,
and buried deep. Everyone returned to the castle for a quick wash.
the Gryffindors then hurried off to the Changing.
Headmaster McGonagall's classes were always hard work, but today it was
Especially difficult. Everything Harry learned last year seemed to have
it came off his head in the summer. He was supposed to turn to
potatoes in a bag, but all he accomplished was giving his potatoes a lot
work as she crunches on the desk that supports her income.
Ron had much worse problems. He had tied his wand with
Some borrowed Spellotape, but it seems to have fallen far short. it
He kept squirming and grinning at odd hours, and every time Ron tried to
She changed her tail and swallowed him in smoke a gray ash that smelled like
Rotten eggs. Unable to see what he was doing, Ron failed miserably
His trunk with a snap and had to order a new one. teacher
McGonagal didn't like it.
Harry sighed when he heard the lunch bell. His mind felt like it was being tightened.
sponge. Everyone graduated from high school except him and Ron, who was
He banged his wand furiously on the desk.
“Anxious — useless — thing —”
“Write home for someone else,” Harry suggested as he pulled out a
a volley of blows like a blow.
“Oh, yeah, and visit another Howler,” Ron said, yelling now .
with his handkerchief in his car. “'It’s your own fault your cheese fell .
—'”
They went down to lunch, where Ron’s mood didn’t improve s
Hermione shows them the handful of perfect cupcakes she has
Applies to Exchange.
“What are we having this evening?” Harry said, quickly changing
subject.
“Protection against the dark arts,” Hermione said suddenly.
“Why,” Ron implored, grabbing his plan, “you explained everything .
Lockhart’s lessons in little hearts?”
Hermione picked up the plan and giggled happily.
They finished lunch and went outside to the overcast courtyard.
Hermione sat down on a stone bench and buried her nose in Voyages s
Vampires too. Harry and Ron stood and talked about Quidditch for days
It was 10 minutes before Harry realized he was being closely watched.
Looking up, he saw the very small, mouse haired boy he saw trying on
the top of the Sorting Hat last night looked to Harry like it had been torn apart. was
She grabbed onto what looked like an ordinary Muggle camera, and that moment
Harry looked at it and went bright red.
“Alright, Harry? I’m — I’m Colin Creevey,” he whispered,
take a retrospective approach. “I was in Gryffindor, too. You think —
Would it be okay if — can I have a picture?” He said, picking up the camera.
hopefully.
"picture?" Harry repeated quietly.
"So I can prove I've met you," Colin Creevey said excitedly, simply .
ahead. “I know all about you. Everyone told me. About how
You lived when he tried You knowWho will kill you and how
Lost and everything and how you still got lightning in you
Your voice” (his eyes scanned Harry’s brow) “is a boy in .
Dormitory said that if I painted the film with the right color, the pictures would
Go." Colin let out a big sigh of relief and said, “It's .
Interesting here, isn’t it? I didn’t know that everything odd I could do was magic.
Until I got a letter from Hogwarts. My father is an asshole, he can't
Believe it too. So I take lots of pictures to send him home. and
It would be really nice to have one of you” — he looked at Harry in surprise .
— “Perhaps your friend can get me to stand before you? and
Then can you sign it?”
“Tangible gifts? You use signed photos, Potter?”
Loud and shrill, Draco Malfoy's voice echoed through the courtyard.
He had stopped behind Colin, exposed, as he always was at Hogwarts,
by his distinguished and influential friends, Crabbe and Goyle.
“Everyone line up!” Malfoy shouted to the crowd. “The Introduction to Harry Potter
the tattooed photos came out!”
“No, I’m not,” Harry said angrily, his fists clenching. “Shut up, Malfoy.”
“You’re just cold,” Colin said, his whole body barely having .
tastes like a Crabbe’s tail.
"jealous?" Malfoy said, unnecessarily shouting: Half of .
prison was listening in. “Of what? I don’t want the ugly body on the other side.
My head, thanks. I don’t think cutting your hair makes you so
Specifically, myself.”
Crabbe and Goyle were bursting into tears.
“Eat the shit, Malfoy,” Ron growled. Krabbe stopped laughing and
He began to rub his shoulders in a menacing manner.
“Be careful, Weasley,” Malfoy growled. “You don’t want to start anything .
poverty or your mother will come and pick you up from school.”
He answered a low, low voice. “'If you put another foot outside the fence' —”
A bunch of Slytherin fifth years nearby laughed loudly at that.
“Weasley wants a signed key, Potter,” Malfoy smirked. "to be
Worth more than his whole family’s house—”
Ron waved his wand of magic, but Hermione connected Voyages with
Vampires with a snap and a snarl, “Look!”
“What is all this, what is all this?” Gildruy Lukhart was looking towards
theirs, her turquoise dress swirling behind her. “Who gives a fuck
Pictures?”
Harry started to speak but was cut off when Lockhart put his hand down
on his knees and shouted excitedly, “He doesn’t have to ask! we
Meet again, Harry!”
Curled up next to Lockhart and squirming in shame, Harry saw
Malfoy slide back and forth from the crowd.
"Come then, Mr. Creevey," said Lockhart, pointing at Colin. "a
double portrait, can’t do better than that, and we’ll both sign it for you.”
Colin got his camera and took the picture as the bell rang
Behind them, it was the beginning of dawn.
“Off you go, get over there,” Lockhart called out to the crowd, and he
Back at the castle with Harry, who was hoping to know better
Vanishing Spell, still strapped to her side.
"Word to the wise, Harry," Lockhart said fatherly as they entered .
The building has a side entrance. “I covered you there with .
Young Creevey — if he was making fun of me too, your schoolmates
Don’t think you’ve established yourself too much. . . .”
Listening for Harry's whispers, Lockhart pushed him down a boarded corridor
through the lens of the students and over a window.
“Let me just say that the dissemination of stereotypical images in this age of
The work is unprofessional — he looks rather old-fashioned, Harry, to be quite frank. there
There may come a time when, like me, you’ll need to hold a fork in your hand
Where are you going, though” — he gives a little sigh — “I don’t think you’re .
Still there.”
They arrived at Lockhart's classroom and he let Harry go at last.
Harry pulled his clothes straight on and went to the seat in the middle of the
class, where he challenged himself by compiling Lockhart’s seven essays .
Books in front of him, so he wouldn’t look at what was real.
The rest of the class came around and Ron and Hermione sat down .
On either side of Harry.
"You can fry an egg on your face," Ron said. “You better hope
Creevey never met Ginny, or they would have started liking Harry Potter
club.”
“Shut up,” Harry growled. The last thing he needed was for Lockhart to
They’ve heard the phrase “Harry Potter fan club.”
When all the teens were seated, Lockhart cleared his throat loudly and .
There was silence. He reached forward and picked up a copy of Neville Longbottom's
He talks to Trolls, and holds it up to show his wallet, looking at the
front.
“I am,” he said, pointing at her and grinning at her as well. “Gilderoy Luckhart,
The Scroll of Merlin, Third Season, Dark Power Magic Member
Defense League, and a five-time winner of the Witch Weekly award for best spell — but I’m not talking about that. I didn’t finish Bandon.
Banshee with her looks!”
He had expected them to laugh; Some people sighed in pain.
“I know you all bought a whole set of my books—for free. I
I thought we’d start today with a little question. Nothing to worry about — just
To see how well you read them, how many you catch —”
After giving the examination papers, he went to the front of the
reading and said, “You have thirty minutes — start — now!”
Harry looked down at his paper and read:
1. What color does Gildruy Lukhart like?
2. What is gildruy lukhart's secret wish?
3. What, in your opinion, is Gilderoy Lockhart's main achievement
Until today?
Following this, he proceeded, over three pieces of paper, as far as:
54. When is Gilderoy Lockhart's birthday, and what would be his intention .
Will there be a gift?
Half an hour later, Lockhart collected the papers and pulled out a gun .
including the front of the high school.
“Tut, tut — almost none of you remember that my favorite perfume is .
Lilac. I said that in The Year with Yeti. And few of you should study
Wanderings and Werewolves more seriously — I mean literally in Chapter 10 .
Twelve that my perfect anniversary gift would be a combination of every magic.
and non-magical tribes — although I wouldn’t say no to a big tub of
Old Ogden Whiskey!”
He gave them another cheeky grin. Run was now staring at Luckhart.
With an incredulous look on his face; Simon Finnigan and Din
Thomas, who was sitting nearby, shakes with silent laughter.
Hermione, on the other hand, was listening to Lockhart with great attention
And he made a start when he mentioned her name.
“. . . But Miss Hermione Granger knew my secret intention was to get rid of
The world of luxury and the market for my fancy dressing gown — good girl!
In fact” — he handed her paper back — “perfect rewards! Where is Ms.
Hermione Granger?”
Hermione held up a trembling hand.
"excellent!" exclaimed Lukhart. “Very good! Get ten points for
Gryffindor! And so — to the economy —”
He leaned behind his desk and lifted a large, battered cage onto it.
“Now — hurry! It’s my job to guide you against the worst.
Creatures familiar to Wizardkind! You may find yourselves facing
Worst fears in this room. Just know that nothing bad can happen to you if I
I was here. All I ask of you is to keep quiet.”
Despite himself, Harry relies on his bookshelf for his well-being
Look at the cage. Lockhart put his hand on the board. There and Simus
He stopped laughing now. Neville was squirming in his front row seat.
"I must ask you not to scream," Lockhart said in a low voice. "enable
They disappointed them.”
As the entire class held its breath, Lockhart released the staff.
“Yeah,” he joked. “New-Catch Cornish Whales.”
Seamus Finnigan could barely contain himself. He let out a bark of laughter.
that even Lockhart couldn't have anticipated a terrorist attack.
"Yes?" He smirked at Seamus.
“Well, they’re not — they’re not very bad, are they?” Simon
He was moved.
“Don’t be so stupid!” Lockhart said, gently running his finger through the
Simon. “The devil’s tricky little buggers might be!”
The pixies were electric blue and about eight inches tall, with spikes .
Faces and voices with a smile like listening to several budgies fight.
When the tape was removed, they started talking and
Looking around with guns, trashing streets and making odd faces at people
Close to them.
"Right, then," Lockhart said aloud. “Let’s see what you do with them!”
And the cage opens.
It was pandemonium. Pixies shoot in all directions like missiles.
Two of them grabbed Neville by the ears and lifted him into the air. quite
Shot straight through the window, shattering the back wall into pieces
glass. The rest end up damaging the classroom more efficiently than a
a hunting rhinoceros. Grab the ink cartridges and spray the unit with
They were, they tore books and papers, they tore pictures from walls, they
trash can, grabbed bags and books and hurled them from
a rolling window; Within minutes, half the school was practicing under
Desks and Neville was staring from the iron candy in the ceiling.
“Come on now — squeeze ’em, squeeze ’em, they’re just pixies,”
Lukhart shouted.
He snapped his fingers, clenched his fists, and shouted, “Peskipiksi .
Pasternomy!”
He had no clue at all; One of the clowns grabbed his coat and stomped on it.
She went out the window, too. Lockhart stumbled and rolled under his desk,
He quickly misses Neville's attack, which lands a second later as
The candle gave way.
The bell rang and there was a parade towards the exit. In the near
With shock following, Lockhart straightened up, catching sight of Harry, Ron,
and Hermione, approaching the door, said, 'Well, I'm going to ask you .
Three to just hang the rest of them in their cage.” He passed them
and shut the door quietly behind him.
“Can you believe it?” yelled Ron as one of the remaining clowns
with pain on the ear.
"He just wanted to give us some hands-on experience," said Hermione,
They don’t freeze two frogs at once with a clever Freezing Charm and
tied them back up in their cage.
“Hands on?” said Harry, who was trying to retrieve a dancing rabbit from
He reached his tongue out. "Hermione, he has no idea what he is
did -"
“Nonsense,” Hermione said. “You read his books — look at all those .
marvelous things he has done —”
“He said it was over,” Ron said with a smile.
h
Chapter Seven
THE BLOOD OF THE WOOD AND THE WOODS
Arry spent a lot of time over the next few days avoiding sight.
Whenever Gilderoy saw Lockhart he descended a corridor.
Hardest to avoid was Colin Creevey, who seemed to have memorized .
Harry's plan. Nothing seemed to give Colin more pleasure than saying,
“Alright, Harry?” six or seven times a day and you hear, “Hi, Colin,” over and over, .
Whatever Harry sounded like when he said it.
Hedwig was still mad at Harry for that disastrous bus ride and
Ron's throat still malfunctioning, he ran himself out on Friday morning
By shooting from the hand of Run in Charms and hitting the little old Master
Flitwick quickly between the eyes, creating a large, throbbing green gash
Where i hit. So for one thing and another, Harry was very pleased that
It’s the end of the week. He, Ron, and Hermione were planning to visit Hagrid
On Saturday morning. Harry, however, was distracted for several hours
earlier than he wished by Oliver Wood, captain of the
The Gryffindor Quidditch Club.
“What’s the matter?” Harry said with a chuckle.
“Quidditch training!” Wood said. "series!"
Harry looked out the window. There is a thin layer hanging over the
The sky is a golden blue. Now that he’s awake, he can’t understand how the
He could sleep through the racket the birds made.
“Oliver,” Harry said quietly. “It’s the morning coat.”
“Exactly,” Wood said. He was fat and muscular in sixth year, in
moment, his eyes gleaming with mischievous glee. “It’s part of
Our new training program. Come on, take your body, and let’s go,” he said
Wood with heart. “None of the other teams have started training yet; are
He’s going to be first in line this year —”
Harry got out of bed and tried to
Find his Quidditch uniform.
“Good man,” Wood said. “I’ll meet you on the field in five minutes.”
When he found his red team uniform and pulled up his pants for
summer, Harry wrote a letter to Ron explaining where he went and
Following it was the installation of the shared hall, Nimbus Two.
A thousand on his back. He had just reached the horizon line when there
There was a scream afterwards and Colin Creevey came running up the stairs
staircase, his camera pointing at his head and somethin
He holds her hand.
"I heard someone say your name at the top, Harry!" Look what I have
It got here! I’ve got it, I want to show you —”
Harry looked nervously at the picture Colin was pointing at below
His nose.
A smirking Lockhart, in black and white, was pulling hard on one of Harry's arms .
It is known as his. He was happy to see that his screen self
He was putting up a good fight and refused to be drawn into the spotlight. Like Harry
turning, Lockhart frowned and slumped, panting, against the white center of the
The picture.
“Will you sign it?” Colin said excitedly.
“No,” Harry stammered, looking around to make sure the room was empty .
It’s really empty. “Sorry, Colin, I’m in a hurry — Quidditch practice —”
He stepped out of the window above.
“Oh, wow! Wait for me! I’ve never seen a Quidditch game before!”
Colin slipped into the ditch after her.
“It’s going to be really fun,” Harry whispered, but Colin ignored him, his .
A face shining with joy.
“You were the youngest House player in a decade, weren’t you,
Harry? Aren’t you?” Colin said, stepping beside her. “You should be
nasty. I have never flown. Is it easy? Is this your taste? Is this
the best there is?”
Harry didn't know how to stop it. She seemed to have a
A very talking shade.
"I don't really understand Quidditch," Colin sighed. " true
Are there four balls? And two of them are flying around trying to hit people
From their taste buds?”
“Yeah,” Harry insisted, taking his seat to explain the complicated rules .
of Quidditch. “They called them the Bludgers. There are two of one each.
team who carry clubs to beat the Bludgers away from their side. Fred and
George Weasley and the bastards of Gryffindor.”
“What’s the other curtain for?” Colin asked, fiddling with both
of things because he was staring at Harry with an open mouth.
“Well, the Quaffle — the biggest red one — is the .
goals. Three decks in each team throw a quaffle at each other and try .
And he did it with goal kicks at the end of the pitch — and three .
long dresses with flowers at the end.”
“And the fourth ball —”
“— he’s a golden snitch,” Harry said, “and he’s very young, very stupid, and .
It’s difficult to catch. But that’s what Search has to do, because playing the
Quidditch isn't over until the Snitch is caught. And anyway
Whoever is looking for a group gets Snitch, gets his group one hundred and fifty plus
points.”
“And you’re a Gryffindor Scholar, aren’t you?” Colin said nervously.
“Yeah,” Harry said as they walked out of the castle and started across the frozen grass. “And there’s even a threat. Guards the goal posts.
That’s it, really.”
But Colin didn't stop asking Harry questions all the way up the stairs.
thing to the Quidditch pitch, and Harry just shook it off when he
access to changing rooms; Colin called after her in a low voice, “I’ll .
Go get a better seat, Harry!” And hurried to the huts.
The rest of the Gryffindor team were already in the changing room.
Wood is the only person who seems to have actually woken up. Fred and George
The Weasleys were sitting, with their glazed eyes and slicked back hair, facing the fourth year
Alicia Spinnet, who seemed to be staring at the wall behind her.
His co-stars, Kati Bell and Angelina Johnson, were strolling side by side
With the side opposite them.
“There you are, Harry, what’s holding you back?” Wood said quietly. “Now, I
I want to have a quick chat with you before we actually enter the field.
Because I spent the summer devising a whole new training plan, which
I really think it will make all the difference. . . .”
Wood was holding up a large poster of a Quidditch pitch, about which .
Several lines, strokes, and strokes were drawn with ink of various colors. he
He took off his shirt, touched the board, and the keys started spinning
The diagrams are like coins. As Wood begins in a speech about his
Modern tactics, Fred Weasley's nose hit right on Alicia Spinnet's
shoulders and started shaking.
The first board took nearly twenty minutes to figure out, but there was
Another plate below that, and a third below that. Harry fell into a
stupor as Wood slowly stumbles away.
“Okay,” Wood said, finally releasing Harry from a sad stare on .
What could eat for breakfast at this very hour up in the castle.
“Is that obvious? Any questions?”
"I have a question, Oliver," George said, rising with a giggle.
“Why couldn’t you have told us all this last night when we were waking up?”
Wood didn’t like it.
“Now, listen here, you lot,” he said, pointing at them all. " required
They won the Quidditch Cup last year. We’re simply a better team. but
Unfortunately — due to circumstances beyond our control —”
Harry shifted obediently in his seat. He was unconscious in
hospital wing for the last term of the previous year, meaning
Gryffindor was a mediocre player and was lost to the worst of them all in 2016.
Thirty years.
Wood took a moment to regain his composure. Their latest team is
He appears to still be attacking.
“So this year, we’re training harder than ever. . . . So, let’s go and install
Our new theories to work!” shouted Wood, grabbing his wand and
makes your way out of the bathroom. His legs are heavy and he’s still crawling, his
The team followed.
They had been in the computer room for a long time until the sun came up.
entirely now, though the cloak of hair lay on the grass in the
stadium. As Harry walked to the field, he saw Ron and Hermione sitting
in the shops.
“Aren’t you done yet?” Ron gasped in disbelief.
“You haven’t even started yet,” Harry said, looking jealously at the mess and .
The marmalade that Ron and Hermione brought out of the Great Hall. “Tree
They were teaching us new tricks.”
He mounted his snowshoe, hit the ground, and flew up to the
air. The cold morning air brushed his face, waking him up much more
more intelligent than Wood's long speech. It feels great to be back at
Quidditch field. He took off across the stadium, running.
Fred and George.
“What’s that terrifying ringing noise?” He called Fred while they were searching
Corner.
Harry looked at the toilets. Colin was sitting in one of the high
The chairs, his camera raised, snapping picture after picture, the sound is amazing
specializes in forestry research.
"Look this way, Harry!" This way!” He shouted desperately.
“Who is this?” Fred said.
“No idea,” Harry lied, setting off a series of steps that took him to .
as far away from Colin as possible.
“What’s going on?” Wood said, smirking, as he stared at the sky
Next to them. “Why is that first year taking pictures? I don't like it. he
Could be a Slytherin spy, trying to find out about our new training
constant."
"He's in Gryffindor," Harry said quietly.
"And Slytherins don't need a guardian, Oliver," George said.
“What makes you say that?” Wood said solemnly.
“Because they’re here in person,” George said, pointing out.
Many people in green uniforms were marching onto the field, flags
in their hands.
“I don’t believe it!” Wood sighed angrily. “I prepared the field for
today! We’ll see about that!”
Wood shoots to the ground, landing harder than he meant to in
his anger, shaking slightly as he hopped off the bus. Harry, Fred, and George
followed him.
"rock!" Wood shouted at the Slytherin Captain. “This is our mission .
time! We totally got up! You can breathe now!”
Mark Flint was great even for Wood. He had a trulish look.
sharp on his face as he replied, “Plenty of room for all of us, Wood.”
Angelina, Alicia, and Katie had come too. There are no girls in
The group of Slytherins, who stood shoulder to shoulder, facing
Gryffindors, they turned to a man.
“But I set the field!” Wood said, kindly smiling happily. "I
set it up!”
"Oh," Flint said. “But I have a special signed note here from 2019.
Professor Snap. “I, Professor S. Snape, have given permission for the Slytherin team .
They will train on the Quidditch pitch today due to their training needs
New Researcher.'”
“You got a new Seeker?” Wood said, stunned. "where?"
And from behind the six great films before them, came the seventh.
A small child, all smiles on his thin, pale face. It was Draco Malfoy.
“Isn’t he Lucius Malfoy’s son?” Fred said, looking at Malfoy with
You don’t care.
“It’s funny you should mention Draco’s father,” Flint said fully .
The slytherin team was silent still for the most part. “Let me show you someone interesting .
a gift he made for the Slytherin team.”
All seven released their crossbows. Seven are very refined,
New hands and seven beautiful gold letters that spell words
Nimbus Two Thousand and One gleamed beneath the Gryffindors' flame in
The early morning sun.
“The very latest model. It just came out last month,” Flint said innocently,
He spews a block of mud from the end of himself. “I believe it has surpassed 2019 .
old Two Thousand series in large numbers. While the old
Cleansweeps” — smiled affectionately at Fred and George, who were both .
taking the Cleansweep Five — “shaking the table with them.”
No one from the Gryffindor team could think of anything to say to a
moment. Malfoy was wide-eyed, his cold eyes fixed on the
Resources.
"Oh, look," Flint said. “Blocking the field.”
Ron and Hermione were sneaking into the woods to see what was going on.
“What’s going on?” Run Harry asked. “Why aren’t you playing? and
What’s he doing here?”
He was glaring at Malfoy, sporting his Quidditch Slytherin uniform.
"I'm the new Slytherin Scholar, Weasley," Malfoy said, grinning.
“Everyone was just praising the arrows my dad bought for our team.”
Ron yelled, opening his mouth, into seven elegant grins in front of the
he.
“So, aren’t they?” Malfoy said casually. “But maybe Gryffindor .
The group will be able to pick up some gold and get new arrows, too. You can
By performing that Five Cleansweep; I expect the museum to provide
them."
The Slytherin team roared with laughter.
"At least none of the Gryffindor team would have to buy his way," he said .
Hermione quickly responded. “They came in for pure talent.”
The relieved look on Malfoy's face disappeared.
“No one asked you for your opinion, you filthy little Mudblood,” he sneered.
Harry knew at once that Malfoy had said something bad because .
There was a stammer in his speech. Flint had to fall in front of
Malfoy to stop Fred and George from jumping in, Alicia shouts, “How .
Dare you!” and Ron reached into his pockets and pulled out his wand,
Groaning, “You’ll pay for that one, Malfoy!” and pointed him angrily down
Flint's hand in Malfoy's face.
A loud explosion echoed through the arena and a beam of blue light appeared.
of the wrong end of Ron's wand, it hit him in the stomach and sent him
Him looks back over the grass.
“Run! Run! Are you okay?” exclaimed Hermione.
Ron opened his mouth to speak, but no words came out. Instead he gave
A low beep and several whimpers left her mouth along his cock.
The Slytherin team burst out laughing. Flint was expanded twice,
He hung onto his new sling for support. Malfoy was on all fours.
He strikes the ground with his fist. The Gryffindors were gathered around the
Ron, who kept banging on the big, shiny beads. No one seems to want
Take care of it.
"We'd better get him to Hagrid, she's closer," Harry told Hermione,
who exclaimed bravely, and the two pulled Ron by the arms.
"What happened, Harry?" what happened? Is he sick? But you can heal
He, can’t you?” Colin had fallen from his seat and was now dancing.
beside them as they left the field. It gives Run a big boost and more
Slugs dribbled down the front of it.
“Oooh,” Colin said, excited and picked up his camera. “You can take
Still, Harry?”
“Get out of the way , Colin!” Harry said angrily. He is Hermione.
They helped Ron off the field and he crossed the field to center
of the forest.
“Almost there, Ron,” Hermione said as the pair of witch came came .
In view. “You’ll be up in a minute—almost there—”
They were twenty feet from Hagrid's house when the front door
It opened, but it wasn't Hagrid out. Gilderoy Luckhart, wearing
Wearing the palest mauve today, came together perfectly.
“Quickly, after here,” Harry growled, pulling Ron behind a nearby bush.
Hermione followed, somewhat reluctantly.
“It’s an easy matter if you know what you’re doing!” There was Lukhart
He said aloud to Hagrid. “If you need help, you know where I am! I'll leave
You have a copy of my book. I’m surprised you don’t already have one —
I’ll sign one tonight and send it off. Well, bye!” And he went
By the castle.
Harry waited until Lockhart was out of sight and then released Ron from
Bush and up to Hagrid's front door. They fell flat.
Hagrid suddenly appeared, looking very confused, but his face
She froze when she saw who it was.
“Bin wonderin' when you're coming ter see me — come in, come in —
You think you can make Professor Lockhart again —”
Harry and Hermione helped Ron upstairs to the kitchen of an apartment, which had a large bed in one corner, a fire crackling .
with pleasure in the other. Hagrid didn't seem bothered by the Run pony problem.
Harry explained softly as he placed Ron in a chair.
“Better to go out than in,” he exclaimed, pushing a large copper bucket into .
in front of him. “Get them all up, Ron.”
"I don't think there's anything to do but wait for it to stop," he said .
Hermione sighed, watching Ron roll the tobacco. “It’s difficult
Sworn to act in good time, but with a broken nose—”
Hagrid was busy making them tea. His pig-dog, Fang, was
snapping at Harry.
"What does Lockhart want with you, Hagrid?" Harry asked, shaking his head
Fang’s ears.
“Give me instructions on how to get wildlings out of a well,” said Hagrid,
By the sight of a rabbit being chopped in half from his wiped-out table and throwing
A cup of tea. “It’s like I don’t know. An 'bagin' about some banshee he
He was thrown out. If one word of it is true, I’ll eat my cake.”
It wasn't like Hagrid to criticize the headmaster of Hogwarts, it was Harry .
She looked at him in surprise. Hermione, however, voiced something
Than before, “I think you’re a bit too liberal. Professor Dumbledore
He obviously thought he was the best man for the job—”
“He’s just the man for the job,” Hagrid said, handing them the tray of
Treacle toffee, while Ron smiled shyly into his mouth. “An' I mean
Only one. Gettin' it's very difficult ter to find one fer the practice of the Dark Arts.
People don't often feel ter take it, see. They begin to think that
Jinxed. No one has stayed much fer a while now. So tell me,” Hagrid said,
He turned his head to Ron. “Who was he trying to prank?”
'Malfoy called Hermione something—probably something really bad, .
Because everyone went crazy.”
“It was bad,” Ron mumbled, climbing up on top of the table looking pale .
It's sweat. “Malfoy called it 'mudblood,' Hagrid —”
Ron lost sight of her again as she made a fresh set of their monsters
appearance. Hagrid looked angry.
“He didn’t!” he muttered to Hermione's surprise.
“It works,” she said. “But I don’t know what it means. I can say there is
Really nice, of course —”
“It’s the most pathetic thing he can imagine,” Ron whispered, .
It comes back up. “Mudblood is a really stupid name for someone .
Muggleborn — you know, non-magical parents. There are some witches —
Like the Malfoy family — who think they’re better than everyone else
Because it’s what people call purebloods.” It produced a small stomach, and a
A single slug landed in his outstretched hand. He tossed it in the bag and
She continued, “I mean, the rest of us know it doesn’t make any difference in .
all. Look at Neville Longbuttom — he’s a pure-blood and he couldn’t
They stand a pot a good way up.”
“An' they ain't invented a trick our Hermione can't do,” said Hagrid .
Enraged, she made Hermione walk through the pink sheet of paint.
“It’s painful to call someone,” Ron said, wiping his sweat .
head with shaking hand. “Filthy blood, look. Common blood. is
ridiculous. Most wizards these days are half-bloods anyway. If we didn’t have
He’s married to Muggles and we’re going to die.”
He sighed and was out of sight again.
“Well, I don’t blame you for trying to curse her, Ron,” Hagrid said
louder on the edges of more flies hitting the bass. “Bu' maybe he was a
good yer wand returned. "Come Lucius Malfoy
Marchin' with ter of school if yeh'd know his son. Least yer not in trouble.”
Harry would point out that the problems didn’t come with a lot of
He has fruit coming out of your mouth, but he can’t; Hagrid's Campaign
toffee had messed up his lips completely.
“Harry,” Hagrid said quietly as if struck by a sudden thought.
“Gotta bone ter pick with yeh. I hear you give a preference
Pictures. How come I don’t have one?”
Enraged, Harry gritted his teeth.
“I wasn’t taking stereotypical photos,” he said solemnly. "If Luckhart's
He’s still beating that around—”
But then he noticed that Hagrid was laughing.
“I’m joking,” he said, patting Harry gently on the shoulder and .
By sending him face first at the table. “I know yeh didn’t really. I told him
Lockhart yeh you don't need to. Yer more of it is known without tryn'.”
“Bet he doesn’t like that,” Harry said, sitting up and rubbing his head.
“Don’t think it works,” Hagrid said, his eyes widening. “An' then I said .
Him I've never read one of his books an' decided ter go. finding piles,
Run?” He added when Ron returned.
“No thanks,” Ron said sadly. “It’s better not to mess it up.”
“Come and see what I’ve made,” Hagrid said as Harry and
Hermione finished the last of their tea.
In the small stables behind Hagrid’s house were dozens of
the biggest outfit Harry had ever seen. Each of them was the size of a large
Stone.
“They’re getting on pretty well, aren’t they?” Hagrid said excitedly. “About Halloween .
party . . . It should be as big as possible then.”
“What are you feeding them?” Harry said.
Hagrid looked over his shoulder to make sure they were alone.
“Well, I gave them — you know — a little help —”
Harry noticed Hagrid's green floral scarf resting on the foot.
The kitchen wall. Harry had reason to believe before now that this
Umbrella isn’t all it looks; In fact, he has a strong feeling that
Hagrid's old school bag was hidden inside it. Hagrid shouldn't
You will use magic. He had been expelled from Hogwarts in his third year, but
Harry didn't get why — any reminder of the affair with Hagrid .
He would loudly clear his throat and become mysteriously deaf until
The topic has been changed.
“A Digging Charm, I suppose?” Hermione said, halfway between
Disapproval is fun. “Well, you did a good job on them.”
“That’s what yer little sister said,” Hagrid said, nodding at Ron. "meet
Her jus' yesterday.” Hagrid looked sideways at Harry, his eyebrows twitching.
“She says she’s been just looking around, but I think she’s been waiting.
She can live inter each other in my house.” He winked at Harry. "whether
Yeh ask me, she’ll say no ter a signed —”
“Oh, shut up,” Harry said. Ron roared with laughter and the floor was
He was sprayed with scarves.
“Look at him!” Hagrid yelled, pulling Ron off his
Pumpkins.
It was almost time for lunch, as Harry had just had a glass of
toffee from breakfast, he was eager to go back to school to eat. They said their goodbyes to Hagrid and walked back to the castle, Ron wondering
Sometimes, but they only produce two very small animals.
They were about to set foot in the cold entrance hall when a voice called out,
“There you are, Potter — Weasley.” Professor McGonagall was walking.
To them, he looked solemn. “You will both do your punishment like this .
evening."
“What are we doing, Professor?” Ron said, nervously stifling an eruption.
“Lighting the lamp in the ballroom is Mr. Filch,”
Professor McGonagall said. “And no magic, Weasley — magic potion.”
Run fell. Argus Filch, the guard, was killed by every student in
The school.
“And you, Potter, are going to help Professor Lockhart answer his wife .
Mail,” Professor McGonagall said.
“Oh n — Professor, can’t I go make a curtain room too?” Harry said
Closely.
"Absolutely not," Professor McGonagall said, raising her eyebrows.
“Professor Lockhart asked for you in particular. Eight o’clock in the morning, both
drink.”
Harry and Ron moved into the Great Hall in desperate circumstances,
Hermione behind them, wearing a sort of
expression. Harry didn't care about his shepherd's hat as much as he had expected.
Both he and Ron felt that they had gotten lucky.
"Filch is going to have me there all night," Ron insisted. “No magic! there
There must have been about ten frogs in that room. I’m not good at Muggle
Cleaning.”
“I’d switch anytime,” Harry growled. “I have a lot of busi
and the Dursleys. Responded to Lockhart fan mail . . . will be the
nightmare. . . .”
Saturday afternoon seemed to blur, and in what seemed like nothing
time, it was five minutes to eight, and Harry was dragging his feet
second floor lobby to Lockhart’s office. He brushed his teeth and
He fell.
The door flew open at once. Lockhart brushed past him.
“Oh, here’s the scallop!” he said. “Come in, Harry, come in—”
They are lit by the light of many candles in the walls.
Framed photographs of Lockhart are not counted. He had even signed some
them. Another large box rests on his desk.
“You can call the shots!” Lockhart says to Harry, as if that
She was a great help. “This first one for Gladys Gudgeon, bless her — great .
My defender —”
The minutes pass. Harry let Lockhart's voice wash over him,
Sometimes they say “Mmm” and “Of course” and “Yes.” Now and then he
He catches a phrase like, “Fame is a fickle friend, Harry,” or “Celebrity is like
celebrity does, remember that.”
The kisses curved lower and lower, making the light dance on the
Lockhart's many smiling faces watched him. Harry stiffened his pain.
Give what feels like the thousandth envelope and write Veronica
Smith's address. It must be almost time to go, Harry thought
Unfortunately, please it will be soon. . . .
And then he heard something — something incredibly strange .
of dying candles and Lockhart's screams at his fans.
It is a membrane, a membrane that lines the bone tissue, a respiratory membrane,
Poison cold as ice.
"Come to me. . . . Let me break you. . . . Let me break you. . . . He let
I’m going to kill you. . . .”
Harry let out a deep breath and a huge lilac glow appeared around Veronica.
The way of Smetli.
"what?" He said out loud.
"I know!" Luckhart said. “Six solid months on top of the best-selling book .
list! He broke all records!”
“No,” Harry said angrily. “That voice!”
"Sorry?" Lockhart said, looking confused. “What voice?”
“That — the voice that says — don’t you hear it?”
Lockhart was staring at Harry in utter shock.
"What are you talking about, Harry?" Maybe you bring a little
sleeping? Great Scott — watch the time! We’ve been here almost four
hours! I didn’t believe it — time flew by, didn’t it?”
Harry didn't answer. He was straining his ears to hear the voice again.
But there was no sound now except Lockhart telling him he shouldn't
Expect a similar reaction every time he gets a hit. You feel terrible, Harry
left.
It was so late that the Gryffindor common room was nearly empty.
Harry went straight up to the inn. Ron didn't come back. Harry pulled
On his pyjamas, he got into bed, and waited. Half an hour later, Run arrived.
He waves his right hand and carries a strong smell of polish in the
A dilapidated room.
“My muscles are completely seized,” he groaned, collapsing on his bed.
“Fourteen times he threw that Quidditch Cup at me before
satisfied. And then I had another devastating attack throughout a special award for
services to the school. It took ages to get the slime out. . . . How is it with
Lukhart?”
He kept his voice low as to not scare Neville, Dean, and Seamus,
Harry told Ron exactly what he had heard.
“And Lockhart says he can’t hear it?” Run said. Harry could see it.
Gazing into the moonlight. “You think he was lying? But I don’t get it.
— Even the invisible one had to open the door.”
“I know,” Harry said, sitting down in his four-poster and staring at the clipboard .
the ground above. “I don’t get it either.”
O
CHAPTER EIGHT
THE DAY OF THE DEATH PARTY
October arrived, spreading a wet chill across the land and inside the
castle. Madam Pomfrey, the headmistress, kept working with a sudden sigh.
of coldness among staff and students. Her Pepperup drink works
At the same time, though it leaves the drinker coughing in the ears for hours
After him. Ginny Weasley, who was looking sweet, was mocked in the
picked up something from Percy. Steam rising from under his lively fur gave
Notice that his whole head is on fire.
Bullet-sized raindrops bounced off the castle windows for days.
In the end; The garden grew, the flowerbeds became beds of potatoes, and
Hagrid's socks had swelled to the size of sandboxes. by Oliver Wood
enthusiasm for daily training sessions, however, was not excluded,
That’s why it was so hard to find Harry, on a stormy Saturday afternoon
A few days after Halloween, he returned to Gryffindor Tower and was dismissed to
the cloth and smeared with sand.
Even next to the rain and wind, it was not a happy business.
meeting. Fred and George, who were running for the Slytherin team, had
saw for themselves the power of the new Nimbus Two Thousand and .
one. It was said that the Slytherin team was no more than seven .
red streaks, shooting across the sky like rockets.
While Harry trudged down the path of the forest, he came upon himself.
who seemed just as confused as he was. Almost headless.
Nick, the genius of Gryffindor tower, was watching solemnly from a
Extract, he mutters under his breath, “. . . Don't finish theirs.
Requirements . . . Half a mile, if that . . .”
“Hi, Nick,” Harry said.
“Hello, hello,” said the almost headless Nick, standing and looking around.
He wears a beaded cap, with a scarf over his long hair, and a tunic with
Ruff, who conceals that his hair is nearly finished
He was killed. It was pale as smoke, and Harry could see right through it to
Gray sky and torrential rain outside.
“You look excited, little Potter,” Nick said, giving a puff .
A letter as he spoke and stared at it inside his double.
“Same,” Harry said.
“Oh,” the almost headless Nick shrugged, “the matter of no .
worth. . . . It’s not like I really want to participate. . . . I thought I would do
Please, but obviously I’m not making demands’ —.”
Despite her airy tone, there was a look of intense anxiety on her face.
“But to think, it’s not,” he said quietly, pulling away .
The letter came back from his pocket, “that he had been struck forty-five times in the head .
With a ring of magic will he enable you to join the headless hunt?”
“Oh — yes,” Harry said, obviously having to agree.
“I mean, nobody wishes more than me that everything was perfect and .
clean, and my head came out perfectly, I mean, it would have saved me
A lot of pain and humiliation. But —” Almost headless Nick stopped .
Her letter opened and read angrily:
“'We can only accept hunters whose heads have been split open .
with their bodies. You will admit that it cannot
Otherwise for members to engage in hunting activities such as
The horse’s head is the Polo of the head. He was with the great
I figured, then, that I should let you know that you didn’t keep our promise
Requirements. With very kind regards, Mr. Patrick Delaney-Podmur.'”
Fuming, Nearly Headless Nick filled out the note.
“The sight of a piece of skin makes it a piece of my soul, Harry! further
People will think that's cool and cut their heads off, but oh, no, it doesn't hurt
For Sir Podmore is killed accordingly.”
Almost Headless Nick took several deep breaths, then said, slowly .
Concerned tone, “So — what’s wrong with you? Anything I can do?”
“No,” Harry said. “Not unless you know where we can get seven free .
Nimbus Two Thousand and One for our match against Sly —”
The rest of Harry's sentence was drowned out by a loud voice
Mewling from somewhere near his body. He looked down and found
Himself staring into a pair of silver-green eyes. and Mrs. Norris, and
The bony gray cat used by the protagonist, Argus Filch, is a type of
leader in his endless war against students.
"You better get out of here, Harry," Nick growled. “Filch was never in a
good case - had the flu and some years third was misplaced
the ball of skulls all on the roof in the fifth row. He had cleaned up all
in the morning, and if he sees you throwing up all over the place—”
“Of course,” Harry said, backing away from the Lady’s accusing stare.
Norris, but not quickly. She was drawn to the place by a mysterious force
That seems to connect him to his missing partner, Argus Filch suddenly vanishes
With a button to Harry's right, he hovered and looked carefully for
who breaks the law. A tartan shawl was tied around his head, and
His nose was an unusual red.
“Thought!” he shouted, his lips quivering, his eyes wide with horror as
He pointed to the ball of cheese spilled from Harry's Quidditch.
furniture. “Mess and muck everywhere! I got it, I tell you!
Follow me, Potter!”
So Harry says goodbye to the nearly headless Nick and
Follow Filch down, double the number of feet of bomb
in the ground.
Harry had never been inside Filch's office before; It was a very place
Students are encouraged. The room was dirty and windowless, lit by a single oil.
a lamp hangs from the ceiling below. A faint smell of fried fish lingered.
About the place. Wooden paneled shelves stand along the walls; of them
labels, Harry could see that they contained the details of each student had Filch
He was never punished. Fred and George Wesley had an entire cabinet for
themselves. A collection of highly elaborate chains and suspenders hung on
the wall behind Filch's desk. There is widespread knowledge that there is
She constantly begged Dumbledore to make him stop the students with their breasts.
from the ceiling.
Filch took a glass from a pot on his desk and began to sip at it.
I'm looking for paper.
“Dung,” he exclaimed, “the big buggers . . . frog
Brains . . . Mouse roots . . . I got him what he needed. . . Give an example . . .
Where is that form. . . Yes . . .”
He took out a large piece of paper from his desk drawer and
He stretched it out in front of him and dipped his long black mustache in the ink
cup.
"The name . . . Harry Potter. Battle . . .”
“It’s just a little mud!” Harry said.
"It's just a little bit of heat for you, baby, but it's an extra hour for me
Scrub!” cried Filch, an unpleasant quivering twitch at the end of his
The nose of the bottle. "Battle . . . take the castle . . . suggested phrase . . .”
Blinking through his flaring nose, Filch looked at Harry with displeased eyes,
who waited with bated breath for his load to drop.
But as Filch lowered his hat, there was a big BANG! on the roof
office, which caused the oil lamp to vibrate.
“WARNING!” Filch shouted, slamming his fist in a transfer of anger.
“I’ll have you this time, I will!”
And without even glancing back at Harry, Filch ran on sharp footsteps from the
office, Mrs. Norris snuggled up next to him.
Peeves was the school’s poltergeist, a creepy crawler, crawling through the air
They lived to endure injustice and poverty. Harry didn’t like Peeves much, but
He couldn’t help feeling grateful for his timing. Hopefully, whatever Peeves
He did (and seemingly destroyed something much bigger a long time ago
time) to have Filch shoot Harry.
He thinks that maybe he should wait for Filch to get back, Harry .
He sank into a chair worn down by the desk. There is only one thing in
Apart from its imperfect form: a large, shiny, flat envelope
with silver lettering on the front. With a quick glance at the door to see
that Filch was not on his way back, Harry picked up the envelope and read it:
KWIK Profile
_______________________________________
Secret Lessons in Ancestral Magic
Nervously, Harry opened the envelope and pulled out a bag of
paper on the inside. More silver writing linked on the front page says:
Feeling out of place in the world of modern magic? Find yourself doing
Reasons not to do simple spells? They’re not making fun of you
A painful potato job?
There is an answer!
Kwikspell is an all-new, non-slip, fast, easy-to-use app.
Hundreds of witches and wizards have benefited from Kwikspell .
method!
Mrs. Z. Nettles of Tupsham writes:
“I had no commitment to weddings and my roses were family .
joke! Now, after a course of Kwikspell, I’m an apprentice in
Parties and friends hanging out drinks of my Scintillation Light!”
Didsbury DJ Prod says:
“My wife used to tease me about my weight loss, but one month into your
Awesome Kwikspell course and I was able to turn her into a yak!
Thank you, Quickspell!”
Pleased, Harry thumbed through whatever was left of the envelope.
Why on earth does Filch want Kwikspell training? Does this mean it doesn’t exist?
Proper magician? Harry was just saying “Lesson one: Hold your wand .
(Some useful advice)” when he rubbed his feet outside he told him Filch was .
He's coming back. He stuffed the paper into the envelope and put Harry
She came back on the counter just as the door opened.
Filch was smiling victorious.
“That Vanishing cabinet was so important!” He was talking
Cheers to Ms. Norris. “Let’s have Peeves this time, my sweet —”
His eyes landed on Harry, then shifted to the Kwikspell screen, which,
Harry belatedly realized, he was sitting two feet from where he started.
Filch's grim face turned brick red. Harry braced himself for the water test.
of anger. Filch rushed to his desk, grabbed the envelope, and
He poured it into a cup.
“Have you — read — ?” He drew out.
“No,” Harry said flatly.
Filch’s gnarled hands were twisting together.
“If I thought you were going to read my personal series — not mine — to a friend .
— be it anyway — however —”
Harry was staring at him, confused; Filch wasn't looking foolish. his
Eyes wide, the tick was going through one of his blind spots, and
The tartan scarf didn’t help.
“All right—go—and don’t utter a word—not that—however, if .
You don’t read—go on now, I have to write a Peeves piece—go on—”
Surprised by his luck, Harry stormed out of the office, up the stairs, and
Go back upstairs. Escaping Filch’s office with impunity was
Probably some kind of school paper.
“Harry! Harry! Does it work?”
Nearby headless Nick came storming out of a classroom. Afterwards,
Harry could see the walls of a large black and gold cabinet
He appears to have fallen from a great height.
"I convinced Peeves to put it on Filch's office," Nick said .
willingly. “Think he can pull it off —”
“That was you?” Harry said excitedly. “Yeah, it worked, I didn’t even
Get a break. Thanks, Nik!”
They embarked on a hike together. Almost as brainless as I am, Harry
She saw, he was still holding Sir Patrick’s rejection letter.
“Maybe I have something to do for you on Headless .
Hunt,” Harry said.
Almost headless Nick stopped in his tracks and Harry walked right
by him. He hoped it hadn’t; It was like walking on ice
shower.
“But there’s something you can do for me,” Nick growled.
“Harry — I’ll be very demanding — but no, you don’t want to —”
“What is it?” Harry said.
“Well, this Halloween will be my fifteenth anniversary of death,” said Nearly .
Headless Nick, pulling away and smiling shyly.
“Oh,” Harry said, not sure if he should look sad or happy about .
this. "right."
“They’re having a party downstairs in one of the many cellars of the prison. Friends will
They will come from all over the country. It would be an honor if you
He will be careful. Mr. Weasley and Mrs. Granger would be very much invited, too,
Of course — but I’m sure you’d rather go to the school concert?” he
She looked at Harry over the pillows.
“No,” Harry whispered, “I’m coming—”
“My dear child! Harry Peter, in honor of my death anniversary! And” — he
You hesitate, smiling brightly — “do you think you can mention to .
Sir Patrick how did you find me so terrified and so embarrassed?”
“N — sure,” Harry said.
He almost choked on a headless Nick.
“A Day of the Dead party?” Hermione said softly as Harry finally changed
And joined her and Ron in the common room. “I bet there aren’t many
Living people who can claim to belong to one of those — be
fascinating!"
“Why would anyone want to celebrate the day they died?” Run said,
who was halfway through his Potions task and growling. "terms
He died making me sad. . . .”
The snow was still pelting the windows, which were now black as ink, but
Inside they all look relaxed and happy. The firelight shines on the
Countless squashy chairs where people sit and read, chat, work
homework or, in the case of Fred and George Weasley, trying to find
What happens if you feed the Filibuster fire to a salami. Fred
He had “rescued” the beautiful, fire-living orange monster from a Care n
Reading Magical Creatures and she was currently floating wildly on the table
surrounded by a crew of intelligent people.
Harry was on the verge of telling Ron and Hermione about Filch and
Kwikspell course when the salamander suddenly appeared in the air,
She lets out high whistles and whistles as she carefully moves around the room. the
the sight of Percy gently nudging himself towards Fred and George,
Amazing display of mandarin starfish leaping from a salamander
for, and its flight into the fire, with the hurricanes that accompanied it, discharged
Both Filch and the Kwikspell tablet from Harry's mind.
By the time Halloween came around, Harry was regretting his awkward promise to
Go to a Day of the Dead party. The rest of the school waited eagerly.
their Halloween party; The main hall is decorated as it once was.
Animated animals, Hagrid's giant puppets that turn into giant lanterns
It took three men to fit in, and it was rumored that Dumbledore had
They formed a dancing skeleton crew for entertainment.
“A promise is a promise,” Hermione reminded Harry teasingly. “You said
You’re going to the Day of the Dead party.”
So at seven in the morning, Harry, Run, and Hermione walked right past the
The entrance to the crowded main hall, which was faintly glittering with
gold cloaks and cloth, and stretched out their arms instead to the
prison.
The path leading to Nick’s nearly headless party was paved
With leather, too, though the effect is far from happy: These were
Tall, thin, jet black, all burning bright green, tossing a rose blue
light even on their living faces. She became warmer with each
step they took. As Harry grins and pulls his shirt tighter towards him,
He heard what sounded like a thousand feet tapping a large
The red carpet.
“Is that supposed to be music?” Run whined. They turned a corner.
And he saw a nearly headless Nick standing at a door hung in black .
The judge of the judge.
“My dear friends,” he said sadly. “Hello, hello . . . so
I’m grateful you could come. . . .”
He unscrewed his thick cock and folded them inside.
It was an incredible sight. The stage was filled with hundreds of coral-white, white people, most of whom spun on a crowded dance floor,
A horrible, shuddering sounding waltzing of thirty strings of music, playing
by a choir on a raised, red-topped platform. Overhead candlestick
Blazed twelve blues with a thousand other black candles. Their breath
He grew up in a forest near them; It’s like going into a freezer.
“Shall we take a look around?” Harry suggested, wanting to warm up
His feet.
“Be careful not to walk into one,” Ron said nervously, and they set up .
off near the edge of the dance floor. A group of volunteers passed
The Nun, the grumpy guy who wears chains, and the Fat Friar, the happy guy
The Hufflepuff ghost, who was talking to a knight with a ring that came out of
His last one. Harry wasn't surprised to see that the Bloody Baron, a madman,
He looked at the Slytherin genius covered in silver blood, given a
Berth upside down by the other ghosts.
“Oh, no,” Hermione said, stopping abruptly. “Turn around, turn around, I
You don’t want to talk to Myrtle smiling —”
"who?" Harry said as they hurried on.
“It’s going down one of the toilets in the bathroom on the first floor,”
Hermione said.
“Are you taking care of the kitchen?”
"Yeah. All year he's been out of order because she keeps getting upset.
and clearing the site. I wouldn’t have gone in there anyway if I could have stopped it; is
panic trying to have a pee with her pussy straddling you —”
“Look, food!” Run said.
On the other side of the lobby was a long table, also draped in black .
The judge. They were almost happily marching but the next moment they were stuck in their house
Tracks, terribly. The smell was so disgusting. Big, aggressive fish were
placed on beautiful silver dishes; The cakes, burned black as charcoal, were
They are independent of intermediaries; There was a giant Maggoty Haggis, a cheese board
Covered with smoky fresh coffee and, to the delight of the place, great brown bread
In the shape of a tomb, with tar-like ice covering the words,
SIR NICHOLAS OF MIMSIPURPINGTON
died 31st OCTOBER, 1492
Harry watched, surprised, as a ghost approached the table.
He nodded, walking through it, his mouth purposefully clamped shut to pass
with one of the salmon filling up.
“Can you taste it if you walk in it?” Harry asked.
“Almost,” the ghost said sadly, and stormed off.
"I expect they'll let it sink to give it a stronger weight," Hermione said .
Intuitively, she pinches her nose and bends down to look at the missing woman.
Haggis.
“Can we move? I feel sick,” Ron said.
They were about to turn around, however, when a small man
Suddenly from under the table, he stopped in the air in front of them.
“Hi, Peeves,” Harry said cautiously.
Unlike the ghosts around them, the Peeves Poltergeist was the .
reverse the top and bottom. He was wearing a bright orange party t-shirt.
a moving leather tie, and a big grin on his big, wicked face.
"animal?" He said sweetly, handing them a peanut butter covered with
animal.
“No thanks,” Hermione said.
"I heard you talking about poor Myrtle," Peeves said, his eyes dancing.
“Rude you were about poor Myrtle.” He took a deep breath and shouted,
“Oh! MIRTLA!”
“Oh, no, Peeves, don’t tell him what I said, he’ll be really sorry,”
Hermione smiled proudly. “I don’t mean to, I don’t mind — er, .
Hey, Myrtle.”
The squat ghost of a woman had glided about. She has a completely scrunched up face.
He didn't notice Harry, half hidden behind dark, blond hair
Forests.
"what?" She said calmly.
“How are you doing, Myrtle?” Hermione said in a disgusted voice. "is
Glad to see you leaving the bathroom.”
Myrtle sniffed.
“Miss Granger was just talking about you —” Peeves sneered in
Myrtle's ear.
“I’m just saying—I’m saying—how lovely you are tonight,” Hermione said,
She looked at Peeves.
Myrtle looked at Hermione suspiciously.
“You made me cry,” she said, silver tears slowly streaming down her cheeks .
Small, observant eyes.
“No — honestly — didn’t I just say how pretty Myrtle looked?” said
Hermione, rubbed Harry and Ron painfully in the ribs.
“Oh, yes —”
“She did —”
“Don’t lie to me,” Myrtle said, tears now streaming down her face, .
While Peeves giggled merrily over her shoulder. “You think I don’t know
You know what people say to me behind my back? Myrtle Body! Ugly Myrtle!
Stupid, looking, looking Myrtle!”
"You forgot pimply," Peeves whispered into her ear.
A smiling Myrtle leaves in a scream of pain and escapes the prison.
Peeves shoots her behind, kicking her with cotton seeds, shouting, “Pimply!
sound!"
“Dear,” Hermione said sadly.
Almost Headless Nick now stalked towards them through the crowd.
“Are you having fun?”
“Oh, yeah,” he lied.
“It’s not a bad joke,” the nearly headless Nick said proudly. “Procrastination .
Widow came all the way across from Kent. . . . The time for my speech is approaching.
I'd better go warn the orchestra. . . .”
However, the orchestra stopped playing at that exact moment. They, the
Everyone else in the lobby, silently, looked around frantically, like
You heard a sick cry.
“Oh, here we go,” said the nearly headless Nick casually.
Out of the fortress walls burst forth dozens of ghostly horses, each ridden by a
The headless traveler. The assembly nodded in agreement; Harry started to blush,
He did too, but he quickly stopped when he saw Nick's face.
The horses trotted to the edge of the dance floor and stopped.
development and destruction. At the front of the herd was a giant ghost holding
His bearded head under his arm, from which he protrudes
horn. The giant jumped up and raised his head high in the air to see
over to the crowd (everyone laughed), and he moved on to Nearly Headless .
Nick, tilts his head back.
“Nick!” he shouted. "How are you doing? The head is still hanging in there?”
He gives a hearty guffaw and taps Nick almost headless on
shoulder.
“Good luck, Patrick,” Nick said reluctantly.
“Live 'uns!” Sir Patrick said, seeing Harry, Ron, and Hermione and
He gives a big, fake jump of surprise, so that his head hits again
(Crowd roars with laughter).
“Pretty much fun,” the nearly headless Nick said with a grin.
“Don’t worry Nick!” Sir Patrick's head rang from the ground. "still
upset we weren’t allowed to join the Hunt! But I mean — look at the .
fellow -"
“I suppose,” Harry said quietly, with a meaningful glance from Nick, “Nick’s .
Very — scary and — er —”
“Ha!” said the head of Sir Patrick. “Bet he asked you to say that!”
“If I could have everyone’s attention, it’s time for my talk!” said
Almost unconscious Nick screams louder, staggers to the bathroom and gets worse
In an eruption of lightning.
“My martyr mourns sir, ladies, and gentlemen, my greatness .
grief . . .”
But no one heard much more. Sir Patrick and the rest of the brainless
Hunt had just started a Head Hockey game and the crowd was heading towards .
watch. Almost headless Nick tried in vain to regain his crew, but .
He waved as Sir Patrick’s head went sailing past him in great excitement.
Harry was so cold now, not to mention hungry.
“I can’t stand much of this,” Ron muttered, his teeth gritting, as .
The orchestra returns to action and the ghost returns to
The dance hall.
“Let’s go,” Harry agreed.
They turned back towards the entrance, smiling and waving at anyone who
They looked at them, and a minute later they were hurrying down the street
It is filled with black candles.
“I guess Pudding isn’t finished,” said Ron hopefully, the head of
Path to the entrance hall window.
And then Harry heard it.
“. . . rip . . . tear . . . kill . . .”
It was the same voice, the same cold, murderous voice he had heard in
Lukhart's office.
He fell to a stop, leaned against the stone wall, heard himself all
He could, looking around, pacing up and down the dimly lit sidewalk.
“Harry, what are you — ?”
“It’s that voice again — calm down a bit —.”
“. . . I'm so hungry. . . It’s been a long time . . .”
"listen!" Harry said suddenly, and Ron and Hermione froze, watching
he.
“. . . kill . . . time of crime. . .”
The voice was getting louder. Harry was sure she was blushing —
He looks up. A mixture of fear and excitement kept him the same
staring at the dark ceiling; How will it be moving upwards? He was a
phantom, for whom the rock ceiling is not worthy?
“Right,” he yelled, and started running, faster and faster, towards .
The entrance hall. It wouldn’t be fair to hope to hear anything here, through the
the whisper of a Halloween party was echoing from the Great Hall. Harry
Climbing quickly up the marble staircase to the first floor, Ron and Hermione
They squirmed after him.
“Harry, what are we —”
“Chh!”
Harry pricked up his ears. away, from the atmosphere above, and growing
Still pale, he heard the voice: “. . . I smell blood. . . . I HAVE blood!”
Her stomach tightened —
“Kill someone!” he shouted, and ignored Ron's and
Hermione's face was shocked, he ran to the next branch of the third floor in a
time, trying to slide over his throbbing feet —
Harry rushed through the second floor, Ron and Hermione
Hovering behind him, not stopping until they turned the circle to the final,
The path created.
“Harry, what’s that all about?” Ron said, wiping the sweat from his face. "I
He couldn't hear anything. . . .”
But Hermione gave a quick gasp and pointed down the hallway.
"look!"
Something was glowing on the wall in front of him. approached quickly,
Staring into the darkness. Foot-sized words splashed across
The wall between two windows, gleaming in the light emitted by the flame
Festivals.
THE SECRET ROOM IS OPENED. The punishment of
NEXT, BEWARE.
“What’s that—that’s lying underneath?” Ron said, with a small chuckle in the
His voice.
As they got closer, Harry nearly fainted — there was a huge puddle .
of water on the ground; Ron and Hermione caught up with him, and squeezed
Towards the message, the eye focuses on a dark shadow below. Three n
They realized what it was at once and jumped back with a smile.
Mrs. Norris, the defendant's partner, was hanged upside down on his
Tribe. She was as rigid as a board, her eyes wide and moving.
For a few seconds, they don’t move. Then Ron said, "Let's get out of .
here."
“We shouldn’t be trying to help —” Harry began awkwardly.
“Trust me,” Ron said. “We don’t want to find here.”
But it was too late. A voice, like distant thunder, told them
that the same ceremony was over. From either side of the road where they
Standing came the sound of a hundred feet coming up the pavement, and a loud,
the happy talk of well-fed people; Next time, students struggle in the
Text from both sides.
The conversation, the commotion, the noise suddenly died down as the people around
He sees the hanged cat. Harry, Ron, and Hermione stood alone, in the
midway, when silence fell amidst the crowd of demanding students
up to see that spectacular view.
Then someone shouted out of the silence.
“Enemies of the Heir, beware! You’ll be next, Mudbloods!”
It was Draco Malfoy. Pushed to the front of the crowd, his cool
His eyes were alive, his usually bloodless face red, as he smiled when he saw
The hanging cat, not moving.
W
CHAPTER THREE
writing on the wall
Hat going on here? What’s going on?”
Unquestionably attracted by Malfoy's ire, Argus Filch arrived .
waving his way through the crowd. Then he saw Mrs. Norris and froze .
later, he touched his face in despair.
“My partner! My partner! What happened to Mrs. Norris?” he screams.
And his eyes flickered falling on Harry.
"you!" he shouted. "You! You killed my cat! You killed her!
I'll kill you! sick -"
“Argus!”
Dumbledore arrived on the scene, followed by several other
teachers. In a matter of seconds, he pushed past Harry, Ron, and Hermione and
You unhooked Mrs. Norris from the steering wheel.
"Come with me, Argus," he said to Filch. “You too, Mr. Butter, sir.
Weasley, Miss Granger.”
Lockhart carefully stepped forward.
“My office is the nearest one, Headmaster—just upstairs—please feel free .
—”
"Thank you, Gilderoy," Dumbledore said.
The silent crowd agreed to let them pass. Lockhart, looking proud and
Crucially, he tried after Dumbledore; As did Professors McGonagall and
Snap.
As they entered Lockhart’s dilapidated office, there was a sense of
movement on schools; Harry had seen a lot of Lockhart in
Images spilled from the eyes, their hair in eyebrows. The real Lockhart introduced
dress on his desk and stood back. Dumbledore placed Mrs. Nuris on the
He quickly backed up and started kissing her. Harry, Ron, and Hermione
They met eager glances and sank into the chairs outside the circle of candlelight.
observe.
The tip of Dumbledore’s long, pointed nose was barely an inch from
The body of Mrs. Norris. He was watching her half moon closely.
the screen, his long fingers quivering gently and curling. teacher
McGonagall was frowning almost as much, her eyes closed. Snap appears
Behind them, half in shadow, he wore one of the most beautiful expressions: He was like
though he was trying hard not to stare. And Lockhart was hovering
All of them, I make suggestions.
“It was obviously a monster that killed her — probably a Transmogrifian .
Torture — I’ve seen it used many times, so luckily I wasn’t there, I know .
that very curse will save her. . . .”
Lockhart’s lyrics are punctuated by Filch’s dry, irritating rhymes. he
He was sitting in a chair by the desk, unable to look at Mrs. Norris, his face
In his hands. As much as he hated Filch, Harry couldn't help but feel a bit
He forgave him, though not nearly as much as he did himself. whether
Dumbledore believed Filch, he would surely be expelled.
Dumbledore was now mumbling dirty words under his breath and
He stabs Mrs. Norris with his fist, but nothing happens: She continues
It will look like it was recently filled.
“. . . I remember something similar happening in Ouagadogou,”
Lockhart said, “it’s a series of murders, the whole story in my career, I .
He could give the townspeople various items, which cleaned
issue at once. . . .”
Lockhart’s paintings on the walls all focused on
Agreement as he talked. One of them forgot to remove his hair plant.
Finally, Dumbledore cleaned himself up.
"You're not dead, Argus," he whispered.
Lockhart stopped abruptly in the midst of calculating the number of
crimes he had stopped.
“Isn’t he dead?” said Filch, pointing his fingers at Mrs. Norris.
“But why all — all tight and scared?”
“She was protected,” Dumbledore said “oh! I think so!”
Lukhart). “But how, I cannot say. . . .”
“Ask him!” cried Filch, turning his tear-stained face to .
Harry.
"No second year can do that," Dumbledore said firmly. "it
It will take the Dark Magic of the most advanced —”
“He did it, he did it!” Filch spat, his bubble face twisting. “You see
The writing on the wall! He found — in my office — he knew I was —
I’m —” Filch’s face worked in horror. “He knows I’m a Squib!” he
finished.
“I didn’t touch Mrs. Norris!” Harry said aloud, unconscious
of anyone looking at him, including all the Lockharts on the walls. "and
I don’t even know what a Squib is.”
"rubbish!" exclaimed Filch. “He saw my Kwikspell letter!”
“If I may speak, Headmaster,” Snape said from around the corner, and .
Harry's grin grew smugly; He was sure that there was nothing Snape should do.
Say was going to do him some favors.
“Maybe Potter and his friends are just in the wrong place in .
wrong timing,” he says, a sly grin curling his mouth as if he .
He doubted it. “But we have a questionable set of circumstances here. why
Is it in the middle section at all? Why it’s not on Halloween
party?"
Harry, Ron and Hermione all launch into an explanation about
The Day of the Dead party. “. . . There are hundreds of species, they will tell you we
They’re there —”
“But why don’t you join the party later?” Snape said, his black eyebrows
They shimmered in the candlelight. “Why go down to that store?”
Ron and Hermione looked at Harry.
“Because—because—” said Harry, his heart beating rapidly;
Someone told him it would sound awkward if he told them he had
He is accompanied there by a disembodied voice that no one but himself can hear, “For we .
They were tired and they wanted to go home,” he said.
“Without any dinner?” Snape said, a triumphant smile flashing through his
His pale face. “I don’t think ghosts provide enough food for living people in
Their parties.”
“We weren’t hungry,” Ron said aloud as his stomach gave a big growl .
Rumble.
Snape's wicked smile widened.
“I suggest, Deputy Director, that Potter isn’t entirely telling the truth,” he said .
said. “It might be a good idea to take some of the tags off him .
Until he tells us the whole story. I personally feel it should be
He’s withdrawn from the Gryffindor Quidditch team until he’s ready.”
"Honestly, Severus," Professor McGonagall said quietly, "I don't see the reason .
To stop the boy playing Quidditch. This cat wasn’t hit over the head with
A craft stick. There is no evidence that Butter did anything.
wrong."
Dumbledore was giving Harry a searching look. Her blossoming flower
The sight made Harry feel like he was being X-rayed.
"Innocent until proven guilty, Severus," he said firmly.
Snape looked angry. So did Filch.
“My partner is a bit-tribid!” He turns, his eyes wide. “I want to
See some prison!”
"We'll be able to heal her, Argus," Dumbledore said patiently.
“Professor Sprout recently managed to produce some mandrakes. And soon
As soon as they reached their full weight, I would be given a drug that
They resurrected Mrs. Norris.”
'I will,' Lockhart whispered, 'I must do it a hundred times.
I could rattle off a Mandrake Restoration Episode in my sleep —”
“Sorry,” Snape whispered. “But I think I am the Potions master in .
This school.”
There was a very awkward pause.
"You may go," Dumbledore told Harry, Run, and Hermione.
They went, as far as they could without actually breaking. when
They were a block away from Lockhart’s office, became empty
call and quietly shut the door behind them. Harry narrowed his eyes.
The glowing faces of friends.
“Do you think I should tell them about the sound I heard?”
“No,” Ron said, without hesitation. “Hearing voices that no one else can hear .
Not a good sign, even in the Wizarding world.”
Something in Ron’s voice made Harry ask, “Believe me, you don’t .
you?"
“'Course I suppose,” Ron said quietly. “But — you must admit that it’s .
weird. . . .”
“I know it’s weird,” Harry said. “This whole thing is weird. What is this?
Writing on the wall about? The room opened. . . . What is this?
Should he say?”
“You know, she’s ringing a kind of bell,” Ron said quietly. “I think someone .
He told me a story about a secret room at Hogwarts once . . . enable
There was Bill. . . .”
“What Squib Castle?” Harry said.
To his surprise, Ron held back a breath.
"Well — it wasn't really funny — but that's how Filch was," he said. “A Squib is
Someone who was born into a Wizarding family but doesn't possess any magic
Skills. Kind of a bunch of Muggle-born wizards, but Squibs are pretty much
unusual. If Filch is trying to learn magic from a Kwikspell course, I think
It must be a Squib. It would explain a lot. Like why does he hate students so much
Very." Ron gave a satisfied smirk. “delicious.”
A clock rang somewhere.
“Midnight,” Harry said. “We better get to bed before Snape comes .
along and trying to serve us the judgment on the rest.”
Some days the school could talk about nothing but the Massacre.
Nuris. Filch keeps it fresh in everyone’s minds by visiting the place where
It was occupied, and he seemed to think that his attacker was coming back.
Harry watched as he scratched the message on the wall with that of Mrs. Skower .
Shooting all-purpose magical fire, but to no avail; The words are still
shining as always on the rock. When Filch wasn’t attacking
murder victim, he was staring wide-eyed in the streets,
They prey on unsuspecting students and try to put them in jail.
for things like “breathing heavily” and “looking happy.”
Ginny Weasley seemed taken aback by Mrs. Norris' argument. according
To Ron, she was a great cat lady.
"But you don't really know Mrs. Norris," Ron told her .
seriously. “Honestly, we’re doing pretty well without him.” Ginny's Bone
Tergiz. “Things like this don’t happen often at Hogwarts,” Ron pointed out .
her. “Catch the maniac who did it and get him out of here in nothing
time. I just hope he has time to Petrify Filch before he gets expelled. am
Only jokingly —” Ron added quickly as Ginny blabbed.
The attack had also had an effect on Hermione. It was customary to
Hermione would spend a lot of time reading, but now she was about to do
Nothing else. Even Harry and Ron couldn’t get much of a response when
They ask her what she thinks, and it’s not until next Wednesday
They find out.
Harry was locked up in Potions, where Snape made him stay
Behind to clear the steamed chickens from the boards. After a quick lunch, he went
upstairs to meet Ron at the library, and saw Justin FinchFletchley, the
The Hufflepuff boy from the junior high school was walking towards him. Harry has just had
He opened his mouth to say hello when Justin saw him and turned
quickly, and dashed off in the opposite direction.
Harry finds Ron in the corner of the library, confessing his history of
Magic homework. Professor Binns asked for three feet in length
commentary on the “Collection of Medieval European Archaeologists.”
“It’s unbelievable, I’m still eight inches away. . . .” Run said angrily.
He pulled out his paper, which appeared largely to be a document. "and
Hermione makes four feet seven inches and her writing is tiny.”
“Where is she?” Harry asked, grabbing the measuring tape and unwrapping it.
his homework.
“Somewhere in there,” Ron said, gesturing to the border of the windows.
“I was looking for another book. I thought you tried to read the whole library.
before Christmas.”
Harry tells Ron about Justin FinchFletchley riding on him.
“Dunno why you care. I thought he was a bit of an idiot,” Ron said,
Sneakily, he makes his writing as big as possible. “All that bullshit
On Lockhart because he’s so big —”
Hermione disappeared from between the bookshelves. She looks annoyed.
And he finally seemed ready to talk to them.
"The entire cast of Hogwarts: History has been cancelled," she said,
They sat down next to Harry and Ron. “And there was a two-week waiting list. I
I wish I hadn’t left my groceries at home, but I couldn’t put it in my backpack with
All of Lockhart’s books.”
“Why do you want it?” Harry said.
“The same reason everyone else wants to,” Hermione said, “to read up .
About the legend of the House of Mail.”
“What’s that?” Harry said quietly.
“That’s all. I can’t remember,” Hermione said, biting her lip. “And I
Can’t find the story anywhere else —”
“Hermione, let me read your biography,” Ron growled,
He checks his watch.
“No, I won’t,” Hermione said, suddenly nervous. “You have ten days to
Finish it —”
“I just need two more fingers, come on —”
The tree fell. Ron and Hermione led the way into the history of magic,
Biking.
The history of the bell is the most fascinating topic in their program. teacher
Binns, who taught it, was their only teacher of Hell, and he was most entertaining .
The thing that happens in his class is he enters the room with
The red carpet. Old and tattered, many people said it didn’t look
He was dead. He just got up to teach one day and left the body.
behind him in an armchair by the staff-room fire; His routine has
It’s not the slightest bit different since.
Today was amazing as always. Professor Binns opened his classes and
They started reading on a tablet drone like an old computer until they approx
Everyone at school is on a deep break, sometimes he comes to class
enough to form a name or a date, and then fall asleep again. have
He was talking for half an hour when something unexpec
It’s happened before. Hermione dropped her hand.
Professor Binns, looking on in the midst of a heated lecture on the death penalty.
of the International Warlock Charter of 1289, looked proud.
“Mrs — er — ?”
“Granger, Professor. I was wondering if you could tell us something about
The suite room,” Hermione said in a clear voice.
Dean Thomas, who was sitting with his mouth open,
He looks out the window, out of his trance; Brown Lavender Nose
He slipped out of her arms and Neville Longbottom’s eyebrow slipped out of his
desk.
Professor Binns rolled his eyes.
“My subject is the history of the vulture,” he says in his harsh, raspy voice. "I
Face facts, Miss Granger, not myths and legends.” He cleaned his property.
A voice with a low tone like a whistle and he continued, “In .
In September of that year, a subcommittee of creditors of Sardinia —.”
He was so scared that he stopped. Hermione's hand was waving in the air again.
“Ms. Grant?”
“Please, sir, don’t laws always have a basis in truth?”
Professor Binns was looking very amused at her, Harry was sure
No student had ever killed him before, living or dead.
“Well,” Professor Binns snapped, “yeah, one could argue that, I .
Let's say." He looked at Hermione as if he hadn't seen a student.
Right before. “However, the poetry you speak of is much more
a tragic story, even a tragic tale —”
But the entire class was now hanging on Professor Binns’ every word.
He looked at them all blankly, each face turned to his own. Harry could tell her
It’s completely driven in such an unusual way.
“Oh, very nice,” he said quietly. “Let me see . . . The room of
Secret . . .
“You all know, of course, that Hogwarts has been established for over a thousand years .
years ago — the exact date is unknown — by the Four Great Magicians .
and Wizards of the Season. Four schoolhouses are named after them:
Goodrick Gryffindor, Helga Hufflepuff, Rowena Ravenclaw, and Salazar
Slytherin. They built all these castles, away from Muggle eyes, i
It was a time when ordinary people were afraid of magic, witches and
They’re very easy.”
He paused, looked blankly around the room, and continued.
“A few years ago, the founders were working in negotiations together, looking for
Young men who reveal magic signs and raise them to the castle to
He will be reading. But then disagreements arose between them. He started a riot.
He would grow up among Slytherins and the others. Slytherin wanted to be the most
selection on students admitted to Hogwarts. He believes that
The learning of magic must be maintained within all magical families. He doesn't like
They take Muggle witch students and see them as untrustworthy.
After some time, there was a serious debate on this topic among
A Slytherin is a Gryffindor, and a Slytherin dropped out of school.”
Professor Binns paused again and licked his lips, looking like a frown .
The old ship.
“Reliable historical sources tell us as much,” he said. “But these
The real truth is revealed in the dramatic drama of the Room of
The secret. The story goes that Slytherin built a hidden room in the
castle, of which the other founders knew nothing.
“Slytherin, according to legend, flooded the Chamber of Secrets with this .
that no one would open it until its true owner came to
school. The only official who will be able to unlock the Chamber of Secrets,
Unleash the horror within, and use it to cleanse the universe of all who are
He doesn’t deserve to study magic.”
There was silence when he finished the story, but not always,
The sleepy silence that filled Professor Binns’s classrooms. There is interest in
the air as everyone continued to see it, hoping for more. teacher
Binns looked sorry.
"It's all nonsense arrant, of course," he said. “Naturally, the
The school has been searched for evidence of such a room, repeatedly, by
of nurses and nurses learned much. It doesn't exist. A story told to
they have confounded the righteous.”
Hermione's hand was back in the air.
“Sir — what exactly do you mean by 'horrors within' the House?”
"That was believed to be some sort of mischief, the Hero of
Only a Slytherin can rule,” Professor Binns said in his dry, gravelly voice.
The set replaces the nerve eye.
"Let me tell you, that thing doesn't exist," Professor Binns said, rubbing his forehead .
opportunities. “There’s no Chamber and there’s no monster.”
“But, Sir,” said Seamus Finnigan, “only if the Chamber cannot be opened .
By the true leader of Slytherin, no one else can find it, right?”
"That's absurd, O'Flaherty," Professor Binns said in a serious tone. "whether
A long series of failed Hogwarts Headmasters and Headmistresses
He found the thing—”
“But, Professor,” Parvati Patil chimed in, “perhaps you should use .
Dark magic to open it —”
“Just because a wizard doesn’t use Dark Magic doesn’t mean he can’t,
Mrs. Pennyfether,” Professor Binns said suddenly. “I mean, if the likes of
Dumbledore—”
"But maybe you must be related to Slytherin, so Dumbledore
He can’t —” Dean Thomas began, but Professor Binns had had enough.
“That will do,” he said firmly. “It’s a vision! It wasn't! was
Not one bit of evidence that Slytherin didn’t build so much as a secret vault
cupboard! I envy you such a lovely story! We'll be back, if you
Please, to history, to solid, believable, verifiable truths!”
And within five minutes, the class had fallen back to its usual luster.
"I've always thought of Salazar Slytherin as a twisted old fool," Ron told Harry .
and Hermione as they fight their way through the twisting streets of
The end of the lesson to put away their dishes before dinner. “But never
He knows he started all this pureblood business. I wouldn’t be in his house if you
He paid me. Honestly, if the Sorting Kid had tried to put me in Slytherin,
I’d take the train straight home. . . .”
Hermione nodded furiously, but Harry didn't say anything. His stomach
He had just hit and didn’t like it.
Harry never told Ron and Hermione that the Sorting Cup had
They seriously considered putting him in Slytherin. He can remember, like
Though it was yesterday, that tiny voice that spoke in his ear when
He had put the cap on his head the year before: You can be great, you
You know, it’s all here in your head, and Slytherin will help you along the way to
Great, no doubt about that. . . .
But Harry, who had already heard of Slytherin House's reputation for
turning out to be high wizards, they were horribly thought, not slytherin! is
Hat had said, Oh, well, if you’re sure . . . Better to have Gryf indoors. . . .
As they waded through the crowd, Colin Creevey passed.
“Hi, Harry!”
“Hi, Colin,” Harry said automatically.
“Harry — Harry — a boy in my class was flirting with you —”
But Colin was so small that he couldn’t fight against the horde of people.
leading towards the Great Hall; He could be heard whispering, “See you, .
Harry!” And he went.
“What did a boy his age say about you?” Hermione asked.
"That I'm the heir to Slytherin, I expect," Harry said, his stomach dropping .
Another inch or so when he suddenly remembered how Justin Finch-Fletchley had escaped from him at lunchtime.
"People here will believe anything," Ron said incredulously.
The crowd roared and moved on down the next line.
Without a problem.
“Do you really think there’s a subjects room?” Ron asked.
Hermione.
“I don’t know,” she said, shrugging. “Dumbledore couldn’t heal the Lady.
Norris, and that got me thinking that whatever is threatening her probably doesn’t exist anymore .
— well — man.”
As she spoke, they rounded a corner and found themselves at the end of the
The same street where the attack took place. They stopped and stared.
The scene was much the same as it was that night, except there was no emotion
The cat sat on the silver table, and an empty chair stood against
wall bearing the message “Mystery Room Opens.”
"That's where Filch was hiding," Ron smirked.
They looked at each other. The road was gravel.
“It can’t hurt to have a squirt,” Harry said, setting down his bag and .
He got on his hands and knees so he could crawl, look for the
ideas.
“Fire nails!” he said. “Here — and here —”
“Come see this!” Hermione said. “This is amazing. . . .”
Harry stood up and headed for the window next to the message on the wall.
Hermione was staring at the center shelf, where about twenty lights
They were squirming, apparently struggling to pass through a small opening. along,
The silver wire was hanging like a blanket, as if they had won it all
In their haste to get outside.
“Have you ever seen spiders do that?” Hermione said in shock.
“No,” Harry said, “you have, Ron? Run?”
He looked over his shoulder. Ron was standing well back and looked like
Be fights the urge to run away.
"what's up?" Harry said.
“I — don’t — like — spiders,” Ron growled.
“I didn’t know that,” Hermione said, looking at Ron in surprise. "possess
I use drugs in Potions loads of times. . . .”
“I don’t care if they’re dead,” said Ron, who was looking pitiful .
Everywhere except the window. “I just don’t like the way they look. . . .”
Hermione laughed.
“It wasn’t fun,” Ron said, casually. “If you must know, when I was three years old,
Fred turned my teddy bear into a big filthy spider because I
He broke his crossbow. . . . You wouldn’t like them either if you were
You’re holding your bear and all of a sudden it has so many legs and . . .”
He broke off, squirming. Obviously, Hermione was still trying not to make
laugh. Feeling they had better get off topic, Harry said, "Remember . . ."
All that water on the ground? Where did that come from? Someone was fired
established.”
“It was about here,” Ron said, making sure to walk a few steps .
past Filch's chair and smiling. “Straight through this door.”
He reached for the glass doorknob but suddenly withdrew his hand as if
although it was burned.
“What’s wrong?” Harry said.
“He can’t go in there,” Ron insisted. “It’s a girls prison.”
"Hey Ron, there's no one there," Hermione said, standing up .
And walking. “This is Moan Myrtle Place. Come, let us have
look."
And ignoring the big OUT OF ORDER sign, she opened the door.
It was the hottest, hottest hotel room Harry had ever set foot in.
In. Underneath the large, cracked, and jagged mirror was a line of light blue toys.
The floor was glowing and reflecting the dim light given off by the lamps of a
fewer candles, curling low in their boxes; Wooden doors to shops
They were leaking and burning and one of them was bleeding from its straps.
Hermione put her fingers to her lips and walked down the finish line.
When she reached him she said, “Hi, Myrtle, how are you?”
Harry and Ron went to look. Smiling Myrtle was floating above the
The tank top, parting space on his chin.
“This is the girls’ room,” she said, pointing at Ron and Harry .
with doubt. “Not girls.”
“No,” Hermione agreed. “I just wanted to show them how — er — good .
She’s here.”
She waved vaguely at the dirty old mirror and the damp floor.
“Ask her if she knows anything,” Harry mouthed to Hermione.
“What are you listening to?” Myrtle said, looking at him.
“No,” Harry said flatly. “We want to ask —”
“I wish people would stop talking behind my back!” Myrtle said, in a
Voice choking with tears. “I have feelings, you know, even though I’m dead .
—”
"Myrtle, no one wants to mess with you," Hermione said. "Just Harry —."
“No one wants to crush me! It’s a good one!” Myrtle exclaimed. "my
Life is nothing but misery in this place and now people are coming
You ruined my death!”
"We wanted to ask you if you've seen anything interesting lately," he said .
Hermione quickly. “Because a cat was caught right outside your front .
door on the day of Eve.”
“Did you see anyone near here that night?” Harry said.
“I wasn’t paying attention,” Myrtle says plaintively. “Peeves annoy me .
That’s why I came in here and tried to kill myself. Then, of course, I
He remembered that I—that I—”
“He’s already dead,” Ron said helpfully.
Myrtle gave a gasp of pain, rose into the air, spun around, and fell
His head is in the shower, he spills water all over them and falls off the
The sight, albeit from the vantage point of its dappled lashes, came to
Rest somewhere in Ubend.
Harry and Ron stood with their mouths open, but Hermione waved her hand
Sadly he added, “Honestly, that’s almost funny for Myrtle. . . . come
On, let’s go.”
Harry was about to close the door on Myrtle's squealing cunt when a loud voice rang out
sound made all three of them jump.
“RUN!”
Percy Weasley stopped dead at the head of the stairs, the headmaster's vault
Agleam, a full expression of pride on his face.
“It’s the girls’ bathroom!” He's silent. “What are you — ?”
“Just to look around,” Ron said quietly. “Drawings, you know —”
Percy blushed in a way that reminded Harry firmly of Mrs.
Weasley.
“Get — away — from — there —” Percy said, rushing towards them and .
He started rubbing them, rubbing his hands together. “You don’t care what this is
Looks like? You’ll be back here while everyone’s at dinner —”
“Why shouldn’t we be here?” Ron said casually, stopping abruptly and looking
in Birch. “Listen, we didn’t lay a finger on that cat!”
"That's what I told Ginny," Percy sighed, "but she's still like . . ."
You think they're going to kick you out, I've never seen her so sad, crying
Your mind is off, you can imagine, all the early years were profoundly
You’re too good at this job —”
“You don’t mind Ginny,” Ron said, ears now .
red. “You're just worried I'm going to ruin your chance of
He’s a Head —”
“Five points from Gryffindor!” Percy said quietly, looking at his boss
book. “And I hope it teaches you a lesson! No research work, or ad
Write to my mother!”
And he stormed off, his head as red as Ron's ears.
Harry, Ron, and Hermione chose as many seats as they could from Percy in the
Common room that night. Ron was still in a bad mood and stuck
Sharing his Charms assignments. When he accidentally reached for his staff i
Remove the heat and burn the paper. Fuming almost as much
his homework, Ron closed the book of alternate patterns, 2nd level.
At Harry's nod, Hermione followed his lead.
“Who could it be, though?” She said in a low voice, as if she were repeating
A conversation I was just having. “Who wants to be scared at all
Are squibs the Muggle-born ones from Hogwarts?”
“Let’s think,” Ron said with a shrug. “Who knows who .
Does he think Muggle-born are stupid?”
He looked at Hermione. Hermione stared back, unconvinced.
“If you’re talking about Malfoy—”
“Of course I am!” Run said. “You’ve heard it — ‘You’re going to be next, .
Mudblood!' - Damn, you only have to look at his ugly mouse face to
See it is —”
“Malfoy, the Heir of Slytherin?” Hermione said suspiciously.
“Look at his family,” Harry said, closing his books, too. “Too much
Six of them were in Slytherin; He’s always proud of her. They can
easily be a Slytherin descendant. His father really is evil after all.”
“They could have had the key to the Chamber of Secrets for centuries!”
Run said. “He will, father to son. . . .”
'Well,' said Hermione cautiously, 'I suppose it's possible. . . .”
“But how do we prove it?” Harry said with a grin.
“Maybe there’s a way,” Hermione said quietly, dropping her voice still .
Glancing quickly across the room to Percy. “Of course, I will
It was difficult. And it’s complicated, very complicated. We will break about fifty
School rules, I’m waiting —”
“If, in a month or so, you feel like clarifying, you let us know, .
Didn’t you?” Ron said calmly.
“Exactly,” Hermione said coldly. “What we need to do is get
Inside the Slytherin room and ask Malfoy some questions
Without realizing it was us.”
"But that's impossible," Harry said as Ron laughed.
“No, it’s not,” Hermione said. “All we will need is some Polyjuice .
Drugs.”
“What’s that?” Ron and Harry said together.
“Snape mentioned it at school a few weeks ago —”
“You think we have nothing better to do in Potions than listen to .
Snap?” said Run.
“It turns you into someone else. Think about it! We can change the
Of the three Slytherins. No one would know it was us. This Malfoy
Maybe he can tell us something. He probably excels at it in Slytherin
common room right now, if only we could hear him.”
“This Polyjuice stuff looks a bit odd to me,” Ron said, smirking.
“What if we stuck seeing like three of Slytherin forever?”
“It disappears after a while,” Hermione said, waving her hand .
with impatience. “But getting into that recipe is going to be very difficult. snap
He said it was in a book called Moste Potent Potions and that it happened to be available in
A reserved section of the library.”
There is only one way to retrieve a book from Reserved Store:
You need a letter of permission signed by a faculty member.
“It’s hard to see why we’d want the book, really,” Ron says, “if we weren’t .
I’m going to try to make one of those smiles.”
“I suppose,” said Hermione, “if we pretend to him that we .
You just love the theory, we can stand by the fact. . . .”
“Oh, come on, no teacher is going to fall for that,” Ron said. "will
It should be really tasty. . . .”
S
Chapter Ten
FROM BLUDGER
Ince the story of the pixies party, Professor Lockhart has no
He brought living people to class. Instead, he read parts of
Books to them, and sometimes he repeats some of the more dramatic elements.
He usually chooses Harry to help him with these extra builds; so far,
Harry was forced to play a simple Transylvanian villager who
Lockhart was recovering from a terrible storm, a yeti with a head cold, and a
a vampire cannot eat anything but lettuce from
Lockhart was arguing with him.
Harry was pulled to the front of the class during their next defense .
Against the Dark Arts lesson, this time he acts as a hero. If he hadn’t
A very good reason to keep Lockhart in good spirits, to have
He refused to do it.
“The wedding bottle with Sport Allen, A Harry — well — both, if you’re interested in, I .
pounced — thus — slammed to the ground — thus — by one .
A hand, I was able to stop — in turn, I have been guaranteed to the Winnis
The voice — I then used up the rest of my strength, and screamed .
Uncomplicated Homorphus Charm — casts a spell of pain — go
On, Harry — worse — good — silver out — eyebrows
Shrank — and became a man. Simple, but effective — it’s
Another village will forever remember me as the artist who delivered them
From the monthly terror of wolf attacks.”
The bell rang, and Lockhart sprang to his feet.
“The homework — create a comment about my Wagga Wagga .
Wolf! Signed copies of Magical Me for the author of the best one!”
The school begins to rot. Harry returned to the back of the room, where
Ron and Hermione were waiting.
"ready?" Harry muttered.
“Wait until everyone’s gone,” Hermione said nervously. "you're welcome . . ."
She approached Lockhart's desk, a piece of paper clenched tightly .
hand, Harry and Ron were right behind him.
“Er—Professor Lockhart?” Hermione warned. “I want to — to .
Get this book from the library. Just for brevity.” She took
the paper, his hand shaking slightly. “But the thing is, in
a protected section of the library, so I need a professor to sign it — I
It certainly helps me understand your point in Gadding with the Ghouls
On poison working softly—”
“Oh, gadding with goats!” Lockhart said, taking the note from the
Hermione and he looks up at her. “It might be my favorite book. you
Do you like it?”
“Oh, yes,” Hermione said cheerfully. “So smart, how do you keep
Last with a clockwork —”
“However, I think that no one would need to give a good student of the year .
A little more help,” Lockhart sighed, pulling out a .
potato chips. “Yeah, it’s good, what’s you all?” He said, invited the vision of the kind
In Run’s face. “She’s mostly, we are grief for the development of books.”
He has a great sign of the pilgrims for the bench and sick.
She turned back to Hermione.
"Okay, Harry," Lockhart said, while Hermione sealed the letter with .
The feet ended and stepped into the vehicle. “Tormorrow's the right
Quidditch match of the season, I believe? Gryffindor vs. Slytherin, and
it not? I hear you're a useful player. I was a Searcher, too. I was asked to try
for the national team, but they want me to dedicate my life to the script
Supported forces. Still, if a day requires a few private things
Important, don’t remember to ask. I’m always happy to make sure I
We haven’t had a lot of energy. . . .”
Harry was the unclearly silent in the cage, Snine ends upwards behind the
Ron and Hermione.
“I don’t believe it,” he said, adding that the three people saw the scene .
About thinking. “He didn’t even look at the book we wanted.”
“That’s because he’s a brainless git,” said Ron. “But who cares, we have
You got what they are wrong —”
“Where is the incredible,” Hermione said quickly as they were looking for half .
The Circle.
“You’re only just saying you’re a full student of the year —”
They slammed their calls as they entered the circle of the
library. Madam Pince, the science, was a short woman, approach,
She appears like an unprecedented school.
“Can the stronger resources?” You said with doubt, and tried to take
Hermiyene’s view; But Hermione didn’t leave.
“I wonder if I can keep it,” she sighed.
“Ah, you’ve achieved,” Ron said from the Photos, forced to .
Mrs. Pins. « ⴰⴷ ⴰⴽⴷ-ⵏⴰⵡⵉ ⴰⵟⵓⴳⵔⴰⴼ ⵏⵏⵉⴹⴻⵏ. Lockhart ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵙⵜⴻⵏⵢⴰ ⴽⵔⴰ
If it stands too long.”
Madam Pin holds the letter, the letter and light, like you can
ⵜⴱⴰⵏⴷ ⵜⴽⴻⵔⴽⴰⵙ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵜⴻⵣⴳⴻⵔ ⴰⴽⴰⵢⴰⴷ. You left those among those.
blocks and returned a few minutes later carrying a large and thick wall-
It is collecting adventures. Hermione smashed with loyalty in the head and out, searching
You don’t go quickly or look like it’s true.
Five minutes later, they were barricaded in Moaning Myrtle’s out-oforder bathroom once more. Hermion has denied the Ron squad in the
It shows that it’s the last place in his right minds will
go, so they wre guarante some privacy. Meettles
Believing in his shop, but there were abandoned, we had them.
Hermione was born with al-Kissite Points, and three
They are close to the ears of the ear. It’s clear from a read
He was in the control sector. Somi of the posters has an accounts Momost
And it’s very difficult to think, and there’s something we don’t like.
Tawchchhaha, of which there was a clear ambulist to be buried in inside .
You left and a woman of the woman who went out of head many hundreds of other hands.
“Attan,” Hermione said with joy when she discovered the snake of The .
Polijus power. She was accomplished with the films in the line of the road.
With change to other people. Harry really hopes the artist
They were reflecting expressions of great sadness on their faces.
“That’s this to be the voice I’ve seen all,” Hermione said like .
They are years. “Mosquito nets, mushrooms, fluxweed, and .
knotgrass,” she said by view, prepared the Dadd in cybersees of products.
“Well, they realized, they were in the student lounge, we could .
Help ourselves. . . . Oooh, see, the bottle of a bottle of a sand — I don’t see
Where to go about this — the ears of the ear ear — that'll
Be tricky, too — and really a little bit of who we want to change into.”
"I'm sorry?" Ron said quietly. “What do you mean, a little who
Are we changing in? I’ll never drink anything with Crabbe’s feet in it—”
Hermione continues the likelihood of the unsure.
“We don’t have to be careful about it, it’s what we sought those .
The last bits. . . .”
Ron is right, he can’t call the word, to Harry, with another ministry.
“Do you need how we get to go, A Hermone?
The young man of a boomslang, this is not quickly in the mother students.
cupboard. And what is to do, to go to the Snapa shops? I
I don’t know if this is a good idea. . . .”
Harmiion covers books with ears.
“Well, if you two make it out, fine,” she said. are
The ears of the ears of the ears of ears have been evacuated more than ancient times. "I
You don’t want to break the rules, you know. I think the threat to Muggle-born is
With a lot of goodness beyond the creation of the hard work. But if you don’t want to find
While Malfoy, I will go directly to Massa Pince now I would give the book
Come back to —”
“I never thought I’d see the day you’d convince us to decide
The law,” Ron said. “As you have to work. But not the feet, okay?”
“They’s time it will take to work, if if it was like?” Hari said like Hirmiyun.
Looking even happier, he opened the book again.
“Well, since fluxweed has to be cut in the full moon and in the
Lachewwings should be absorbed as a couple of days . . . I would say it would be
They’re on the month of the moon, while we can do so all.”
“ⴰⵢⵢⵓⵔ?” Run said. “Malfoy can get a half of Yimugleborns in the template!” But Hermione's eyes widened dangerously.
Again, and quickly, “Maa is the best plan for which we have, yes with the ear of the ear .
ahead, I mean.”
However, when Hermione was checking to see if the sea was clear for
They will leave the woman’s home, Ron said with Harry’s vision, “Ad will be very short .
Hassale if you can just get from Malfoy from the stones tomorrow.”
Harry had previously been worried about Saturday morning, he remained for a while thinking about
The Quidditch meeting for the next. He was getting nervous, especially at the thought of
And what that doin will if Gryfeffindor falls, but also in the view of the acceptance of a
The team are close to the balls quickly all that can be taken. There was no
He wants to fall for Slitherin with good. Create half a lot of rest there and the minis
Inside he stirred, he got up, dressed, and went down early toward evening,
Where he finds the other of Gryfeffindor’s bunch of close to the back of the long, and Imem
ⵜⴰⴼⴻⵍⵡⵉⵜ, ⴰⴽⴽ ⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵍⵇⴻⴷⴷ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵓⵔ ⵜⵜⵎⴻⵙⵍⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ.
ⵎⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵇⵔⴻⴱ ⵜⴻⵙⵔⴰⴳⵜ ⵏ ⵎⵔⴰⵡ ⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ, ⵢⴻⴱⴷⴰ ⵓⵖⴻⵔⴱⴰⵣ ⴰⴽⴽ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⴱⵔⵉⴷⵉⵙ
He reached the Quidditch gym. It was a fun kind of day compared to
Thunder in the sky. Run and Hermione came running over to shout at Harry
good as he entered the locker rooms. The group pulled their red.
Gryffindor’s accusations, two remains to hear the Wood party before the game
talk.
He started: “Stlewhherin has more rich pieces.” “No benefit will be involved.
But we have wonderful people on our platforms. We train harder than them
Serve, we were hiding in all the circumstances —” (“D truth,” George said .
Wesley. “I’ve never been in August”) “— we’re going
To make them hate the day they let go of that little bit of magic, Malfoy, he'd buy his
ⴰⴱⵔⵉⴷ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⴻⵔⴱⴰⵄⵜⵏⵙⴻⵏ.”
The mountains are decreasing with snow, and the wood came to Harry.
“It’s going to be about you, A Harry, to make sure that Unidi should have .
Something worse than a rich dad. ⴰⵡⵡⴻⴹ ⵖⴻⵔ Snitchnni ⵙⴻⵏⴷ Malfoy ⵏⴻⵖ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵎⵎⴻⵜ
You tried, A Hari, because we have to win today, we have to win.”
“By no hills, a Harry,” says Fred, and it’s accompanied by.
As they went to the district, they were trained a slavery of salt; usually
ⵙ ⵍⴼⴻⵔⵃ, ⴰⵛⴽⵓ Ravenklaw ⴷ Hufflepuff ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵜⵜⵃⵓⵍⴼⵓⵏ ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ ⴰⴷ ⵡⴰⵍⵉⵏ Slitherin
ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵡⵜⴻⵏ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ Slitherin ⴷⴻⴳ ⵍⵖⴰⵛⵉ ⵙⵙⴰⵡⴹⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵙⵍⴻⵏ ⵉ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜⵏⵙⴻⵏ ⴷ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜⵏⵙⴻⵏ,
also. Madam Hutch, the Quidditch teacher, asks Flint and Wood to listen
ⵉⴼⴰⵙⵙⵏ, ⵏⵏⴰ ⵜⵜⴳⴳⴰⵏ, ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⴰⴽⵣⵏ ⵢⴰⵏ ⵡⴰⵢⴹ ⴰⵙⴷⵉⴷⴷⵉ ⴷ ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⵔⴳⴰⵍⵏ
more precious than it should be.
“On my nose,” said Mrs. Hooch. "Three . . . two . . . one . . .”
ⵙ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵙⵖⴻⵔ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵍⵖⴰⵛⵉ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵏⵙⴼⴻⴹⴹⴻⵏ ⵙ ⴰⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢ, ⵎⵔⴰⵡ ⴷ ⴽⴽⵓⵥ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵎⴰⵔⵉⵔⴻⵏ
ⵢⵓⵍⵉ ⵖⵔ ⵢⵉⴳⵏⵏⴰ ⵏ ⵓⴱⵔⴽⴰⵏ. Harry left more than any of them, and he blamed
of the village for Snitch.
“Alright there, Skarhed?” » ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⵖ Malfoy, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴹⵓⵔⵔⵓ ⴷⴷⴰⵡⴰⵙ ⴰⵎ
Given to show the power of the ear.
Harry didn't have time to answer. At the same time, one Bluedger black black .
The pelting came to him; It was attracted to himself to himself.
Shabbouub as well as passed.
“Close one, Harry!” Georg said, he passed away from the ear in
A hand, and be ready to turn Bluger with return to a Slitherin. He saw Harry
George gives the Bluedger a strong leg on the Adrian Road
Pucey, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ Bludger ⵉⴱⴻⴷⴷⴻⵍ ⴰⴱⵔⵉⴷ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⴳⴻⵏⵏⵉ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵔⵙ ⵜⵉⵢⵉⵜⴰ ⵙⵔⵉⴷ ⵉ
Harry too.
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⵖⵍⵉⴷ ⵙ ⵍⴻⵎⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵢⴻⵄⵇⴻⵍ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ George ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴰⵡⴻⴹ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵙ ⵍⴵⴻⵀⴷ
As much as Malfoy. ⵜⵉⴽⴽⵍⵜ ⵢⴰⴹⵏ, ⴱⵍⵓⴷⴳⵔ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵖⵓⵍ ⵣⵓⵏⴷ ⴱⵓⵓⵎⵔⴰⵏⴳ ⴷ
She was at the head of Harry.
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⵔⵔⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵙⴼⵓⴳⴻⵍ ⵏ ⵜⴰⵣⵣⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵎⵖⴻⵔ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵢⵉⴷⵉⵙ ⵏⵏⵉⴹⴻⵏ ⵏ
pitch. He could hear Bludger flailing behind him. What was
Complete? Never have the Blodgers gathered on a player like this; It was their
Work to learn not to ask many people. . . .
Fred Weasley was waiting for Bludger on the other end. Harry
Ducked as Fred stared at the Bludger full force; There’s the Bludger
He was pushed off the road.
“Awesome!” Fried was overjoyed, but not like this; It seems to be
Pulling him magnetically towards Harry, the Bludger disappeared after him again
And Harry was forced to rush out.
It had started to rain; Harry felt light flushes on his face,
He covers his lies. He has no say in what happens in
From the day that he heard Jordan speak, saying,
“Slytherin is down, sixty points to zero —”
Slytherins are very focused on their jobs, and
Meanwhile, crazy Bludger was doing his best to free Harry from
air. Fred and George are now much closer in every way.
That Harry could see nothing but their flailing hands and had no
This time to visit Snitch, don't take it.
“Somebody’s — fucked — up — by — this — Bludger —” whispered Fred, .
He charges at his anger with all he can get out of it as he launches a new attack on
Harry.
"We need time out," George said, trying to signal Wood and stop .
The bludger picks Harry's nose at one point.
It turns out that Wood has this message. Madame Hutch's River Flows
And Harry, Fred, and George lay on the floor, still trying not to know.
Mad Bludger.
“What’s going on?” said Wood as the Gryffindor team huddled together,
While the Slytherins in the crowd are changing. “We are coming together. Freed, George,
Where were you when that Bludger stopped Angelina from scoring?”
“We had two thousand feet above it, we started another bludger from
murdering Harry, Oliver,” George said angrily. “Someone who has been appointed — to
She won't leave her alone. It hasn't gone for anyone else all game. the
The brides should do something about it”.
“But the Bludgers have been holed up in Madam Hooch’s office ever since .
The last step, and there is nothing wrong with them now. . . .” said Wood,
With closure.
Madam Hooch was walking towards them. On his hand, Harry
He could see the Slytherin group snickering and looking in his direction.
“Listen,” Harry said as he walked closer to the door, “both
It gets away from me every time, the only way to catch a Snitch is
if it flew up my sleeve. Go to the other group and let us give it
With the bastard one.”
“Don’t be too heavy,” Fred said. “He’ll take your head off.”
Wood was looking from Harry to Wesley.
"Oliver, this is awful," Alicia Spinnet growled angrily. “You can’t leave Harry
She faced the thing herself. Let’s ask for a conversation —”
“If we stop now, we’ll have to forfeit the match!” Harry said. "and
We don't pass for sliters just for the sake of bludjer that matters! series,
Olifer, tell them to leave me alone!”
“It’s all a luck,” George said with a blend to Wood. “'Get the Snitch
Or to die,' and what the pot will come through—”
Madam Hooch was full of them.
“The game play thing?” she asked Wood.
Wood looks at a definitive view of Harry's face.
“Everything is going on,” he said. “Fred, George, you heard Harry — leave him alone
And letting it face Bludger itself.”
The rain is getting heavier now. On the Madam Huch novel,
Harry stood a lot in the air and knew that the word in Bloodger .
After him. Luckily, Harry increases; announces
Spiral, Zigag, and Large. A little sandwich, but he took in it
Allenis Diflee, Assel quotes linguistics and sells with the Azerones as he was in line with him.
She kept in head, keeping the other wedding party from Bludgeer. he
He could hear the laugh from the goods; He knows he must seem very silly, but
The podcast was nervous and couldn’t change the way through such a
Harry can; A syllabus of behavior began with a fraud on the hills of the
Stadium, looking through the silver sheets of rain towards Gryffindor
of the brands, where Adrian Pacey is trying to study Wood —
A buzz in Harry's ear told him that Bludger had just pleasured him
again; He consists to the snow, the light went to another.
“Training the Balet, a Potter?” Malfoy yelled as Harry was forced to
He worked for a earring of ears in the sky to stop Bldger, and he ran, and ran,
Bloodgers guarantees a few feet behind; Oswine, with the eyes by Malfoy in 1990.
Hypie, Eweds — Snatch of gold. He was simultaneously simultaneously
The ear ear Malfoy — and Malfoy, was surrounded by Harry’s laughter, he didn’t.
For a season of hip, Harry remains in the air, he couldn’t smoothly smell.
With Malfoy’s view if he saw the vision, Snitch words.
WHAT.
He remains the second with a second. Bloodgers ended,
He cut into his palm, and Harry felt his arm twitch. Dimly, stopped by
And the rewards was poured in hands, and tells the ears under the ear, one
Still closer to him, the right-hand mirror illegally illegal to the side — L
Bloodgers came to ear for the second, this time this time with the goal of the goal .
— Harry left the road, one twin remains intimidating in sandwiches .
Quarry: he arrived at Malfoy.
With the sting of rain and pain, he succumbed to the glittering, tearing
The face below and tongues are verbally accused: Malfoy considers Harry .
He was insisting on it.
“Wow of —” he said with advocacy, he left Harry’s way.
Harry took off the left of the left, and a premiere; he
I felt the music was almost on Snitch but now he was just guilty
A car with the feet, and there was a drink from the Galachi that was below as it was
He arrived directly to the ground, and is so hard to not understand.
With the November fire to Yalid in Al-Qhaa, it was released from him. His hand
He was thrown at a very strange angle; Filled with pain, he listened, as if
From a distance, good taste and satisfaction. He looked at the
Switzerland took on the right hand.
“Okay,” he said vaguely. “We won.”
And he failed.
It’s smoothly, Adfel was crazy on the face, still staying in the field, with
Anything who relates to it. A journalism of journalism has spoken.
“Oh, no, you’re not,” he insisted.
“He doesn’t know what he’s talking about,” Lockhart said aloud to the excited .
The Gryffindor crowd pressed against them. “Don’t worry, Harry. am
You almost lost your hand.”
"No!" Harry said. “I’ll keep it that way, thanks. . . .”
He attempted to stay, but the monarchies were great. He hears a familiar scheme.
The noise is close.
"I don't want a key to this, Colin," he said aloud.
“Lee, Harry,” Lukhart said in a perfect way. “It was a simple treatment I had
I often use —”
“Why can’t I just go to the hospital wing?” Harry said through his grin.
teeth.
“They really is, A Professure,” said a hood of salt, can’t help .
grinning even though his Seeker was injured. “Big shock, Harry, indeed .
spectacular, your best yet, I’d say —”
Through the woods around him, Harry spotted Fred and George
Ulayer, faces the polls of the polling in a pothata. It was still putting up a
The war was good.
"Stand back," said Lockhart, who was fiddling with his light gray cloak.
“No — don’t —” Harry said sadly, but Lockhart was winking .
And a second later she shoved it right into Harry's hand.
A non-birth of good starts in the Tyoy of Harry O
spread all the way down to his fingertips. It was considered the such as an arms.
It's being used. He diddn't dar look at whats was happing. had shut hi
The eyes, his face has returned from his hands, but his big doors that they had to know
As the people above him get excited and Colin Creevey starts to snap .
conflict. His arm didn’t hurt—nor did it feel remotely like a
arm.
“Ah,” said Lockhart. "Yeah. Yes, this can happen. But’s the
Moreover, the bones are unbroken. That’s something to keep in mind.
Well, Harry, you just strode down to the hospital wing—oh, Mr. Weasley, Mrs.
Granger, are you trying? — ⴷ Massa Pomfrey ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵣⵎⴻⵔ ⴰⴷ —
ER — You are a little bit.”
As Harry got to hes fet, h felt lupseded. ⴰⵙⴽⴰⵔ ⵏ ⵢⴰⵏ ⵓⵏⴼⵓⵙ ⵉⵍⵇⴰⵢⵏ
He looks to his left. What he saw nearly made him pass out
again.
Poking out of the end of his robes was what looked like a thick, leshcolored ubber gluve. He attempted to keep the tube. Nothing happended.
Lockhart did not prepare Harry’s bones. He took them away.
Madam Bumfrey is not all the same.
“It’s going to go straight to me!” She was close, you took care of the hunting,
limp remainder of what, half an hour before, had been a working arm. "I
He can prepare the bones in the crisis — but they will be able to develop —”
“You’ll be able to, won’t you?” said Harry desperately.
"I will be able to, of course, but it will be painful," said Madam Pomfrey .
Casually, he throws Harry a pair of pajamas. “You have to stay with
night. . . .”
Hermione waited outside the wall surrounding Harry's bed while
Ron helped him into his pajamas. Some time came to facilitate the strike,
A boneless hand on one shoulder.
“How can you stick up for Lockhart now, Hermione, eh?” Ron read
through the curtain as he pulled Harry's limp fingers through the cuff. "whether
Harry wants to ask if he’s going to ask her.”
"Everyone can make a mistake," Hermione said. “And it doesn’t hurt
Too much, right, Harry?”
"No," Harry said, getting into bed. "But he doesn't do anything else
either."
As he stretched himself out on the bed, his arm flailed aimlessly.
Hermione and Madam Pomfrey came around the curtain. madam
Pomfrey was holding a large bottle of something labeled SkeleGro.
“You’re having a rough night,” she said, holding out a glowing parrot .
And he gives it back to her. “Hair growth is a matter of luck.”
So he was taking SkeleGro. It burned Harry's mouth and throat as it was
he reached out, making him smile and breathe. Still forgetting about
Terrible sports and incompetent teachers, Madam Pomfrey retreated and left
Ron and Hermione to help Harry drink some water.
“We won, though,” Ron said, a grin breaking out on his face. “That’s what
Some arrest you made. Malfoy's face . . . He looked ready to kill. . . .”
“I want to know how he made that Bludger,” Hermione whispered.
“We can add that to the list of questions to ask him when we hire
He’s got the Polyjuice Power,” Harry said, rolling up his sleeves. "I
I wish there was a sense of urgency to this thing. . . .”
“Does he have elements of Slytherin in him? You should taste it,” Ron said.
The door to the hospital wing opened at that moment. Dirty and
With a sigh, the rest of the Gryffindor team arrived to see Harry.
“Don’t believe in redemption, Harry,” George said. “I just saw Markus Flint .
He yelled at Malfoy. Something about the Snitch on his head
And it’s not funny. Malfoy didn’t look too happy.”
They brought coffee, tea, and bottles of sour cream; they
They gathered on Harry's bed and just started at what
It promised to be a nice party when Mrs. Pomfrey came storming in,
Sighing, “This boy needs rest, he’s got thirty-three ribs to regrow! out!
out!"
And Harry was left alone, with nothing to distract him from the asteroid .
pain in his missing arm.
Hours and hours later, Harry suddenly woke up in the dark
And he gave a small gasp of pain: his arm now felt covered in large scales. for
Second, he thought it was a slap in the face. Then, by running the
Panic, he realized someone had rattled his window in the darkness.
“Hello!” He said aloud, then, “Dobby!”
The tennis ball eyes of the pet pig were fixed on Harry s
ⵟⵟⵍⴰⵎ. ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵟⵟⵓⵜ ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⴼⴻⴳⴳⵉⴹ ⵙⴻⴳ ⴰⵏⵣⴰⵔⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⵖⴻⵣⵣⵉⴼⴻⵏ, ⵉⵃⴻⵔⵣⴻⵏ.
“ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ Potter ⵢⵓⵖⴰⵍⴷ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵓⵖⴻⵔⴱⴰⵣ,” ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ. “Dubbi
Harry Potter urged and nudged. Oh sir, why don’t you count on Dobby? why
Didn’t Harry Potter go home when he got stuck on the train?”
Harry lifted himself off his pillows and patted Dobby’s sponge
away.
“What are you doing here?” he said. “And how do you know that I love .
ⵜⵎⴰⵛⵉⵏⵜⵏⵏⵉ?”
ⵉⴹⴰⵔⵔⴻⵏ ⵏ Dobby ⵜⵜⵏⴻⵔⵏⵉ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ Harry ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵟⵟⴻⴼ ⵙ ⵛⵛⴻⴽ ⵏ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵙⴰ.
"are you!" ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ ⵙ ⵍⴻⵎⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ. « ⵜⴻⵃⴱⴻⵙⴷ ⵍⵃⴻⴱⵙ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵓⵔ ⴰⵖⵜⴻⴵⴵⵉⴹ ⴰⵔⴰ .
through!"
“Of course yes, sir,” Dobby said, shaking his head vigorously, ears .
ⵜⵜⴼⴻⴳⴳⵉⴹⴻⵏ. « Dobby ⵢⴻⴼⴼⴻⵔ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵍⵉ Harry Potter ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵇⵇⴻⵏ ⵜⴰⵡⵡⵓⵔⵜ .
ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ Dobby ⵉⵍⴰⵇⴰⵙ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵃⴻⴷⴷⴻⴷ ⵉⴼⴰⵙⵙⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔⵙ » — ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴽⴻⵏⴰⵙ ⵉ Harry ⵎⵔⴰⵡ ⵏ ⵜⵖⵓⵣⵉ, .
Fingers crossed—“but Dobby didn’t mind, sir, because he thought Harry .
Potter ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵍⴰⵎⴰⵏ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵡⴻⵔⴵⵉⵏ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴰⵔⴳⵓ Dobby ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ Harry Potter ⴰⴷ ⵢⴰⵡⴻⴹ ⵖⴻⵔ
School in a different way!”
ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⴻⵣⵣⵉⴱ ⵙⴷⴰⵜⵙ ⴷ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⴻⵣⵣⵉⴱ ⴰⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢⵉⵙ ⵢⴻⵛⵎⴻⵜ.
“Dobby was very shocked to hear Harry Potter had returned at
Hogwarts, ⵢⴻⴵⴵⴰ ⵉⵎⴻⵏⵙⵉ ⵏ ⵎⴰⵙⵙⵉⵙ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵞⵞⴰⵔ! ⴰⵎ ⵡⴰ ⴷ ⴷⵓⴱⵉ ⵓⵔ ⵊⵊⵓ
had, sir. . . .”
Harry went over his sheets.
ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ ⵙ ⵍⴵⴻⵀⴷ: “Qrib ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜⴻⵙⵙⵓⴼⵖⴻⴹ ⵏⴻⴽⴽ ⴷ Ron.” “ⴽⴻⵏⵏⵉⵡ ⵎⵍⵉⵃ
I'll write before my bones come back, Doub, or I'll hear you.”
ⴷⵓⴱⵉ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵙⵎⵓⵎⵎⵓⵢ ⵙ ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⵖⴰⵔⴰⵙⵜ ⵓⵔ ⵉⵃⵍⵉⵏ.
“Dubi is used for deadly dangers, sir. Debi arrives five times a day in
home."
ⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⴼⴻⵖⴷ ⴰⵏⵣⴰⵔⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵖⴻⵔⵖⴻⵔⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⵉⵅⴻⵎⵊⴻⵏ ⵉ ⵢⴻⵍⵙⴰ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ
ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ ⴰⵔⵎⵉ ⵉⵃⵓⵍⴼⴰ Harry ⵙ ⵍⵖⵉⴹⴰⵉⵏⴻⵙ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵏⴻⵔⵏⵉ ⵖⴰⵙ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴷ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ ⵉ ⵢⵉⵎⴰⵏⵉⵙ.
“Why are you doing it, Dobby?” he asked honestly.
“This, sir?” said Dobby, plucking at the pillowcase. “ⴷ ⴰⵙⴻⴳⵣⵉ ⵏ
ⴰⵙⵓⵎⵔ ⵏ ⵜⴰⴷⴷⴰⵔⵜ ⵏ ⵜⴰⴷⴷⴰⵔⵜ, ⵎⴰⵙⵙ. ⵓⵔ ⵉⵣⵎⵉⵔ ⴷⵓⴱⵉ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵙⵏⴼⵍ ⵖⴰⵙ ⵎⴽ ⵍⵍⵉ ⵔⴰⴷ ⴰⵙ ⵉⴼⴽ ⴱⴰⴱ ⵏⵏⵙ
ⴰⵔ ⵜⵙⵙⵓⴼⵓⵖ ⵜ ⵙ ⴰⵔⵔⴰⵜⵏ, ⵎⴰⵙⵙ. ⵜⴰⵡⵊⴰ ⴰⵔ ⵜⵃⵟⵟⵓ ⵓⵔ ⵜⵣⵔⵉ ⴷⵓⴱⵉ ⵖⴰⵙ
ⵍⵇⴰⵀⵡⴰ, ⴰ ⵎⴰⵙⵙ, ⵉⵎⵉ ⴰⴽⴽⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⵍⵉ ⴷ ⵉⵍⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⴼⴼⴻⵖ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵡⴻⵅⵅⴰⵎⵏⵙⴻⵏ ⵉ ⵍⴻⴱⴷⴰ.”
Dobby ⵢⴻⵙⴼⴻⴹ ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⴼⴼⵖⴻⵏ, ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ : « Harry Potter ⵉⵍⴰⵇ .
go home! Dobby thought his Bludge would be enough to make —”
“Your Bludger?” ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ-ⴷ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ, ⴰⴼⵛⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵏⴻⵔⵏⵉ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⴻⵍⵜ ⵏⵏⵉⴹⴻⵏ. “What d'you mean,
ⴱⵍⵓⴷⵊ ⵏⵏⴽ? ⵜⵙⵙⴽⵔⴷ ⵎⴰⵙ ⴷ ⴱⵍⵓⴷⵊⵔ ⴰⵔⵎ ⴰⴷ ⴰⵢⵉ ⵜⵏⵖ?”
“I will not kill you, O Lord, I will not kill you!” said Dobby, shocked. “Dobby wants
He'll save Harry Potter's life! sent home well, badly wounded, than
Stay here, sir! ⴷⵓⴱⵉ ⵓⵔ ⵉⵔⵉ ⵖⴰⵙ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⴱⵓⵜⵔ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⴰⵣⵣⴰⵍ ⴽⵉⴳⴰⵏ.
home!"
“Oh, is that all?” ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ Hari ⵙ ⵍⵖⵉⴹⴰ. “I don’t think you’re going to
Tell me why you want me sent home with stuff?”
“Oh, if only Harry Potter knew!” Dobby cries, more tears rolling
ⵅⴼ ⴱⵉⵍⵓⵍⵓⵡⵙ ⵏⵏⵙ ⵉⵣⴷⴷⵉⴳⵏ. « ⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵏ ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⴰⵢ ⴰⵖ-ⴷ-ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⴼⵔⴰ, ⵖⴻⵔ ⴷⴷⴰⵡ,
ⵉⵎⴷⴰⵏⵏ, ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⴷⴷ. Dobi is wondering how.
It was when WinUrIlaqAdAdAtwasimmi in the possibility of the possibility,
Sir! We house-elves were treated like vermin, sir! Of course, Dobby still
They were noted, slain,” he advised his face on the ears. "but
In general, the Mr., life has grown for the kind since you win the one that should not be acknowledged. Harry Potter survivived, and the Dark Lord's
The power is deployed, and is a new silence, Mass, and Harry Potter is happy.
A hope of hope for those that help us to become abstract days won't expect .
Finally, sir. . . . And now, in Hogarts, there will happen, and
I wish there was tomorrow, and Doby couldn't let Harry Potter stay here.
Now the history will be rescued, now because Tuffxamt of Tuffra and
Open again —”
Dobby Frost, Hurrrstroke, catches Harry's water from his mouth
bedside table and cracked it are down head, postoping to of sight. a
The second later, he returned to the celebration, and closed the eyes, and he shows, “Bad .
Dobby, very bad Dobby . . .”
“So there is a Chamber of Secrets?” Harry whispered. “And — Did you
Does he opened before? Tell me, Dobby!”
He grabbed a handful of boarbones as Dobby's hand turned to the water.
cup. “But I wasn’t the one that’s from Mugle — how to be in the hill from .
room?"
“Ah, Mr., don’t get a lot more, don’t necessarily acknowledge Dobby’s simultaneously,” he quickly said.
Long-term Allennis in Team. “Leady actions were stored in place, but Harry .
Potter shouldn’t be here when they happen — go home, Harry Potter, go .
home. Harry Potter doesn’t have to participate in this, s Mr., which is very satisfied —”
“Who, Dobby?” Harry said, holding in the Dobby’s handy joy to
Stop so it wouldn’t be supposed to take the sandwiches by a water bottle again. “Who opened it?
Who opened it last time?”
“Doby is impossible, Mass, Dobby can’t, Dobby doesn’t have to say!” roared the stag.
“Go home, Harry Potter, go home!”
“I’m not going anywhere!” Harry said calmly. “One of my best friends .
He was Muggle born; It will be the first in the mirror if it really is Texxamt
open -"
“Harrey Potter suppresses his life on the joy of friends!” Guide Dubi’s registration
The form of a coins. “So cute! So brave! But he should save
Evans, should, Harry Potter doesn’t need —”
Dobby at once elaps, the ear ears are closer. ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ Harry ⵢⴻⵙⵍⴰⵢⴰⵙ. there
There were footsteps coming from the street outside.
“Dobby has to go!” The manufacturing, Gr. was born with joy. There was a silence with a talan.
and the Harry's hand is linked to a once-in-law. returned to
The bed, his eyes in the green door of the hospital wing as his feet
He approached.
In the moments, Dumbledore was heading to the youth home, a
They were tweeted after sorrows and thecle of the night. He was carrying a chapter of
What is seen. Professor McGonagall Eband II BC,
He takes the legs. Rejoined a bed.
“To Massa Pomfrey,” Dumbledree said in the ear, and Uselmad .
McGonagall has been quick about the end of the Harry’s soul that is not seen. Had Harry
Still, he pretends to sleep. He listened quietly, then
Professor McGonagall has come back to the sight, tragedy with terror Massa
Pomfrey, for Digibs a carrier on the nightmare. teach
by shortness of breath.
"what happened?" Ms. Buumfri felt Dumblur, buying
Consider the one that is on the bed.
“One torture,” Dumbledore said. “Minerva found him in the attic.”
“There is a forest sandwich to the side,” which Professor McGonagall said.
“We think it’s hard to come out quickly here to visit Putter.”
Harry’s boat has given a marijuana. Humanor and court
some ceremonies is involved in this ceremonies to the democratic force bound. one
The moon’s light is around the smooth face.
ⴷ Kulin Krivi. Allniss were tested and hands were captured in
Effective, he took the carpenter.
“Heavy?” said Mrs. Pumfrey.
"Yes," Professor McGonagall said. “But you like the m'ara I’m . . . While Albus
It was not on the way of the sight of the fireworks — who has seen what he sees and what
He could have —”
The three looked at Colin. Den Dumbdur
Before and brought up the vessels from the vessels of the hotline.
“Don’t you do you get to take the picture of the one who is forced?” said
Professor Makgonagall with happiness.
Deerry Dyrie Dumbldur did not. The main objective of the event continues.
“Good gracious!” Mrs. Pomfrey said.
One of the bucket giant left the slavery. Harriy, three weeks on the bed,
The lvastki’s rye caught.
“It’s easy,” Massa Pomfrey said with joy. “They all melted . . .”
“What is the meaning of this, Abus?” ” Professor McGonagall sought toward a quick.
“Anamese,” said Dumbledore, “It’s true and Taxxamt of Yifukal .
We’re alive.”
Madam Poomfrey snapped the hand to the mess. Professor McGunagall
The company to Doumporo.
“But, Albus . . . ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜⵜ . . . who?"
“The question is not what,” Dumbledre, Allennis come into Colin. "the
The question is, how. . . .”
and from what can be seen Harry’s Uselmad McGonagall .
The face, you don’t understand that more.
h
twentyteenth coal headquarters
DUEL TAMPLT
He stolen inherited on Monday morning, found you to house youth houses
The light of the summer and phosphate light was snapped but very close. He sat still.
In acceleration and the dealer to the Colin bed, but he was dissolved from Wallen
With the middle balls that Harry changed after yesterday. When you believe that he is
Take, Madam Pumfrey Tasaad with a pleasant coffee and
Then he began to kiss and lick his hand and knees.
“It is in law,” she said when he drowned with a lawsuit with the left hand.
“When you’re accomplished, you can follow.”
Harry dressed as quickly as he could and hurried to Gryffindor.
Tower, he needs to tell Ron and Hermione about Colin and Dobby, but .
They weren’t there. Harry went out to look for them, wondering where they were
They may arrive and feel a bit disappointed that they didn’t like it
Whether or not he has his bones back.
As Harry passed the library, Percy Weasley stepped out of it, glaring at him .
with many more noble spirits than the last time they had met.
“Oh, hi, Harry,” he said. “Good practice yesterday, really good.
Gryffindor only took the first place in the Uxxam Teqbuck — you’ve been full of five .
points!”
“You haven’t seen Ron or Hermione, have you?” Harry said.
“No, I didn’t,” Percy said, smiling. “I wish Ron wasn’t in
Another room for girls. . . .”
Harry suppressed a laugh, watched Percy walk out of his sight, then headed
Straight to the Moaning Myrtle Shrine. Can’t see why Ron is
Hermione would be there again, but after making sure that Filch was too .
No prefect was around either, he opened the door and heard their voices
It came from a locked window.
“It’s me,” he said, closing the door behind him. There’s a break, a
With a whistle, it was a sniff from inside the hallway and he saw Hermione's eyes widen
With a slight twist.
“Harry!” She said. “You give us such a fright—come in—how is it .
arm?"
“Fine,” Harry said, strolling down the hallway. An old ship was
They sat down on the couch, and a crack from under the couch told Harry that
He had lit a fire underneath. The recycled, waterproof combustion was d
Hermione's knowledge.
“We were coming to meet you, but we decided to start on
Polyjuice Potion,” Ron explained as Harry, with difficulty, closed the shop .
again. “We decided this was the safest place to hide.”
Harry started to tell them about Colin, but Hermione stopped.
“We already know — we heard Professor McGonagall tell the Headmaster .
Flitwick this journey. That’s why we decided to go —”
"We used to get a strike from Malfoy, which was nice," Ron said.
“You know what I’m thinking? He was in a similar predicament after the
Quidditch match, he took it out in Kulin”.
"There's something else," Harry said, watching Hermione struggle .
The contours of the story are introduced in the novel. “Dobie came to
Visit me in the middle of the night.”
Ron and Hermione looked up, amazed. Harry told them everything.
Debbie told her — or didn’t tell her. Hermione and Ron listened.
With their mother opened.
“Have you opened the Sicrist room before?” Hermione said.
“This puts her down,” Ron said triumphantly. “Lucius Malfoy
He should have opened the award when he was in school here and now he is
He told Draco Old Draco how to do it. sure. Wich Dby will tell you what it says.
However, the nature of the cow there, wax. I want to know how no one is going.
He thinks he's behind the school.”
"Maybe he can make himself incredible," Hermione said, revealing the details
By below the collidron. “ⵏⵖ ⵉⵖⵢ ⵉⵙ ⵉⵖⵢ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵙⵎⵔⵙ ⵉⵅⴼ ⵏⵏⵙ — ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵖⵓⵍ
I’m going to cheat or something — I read about Chameleon Ghouls
—”
“You read a lot, A Hermione,” Ron said, and he smoke dead on .
Above the knives. He parked the disused milk cart and looked
Harry.
“So Dobby stopped us to get into the car and opened us
arm. . . .” He shook hes head. “You know what, Harry? Whether he doesn't stop .
Try to save your life that will kill you.”
The news that Colin Creevey has been arrested and is now lying as
Although he died in the hospital of the hospital everyone in the school s
On Monday evening. The air was at once thick with tension and suspicion.
The first few years were now traveling to the castle in the most common groups, such as
Though they are afraid to destroy it, they will do it to one.
ⵊⵉⵏⵏⵉ Wesli, ⵉ ⵢⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⴰⵎⴰ ⵏ Kulin Krivi ⴷⴻⴳ Charms, ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ
deistraught, but Harry believed that Fried and George go terrible
On tt tsard. They came to follow themselves with
fur or ibalkimn fall on it from behind the poems. They stopped though.
When Percy, apoplectic with joy, told them he was going to write to Mrs.
Wisli is called Ginny and she takes it one day.
At that time, these teachers chose a teacher who worked in the middle.
Supplies, and other members of the store are stored in the school. Nephil
Longbottom bought a big green symbol, it turns and turns, it's a barrel of an enchanted horse.
crystal, and a shattered piece of magic before the other Gryffindor boys remarked
it turned out that he was not in danger; He was a pureblood, so he couldn’t
He will be arrested.
“They went on Filch as the first,” Neville said, a long face Yugad. "and
Everyone knows it’s almost a team.”
In the second week of December of Mokhtar Mokhtar, this was
Specifically, collecting names of those who will sit in school i
Christmas. Harry, Ron, and Hermione signed his register; they had heard that
Malfoy was sat, which is for the sights that they filled a lot. The holidays
It will be a lucky Lauan to use Polyjuice Tazmert and you will try to reach
His honor.
Sadly, the palace only ended half. They still used the
The hills of two gangs and the skin of Boomslang, and the only place to trops
get them was from Snape's private stores. Harry felt he would be
Face Slytherin's proverbial hero rather than let Snape catch him misappropriating his property
office.
“Whatever we need,” Hermione said as bluntly as a child on a Thursday morning .
The views of the lesson she said, “It's a combination. Then one of us can sneak
In Snape belts to get what they are around.”
Harry and Ron looked at her in surprise.
“I think I’d better do the actual theft,” Hermione finished in a
matter-of-f-fact tune. “You two will be using her if you’re into anything else
trouble, and I've got a clean record. So all you should work is the necessary reason
Mayhem to keep Snape busy for fifteen minutes or so.”
Harry smild fiebly. for his birthday he worked for him in simplified Spanish
The average was almost confidence as a ear of a stormed snow in Wallen.
The shells of juniors have declined in one of the terrorists. Thursday
The afternoon lesson went on as usual. Twenty caddrons stood
Follow between the midfielder of tree nights, why of the names of the Nassiah and Yes
of ingredents. Snape is passed in Ukrainian, speaking words that aren’t listening.
About Griffindor’s story while Slitherin are closely close to.
Draco Malfoy, which is a student loves Snaape, is prompting the ear fish
Their back to Ron and Harry, who saw that if they were trying to get a
The jail so much more than what you can tell “Ur was to be guilty.”
The Harry’s Harry of Ufus was very sensitive, but he had a think about
More important things. He is waiting for Hermione’s, and he.
He almost didn't hear when Snape stopped to turn on his water bottle. what Snape
She was involved to force Neville, Hermie holds Harry and
He ran his head.
Harry fell quickly after the car, and he broke one of the Fred
Philosotry snapped fire from the lyrics, and gave a predit with a fast
A stick. The ferourk began to fizz and sputter. Knowing he has only
seconds, Harry straightened up, took aim, and lobbed it into the air; it
He hit straight on target in Goyle’s box.
Goyle’s smile exploded, sending the entire classroom spinning. People shrieked as
Tifgel Tifgel Tifgel. Malfoy has a face with Winnis
The Nazis began to invest as labour; Goyle turned around, hands on
Allennis, who came in with the slavery of the dinner — Snape was .
They’re trying to pick up the pace and find out what happened. S
Panic, Harry watched Hermione slowly disappear into Snape's office.
"Seasons! silence!" Snap rared. “Anyone who was canceled,
Reported to Dagi for a Deflating Draft — when I find who is doing it —”
Harry tried not to laugh as he watched Malfoy rush forward, his head
It is followed with Annarist as a young man. As halif the classics
The Snappe’s ruling, some were sliced ​​by hands as sand,
Others can’t speak with great voices, Harry Ewala Hermione
Slide back back in prison, in front of the chemistry was broken.
When each of each had a slope of acquisition and nuclear challenges
Panicked, Snape strode over to Goyle’s box and pulled out
The remaining browned silence of fire. There was a smooth brake.
“If I’ll get to find who put this,” said Snape quickly, “I’ll be surprised .
The man is tough.”
Harry organizes the face in what they hope is what is lost.
Snab is watching him closely, and the field is ten minutes behind him.
It can’t be even more inspiration.
“He knows it’s me,” Harry said to Ron and Hermione as they hurried .
back to Moanerie Myrtle's batroum. “I can say.”
She snapped the new projects on the ship, and began to protect.
with fever.
“It’s coming out in two weeks,” she said excitedly.
"Snape can't prove it's you," Ron whispered to Harry. "what
Can it work?”
“Know Snape, something sinister,” Harry said as the wand beeped and .
He left.
Dottle Muse, Hari, Run, and Hermion were going on the door
room when they saw a small herd of people gathered around the corner
board, reading a piece of parchment that had just been pinned up. Simon
Finnigan and Dean Thomas welcomed them, looking excited.
“They’re starting a Dueling Club!” Seamus said. “First meeting tonight!
I don’t mind dueling lessons; They can come in hand
days. . . .”
“What, yo reckon Slayerin's monster can doel?” Run said, but too,
I read the sign carefully.
“May there be a famine,” he said to Harry and Hermione as they entered the
dinner. "going to?"
Harry and Hermione were all over, yes to the diameter of the afternoon there are
In quicker back to Uxxam Amran. Long dining queues are gone and
A golden museum lit up on one wall, with thousands of candles.
floating overhead. The river is a clean computer once again and a lot of
The People's schools have been filled under the earth, you bring all the sources and
They looked happy.
“I wonder what this will teach us?” Hermione said as they walked out to the
They are interacting with the people. “Someone told me Flitwick was a dueling champ.
When he was young — it could be it.”
“Scod was not —” Harry started, but he finished with a mirror: Gilderoy .
Luckhart walks on stage, twisting and turning in the aisles of a broken computer
And he was followed by none other than Snape, wearing his usual black.
Lockhart has one hand on silence and his name is “Game work, gather
bust! Can everyone see me? Can you all listen to me? excellent!
“Now, Professor Dumbledore gives me a license to start this
A small resistance guild, so I can train you if you need to defend yourselves
Your selves as I have done myself on countless occasions — completely
Functions, see workshops that came out.
"Allow me to introduce my assistant, Professor Snape," Lockhart said,
The main circle. “He said he knows a little about Duel’s wedding .
Culture before sports accepted me with a special fire.
Skel to start. Now, I don’t want someone to feel young —
You’ll still have your Potions apprentice when I’m done with it, never
concern!"
“Wouldn’t it be great if they complemented each other?” said Run in
The Hari ear.
Snape's feet were closer. Harry wondered why Lockhart was still
He looks; If Snape looked at him like that he would have slipped
As possible on the other way.
Lockhart and Snape smelled themselves to that, broke themselves; at least,
Lockhart did, with several waves of his hands, while Snape withdrew his hands .
His head was shaking. Sin rand rands like Switzerland in front of.
“As you can see, we hold our own in acceptable resistance .
place,” Lockhart said to the hushed crowd. “According to the three, we will
Put on our best obsessions. Neither of us would be the target of an attack, of course.”
“I’m not betting on that,” Harry murmured, watching Snape point .
teeth.
“One — two — three —”
Both drew their shields above their heads and pointed them at .
their enemy; “Expelliarmus!” Snape shouted. There was a shiny barn.
of green light and Lockhart was knocked off his feet: he flew backwards
He left the stage, hit the wall, and beat it to cross over
floor.
Malfoy and a few other Slytherins cheered. There was Hermione.
Dance on the feet. “You think he’s good?” She screamed into it.
Fingers.
“Who cares?” Harry and Ron said together.
Lockhart was slowly getting on his feet. His top fell off and
His tousled hair stood on end.
“Well, there you have it!” He said, looking shy.
“That was a Disarming Charm—as you can see, I lost my shield—ah, .
Thank you, Ms. Brown — yes, it’s a good idea to show them that,
Professor Snape, but if you don’t mind my saying that, it was very clear
What you were about to do. If I wanted to stop you it would be
Just too easy — however, I felt it would be educational to let them see . .”
Snape was looking murderous. Lockhart must have known it, because
He said, “Enough demonstrations! I am coming among you now and
Put both of you down. Professor Snape, if you would help me —”
They move through the crowd, welcoming partners. The Lukhart Group
Neville is Justin Finch-Fletchley, but Snape gets to Harry and Run
first.
"It's time to break up the dream team, I think," he joked. “Weasley, you
He could partner Finnigan. grave -"
Harry moved himself to Hermione's side.
“I don’t think so,” Snape said, smiling coldly. " Sir. Malfoy, come on.
here. Let’s see what you can make of the famous grave. And you, Ms.
Granger—you can have sex with Mrs. Bulstrode.”
Malfoy nodded, smiling. Behind him walked a Slytherin girl who
He reminded Harry of a picture he had seen in the Holidays with the Hags. She was
It was big and square and his gray jaw stuck out strong. Hermione had her
the sad sight never returned.
“Face your partners!” called Lockhart, back on the platform. "and
bow!"
Harry and Malfoy almost nodded, never taking their eyes off
each other.
“Wands in the range!” shouted Lockhart. “When I count to three, I put
Your charms to charm your opponents — only to repulse them — we
Don't want anything — anything. . . two . . . three -"
Harry pulled his wand out deliberately, but Malfoy had already started on “two”:
His fists hit Harry so hard that he felt like he had been hit on the head.
With a suspension. It crashed, but everything still seemed to work,
And wasting no time, Harry pointed his wand directly at Malfoy and
he cried, "Rictosempra!"
The silver light hit Malfoy in the stomach and he doubled in size,
Heating.
“I said just disarm!” Lockhart shouted nervously over the heads of
The crowd rises, as Malfoy falls to his knees; Harry took it with a
Tickling Charm, and he could barely stifle the laughter. Harry took a step back,
By a vague hunch, it would be unsportsmanlike to provoke Malfoy while he
was on the floor, but this was a mistake; Sighing, Malfoy
He pointed his wand at Harry's chest, startled, "Tarantallegra!" and the next
The second Harry's hips started moving faster and faster in a sort of
has friendship.
"Stop! Stop!" shouted Lockhart, but Snape got the better of him.
“Finished indentation!” he shouted; Harry's fingers stopped dancing, Malfoy
They stopped laughing and looked up.
A haze of greenish smoke hovered over the scene. Both Nephil
And Justin was lying on the floor, panting; Ron was holding up an ashenfaced Seamus, apologizing for whatever his broken wand had done; but
Hermione and Millicent Bulstrode were still moving; Mix them to
Hermione's in a headlock and Hermione whimpers in pain; both their
The boards are built on the ground. Harry stepped forward and released Millicent.
off. It was difficult: She was much older than he was.
“Dear, dear,” Lockhart said, looking through the crowd, waving at the
After the Invasion. “You’re coming, McMillan. . . . Hang in there, Miss
Fawcett. . . . Bite it hard, it’ll stop bleeding in a second, Boot —
“I think I’d better teach you how to handle unfriendly herds,” he said .
Lockhart, standing nervously in the middle of the hall. He glanced at Snape,
With its black eyes shining, it stared rapidly ahead. “There will be a
Two volunteers—Longbottom and FinchFletchley, how do you put it—”
"That's a bad idea, Professor Lockhart," Snape said, grinning like a .
It’s a pineapple battle. “Longbottom causes destruction in the simplest of ways .
pages. Let’s drive the rest of FinchFletchley up to the hospital
wing in a matchbox.” Neville's pale, pale face turned pale. "how
Malfoy and Butter?” Snabi said with a clear smile.
“Bright idea!” Lokhart said, Harry and Malfoy doing g
In the middle of the room where people are waiting to be given on the spot.
“Now, Harry”, Lockhart said. “When Draco points his finger at you, you
Do this.”
He raised his hand and tried a strange kind of sword.
Do it, please. Snape smirked as Lockhart slowly picked him up,
They say, “Mani — my anger is a little too much —.”
Snape went up to Malfoy, panting, turning to something in
his ear. Malfoy corrected, too. Harry looked in a pleased way at Lokhart and
He said, “Coach, can you show me another thing?”
"afraid?" Malfoy said, so Lockhart wouldn't hear him.
“You want to,” Harry said from the corner of his mouth.
Luckhart shook Harry with a handshake. “Just do what I did,
Harry!”
“Ma, put one of my uncles on it?”
But Lukhart is not a slave.
“Three — two — one — go!” he shouted.
Malfoy brought his hand together in a neat gesture that meant "Serbensourtya!"
The end of his hand changed. Harry looks, turns, like a long computer.
Snake got off of her, landed heavily on the ground between them, and turned around.
On her own, she is ready to win him. There are cards like people that behave in a clean way .
Then, the land exposure.
“They don’t know, Potter,” Snape said in an old-fashioned way, obviously enjoying the picture of .
Harry stood motionless, eye to eye with a clean hand. “I’m leaving the
it. . . .”
Touch me!” Lukhart asked. He showed his hand in his hand and
There’s a clean bang; streets, instead of chasing, instead of chasing, he will run away according to the ten foot .
The air returns to the earth as a fresh coolant. It looks, his
Encouraged, she flew right up to Justin Finch-Fletchley’s side and picked up
By himself, the elements were disassembled and headed for the strike.
Harry doesn’t know what to do. He doesn’t even know
He decided to do it. All he knows is that his feet are carrying him forward.
It’s like he’s on crutches and he’s screaming trumpets at that snake,
“Just let go!” and with the verb — not an afflus — explanation
She walked to the ground, looking like a clean, black house, her eyes now on
Harry. Harry thinks he got away with it. He knew there would be no happiness.
Attack everyone now, though how he knew it, he couldn't explain.
He looks at Justin, begging, begging to see Justin look
out, or being used, or even being ignored — but not just a form of
afraid.
“Do you want to play?” corrected, and before Harry
Wanting to say something, Justin left and left the room.
Snape came over, lowered his hand, and came out of it in a
Small smoke of black meat. Snape, too, sees Harry in a
Unexpected way: It was a smart and calculating look, and Harry didn’t
Like e.g. It is also a great example of a celebrity who is known throughout the country.
The walls. After that, he counted a burden on himself.
“Come on,” Ron’s words said in his ear. “Ammon — enter —”
Ron picked him up from the living room, Hermione writing at their side. as
They dwell in the gates, the people that are on the right side.
yet they were afraid of catching anything. Harry didn’t hav
See what’s going on, and neither Run nor Hermione explain anything
Until he was dragged all the way back to Gryffindor missing
Common room. Then Ron pushed Harry into a chair and said, “You .
A Parsley. why didst thou not tell us?
“I what?” Harry said.
“Parselmouth!” Run said. “You can talk to snakes!”
“I know,” Harry said. “I mean, this is only my second time doing it .
it. To a loss I threw a Boa ball at my cousin Dudley in the woods once.
— long story — but she was telling me she had never seen Brazil and I kind of
Release it meaningless to — that’s before I knew he was a wizard —”
“A boa constrictor tells you he’s never seen Brazil?” Rerun
Unfortunately.
"so?" Harry said. “I bet loads of people here could do it.”
“Oh, no they can’t,” Ron said. “It’s not a very well-known gift. Harry, this
It’s bad.”
“What’s the bad stuff?” Harry said, starting to get very excited. “What's the matter
with everyone? Listen, if I hadn’t told that snake Justin wouldn’t have attacked—”
“Oh, is that what you told her?”
“What do you mean? You were there—you heard me—”
"I hear you speaking Parsel," Ron said. “The language of rights. you
He could have said anything — no wonder Justin was shocked, you
You looked like you were strangling that snake or something—it was scary,
You know -"
Harry stared at him.
“Did I speak another language? But — I don’t understand — how to speak .
A language without knowing I can speak it?”
Ron shook his head. He and Hermione were looking like
Someone had died. Harry couldn't see what was so strange.
“You mean to tell me what’s wrong with touching a giant snake
Did you shave Justin’s head?” he said. “What does it matter how I did it as long as
Like shouldn’t Justin go into headless bars?”
“It’s important,” Hermione said, finally speaking in a quiet voice, .
“Because being able to talk to snakes is what Salazar Slytherin is all about .
It is known as. That’s why the Slytherin House symbol is a snake.”
Harry's mouth hung open.
“All right,” Ron said. “And now the whole school will think that you .
A great-grandson or something —”
"But I'm not," Harry said, frustrated he couldn't quite explain it.
"You're going to find that hard to put on," Hermione said. “He lived about .
A thousand years ago; Because for all we know, you could be.”
Harry stayed awake for hours that night. With a glitch in the curtains of the town hall
Four of his decks watched the rain begin to lash against the window of the tower.
And he asked . . .
Could he be a descendant of Salazar Slytherin? He doesn't know anything
About his father’s family, after all. The Dursleys had always kept
Questions about his Wizarding relatives.
Quickly, Harry tried to say something in Parselto ngue. mandatory
It won't come. Like he had to be face to face with a snake to do it.
But I'm in Gryffindor, Harry thought.
I'm here if I have Slytherin blood. . . .
Ah, he said that a small reading was wrong in his receiver, but the Sorting Hat Education wanted to
Put you in Slytherin, don't you remember?
Harry turned around. He would see Justin the next day at Herbology and would
explain that he was calling the snake, not the driver, what (he
he thought angrily, hugging his pillow) every fool must smile.
By the next morning, however, the rain that had begun overnight had cleared .
It became a serious snowstorm until the last Herbology lesson of the word
Canceled: Professor Sprout wants to put shirts and hats on
Mandrakes, a delicious recipe will do nothing else, now that it is
It is very important for mandrakes to grow in a healthy way and to nourish the mass.
Norris and Colin Creevey.
Harry sat there by the fire in the common room in Gryffindor,
Run and Hermione spend their free time playing witchcraft
chess.
“For heaven’s sake, Harry,” Hermione whispered, like one of Ron’s girlfriends .
The bishops denied his name because his horse was taking him outside the table.
“Go find Justin if that’s something you like a lot.”
So Harry got up and walked out of the window above, wondering where
I wish it was Justin.
The castle was darker than usual during the day because of
Thick rain, peeking through every window. Squinting, Harry walked
Classrooms where classes were taking place, caught snitches of what
It occurs in the gut. Professor McGunagall was yelling at someone.
who, by the sound of it, turned his friend into a raven. before the
Urging to take a look, Harry walks over, thinking that Justin might be
using his free time to catch up on some work, and decided to check out
The foundation in the first.
The group of Hufflefoffs that are supposed to be in herbology are t
actually sit behind the library, but they don't seem to
working. Among the long lines of great books, Harry could see that
Their heads were close together and they had what looked like
language of speech. He couldn't wait to see if Justin was among them.
He was walking up to them when some of what they
He met his ears, and stopped to listen, hiding in the Invisibility section.
“So, as far as that’s concerned,” said a torture dog, “I told Justin to hide in us
desk. I wish I could say, as Peter did it like his late colleague,
He had better take his chances for a while. Of course, Justin was
Was waiting for something like that to happen ever since he let slip to Potter he
He was a Muggle. Justin actually told her he was going to Eton. This
That’s not the sort of thing you’re talking about with the Headmaster of Slytherin, it’s
it?"
“You really think it’s Potter, then, Ernie?” said a blonde girl.
Bigtail in a fun way.
'Hannah,' said the dwarf anxiously, 'is a Parselmouth. all
He knew it was a hint of a Dark wizard. Have you ever heard of a good
One who can talk to snakes? They call Slytherin himself the Snake Tongue.”
There are some old points in this, and it goes on and on,
“Complete what was written in the Gulf? Enemy of the Uraath, beware.
Potter has some sort of rivalry with Filch. Next thing we know, Filch’s cat
They kill. That first year, Crevey was challenging Potter to Quidditch .
match, taking pictures of him while he lay on the ground. The thing that is alive
We know — Krifi was arrested.”
“But, he always seems so nice,” Hannah said uncertainly, “and, well, .
It is the source of the captains to sight. ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵣⵎⵉⵔ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⵍⵉ ⴷ ⵢⵉⵔ ⴰⴽⴽ, ⵢⴻⵣⵎⴻⵔ
he?"
Ernie lowered his voice in disbelief, the Hufflepuffs were getting closer, and .
Harry approached to take the words of Ernie.
“No one knows how he survived that YouKnow-Who attack. I mean
Let’s face it, he was just a baby when it happened. It must be exploded.
In the elements. ⴰⵍⴰ ⴰⵙⴻⵃⵃⴰⵔ ⴰⵇⴻⵙⵃⴰⵏ ⵉⵊⴻⵀⴷⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜⵜ ⵉ ⵉⵣⴻⵎⵔⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⴷⵉⵔ
A story like this.” He dropped his voice until it was more a
Sighing, he said, “Maybe that’s why you-knowwho wants to kill .
ⵖⵓⵔⵙ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⵎⴽⴰⵏ ⴰⵎⴻⵣⵡⴰⵔⵓ. He didn't want another Dark Lord to compete with him.
I wonder what other powers Potter is hiding?”
Harry couldn't take anymore. He cleared his throat loudly and walked out
from behind bookshelves. If he doesn't care, he will leave you.
They found the look that greeted him amusing: Every single one of the Hufflepuffs .
The likes of the likes are considered to be guilty by historic, and the beauty.
It was bleeding from Ernie’s face.
“Hi,” Harry said. “I’m looking for Justin Finch-Fltchley.”
The Hufflepuffs worst fears were quickly confirmed. All .
She sees a lot in growth.
“And what do you want to be with?” Ernie said with a closer slave.
“I want to tell me what happened and the horror in
The Duel Union,” Harry said.
Ernie bit his white lips and then took a deep breath and said, “We were .
All in those. We’ve seen what happened.”
“Sain, you’re afraid that when I spoke, the trams went back?” said
Harry.
“All I’m all about,” Ernie said quickly, even if he was growing when he’s talking about, .
“You were speaking Parseltongue and chasing the snake alongside Justin.”
“Don’t go after him!” Harry said, his voice dripping with hoarseness. "it
It doesn’t even hurt!”
“It was very important,” Grey said. « ⵢⴻⵔⵏⵓ ⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵜⵜⴰⵡⴹⴻⵎ
The ideas,” he added quickly, “I can tell you that you can follow my family .
Return to nine centuries of Echaga and my blood and my blood vessels like
Clean as anybody’s, so —”
“ⵓⵔ ⵉⵢⵉⵢⴻⵀⵡⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⵏ ⵚⵚⴻⵏⴼ ⵏ ⵢⵉⴷⴰⵎⵎⴻⵏ ⵉ ⵜⴻⵙⵄⵉⴹ!” Harry said really. "why
ⴰⴷ ⴱⵖⵓⵖ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜⵏⴰⵖⴻⵖ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵡⵉⴷ ⵉ ⴷⵉⵍⵓⵍⵢⴻⵏ ⵙⴻⴳ Muggle?”
“I’ve heard of you that you’re living,” Irni said quickly.
"He couldn't live with the Dursleys and not hate them," he said .
Harry. “I like to see you try it.”
He turned on his heels and stormed out of the library, getting himself a
He runs after Madame Pence, who opens on a 1000 plate.
ⵢⴰⵏ ⵓⴷⵍⵉⵙ ⴰⵅⴰⵜⴰⵔ ⵏ ⵓⵏⴳⴰⵍ.
Harrey fell on the road, not the house and he was not seen, he was not,
He was in such a hand. The result was that he got involved in something much bigger.
and solid, which knocked him sharply to the ground.
“Oh, hi, Hagrid,” Harry said, looking up.
Hagrid's face hidden all with a sensitive Bakalava diamond, with snow,
But he couldn’t be another, as he eaten most of the store in 1990.
His interior of muleskin. A dead chicken was hanging on one of them
Massive, gloved hands.
“Is everything lost, Harry?” He said, he put down the ball so he could.
“Why isn't she in class?”
“Chancellor,” Harry said and left. “What are you doing here?”
Hagrid held up the missing necklace.
“The second one is killing the season,” he explained. “It’s some fox or someone
Blood-Suckin' Bogbear, an' I'm reading the airport director's certificate that put a
You’re running after hen back.”
He looked more into Harry from under his arm, and the snow came out.
Eyes.
“Yeah excited heya all '? Yes, it turns out everything asks for a very popular novel —.”
Harry couldn't bring himself to answer what remained Irni and the others in the
Hufflepuffs was talking about it.
“It’s nothing,” he said. "I'd better get going, Hagrid, it's a Change
ahead and I have to get my books back.”
He walked away, still full of what Ernie had said about him.
“Justin has been waiting for something like this to happen for a long time .
Lets save peter that he's a muggle. . . .”
Harry stood on the scaffold turning the other way, which
It was a heavy rain; the torches had been extinguished by a strong, icy
The project comes out with a happy picture. It was halfway down.
way when he hit his head on something lying on the ground.
He looked around to see what he had stumbled upon and felt like his
Stumc came out.
Justin Finch-Flitchley rolls around on the floor, twisting and turning, a figure of
confusion gathered on his face, his eyes staring blankly at the ceiling. What is this?
It wasn’t at all. In turn there is another novel, there is the terrorist vision that Harry has.
and he seeth, and seeth not.
It was a bald Nick, no longer coral-white and transparent,
But black and fleshy, glowing that never becomes flesh, six miles from
floor. His head was half-shaved, and his face bore an expression of surprise.
Verbs and Justin.
Harry rose to his feet, his breathing shallow and heavy, his heart doing a
sort of drumroll against his lips. He looked nervously up and down.
The road was narrow and they saw a line of spiders scrambling as fast as they could
away from the body. The only comments were the
Teachers from schools in each district.
He could go, and no one would know he was there. But he
He couldn't let them sleep here. . . . Help must arrive. . . . will
Someone believes he had nothing to do with this?
As he stood there, looking, a door on his side opened with a bang.
bang. Peeves the Poltergeist came shooting out.
“Why, a fucking Potter!” Peeves exclaimed, knocking over Harry's cherries.
Askew as it crossed. “What is butter? Why was Peter wandering
—”
Beef stopped, halfway through an intersection. Top down, he
spotted Justin and Nearly Headless Nick. turned the right way up,
they filled his lungs and, before Harry could stop him, he yelled, “ATTACK!
attack! Reminder of ATTACK! NO DEATH OR GHOST IS SAFE!
BLESSINGS YOUR LIFE! ATTACK!”
Crash — crash — crash — one door after another opened in the street
and people flooded out. For several long minutes, there was a scene of
Rumor has it that Justin is in danger of connecting with people
It ended up being in Nearly Headless Nick. Harry found himself trapped
against the wall as the teachers shouted for quiet. Professor McGunagall
She came running, followed by her class, one of whom still wore blonde hair and a pink goatee. She used her wand to set off a loud bang, which
Silence reigned, and he ordered everyone back to their classrooms. Not long ago .
If the mission turns out to be anything less than Ernie Hufflepuff gets upset, he sighs,
Instead.
“Caught in the act!” Ernie shouted, his face white, pointing to his face
Hand in a good way in Harry.
“That’s what he’ll do, McMillan!” Professor McGonagall said quietly.
Peeves was nodding his head, and now he was twisting wildly, staring at the
scene; Peeves always loved chaos. As the coaches bully Justin and
Up close to headless Nick, smiling at them, Peeves breaks into song:
"Oh, Potter, you're a spy, oh, what have you done, . . ."
You kill students, you think it’s OK —”
“That’s enough, Peeves!” barked Professor McGonagall, and Peeves
zoomed back, tongue-tied at Harry.
Justin was brought to the hospital wing by Professor Flitwick and
Professor Sinistra of the Natural Science department, but no one seems to
Know what I'd do for the Nearly Headless Nick. Finally, the teacher .
McGonagall conjured a large piece out of thin air, which she handed to Ernie .
with orders to waft the nearly headless Nick up the stairs. Tris Ernie
He has worked, was happier Nick as a black babour is known. This left Harry and
Professor McGonagall with all.
“Right, Potter,” she said.
"Headmaster," Harry said suddenly, "I swear I didn't—"
“That’s out of the hands, A Potter,” Professor McGonagall said quickly.
They walked in silence around a corner, and she stopped in front of a large
It's Kigan's Stoneware.
“Lemon drop!” She said. This was evidently a password, because the
Gargoyle left at once to life and came to side as after
They split into two. Even though he was filled with dread for what was to come, Harry couldn't stop
Stay on it nn go. Behind the wall was a spiral staircase that was moving
It is often used topically, such as as a towel. Like him and Professor McGonagall.
stepped onto it, Harry heard the wall thud close behind them. They responded
With the upper in the balls, very smoothly, until the end, with a little sand, Hari's
A gleaming oak door in front of it, with an oval-shaped glass hinge.
He knew now where he was being taken. This should be where
Dumbledore lived.
the
Installation
THE POLYJUIS FOUNDATION
Hey, he jumped off the stone wall in the head, and Professor
McGonagall stepped through the doorway. It opened silently and they entered.
Professor McGonagall told Harry to wait, and she left him there, alone.
Harry looked to his side. One thing was certain: of all faculty offices .
Harry has visited so far this year, Dumbledore's being the most
interesting. If he wasn’t scared out of his mind that he was about to be
Expelled from school, he would have been very happy to have the opportunity to
Look around it.
It was a large and beautiful room, filled with amazing little noises. a
Several fine silverware stood on tables with ornate legs,
They wheeze and release little wisps of smoke. The walls were coated with
Portraits of former principals and schoolmistresses are all
snoozing gently in their wings. There’s also a large, spider-bristled
desk, and, sitting on a shelf behind it, a dirty, tattered Wizard’s hat—and
Distribution box.
Harry hesitated. He glanced cautiously at the sleeping wizards and
He was careful about schools. Surely it couldn’t hurt to pull the cap out and
Have you tried it again? He only means we are going to be understood. . . Just to make sure you put it in
Right axis —
He walked silently across the desk, picked up the bowl from his lap, and
He placed it high on his head. It was too big and sank to the bottom.
over his eyes, just like she did the last time he put it on. Harry
On the inside of the rooftop, he waits. Then a small voice said in his ear:
“Bees in your hat, Harry Potter?”
“Er, yeah,” Harry shrugged. “Er — I’m sorry to bother you — I wanted to ask .
—”
“You were wondering if I put you in the right House,” he said .
Hat with knowledge. "Yes . . . you were especially difficult to pin down. But I stand
By what I said earlier” — Harry’s heart clenched — “you do .
Good luck in Slytherin—”
Harry's stomach dropped. He grabbed the point of the skirt and pulled.
Clear it. It folded loosely in his hand, blackened and faded. He turned back Harry back.
On his plate, he feels sick.
“You’re wrong,” he shouted to the crouching and silent captain. He didn't move.
Harry stepped back and watched him. Then a strange, piercing noise behind him
He did it passing.
He wasn't alone after all. He stood on a golden stool behind the door.
It was a weird looking bird that resembled a potato cut in half. Harry
She looked at him and the bird calmly looked back, making his chirping noises.
again. Harry thought that she looked very sick. His eyes were pretty and, even
Harry noticed, two more pieces fell from his wand.
Harry just thought that all it took was Dumbledore’s hero
Bird would die while he was alone in the office with her, when the bird appeared in
The flames.
Harry sighed in frustration and turned back to the desk. Look
For Tala if there is a water coffee but
He couldn’t see anyone; The bird, meanwhile, has become a wastebasket; He gave a
Screaming louder and the next second nothing but a pile of flying ashes
in the ground.
The office door opened. Dumbledore came in, looking very concerned.
“Turs,” Harry said quickly. “Goding — I can’t work anything — he .
She just took the cause —”
With the joy of the Hari, Dumbledore silences.
“Even the timing,” he said. “He was looking terrible for days; I have
They were said to come forward.”
He succeeded in the vision of Harry’s wife.
“Fawks is the body of the body, A Hari. Phoenix is ​​investigating in the fire when the time comes
ⵉ ⵡⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵎⵎⵜⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⴰⴷ ⴷⵍⵓⵍⴻⵏ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵍⵃⴻⵎⵍⴰ. Wait . . .”
Harrey fell down at time to see a small birds, boys, for Deluling with Lhireras
Qurosses from the stones. She was a lot like a minute.
“It’s a good judgment you have to be fallen on the day of the fire,” Dumbledore, .
He stayed behind the machines. “It’s true, it’s a lot
Lawan, the black and violent gold sky. ⵉⵎⵅⴻⵍⵇⴻⵏ ⵉⴳⴻⵔⵔⵣⴻⵏ, ⴷ ⵉⴼⴻⵏⵉⴽⵙⵉⵢⴻⵏ.
They can bring the boats in, their tears have the strength of therapy.
and worked for a lot of home with a lot of good.”
ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⵙⵃⵉⵙⵙⴻⴼ ⵏ Fawkes ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵟⵟⴼⴻⵏ ⵜⵉⵎⴻⵙⵜ, Harry ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵓ ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓⵜ
There for, but all came back as Dumbledrere Egnes stood in
A high chair behind the desk and straddled Harry with its thick, pale
ⵥⴻⵔ.
However, before Dumbledore could say another word, the door to
Performance was founded with a great play with Hagrid out of
His eyes, his balaclava sitting on his beautiful black head and
The dead brain was still swinging from his grasp.
“Nother and Hari, Professor Doumbledore!” Hagrid was said quickly. "I was
ⵜⵎⴻⵙⵍⴰⵢⴻⴹⴰⵙ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵜⴻⵙⴷⵉⴷⵉⵏ ⵙⴻⵏⴷ ⴰⴷ ⴷⵏⴰⴼ ⴰⵇⵛⵉⵛⵏⵏⵉ, ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴽⵓⴷ, Mass
—”
Dumbledore ⵢⴻⵄⵔⴻⴹ ⴰⴷ ⴷⵢⵉⵏⵉ ⴽⵔⴰ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ Hagrid ⵉⴽⴻⵎⵎⴻⵍ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⴻⵙⵍⴰⵢ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ
The archaeologically passed at the church, sending Rsh every place.
“——You can’t stop, I will be struggling in front of the Shuhor ministry if
They should —”
“Hagred, I —”
“— yeh've got the wrong boy, sir, I know Harry never —”
“Hagrid!” ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ Dumblur ⵙ ⵚⵚⵓⵜ ⵄⵍⴰⵢⴻⵏ. « ⵓⵔ ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵍⵉⵖ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ Harry ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵟⵟⴻⴼ .
Those people.”
“ⴰⵀ”, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Hagrid, ⴰⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢⵏⵏⵉ ⵢⴻⵖⵍⵉⴷ ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⴰⵎⴰⵙ. "Right. I'll wait
Outside then, Director.”
And it quickly was silently frustrated.
“You don’t think I am, Professor?” Harry has also been also hopefully
Dumbledre has dismissed the woman’s rice from home.
"No, Harry, I don't," Dumbledore said, though his face was calm .
again. “But I still want to take up.”
Harrey Skhoug wants to drop out of Dumbledusehrts, his homes
The allies are long enough.
“I need to ask you, Harry, if there’s something you want to tell me,”
he’s talked to Lord. “Something all.”
Harry didn't know what to say. Thinking about Malfoy wore, “Ad .
Tell is the one that is, Modbleloods!” and of Pution of Polyjoice who has benefited from 2019.
She was joined in the Myrtle camp. ⵙⵢⵉⵏ ⵉⵅⴻⵎⵎⴻⵎ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵚⵚⵓⵜ ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵙⵄⵉ ⵍⴵⴻⵜⵙⵜⵙⴰ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⴼⴽⴰ
She listened twice and remembered Ron saying, “Hearing voices no .
Anyone else might hear it’s not a good sign, even in the Wizarding world.” he
Thinking, too, about what everyone says, and the ancestry .
ⵜⵓⴳⴷⵉ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵙ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵙⴰ ⵢⴻⵇⵇⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ Salazar Slitherin. . . .
“No,” Harry said. “No something, a Professur. . . .”
A double-half on Justin and Nick almost we didn’t have to do what’s
It's very common in fact. Surprisingly, it was almost
Nick’s seemingly headless power is very annoying to people. What could
Does he do this to an Angis ? people asked each other; What awesome power.
Can he harm someone who is already dead? There was almost a stampede
Let’s get the record in Hogwarts Essential so students can go home
Christmas.
“In this context, we’ll be only players,” Ron told Harry and Hermione.
“With, Malfoy, Crabb, and Guile. What’s going to be a July event that’s going to happen.”
Krabbe and Goyle, who are very much disgusted by what Malfoy did, are both
Let’s stay on the holidays, too. But Harry said that in general people are
I'm leaving. It’s turning out to people and look at it in the streets, such as
although he is about to spew ashes or spit venom; tired of all the
The smile, it shows, was his thought as he passed.
However, Fred and George found the whole thing very interesting. They went out of
Their way forward to Harry under the streets, and they say, “Cree
The road to the slytherin market, the guardian of the children who walk. . . .”
Percy was very disapproving of this behavior.
« ⵓⵔ ⴷ-ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵉⵍⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵜⴻⵎⵙⴰⵍⵜ ⵏ ⵜⴹⵙⴰ », ⵖⴻⴼ ⵡⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⵢ ⴷ-ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ ⵙ ⵓⵙⴻⵎⵎⵉⴹ.
“Oh, get out of the way, Percy,” Fred said. “Harry in one room.”
“Yes, he went to the Yifukanen to eat a Lattay and wife .
A hands-on worker,” George said, grinning.
Jenny did not find it even.
“Oh, don’t take it,” said Fred Harry fully asked what .
Please fight them in front of them, or when George’s such as the smelling the Harry s
A great color of the slave when they met.
Harry didn't mind; This leads him to assume that Fred and George, in
Less, he thinks the idea of ​​the girl and Slitherin’s character is what he’s very careful.
But it appears to have their own signs are ridiculous with Draco Malloy, who show
Simual increases every time he is seen in it.
"However, it was to say that it was really him," Ron said honestly.
“You know how something takes care of something, and you
All the prince of righteousness is given.”
“It’s not a lot of time,” Hermione said in a circumstances. “The police
Potion's almost ready. Let’s really spend a few day now.”
the end, it was a silence of their cry such as snow on earth
Sick of the city. ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵢⵓⴼⴰ-ⵜ-ⵉⴷ ⵙ ⵜⴰⵍⵡⵉⵜ, ⵡⴰⵔ ⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ-ⴷ ⵓⵄⴻⵢⵢⵓ, ⴷ
She loves to be, Hermionee, and Weasley have the
Grinffindor bar, which means Snap Yettbeddillen can play with Soto Allen
Without proving anything, it's a matter of harmony in private. Fred, George,
ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⴳⵉⵏⵏⵢ ⵜⴻⴼⵔⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⵖⴻⵔⴱⴰⵣ ⵡⴰⵍⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵔⵣⵓ ⵖⴻⴼ ⴱⵉⵍⵍ ⴷⵉ ⵎⴰⵚⴻⵔ ⵙ
Mr. and Mrs. Wizli. Percy, which is not agreed on what they call it
The child’s behavior, did not spend a long time in the most popular Griffindore .
room. He’d already told them in a sarcastic tone that he was just staying upstairs
Nippy because they’re hallis and prefeckt to help teachers
At this time you have no power.
The birthday party goes, cold and white. Harry and Run, they are just
The ones left in their orphanage were brought in by Hermione very early, i
He left, and learned by chemist and took pictures for their two.
“Drink,” she said aloud, pushing the curtains down.
“Hermione — you shouldn’t be here —” Ron said, keeping .
His eyes against the light.
“Merry Christmas to you too,” Hermione said, handing him hers .
present. “So almost still from when I was happier, they added more than ears of the ears of the ears .
medicine. It’s the right.”
Harry sat up, suddenly wide awake.
“Do you?”
“Positive,” Hermione said, shifting Scabbers the beast so she could sit up .
Down the end of Ron's shoulder. "If we're going to do it, I say it
It should be right.”
At that moment, Hedwig darted into the room, carrying a very small bundle .
package in his head.
“Hi,” Harry said cheerfully as she climbed onto his bed. “You’re talking
I am also?”
She licked his ear in a sort of affectionate way, which was very cute
It looked better than the one she received, which turned out to be the
Dursli family. They sent Harry a toothpick and a note telling him to
Find if it can stay in Hogwarts for the summer Moors.
also.
What else of the Harry’s Noël weddings were much more concerned.
Hagerided deceased a big shop of tears, which is required to serve
Thaw with sauce before eating; Run gives him a book called Flying
With Cannons, it’s a book book about Quidditch for very loves
The team, and and Hermie has a lack of Kiter Basid of Kyir. Harry
He opened the last gift to find a new sweater, handmade by Mrs.
Weasley and a big pot of peanut butter. reads its map with a new class of
Holy, he thinks about Mass Wesley (deceased has not been seen since Detto
occurs with the Whomping Willow), and the legal challenge is the
Ron were singing the next.
No one, even the one who is trying to take Polyjoice Potion Sedffers, cannot .
It has not benefited from Noël’s dinner in Hogarts.
The big room was great. It’s not just the dozens of Christmas trees covered in ice and pine cones and pine cones .
It goes over the roof, but the compressed snow was falling, hot and dry,
from the ceiling. Dumbledore is heading in some songs for the very love,
Hagrid yelled louder and louder with every cup of eggnog he had
was a food. Percy, who didn't notice that Fred had shamed his manager
Badge to now read “Pinhead”, he kept asking them all what they were .
He chuckles at. Harry didn't even care about Draco Malfoy speaking out loud.
Snide comments about his new jacket from the Slytherin table. slightly
of luck, Malfoy would be getting his comeuppance in a few hours time.
Harry and Ron are about to finish their third Christmas collaboration
pudding as Hermione sent them down the hall to complete their homework
Evening plans.
“We still need a bit of the people you changed into,” Hermione said .
In fact, it’s like sending them to the supermarket for
Washing laundry. “And obviously, it would be great if you could get some
Crabby and Guyle; They were Malfoy's best friends, he would tell them
anything. And we also have to see if the real Crabbe and Goyle can’t .
He walked out on us while we were questioning him.
“I’ve got it all working together,” she goes further, thinking Harry’s Harry is
Ron's face was tense. She holds two mugs of dark chocolate. “I’m full
This one with a simple sleep diagram. All you have to do is enter the
Crabbe and Goyle find them. You know how hot they are, they
bound to eat them. Once they are comfortable, pull out some of their hair and
Hide them in a trash can.”
Harry and Ron looked at each other in disbelief.
“Hermione, I don’t think —”
“This could be wrong—”
But Hermione had a steely glint in her eyes unlike the Professor's
McGonagall sometimes has.
"That operation would be incomplete without the skeletons of Crabbe and Goyle," she said .
Closely. “You really want to investigate Malfoy, don’t you?”
“Oh, okay, okay,” Harry said. “But what about you? Whose hair
Are you shaking?”
“I already have mine!” Hermione said teasingly, pulling a small bottle
From his hand he shows them a wing in his belly. "remember
Mixant Bulstrad Akidi at Duyling Club? tfl this
On my clothes when she was trying to rape me! And she went home
Christmas — so I just have to let the Slytherins know that I’ve decided to come .
back."
When Hermione carefully left to check on Polyjuice's pain again,
Ron turned to Harry with a sad expression.
“Have you ever heard of a plan where so many things can go wrong?”
But much to Harry and Ron’s surprise, the first phase of the operation went through .
Calmly as Hermione said. hide in the wilderness.
The lobby after Christmas tea, waiting for Crabbe and Goyle who had
They sat alone at the Slytherin table, choking down a fourth draft of
A little. Harry had placed the chocolate balls in the center of the table.
When they saw Krabbe and Goyle leaving the Great Hall, Harry
and Ron Yuli suddenly followed a robbery near the entrance to the street.
“How high can you get?” Run smiled as happily as Crabbe
He proudly mentioned the boys to Guile and arrested them. Greening
Cruelly, they filled the animals whole in their huge mouths. for one
For a second, the two of them were cheering wildly, looks of victory on their faces.
After that, without the slightest change of verb, the two managed to reach
Back to the ground.
With the best part as them in the room in the room in the room in the room.
When they were safely snapped between the small and small, Harry caught
Releasing the two pillows covering Goyle’s forehead, Ron pulled
Pull out a lot of Crabbe's hair. They also stole their guns, because
There are very little about Crabbe feet and Goyle. both, the most beautiful
In what they had worked just, they went back to Moaning Myrttle
shower.
Aqli couldn’t Walin Denkhorous blondes left out of the store in 1990.
For Hermione keeps clean for coffee. They pulled their skirts up
Their faces, Harry and Ron quickly achieved the door.
“Hirmiyun?”
They heard a rain ears and Davis, by the way.
and on running. Behind him they heard the sound of
Pubbleling, the princess of the salt. Three slots of SJAIs stood up at all over the season.
seat.
“The sails?” Hermione asked rhetorically.
Harry pointed at Goyle's frown.
"Now. And I've exported the rise from the smell's home," said Hermione .
He said, holding up a small sack. “It will be a bigger prayer that is when you are sick.
Crab and Guyle.”
The three of them looked at the car. almost, and the budget
Like the powder, sand, bowls with the cold.
“I felt I did everything the right thing,” Hermione said, in mind
With the reading of the Mosete Pointe's research. “It looks like
The book must be. . . When we get, let’s take one hour well.
Before we turn to ourselves.”
“Now what?” Run whined.
“We’ve come to three and we’ve been a sick.”
Hermione has brought off theater teams of the bass each of the ones of each one of the storm.
Sein, the sandfriends, and snapped Millencent Bulsterrede from the Photos .
The first gas opposites.
The medicine smells loudly like a steaming car and blows wildly. a
Secondly, it becomes a type of dialogue.
“Ogh — Milisent Bulsterd,” Ron said, and he’s accomplished with Wallens .
ⴰⴽⴻⵔⵀⵓ. “No love.”
“To add, yes,” said Hermione.
Harry puts the Goyle’s head in the middle gas gas, Ron broke the Crabbe
In the last. Twins are smiling and celebratory: Goyle's wears khakis
the color of a booger, Crabbe is brown, gray.
"Hang on," Harry said as Ron and Hermione got out of their seats.
“Fit not all of it all right here. . . . When we go back to Krab and
Goyle doesn’t work. And Millennial Bulsterad we say.”
“ⴰⵅⴻⵎⵎⴻⵎ ⵢⴻⵍⵀⴰⵏ”, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Ron, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⴼⵙⴻⵔ ⵜⴰⵡⵡⵓⵔⵜ. “We will controlling
shops.”
Hadrat so you don’t even know a Polyjuiceines, Harry’s house was fallen in
The middle of the store.
"ready?" Talking.
“Ready,” came Ron and Hermione’s voices.
“One — two — three —”
In the Industrial Log, Harry Occupied Al-Green ears to two great passengers. it
It tastes like overcooked coffee.
Immediately, his insides began to convulse as if he had just swallowed
The lived stones — with two bars, Emanis asked if they got to death
— Sein Akin, you quickly left the story of fire from the neck to the body .
The tips of his fingers and toes — in front of him, he brought him by the throat to four,
There came a terrible burning sensation, as the skin all over his body boiled like
hot wax — and before his eyes, his hands began to grow, fingers .
squinting, eyebrows furrowed, eyebrows flaring out like arrows — hers
His shoulders twisted painfully, a voice in his head told him that
His hair was sloping down to his eyes—his beard was as disheveled as hers .
His chest rose like a barrel sharpening his hooks—his knees were awful in
Four-size shoes are too small —
As soon as she started, everything stopped. Harri lay face down.
On the stone-cold floor, she heard Myrtle grunt softly at the end
bath. With difficulty, he took off his shoes and stood up. So this was
What she felt, because it was Goyle. His big hand reaches out and he removes his
The old clothes, which hung one leg above his knees, pulled on the tension
One, and they used Goyle’s things like an anchor. He reached up to brush his hair.
He slipped out of sight and was only met with the dark blur of blue, under his nose
forehead. Then he realized that his contacts were staining his eyes because
Goyle obviously didn’t need them — he took them off and called out, “Are .
You two okay?” Goyle's rasp of a sound erupted from his mouth.
“Yes,” came Crabbe’s deep growl from his right.
Harry unlocked his door and knelt in front of the cracked mirror.
Goyle returned it with round, deep eyes. Harry scratched his ear.
So did Goyle.
Ron's door opened. They looked at each other. except it looks delicious.
And shockingly, Ron was indistinguishable from Crabbe, from the pudding-bowl mustache to the long gorilla arms.
“That’s unbelievable,” Ron said, approaching the mirror and stretching .
Crabbe’s nose is simple. “It’s unbelievable.”
“We’d better get going,” Harry said, pulling out the clock that was .
cut into Goyle's pinky hand. “We still have to find out where the
Slytherin common room is. I just hope we can find someone who will
follow . . .”
Ron, who was looking at Harry, said, "You don't know what it's like . . ."
It’s to see Goyle think.” He knocked on Hermione's door. “Come on, we
We should go —”
A high voice replied.
“I — I don’t think I’ll come after that. You’re done without me.”
“Hermione, we know that Millicent Bulstrod is dangerous, no one will ever know .
are you -"
“No—really—I don’t think I’ll come. You two try, you
You’re wasting time —”
Harry looked at Ron, shocked.
"That sounds more like Goyle," Ron said. “That’s how every
The time the teacher asks a question.”
“Hermione, are you alright?” Harry said from the doorway.
“I’m fine — I’m fine — go on —”
Harry looked at his watch. Five of their valuable six minutes had
It’s already passed.
“We’ll meet you here, okay?” he said.
Harry and Run carefully opened the bedroom door and checked to see if
The sea was clear, and they set sail.
“I don’t worry with hands all,” Harry said with the Ron’s vision.
"Yes?"
“Chrabbe keeps with the ear. . . .”
"how is?"
“Yes, it’s for thousands. . . .”
Leave the marble patio alone. All they need now is
Slytherin that they could follow to the Slytherin common room, but there
No one is on the side.
“Any ideas?” exclaimed Harry.
“Slitherin’s residents always buy coffee from there,” he said .
Ron, looking at the entrance to the stacks. The words are almost out
Mess as she came out of the gate a girl with long, quiet.
“I’m sorry,” Ron said, walking over to her. “We have forgotten the way to
Our home room.”
“I apologized with smell?” The woman said the sect. “Our friendship? I am a
Ravenklaw.”
She walked over, looking at them suspiciously.
Harry and Ron hurried down the stone staircase into the darkness, their
The knees creaked especially loudly when Crabbe and Goyle’s big shots hit
Early on, they felt this wasn’t going to be as easy as they had hoped.
The boat lanes were mixed. They go deep and
The Gulf, every time have been seen to find out how they find how.
A lot of time they left. Sand rape of the silver, only when they were
They crouched down and heard a sudden movement ahead.
“Ha!” Ron said cheerfully. “There’s one of them now!”
The figure was emanating from a side room. As they approached slowly,
However, the sermons are open. He wasn't a Slytherin, he was Percy.
“What are you doing down here?” Ron said with a smile.
Percy militantly pleasantly.
“That,” he said with good, “it’s not angel. And Crabbe, are all?
“Wh — oh, yes,” Ron said.
“Yes, stop to your wedding homes,” Percy said with hunting. “It’s not safe for
Go wandering the side streets these days.”
“You are,” he reminded Ron.
“I’m,” Percy said, he snapped himself, “a guardian of the country. Nothing
Push me.”
A voice suddenly rang out from behind Harry and Ron. Draco Malfoy was
He looks over at them, and for the first time in his life, Harry is happy
to see.
“There you are,” he declares, waving at them. “You two were
piging ot at Uxxam Amqran all seasons? I was looking for you; I
I want to with something really interesting.”
Malfoy looked down at Percy.
“And what do you work here, A Weasley?” he is good.
Percy mildly with happiness.
“You want to show a little respect for a schoolmaster!” he said. "I
I didn’t meet you!”
Malfoyran is committed with Roy and Ron to follow. Harry
He was about to say something apologetic to Percy but caught himself just in time.
He and Ron scored Malfoy, they said they were simultaneously simultaneously.
Part, “As Peter Wesley —”
“Percy,” Ron corrected himself.
“You’re abandoned,” said Malfoy. “I’ve seen him hit a lot lately.
And I saw what I say. He thinks Slither
The leader with one hand.”
He gave a short, sheepish laugh. Harry and Ron exchanged pleased smiles.
Malfoy stopped in front of a black, wet stone wall.
“What’s the new password again?” He told Harry.
“Er —” Harry said.
“Oh, yes — pure blood!” Malfoy said, not listening, and the stone door .
He hid in the wall open. Malfoy walked in, and Harry and
Run followed.
The Slytherin common room was a long, underground room with
The dark stone walls and ceiling of which were dark, round windows
He was hung on chains. A fire was crackling beneath an intricately carved oak.
mantelpiece in front of them, and several Slytherins were painted around the
It in high backed chairs.
“Wait here,” Malfoy told Harry and Ron, motioning them over to the .
The empty chairs were placed from the fireplace. “I'll go get it—just my father .
He sent it to me—”
Wondering what Malfoy was going to show them, Harry and Ron sat down .
Below, they are doing their best to explore the house.
Malfoy returned a minute later, holding what looked like a newspaper .
kidding. He placed it under Ron's nose.
"This will give you a laugh," he said.
Harry saw Ron's eyes go wide. He read the note quickly and gave
A very restrained smile he gave Harry.
It was stripped of regular Christmas, and she said:
INQUIRY AT THE MINISTRY OF MAGIC
Arthur Wissley, director of the Museum of Maggle Artifacts, is
Today marks the 50th anniversary of the launch of the Muggle car.
Master Lucius Malfoy, Headmaster of Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry
and Wizardry, where the boat crashed later this year,
They called for Mr. Weasley's resignation today.
"Weasley has lied to the Ministry," said Mr. Malfoy .
Our journalist. “He clearly has no right to impose our rights and his
ridiculous muggle protection order should be scrapped immediately.”
Mr. Weasley was unavailable for comment, though his wife said
journalists to disarm or set the family ghoul on them.
"Well?" said Malfoy impatiently as Harry handed the clipping back to
he. “Don’t you think it’s funny?”
“Ha, ha,” Harry groaned.
“Arthur Weasley loved the Muggles so much that he had to sell his wallet in
Half and you go walk them,” Malfoy said menacingly. “You don’t know
These are red flowers, a way of writing.”
Run's — or D, Crabb's — Handmade face.
“Did he take you with you, Krabe?” Malfoy left.
"Stumcat," Run wore.
“Well, get up to the hospital wing and give all those Mudbloods a lick .
From me,” Malfoy said, reassured. “You know, I surprised Daily
Prophet hasn’t reported all these attacks yet,” he said thoughtfully. "I
Let's just say Dumbledore is trying to screw it all up. will be deleted if it doesn't
Stop immediately. My father always says it's Dumbledore, it's a bad thing to be
It's very common in this area. He loves Muggle-borns. A former manager
Can’t let a slime like that Creevey in.”
Malfoy starts taking pictures with the imaginary camera and makes a mess
But Colin's friend asked: “'Potter, can I have your picture, Butter?
Can I get your autograph? Can I tie your shoes, please, Potter?'”
He dropped his hands and looked at Harry and Ron.
“What’s wrong with you two?”
Far too late, Harry and Ron forced themselves to laugh, but Malfoy
He seemed disappointed; I mean crab and gouel are very commonly used in the
submission.
“Saint Potter, the Mudbloods' friend,” said Malfoy slowly. "he
Another doesn’t have the right sense of magic, or doesn’t go through the
This angst-ub granter modblood. And people think it's Slytherin
heir!"
Harry and Ron Rageon breathe a sigh of relief: Malfoy isn't just a double
I wanted him to tell them he was — but then —
"I wish I knew who it was," Malfoy sighed. “I can help them.”
Rune's bird rose to become a crab who was stronger than the one who had eaten it.
Soon Malfoy was out of sight, and Harry, thinking quickly, said, 'You .
He had to have some idea who was behind all of this. . . .”
“You know I haven’t, Goyle, how many times do I have to tell you?”
Malfoy said. “And my father won’t tell me anything about the last time .
A box also opens. Obviously, it was fifty years ago, and therefore it was
before his time, but he knew all about it, and said that everything was taken care of
They’re quiet and he’s going to get suspicious if I know much about him. But I know one
Thing — last time the target room was opened, a Mudblood died.
So I guess it’s a matter of time before one of them gets killed this time. . . . I
Hopefully Granger,” he said with loss.
Ron was clawing at Crabbe's massive hands. You get the feeling that it’s going to be a bit
threatening if Ron knocked up Malfoy, Harry gave him a warning look and
He said, “Do you know if the person who opened the Chamber last time was .
caught?"
“Oh, hey . . . The one who was kidnapped,” Malfoy said. "she
I mean, they're still in Azkaban.”
“Azkaban?” Harry said, confused.
"Azkaban—the wizarding prison, Goyle," Malfoy said, looking at him in
disbelief. “Honestly, if you stopped anything, you would go backwards.”
Shifting abruptly in his chair, he said, “My father said he would keep my head
down and let the Slytherin bastard get on with it. They say school should
Removing all of Mudblood's corruption, but not to mix in it. sure,
He has a lot on his plate right now. You know the Ministry of Magic
You took our load last week?”
Harry tried to push down Goyle's flushed face.
"Yes . . ." Malfoy said, “surprisingly, they didn't find much for my father.
Some very important Dark Arts items. But luckily, we had our secret
Architecture under the auspices of swlf —.”
“Ho!” Run said.
Malfoy looked at him. Harry did the same. Run passed. Even her hair was
It turns red. His nose is also getting progressively longer — longer and longer,
Ron was turning back into himself, and from the look of panic he was
At one point Harry gave Harry, he should be too.
They both jumped to their feet.
“Medicine for my stomach,” Ron said quietly, and without warning .
Literally running the length of the Slytherin common room, they threw themselves into
stone wall, and dashed out into the street, hoping against hope that Malfoy .
He didn't see anything. Harry could feel his fingers twitching in
Goyle with big shoes and should raise his stature as he gets older; they
He descended the stairs into the central entrance hall, filled with
They run back and forth from the meat where they turn into crabs and
Guile. They left their shoes outside the prison door and ran around their apartment
the top of the marble staircase to the Moaning Myrtle Chapel.
“Well, it wasn’t a complete waste of time,” Ron said quietly, closing the
The door of the rest house is behind them. “I know we still haven’t found out who
I'm making those calls, but I'm going to write to my dad tomorrow and tell him to
Look down at Malphus’ statue hall.”
Harry looked at his face in the cracked mirror. He returned to normal. he
He broke l'écranis when Ron snapped the door of the Hirmion store door.
“Hermione, come out, we have a need to tell you—”
"go away!" Hermione scoffed.
Harry and Ron looked at each other.
“What’s wrong?” Run said. “You should be back to normal now, we .
are -"
But Moaning Myrtle stormed out of the closet door. He had Harry
I've never seen her look so happy.
“Ooooooh, wait till you see,” she said. “That’s awful —”
They heard the stairs moving backwards and Hermione came out, panting, she
clothes pulled over his head.
"what's up?" Ron said nervously. “You still got Millicent’s nose
Or something else?”
Hermione let her dress fall and Ron walked back into the kitchen.
His face was covered in red fur. His eyes turned gray and there
There were long, fluffy ears curling in his hair.
“It’s cat hair!” she screamed. "I'm sorry Bulstrud should have
cat! And the potion should never be used for an infection
Changes!”
“Uh-huh,” Ron said.
“They’re going to serve you something amazing,” Myrtle said excitedly.
“It’s okay, Hermione,” Harry said quietly. "We'll take you up to
hospital wing. Madam Pomfrey didn't ask too many questions. . . .”
It took a long time to convince Hermione to leave the dormitory.
Smiling Myrtle waves them on their way with a hearty guffaw. “Wait until
Everyone finds out you have a ring!”
h
Chapter Thirteen
Top Confidential Journal
Ermione stayed in the hospital wing for several weeks. was
A flower of words about his brother when he stayed.
School is back from Christmas vacation, because of course
Everyone thought she was cursed. Many students who have passed
The hospital wing is trying to check on Miss Pomfrey
It took a ministry again, and put them on the Hermione bed, to
Avoid the embarrassment of looking body-faced.
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⴷ Ron ⵜⵜⵕⵓⵃⵓⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜⵥⵔⴻⵏ ⵢⴰⵍ ⵜⴰⵎⴻⴷⴷⵉⵜ. ⴰⵙⵔⴰ ⴳ ⵉⴳⴳ ⵢⵉⵔⵎ ⴰⵎⴰⵢⵏⵓ
ⴱⴷⴰⵏ, ⵜⵜⴰⵡⵉⵏⴰⵙⴷ ⵍⴻⵛⵖⴰⵍ ⵏ ⵢⴰⵍ ⴰⵙⵙ.
“If I turn on the lights, I will join a meeting from work,” Ron said, speaking .
ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⴽⵔⴽⴰⵙ ⵏ ⵉⴷⵍⵉⵙⵏ ⵅⴼ ⵜⴷⴰⴱⵓⵜ ⵏ ⵢⴰⵏ ⵡⴰⵙⵙ ⵏ ⵓⵅⴼ ⵏ ⵀⵉⵔⵎⵉⵓⵏ ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⴷⴳⴳⵡⴰⵜ.
“Don’t care, A Ron, I have to take,” Hermione said quickly. her
ⵕⵕⵓⵃⴰⵜ ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵙⴻⵍⵃⵓⵏⵜ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⵉⵎⵉ ⴰⴽⴽ ⴰⵛⴻⴱⴱⵓⴱⵏⵏⵉ ⵢⴻⴼⴼⴻⵖⴷ ⵙⴻⴳ
His face and eyes slowly turned towards the ceiling. « ⵓⵔ ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵍⵉⵖ ⴰⵔⴰ
Do you have any new tips?” ⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ ⵙ ⵓⵙⵓⵙⴻⵎ, ⵉⵡⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ Massa
Pomfrey ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵣⵎⵉⵔ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⴰⵙⵉⵙⵍⵉ.
“ⵓⵍⴰⵛ”, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Harry ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ.
“ⵙⵙⵓⵔⴻⴼⵉⵢⵉ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⴷ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴷ Malfoy”, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Ron, ⴰⵣⴰⵍ ⵏ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⴻⵍⵜ ⵜⵉⵙ ⵎⵢⴰ.
“What’s that?” » ⵉ ⵙⵢⴻⵙⵜⴻⵇⵙⴰ Hari, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⴷⴻⴳ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵡⵓⵔⴻⵖ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⴼⴼⵖⴻⵏ
From under the Hermiee.
“ⴷ ⵜⴰⴽⴰⵔⴹⴰ ⴽⴰⵏ ⵏ ⴳⴻⵜ ⵡⴻⵍⵍ”, ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ Hermione ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ, ⵜⴻⵄⵔⴻⴹ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜⵜⴻⵙⵙⵓⴼⴻⵖ ⵙⴻⴳ .
ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ Ron ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵄⴻⴳⴳⵉⴹ ⴼⴻⵍⵍⴰⵙ. ⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⴼⴻⵖⵉⵜⵜ, ⵢⴻⵍⴷⵉⵜⵜ, ⵓ
ⵖⴻⵔ ⵙ ⵚⵚⵓⵜ ⵄⵍⴰⵢⴻⵏ
'To Messg Granger, who hopes you will have hope, from your tasting
ⴰⵙⵍⵎⴰⴷ, ⴰⵙⵍⵎⴰⴷ ⵊⵉⵍⴷⵉⵔⵓ ⵍⵓⴽⵀⴰⵔⵜ, ⴰⵙⵍⴳⵏ ⵏ ⵎⵔⵍⵉⵏ, ⴰⵙⵡⵉⵔ ⵡⵉⵙⵙ ⴽⵕⴰⴹ,
Senior member of the Red Cross, five-time
ⵢⴻⵡⵡⵉⴷ ⴰⵔⵔⴰⵣ ⵏ ⵡⵉⵜⵛⵀ ⵡⴻⴻⴽⵍⵢ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ.”
ⵔⵓⵏ ⵉⵥⵕⴰ ⵖⵔ ⵀⵉⵔⵎⵉⵓⵏ, ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵖⵓⵍ.
“ⵜⴻⴹⵔⴰⴷ ⵙ ⵡⴰⵢⴰ ⴷⴷⴰⵡ ⵜⴼⴻⴽⴽⴰ-ⵏⵏⴻⴽ?”
But Hermione likes Madame Pomfrey's son fighting for
ⵙ ⵜⵙⵎⴽⵜⴰ ⵏ ⵓⵙⴳⵏⴰⴼ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴷⴷⵉⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴷⴷⵉⵜ.
“ⵉⵙ ⴷ ⵍⵓⴽⵀⴰⵔⵜ ⴱⵔⵉⴷ ⵏ ⵙⵎⴰⵔⵎⵉ ⵍⵍⵉ ⴽ ⵢⴰⴷ ⵉⴼⴽⴰⵏ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⵍⵜ, ⵏⵖ ⵎⴰ ⴰⵢ ⴷ ?” Ron said
ⵉ Harry ⵎⵉ ⴷⴼⴼⵖⴻⵏ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵓⵙⴱⵉⵟⴰⵔ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵎⵓⴹⴰⵏ, ⴱⴷⴰⵏ ⵜⵜⴳⴰⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵙ ⵜⵃⵓⵏⴰ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⴰⵎⴰ ⵏ
Gryffindor Tower. ⵉⴼⴽⴰ ⴰⵙⵏ ⵙⵏⴰⴱ ⴽⵉⴳⴰⵏ ⵏ ⵜⵡⵓⵔⵉⵡⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵜⴰⴷⴷⴰⵔⵜ, ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ
ⵉⵅⴻⵎⵎⴻⵎ ⴰⵀⴰⵜ ⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⵍⵉ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⵙⴻⴳⴳⴰⵙ ⵡⵉⵙ ⵙⴹⵉⵙ ⵓⵇⴱⴻⵍ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵢⴻⴽⴼⵓ. ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ Run
ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵉⵏⵉ ⵖⴰⵙ ⵉⵙ ⵉⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵙⵇⵙⴰ ⵀⵉⵔⵎⵉⵓⵏ ⵎⵛⵜⴰ ⵏ ⵜⴼⵍⵡⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵖⵔⴷⴰⵢ ⵍⵍⵉ ⴽ ⵉⴳⴰⵏ
ⵉⵍⴰⵇ ⴰⴷ ⵔⵏⵓⵏ ⵖⵔ ⵢⴰⵏ ⵓⵏⴳⴰⵍ ⵏ ⵀⴰⵢⵔ-ⵔⴰⵢⵙⵉⵏⴳ ⵎⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵢⵉⵍⵉ ⵢⴰⵏ ⵓⴼⵓⵖ ⵙⴳ .
No evening are even better to their ears.
“ⴷ ⴰⵢⴰ ⴰⵢ ⴷ ⴼⵉⵍⵛ,” ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵖⵓⵍ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵍⵍⵉⵖ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⴰⵍⵙⵏ ⴰⵙⴽⴽⵉⵍ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⴱⴱⵉ,
ⴱⵕⵕⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵡⵍⴰⴼⵜ, ⴰⵙⵍⵍⵙ ⵙ ⵡⴰⵟⴰⵙ.
“ⵓⵔ ⵜⵜⵉⵖⵉⵍⴷ ⵎⴰⵙ ⴷ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵢⴰⴹⵏ ⵉⵜⵜⵢⴰⵡⵙⵙⴰⵏ?” ⵉⵏⵏⴰ ⵔⵓⵏ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⵜ.
ⴱⴷⴷⵏ ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⴱⴷⴷⴰⵏ, ⵉⵖⴼ ⵏⵏⵙⵏ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵖⵓⵍ ⵙ ⵜⴳⵓⵔⵉ ⵏ ⴼⵉⵍⵛ, ⵍⵍⵉ
ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵖⵓⵍ ⴱⴰⵀⵔⴰ ⴰⵀⵉⵙⵜⵔⵉⴽ.
“— ⵓⴳⴰⵔ ⵏ ⵍⴻⵇⴷⵉⵛ ⵉ ⵢⵉⴷ-ⵢⴻⴼⴽⴰ! ⵙⵙⵓⵙⵎⴻⵖ ⵉⴹ ⴽⴰⵎⴻⵍ, ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ ⵓⵔ ⵙⵄⵉⵖ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵉⵍⴰⵇⴻⵏ
ⴰⴷ ⵉⴳ! ⵍⵍⴰ, ⵡⴰ ⴷ ⴰⴼⵔⴰ ⴰⵏⴳⴳⴰⵔⵓ, ⵔⴰⴷ ⴷⴷⵓⵖ ⵙ ⴷⵓⵎⴱⵍⴷⵓⵔ —.”
His texts are based on the length of the road outside the field until they reach a
Greeting the outer door.
ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⴰⵡⵉⵏ ⵉⵅⴼⴰⵡⵏ ⵏⵏⵙⵏ ⵖ ⵜⵙⴳⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵡⵏⵖⴰ. ⴼⵉⵍⵛⵀ ⵉⴱⴰⵏⴷ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ
ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵎⵙⴰⵡⴰⵍ ⵅⴼ ⵓⵏⴳⴰⵍ ⵏⵏⵙ ⵏ ⵓⵏⵏⵓⵎⵎⵍ ⵍⵍⵉ ⴱⴰⵀⵔⴰ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵙⵎⵔⴰⵙⵏ: ⴳⴰⵏ ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⵍⵜ ⵢⴰⴹⵏ ⴳ ⵡⴰⵏⵙⴰ ⵍⵍⵉ ⴳ
ⵎⴰⵙⵙⴰ ⵏⵓⵔⵉⵙ ⵜⵜⵄⵓⵎⵓⵏ. ⵥⵕⴰⵏ ⴳ ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⵡⵍⴰⴼⵜ ⵎⴰⵢⴷ ⵉⴳⴰⵏ ⴼⵉⵍⵛ
We ask about. ⵢⴰⵏ ⵓⵏⴳⴰⵙ ⴰⵅⴰⵜⴰⵔ ⵏ ⵡⴰⵎⴰⵏ ⵉⵣⵔⵉ ⵓⴳⴳⴰⵔ ⵏ ⵓⵣⴳⵏ ⵏ ⵓⴱⵔⵉⴷ, ⴷ
ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ ⵎⴰⵣⴰⵍⵉⵜ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴼⴻⴳⴳⵉⴹ ⵙⴻⴳ ⴷⴷⴰⵡ ⵜⴻⵡⵡⵓⵔⵜ ⵏ Moaning
ⴰⵙⴳⵏⴰⴼ ⵏ ⵎⵉⵔⵜⵍ. ⵜⵓⵔⴰ ⵉⵎⵉ Filch ⵢⴻⵃⴱⴻⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ, ⵣⴻⵎⵔⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵙⵍⴻⵏ
ⵜⵉⵖⵔⵉ ⵏ Myrtle ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵏⴻⵔⵏⵉ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵖⴻⵔⴱⴰⵏ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⴱⴻⵔⵜ.
“ⵉⵎⵉⵔ-ⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⵉ ⴷ-ⵢⴻⵍⵀⴰⵏ ⴼⴻⵍⵍ-ⴰⵙ?” Run said.
“Let’s go take a look,” Harry said, tugging their robes over their shoulders .
They went from the big water heater to the door that had OUT OF his
ORDER sign, ignored as usual, entered.
Mr. Myrtle asks, if possible, to come back more than a few times.
before. It appears she is hiding her earlier strike. It rises in .
living room because the candles were extinguished in the great rush of
water leaving both the walls and floor wet.
“What is it, Myrtle?” Harry said.
“Who is this?” Myrtle bowed in an awkward manner. “Come put some
Who is there with me?”
“Why would I destroy,” Harry said, storming back into his closet.
Anything in check?”
“I didn’t recommend it,” Mirl explained, and he came out with a song of even more
water, which is distributed over the existing land. “Here I am, thinking
My issue, and someone who thinks it’s funny to throw a book at
we. . . .”
“But it can’t hurt you if someone throws something at you,” Harry said,
Reasonable enough. “I mean, it just gets to you, won’t she answer?”
He said the wrong thing. Merktel bowed her head and listened,
“We’ll do all the books in Myrtle, because you wouldn’t know it! Ten points mk
You can touch it with its meat! Fifteen points if it goes.
head! Well, ha, ha, ha! What a game of love, I don’t think!”
“Who put you down, anyway?” Harry asked.
"I didn't know. . . . I just sat in the Ubend, thinking about death,
And it fell right off the top of my head,” Myrtle said, looking at them.
“He was in there, washed up. . . .”
Harry and Ron look under the covers where Myrtle points. a
A small, thin book was there. She had a messy red tail and was as red as
Everything else is in the bathroom. Harry stepped forward to get it, but
Ron suddenly reached out to grab it.
"what?" Harry said.
“Are you okay?” Run said. “It can be dangerous.”
"difficult?" Harry said, laughing. “Take it out of him, how can it be .
difficult?"
“You’d be surprised,” said Ron, who was staring in awe at the
book. “Some of the books the ministry took — the one my father told me about —
There’s one that burns your skin. And anyone who has read the Sonnets .
of a Wizard travel in limericks all their lives. And some old
The Witch in Bath has a book you can’t stop reading! You have just now
You’ll be tossing and turning in it, trying to do everything one-handed.
and -"
“Alright, I’ve got the point,” Harry said.
The little book lay on the floor, unrecognizable and heavy.
“Well, we won’t find out if we don’t,” he said, and blinked .
in front of Ron and picked him up off the floor.
Harry suddenly noticed that it was a diary, and the year printed on the envelope
He told her he was fifty. He carefully opened it. On the first page he
He could only make out the name “TM Riddle” in a blur.
“Hold on,” said Ron, who cautiously approached and smiled .
Over Harry's shoulder. “I know the name. . . . TM Riddle received the game
For personal service to the school for fifty years.”
“How on earth d'you know that?” Harry said nervously.
“Because Filch made me spin his wheel about fifty times in
You stopped him,” Ron growled. “That’s the one I wrapped it all up with.
If Slim dissolves from one name for an hour, this truth and even you.”
Harry tore up the damp pages. They were all intact. there
There’s no record of writing about any of them, not even Uncle
The birth of the birth of Mabel, or of the jury of the journalist, on the tale and a half.
“It’s not written in,” Harry said, disappointed.
“Why would anyone want to lose it?” Ron said with a wry smile.
Harrie visits the back of the book, the word is called slaves of
A miscellaneous shop on Vauxhall Street, London.
“Maybe he’s Muggle-born,” Harry mused. “You will have .
They bought a diary from Vauxhall Road. . . .”
“Well, you don’t like it much,” Ron said. He lowered his voice. "fifty
points if you can get a hold of Myrtle’s necklace.”
Harry, however, pocketed it.
Hermione walked out of the hospital wing, hairless, tailless, and legless, for
The beginning of February. On her first morning back in Gryffindor tower,
Harry shows him TM Riddle's journal and tells him the story of how they
She found it.
“Ouh, it may have hidden powers,” Hermione said,
He brought the diary and stared at it intently.
"If it had, that was well hidden from them," Run said. “Maybe it’s an arcade. I don't
You know why not, Harry.”
“Perhaps I’ll see what someone tried to do,” says Harry. "I
It would not be known how Riddle received an award for special services to
Hogwarts too.”
"There could be anything," Run said. “He probably got thirty OWL or .
He saved a teacher from the great architect. Ahor was killed Merttle; that
would have done everyone a favour. . . .”
But Harry could tell from the look on Hermione's face that she was
He was thinking what he was thinking.
"what?" Ron said, turning from one to the other.
“Wow, Sikrats’ room was torn down five hundred years ago, wasn’t it?”
he said. “That’s what Malfoy said.”
"Yes . . ." The colors ran really well.
“It’s the book has five decades,” Hermione said, and he snapped it with sensation.
"so?"
“Oh, Ron, come out,” Hermione said. “We know that parliament
He opened the Chamber last time was thrown out fifty years ago. We know the TM
Riddle received the award for exceptional service to the school five decades ago. Well,
And what will you say if Riddle had found a private prize because they took the Slithairin’s guard? his
Maybe I’d tell us Diddy all — where she is award, and how
To open it, and what kind of an animal is like it — the person behind
The attackers this time don’t want to use it, will they?”
“That’s a terrible look, Hermione,” Ron said, “with one little
flaw. Nothing is written in his book.”
But Hermione pulls her hand away from his flesh.
“There’s going to be unclear!” On kisses.
She tapped the diary three times and said, “Aparecium!”
Nothing came out yet. Undaunted, Hermione reached out towards him
vehicle and emitted what appeared to be a clear red device.
“He’s the president, I brought him up in Diagon Alley,” she said.
She laid well in January. Nothing happened.
"I'm telling you, there's nothing to be found there," Ron said. “Just Riddle
A singer came for Christmas and couldn’t manage it.”
Harry couldn't explain, even to himself, why only Riddle had given it to him.
A separate diary. The truth is that even he saw newspapers and average, he
He kept them listening and turning to the page, as if they were
A story that wants to end. And Harry makes sure they don't listen
The name TM Riddle before, still seems to have meant something to him,
Almost like Riddle is the friend he had when he was much younger,
And he was half forgotten. But this is not abrs-fear. He never had friends before
At Hogwarts, Dudley did this.
Nevertheless, Harry is interested in learning more about Riddle, so
Another day in the field, he went to the girl's room to check on Riddle .
A special award, which goes with a very popular Hermione.
Unconvinced Ron, who told them he knew enough of a ball room to
It’s accomplished and life.
Riddle's dazzling gold necklace was tucked away in a corner cabinet. it
He didn’t get the details of what was due (“good enough, too, or
ⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⵍⵉ ⵎⴻⵇⵇⴻⵔ ⵓⴳⴰⵔ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵎⴰⵣⴰⵍⵉⵢⵉ ⵜⵜⵚⴻⴳⴳⵉⵎⴻⵖⵜ », ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Ron). However, they
He found the name Riddle in an old magical lore, and in a list of
The old Head Boys.
"He looks like Percy," Ron said, scrunching up his nose in disgust.
“Boss, head boy . . . Perhaps it’s a rigor of each department —”
“You’re saying that like it’s a bad thing,” Hermione sighed a little .
sound.
The sun was now beginning to shine weakly on Hogwarts once more. inside
Learning, of course has become more hopeful. There were no other crimes
Because the ones in Justin and Nick were nearly headless, and Mrs. Pomfrey was
ⵙ ⵍⴼⴻⵔⵃ ⴰⴷ ⴷⵉⵏⵉⵖ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ Mandrakes ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵜⵜⵏⴻⵔⵏⵉⵏ ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ ⴷ ⵍⴱⴰⴹⵏⴰ,
That means they were hurrying out of childhood.
“By the time their skin clears, they’ll be ready for replanting,”
Harry overheard her cursing Filch one morning. “And after that, it
It won’t be long until we’re tearing them apart, tearing them apart. You will have
Mrs. Norris be back in no time.”
Maybe the Slytherin Headmaster had lost his temper, Harry thought. it
He must be getting too dangerous to open the Chamber of Secrets, s
The school is loved and hurts. Maybe the monster, whatever it is,
He was even now bracing himself to lose another fifty years. . . .
Hufflepuff's Ernie McMillan didn't get this view. was
He was still convinced that Harry was the guilty one, that he had “given himself .
Away” at the Duel Club. Peeves wasn't helping matters; committed
They appear in crowded streets singing “Oh, Potter, you’re a pervert . . .”
Now with a dance routine to match.
Gilderoy Lockhart appears to have orchestrated the attacks himself .
stop. Harry had heard him tell Professor McGonagall so while
The Gryffindors were lining up for the Change.
"I don't think there'll be any more trouble, Minerva," he said, grinning .
His nose with intelligence and imagination. “I think the House is ready for
She was good this time. Maybe he knew who was happening it was just a matter of time.
Before I caught him. It's important I stop now, before I get too bad
on it.
“You know, what the school needs right now is a morale booster. Wash
Last term ideas! I wouldn’t say right now, but I think I
They just know that thing. . . .”
He picked his nose again and drove off.
Lockhart’s idea for motivation was conceived during lunchtime on
The fourteenth of February. Harry hadn’t had much sleep due to a Quidditch match later the night before, and he’d sneaked down to
Great hall, a little late. He thought, for a moment, that he had gone
with the wrong doors.
The walls were completely covered with huge purple flowers. Worse yet,
heart-shaped confetti was falling from the brightly colored ceiling. Harry walked
In front of Gryffindor commons, where Ron sat looking sick, and
Hermione seemed to be taken by surprise.
“What’s going on?” Harry asked, sitting down and clearing the food
off his taxes.
Ron pointed to the row of teachers, looking too confused to speak.
Lockhart, wearing a strange suit to match the slacks, was looking
For silence. The teachers on either side of him looked stone-faced.
From where he sat, Harry could see an asshole walking into the Headmaster
McGonagall's voice. Snape looked like he had just been fed
Skele-Gro’s largest potatoes.
“Happy Valentine’s Day!” Lukhart shouted. “And I can thank
Forty-six people have sent me cards so far! Yes, I caught
Free to host this little adventure for all of you — and it’s not over yet
here!"
Lockhart held his hands and through the entrance hall doors
marched a dozen surly-looking clowns. It’s not just any clowns, though.
Lockhart has them all wearing golden wings and carrying amulets.
“My friendly cubicles, they take the cards!” exclaimed Lukhart. “They will be .
Moving around the school today getting your valentines! And happy
It doesn't stop here! I am sure my friends will want to get into the spirit.
of that opportunity! Why don’t you ask Professor Snape to show you how to sew
The health of love! And while you’re at it, Professor Flitwick knows better .
About entrance needles better than any wizard I've ever met, that old wizard
dog!"
Professeur Flitwick ⵉⴹⴻⵍ ⵓⴷⴻⵎⵉⵙ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵉⴼⴰⵙⵙⴻⵏⵉⵙ. Snape ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ
Although the first person to ask for a love potion would be forced to eat
poison.
“Please, Hermione, tell me you’re not one of forty-six,” Ron said .
As they left the Great Hall for their first lesson. Hermione suddenly
She became obsessed with searching her bag for her plan and never worked
answer.
Throughout the day, the dogs kept going into their classrooms to deliver
Valentines, to the delight of the teachers, and those late evenings as
The Gryffindors were walking up to Charms, one of the infected clowns
ⵙⴷⴰⵜ ⵏ Hari.
“ⴰ, ⴽⴻⵞⵞ! 'ⴰⵔⵔⵉ Buṭer!” A manly looking dog shouted,
elbowing people out of the way to get to Harry.
Hottest at the thought of being given a valentine in front of the line of
ⵉⵙⴻⴳⴳⴰⵙⴻⵏ ⵉⵎⴻⵣⵡⵓⵔⴰ, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⴹⵔⴰⵏ ⴷⴻⴳⵙ Ginny Weasley, Harry ⵢⴻⵄⵔⴻⴹ ⴰⴷ
escape. ⵎⴰⵛⴰ, ⴰⵇⵛⵉⵛⵏⵏⵉ ⵢⴻⵇⵛⴻⵄ ⴰⴱⵔⵉⴷⵉⵙ ⴳⴰⵔ ⵍⵖⴰⵛⵉ ⵙ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ
bodies of men, and reached him before he had gone twice as far.
"I have a musical message to deliver to 'Arry Potter himself,'' he said .
he said, tapping his chin in a sort of menacing manner.
“Not here,” Harry whimpered, trying to escape.
“ⵇⵇⵉⵎ ⵜⵃⴻⵎⵎⵍⴻⴹ!” » ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ ⵓⵇⴻⵛⵍⴰⵡⵏⵏⵉ, ⵢⴻⵟⵟⴻⴼ ⵜⴰⵛⴽⴰⵔⵜ ⵏ Harry ⵓ ⵉⵊⴻⴱⴱⴻⴷⵉⵜⵜ.
ⵙⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔⵙ.
“ⴻⴵⴵⵉⵢⵉ ⴰⴷ ⵕⵓⵃⴻⵖ!” Harry is delay, he foresees.
With a violent calculation, she split her bag in half. ⵉⴷⵍⵉⵙⴻⵏⵉⵙ, ⴰⵄⴻⴽⴽⴰⵣ,
The paper, and the cloth fell to the floor and her ink bottle fell
everything.
Harry turned around, trying to take it all back in before the boy started.
sing, causing some pause in motion.
“What’s going on here?” came Draco's cold, drawling voice
Malfoy. Harry started doing everything in a happy manner in his uniform that wasn't there,
He asks to appear before Malfoy so he can learn his musical taste.
“ⵎⴰ ⴰⵢ ⴷ ⴰⵢⴰ ⴰⴽⴽ ⴰⵢ ⴷ-ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵉⵍⵉ ⵡⴰⵢⴰ?” ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵚⵚⵓⵜ ⵏⵏⵉⴹⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵙⵙⵏⴻⵏ ⴰⵎ Percy
ⵉⵡⴹ ⵡⵉⵙⵍⵉ.
ⵢⴻⵅⵚⴻⵔ ⴰⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢⵉⵙ, Harry ⵢⴻⵄⵔⴻⴹ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵔⵡⴻⵍ ⴼⴻⵍⵍⴰⵙ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⴰⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢⵏⵏⵉ ⵢⴻⵟⵟⴻⴼ
He will walk in his hands and run and return to the end.
“There,” he said, sitting down on Harry’s pictures. “ⴷ ⵡⴰ ⴷ ⵛⵛⵏⴰ ⵏⵏⴽ
ⴼⴰⵍⴰⵏⵜⵉⵏ:
Her eyes were green like a happy woman,
The challenge is that there are middle schools like a package.
ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⵉⵔⵉⵖ ⴰⴷ ⵉⴳ ⵉⵏⵓ, ⵏⵜⵜⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵏⴼⵔⴰⴳ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⵜ,
Woe to him that breaketh the cords of the LORD.
Harry would give all the gold in Greenwich to beat the
field. He plays in a happy way, laughs with everyone else, comes, his feet
Symbol from the flesh of the flesh, because Beersheba is the one who is very capable of being .
ⵙⵙⴼⵔⵓ ⴰⴳⴷⵓⴷ, ⴽⵔⴰ ⴳⵉⵙⵏ ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⵔⵓⵏ ⴰⴽⴷ ⵎⵎⴰ.
“ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⴷⴷⵓⴷ, ⵅⴻⴼ ⴽⴻⵏⵏⵉⵡ ⵜⵔⵓⵃⴻⵎ, ⴰⵔⵔⴰⵛ ⴰⵔⵔⴰⵛ 5 ⵏ ⵜⵓⵙⴷⵉⴷⵉⵏ ⴰⵢⴰ, ⵅⴻⴼ ⵜⵏⴻⵖⵔⵉⵜ,
Now,” he said, adding that some of the younger students are far away. "and you,
ⵎⴰⵍⴼⵓⵢ —.”
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ, ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⴱⴱⵉ, ⵉⵥⵕⴰ ⵎⴰⵍⴼⵓⵢ ⵉⴱⴷⴷ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵙⴽⴰⵔ ⴽⵔⴰ.
ⵍⴻⴻⵔⵉⵏⴳ, ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴽⴻⵏⵉⵜⵉⴷ ⵉ Crabbe ⴷ Goyle, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ Harry ⵢⴻⴼⵀⴻⵎ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴰⴷ
ⵢⵓⵎⵥ ⴷⵉⴷⵍ ⴷⵉⴷⵍ.
“ⴻⴼⴽ-ⴷ-ⴷ ⴰⵢⴰ”, ⵖⴻⴼ ⵡⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⵢ ⴷ-ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵙ ⵜⵙⵓⵙⵎⵉ.
“Did you see what Peter wrote about this?” Malfoy said, in control.
He hadn't seen a year on the shelf and thought he had a Harry novel.
Fire fell on the onlookers. Ginny was looking from the diary to Harry.
She is sowing hope.
“In this, Maloy,” Perers saidly said.
“When I had an idea,” Malfoy said, turning the diary in a pleased manner in
Harry.
Percy said, “Like a schoolteacher —” but Harry lost his temper. he
His hand shot out and shouted, “Expelliarmus!” And so is snap
Darmd Lokhart, that's why Malfoy got the sword from his hand.
in the wind. Ron, looking down at him, grabbed it.
“Harry!” Bircy said in a pure manner. “There is no threat in the crows. will need to .
They say that, you know!”
But Harry didn't care, Malfoy had one, so he got five
Points from Gryffindor someday. Malfoy was turning around, and like a genie
He walked into her room, saying earnestly behind her: “I’m not saying
Think butter loves well!”
Ginny covered her face with her hands and ran into the hall. Snarling, Ron
He got out too, but Harry knocked him out. Ron doesn’t need to
Do all Sharms and he was wearing a slot.
It wasn't until they reached Professor Flitwick's dorm that Harry appeared .
She saw something special in Riddle's journal. All his other books
It is scratched with a knife. However, the celebration was largely the same as it had
It was before the ink bottle spilled all over it. Wanted to mention that.
They are Ron, but Ron has a similar relationship with his son again; Bubble Bubble.
The bulbs appear from the end, not much of an obstacle in the
Something else.
Harry went to bed before another in his room that night. This was
Partly because he never thought Fred and George would stand up and sing,
“His eyes are as blue as fresh snow” again, and partly .
because he wanted to check Riddle's diary again, and he knew that Ron
He thought he was wasting his time.
Harry sat on all fours of his desks and flipped through the blank pages, not one
in which he has a light blue pattern on it. Then he took out a fresh bottle from the
his bedside cabinet, put his hat in it, and put a pillow on
The front page of the newspaper.
The ink glows on the paper for a second, and then, just like
It had been sucked into the page and disappeared. Delighted, Harry filled his
Quill a second time and writes, “My name is Harry Potter.”
The words flash momentarily on the page and they, too, fall without .
pursue. Then, finally, something happened.
Leaping off the page, punctuated by it, came the words Harry has .
It has never been written.
“Hello, Harry Potter. My name is Tom Riddle. How did you come to me?
diary?"
This rumor, too, got out, but not before Harry started to
Scribble backwards.
“Someone tried to shove him down a toilet.”
He was eagerly awaiting Riddle's response.
“Lucky to have recorded my memories in something more permanent than ink.
But I always knew that there would be those who didn’t want this diary
read."
"what do you mean?" Harry declared, sliding the page into his
excitement.
“I mean that this diary holds horrible memories. items
They are deceived. Things That Happened at Hogwarts School of Witchcraft
and Knowledge.”
“That’s where I am now,” Harry wrote back. “I’m at Hogwarts, and
There are amazing things happening. You know something about the room
They?”
His heart was grateful. Riddle’s response came quickly, his writing
He became unsteady, as if in a hurry to tell all he knew.
“Of course I know about the Chamber of Secrets. In my day, we were told
He was a mirror, that he never was. But this was a lie. During the fifth year,
The room opens up and the beast attacks several students, finally
He killed one. I caught the person opening the Room and he was
He was thrown out. But the headmaster, Professor Dippet, scoffed that such a thing
It happened at Hogwarts, I was forbidden to tell the truth. A story is provided.
out that the girl died in a tragic accident. They gave me a nice, shiny,
trophy engraved on my troubles and forced me to keep my mouth shut. but
I knew it could happen again. The villages lived, and with
The power to pull it off is unstoppable.”
Harry nearly shattered his ink bottle in his haste to write back.
“It’s happening again now. There were three fights and no one
He seemed to know who was behind them. Who was it last time?”
“I can show you, if you’d like,” Riddle said. “You shouldn’t
Take my word for it. I can take you inside my memories of the night when
He took it.”
Harry hesitates, his chin pressed against the newspaper. What did Riddle do
mean? How can he be trapped inside someone else’s throat? he
She stared nervously at the door of the orphanage, which was lit by night.
When he saw the democracy, he saw the new words that made .
“I’m let me know with me.”
Harry paused for a second and then wrote down two letters.
"ok."
The pages of the book began to fly out like a whirlwind,
It starts in the middle of June. From salary, Harry
He saw that the smallest square for thirteen was equal to one.
A little television show. His hands are smoothly, humble
This book used his eye against the smaller door, and before knowing what
It happens, it goes back and forth; the window was widening, he felt
his body left his bed, and he was thrown headlong through the opening in
page, in a range of color and shade.
He feels his feet return to the happy ground, he stands, he flows, like a river.
The characteristics that were told are simultaneously in the perspective.
He immediately knew where he was. This green room with
The Nightingales became Dumbledore's secretary — but she wasn't Dumbledore
which remains at the back of the field. A wizended, frail-looking with, bald
Without any pictures of white wings, a message is read from the cow's mouth.
Harry had never seen this man before.
“Supported I,” he said Salder. “I didn’t lie to —.”
But the woman did not see. He continued to read, struggling a bit.
Harry went up to his bed rolling over, “I’m — I’ll just go, will you?”
The advertiser still didn’t have him. He wouldn't even even heard him.
Thinking that he might be a hero, Harry lost his voice.
“I’m sorry I caused you. I’ll be going now,” he half repeats.
The guard left and snapped with the message with a picture, and he stood, and went on Harry
Apart from him to put him, and he went to snapped the bottles on his portrait.
The sky tutside the weindow was ruby-red; It seems to be a kingdom. the
The menu turns into the field, staying down, and snacks and snacks in his own, and sees
gate.
Harry sees on the side of the office. There’s no Facks Avonex — it’s not silence
The silver rings. This is Hogwarts named Riddle, which means
that this unknown author is the leader, not Dombdore, and he, Harry,
It’s not just a van van, not all of the fifteen
years ago.
There’s a few points on the office door.
“Nther,” the former director said with a good communication.
A boy of about sixteen came in and left his room. boy .
The prefect's badge was glinting on his chest. It was much longer than Harry,
But he, too, has the jet of the jet-black.
“Oh, Riddle,” the manager said.
“Do you want to see me, Professor Dipt?” Riddle said. congratulations
nervous.
“It’s staying under,” Depp said. “I’m just saying the letter you’ve got.”
“No,” Riddle said. He sat down and clasped his hands very tightly.
“My first boy,” Deppet said joy, “I can’t let you stay in
The school in the summer. Surely you want to go home for the holidays?”
“No,” said Reddle at the same time. “I’ll stay a lot in Hogwarts than I went
They went back to that — to that —.”
“You lived in a muggle novel during the holidays, I presume?” said
Deept is smoothly.
“Yes, Mass,” Reddle said, and goes a little.
“Are you Muggle born?”
“The blood pressure, Mass,” Riddle said. “The father of Mugle, mother of mother.”
“And both of your parents — ?”
“My mother was just after learning, Mass. They said in
orphelinat lived only a lot to give the name — Tom on the name of my father,
Marvolo after my grandfather.”
Dippet Isses in the white.
“It’s good, O Tom,” he said Serhier, “Here are the first things .
It works for you, but in the current context. . . .”
“That wants all the house, Mass?” Riddle said, and the heart of Harry,
And he approached, ready to lose something.
“Exactly,” the principal said. “My dear boy, you should have seen how .
It will be a stadium from if I have to last in the vocabulary if Lawan has passed.
He was found. Especially in light of the recent tragedy . . . the bride of the time of the capital.
The little girl. . . . You will be much safer at your yogurt house. As a matter of
Reality, the Ministry of Victories also is written about the return of the school.
We’re no closer to finding the — er — source of it all .
We didn't rush. . . .”
The Reddle devices were illustrated.
“Sir—if that person is caught—if everything stops—”
"what do you mean?" Dippet said with a smirk in his voice, sitting down
In his chair. “Riddle, you mean you know something about these .
murders?”
“No, sir,” Riddle said flatly.
But Harry was sure that was the kind of “no” he himself had .
He was given a Dumbledore.
Dippet fell back, moaning in disgust.
“You can go, Tom. . . .”
Riddle jumped out of his chair and stormed out of the room. followed Harry
he.
down the moving gray fence they went and emerged towards the
a gargoyle in the far corner. Riddle stopped, and so did Harry,
They see it. Harry could tell that Riddle was doing something strange.
A thought. He was biting his lip, his nose bent.
Then, as if coming suddenly to a decision, he hurried away,
Harry breathes noiselessly behind him. They don’t see another person until
They reached the entrance hall, when a tall wizard with a long beard walked out
The horn and smile that summoned Riddle from the marble slab.
“What are you doing, wandering around so late, Tom?”
Harry looked at the wizard. He was none other than fifty years younger
Dumbledore.
"I need to see the principal, sir," Riddle said.
“Okay, get to bed,” Dumbledore said, handing the Riddle the exact same
The kind of penetrating gaze Harry knew well. “It’s best not to wander into
n roads these days. Not since . . .”
He smiled brightly, told Riddle good night, and drove off. sound
I saw it go out of sight, and then, turning slowly, he looked straight
Up the stone stairs to the stables, with Harry in hot pursuit.
But much to Harry's dismay, Riddle didn't take him to a hidden location .
passage or secret tunnel but to the specific dungeon that Harry was in
Drinking with Snape. The bodies were not cremated, and when Riddle asked
The door was almost closed, Harry could just watch, he stood frozen
By the door, he watched the road outside.
It felt to Harry that they had been there for at least an hour. All he can see is
There’s Riddle’s face by the door, staring at the crack, waiting as
keyboard. And just when Harry stopped feeling emotional and nervous and
He starts wishing he could go back to the present, he hears something moving
above the door.
Someone was creeping down the street. He listened to someone who had passed
the dungeon where he and Riddle hid. Riddle, silent as a shadow,
He walked out the door and followed, Harry on foot behind him,
He forgot that he couldn’t be heard.
Maybe five minutes follow the footpath, up to Riddle .
He stopped suddenly, his head snapping in the direction of the new noise. Harry
I heard the door open, and then someone moving through the doorbell.
“Come . . . You’ve got to get out of here. . . . Come now. . . in the tree . . .”
There was something familiar about that voice. . . .
Riddle suddenly jumped out of the corner. Harry walked out after her.
he. He could see the pale face of an older boy who was crouching in the
in front of the open door, a very large box beside it.
"Morning, Rubeus," Riddle said softly.
The boy closed the door and stood up.
“What are you doing down here, Tom?”
Riddle approached.
“It’s all over,” he said. “I will pay you back, Rubeus.
They’re talking about closing down Hogwarts if the killings don’t stop.”
“What d'eh —”
“I don’t think you want to kill one. But the dogs don’t work.
Domestic animals. I was just released for the body’s work and —”
“She didn’t kill anyone!” Large, the younger, succeeds against the one.
gate. From behind him, Harry could hear the sniffles and gasps.
“Come on, Rubeus,” Riddle said, stepping closer. “The girl who died
The parents will be here tomorrow. What Hogwarts can’t do is ensure
that the thing that killed their daughter was lost. . . .”
“It’s not him!” He said the boy, the temple is going on on the middle of the middle.
"unable! Never!”
“Stand aside,” Riddle said, pulling out his wand.
Tissis keeps the way through a fire light with a skiing with a skiing. The door behind
The older boy opened so hard that he crashed into the Wall.
against. And out of it came something that made Harry let out a long,
The sound of a bell no one hears —
Large, slender body with black hair and eyebrows; The flowers of
Lots of eyeballs and a couple of butt plugs — Riddle raises his shirt
Also, but too late. The thing struck him as it flew away,
They miss the ball and are invisible. Riddle rose to his feet.
They looked at him; He raised his cane, but the older boy jumped over it and caught
his wand, and threw it back, screaming, “NOOOOOOO!”
The track moved, the darkness became complete; Harry felt sorry for himself.
He came and added, and, with smuggling, and sightded with the invader of the 4th century
The Gryffindor common room, Riddle's journal lay open on his stomach.
They will have a time to learn about his youth, call the door of the youth house
And Run enters.
“There you are,” he said.
Harry sat up. He was sweating and shaking.
"what's up?" said Ron, looking at him with concern.
“It's Hagrid, Run. Hagrid Opens the Chamber of Secrets Fifty Years
early."
h
Chapter Fourteen
Cornelius Fudge
Arry, Ron, and Hermione have always known that Hagrid has a
We don’t have a good thing for big and vegetables. During their
The first year in Hogarts tried to develop a skirt in small trees.
house, and it would be a long time before they forgot the giant, threeheaded dog he’d christened “Fluffy.” And if, boy, Hagrid heard
That there was a monster hiding somewhere in the castle, Harry was sure that it would
They went to some lengths for a look at it. Perhaps thought is that it was
It’s a shame that the beast has been incarcerated for so long, and figured it out
He deserves a chance to stretch his legs a lot; Harry could only guess
Thirteen-year-old Hagrid attempts to slingshot and slingshot. But there was
Equally certain that Hagrid never intended to kill anyone.
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵉⵣⴳⵏ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵉⵔⵉ ⵎⴰⵙ ⵓⵔ ⵢⵓⴼⴰ ⵎⴰⵎⴽ ⵙ ⵔⴰⴷ ⵉⵅⴷⵎ ⴳ ⵔⵉⴷⵍ.
Again, Ron and Hermione got him to describe what he saw,
Until he was heartbroken to tell them and long, dreadfully sick
The conversations that followed.
"Maybe Riddle got the wrong person," Hermione said. “Maybe it's
was some other monster that was attacking people. . . .”
“How many monsters d'do you think this place can hold?” Ron asked quietly.
“We’ve always seen that Hagrid was released,” Harry said with a hill.
“And the attacks must’ve stopped after Hagrid was kicked out. otherwise,
Riddle didn’t get his prize.”
Ron wrote a variety of novels.
“Riddle definitely looks like Percy — the one who asked him to piss on Hagrid, .
anyway?"
"But the hero killed someone, Ron," Hermione said.
'And Riddle was going to go back to some Muggle orphanage if .
ⵜⵜⵡⴰⴱⵥⵏ ⵀⵓⴳⵡⴰⵔⵜⵙ », ⵖⴼ ⵡⴰⴽⴽⵏ ⴰⵢ ⴷ-ⵢⵏⵏⴰ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ. “I’m not going to put it back because I want it to stay
here. . . .”
“You met Hagrid on Knockturn Road, didn’t you, Harry?”
“He’s selling a flesh-eating weasel,” Harry said quietly.
All three of them died silently. After a long pause, Hermione talked about
The opposite question of all in a clear statement.
“Do you think we should go ask Hagrid about all this?”
"This will be a good visit," Run said. “'Hello, Hagrid. Tell me, bring
Have you posted anything sexy and naughty in the castle lately?'”
Lastly, Gzemed in Rray that nothing read for Hagrid
unless there is further confusion, and as the days s
No pause from the disembodied voice, they returned hoping that
He didn’t need to talk to him about why he was fired. compliance
Now almost four months since Justin and Nick we haven’t had a dirty
Petriter, and almost everyone looks like the attack, who is a fighter.
it was, had retired for good. PEVE was ultimately left with the agreement “Ah,
The song of the box, you are aches,” Ernie Mamtholan asks Haarry with valuable to Harri with its same story to.
Spend a day of a bouquet of jumping worms in Herbology, and in March
Many mandrakes put on a beautiful and beautiful ceremony in the house of the wind.
three. This makes Professor Sprout very happy.
“The moment they start trying to get into a property, we score.
They know they exist together,” she told Harry. “Then we will be able to reassess that.
Those people are disabled in the hospital yard”.
The second years have given something new to think in their period .
Celebration of the party. The time has come to choose their pages for the third .
A year, it’s a matter that Hermione, at least holds a lot.
“It’s possible that it’s about all of our future,” she told Harry and Ron when they put .
On the lists of new topics, I present them with data.
“I just want to give Ponts,” Harry said.
“We can’t,” he said run goloolyly. “We took all our old flags, or I would call
The resistance against the arts is becoming more and more important.”
“But this is so important!” Hermione said, enchanted.
"It's not the way Lukhart taught it," Run said. “I learned nothing
Of it except it doesn’t take out pixies.”
Neville Lungbuttum was sent letters from all the magicians and
The students in her family all give her different messages about what they will learn.
He reads the texts in his own language.
By comparison, people were asked if they thought Arithmancy sounded more
Difficult to study ancient Rouen. Dean Thomas, who, like Harry, has
Growing up with Muggles, he finished his eyes and waited for his river in 2017.
Algam, then uses the topics it contains. Hermione didn't catch any
Light but signed for everything.
Harry smiled to himself at the thought of what Uncle Fernon had said and
Aunt Petunia would say if she wanted to talk about her role in her career.
them. It's not that a novel hasn't been published yet: Percy Wisli is writing
Share her experience.
“Depends where you want to go, Harry,” he said. “Never before is
Think about the future, so I decided to recommend Divination. People say he's a Muggle
Vaccinations are a neat element, but I personally think wizards should have
The long-term resistance of society is not scientific, especially if
They think they work in coordination with them — see my
Dad, he has to handle muggle duties all the time. brother .
Charlie has always been more of an outdoors type, so he went to Care of .
Classic maps. Play on your strengths, Harry.”
But what's wrong with him even though Harry is really good is Quidditch. in
He ended up choosing a new subject like Ron, thinking that being a member of
They, though he will have someone to help him.
Gryffindor's next Quidditch match will be against Hoffleaf. There was ood
He discusses group activities every night after dinner, and Harry is very cooperative.
Have time for anything besides Quidditch and homework. However, this training
Happy rituals are held, or at least they are changed, and the night before
Saturday's game, he came to his field to leave his car
Gryffindor's enchantment for the Quidditch Cup wasn't a good one.
But his climate didn't last long. At the top of the ladder to .
the orphanage, he met Neville Longbottom, who was looking excited.
“Harry — I don’t know who did it — I just found out —”
Watching Harry in fear, Neville pushed open the door.
The contents of Harry's bag spilled everywhere. His cap
lay broken on the ground. The bed linen was removed from its four posters.
And they got the coffee out of her bedside cabinet, the contents
They were scattered about the cemetery.
Harry walked to the bed and opened his mouth, going through some dirty
Events pages with Trolls. As he and Neville pulled the covers back
Onto his bed, Ron, Dean and Seamus came in. Dean sighed loudly.
“What happened, Harry?”
“No idea,” Harry said. But Ron was checking Harry's clothes. all
pockets were fastened.
“There is one looking for something,” Ron said. “There’s something .
missing?"
Harry began to grab all of his things and shove them into his trunk. it
He was just when he’s the last of the Lockhart’s books in which Yerra .
You agree what is not there.
"Riddle's figure is out," he said in a low voice to Ron.
"what?"
Harry was slaughtered to the teenager to the door of the youth home, Ron follows.
out. They hurried down to the half-empty Gryffindor common room and joined Hermione, who was sitting alone, reading a book called
Ronns Aqbur Yettwaxdem Sehlin.
Hermione looked shocked at the news.
“But — only a Gryffindor can steal — no one else knows .
password -"
“Exactly,” Harry said.
The next morning they woke up to a beautiful sun and a refreshing light breeze.
“Perfect Quidditch conditions!” Wood said proudly at
The Gryfeffindor tablet, hungry to the slaves of the turbulence with the equivalent of the eggs. “Harry,
Buck up there, you need good coffee.”
Harry was looking around the crowded Gryffindor table, wondering if
The new owner of Riddle's journal was before his eyes. Hermione
They were pressing him to confess the lie, but Harry didn't like the idea.
The teacher should say all the newspaper of the day, and several people for know
Why was Hagrid banished fifty years ago? He didn’t want to be a
One that brings it all up again.
As he walked out of the Great Hall with Ron and Hermione to go collect his
Quidditch stuff, adding another very interesting challenge to Harry's
Listed List. He just put his foot down on the marble floor when he heard it.
Yet once again —
“Kill him this time . . . Let me break. . . tear . . .”
He screamed out loud and Ron and Hermione both jumped at him in
alarm.
“That voice!” Harry said, looking away. “I just heard it again .
— Don’t you see?”
Ron’s advocate, with Wallens protected. Hermion, however, took a hand for
His nose.
"Harry — I think I just figured something out!" I have to go to
library!"
And it came out very, very fast.
“What did she understand?” Hari said with a simulations, it is still accumulated
In the district, he is trying to get into where he is located in the sun.
“So more,,” said Ron, the heroin.
“But why does she have to go to the library?”
"Because that's what Hermione does," Ron said, smirking. “M download in the
check, go to the library.”
Harry stands, and he had no pride, trying to take the voice again, but the persons were
Now he left the Great Hall after her, speaking loudly, and went out
through the front doors on their way to the Quidditch gym.
“Txs sorry,” Ron said. “Almost eleven people — meeting
—”
Harry headed back to Griffindor, the second Numbus II
a thousand, and joined the great throng that spread about, but
He was still in the castle along with the disembodied voice, and as it was
He pulled on his red shirt in the computer room, the only drawback being that
Everyone was now outside to watch the game.
The teams took to the field with cheers. Oliver Wood
He popped out for a physical stop along the goal line; Ms. Huch
He took out the buttons. The Hufflepuffs, who play canary white, were
Standing in a merger, he had a last-minute talk of tactics.
Harry was just going to his desk when Professor McGonagall came
Half walking, half running across the field, got a big red
A megaphone.
Harry's heart sank like a stone.
"The meeting has been cancelled," Professor McGonagall announced via
megaphone, addressing the crowded stadium. There are problems with
he screams. Olifer Wood, Returns Returns Returns Returns to Teacher
McGonagall without breaking out of her spell.
“But, Professor!” he shouted. “We have to play — Cup — .
Griff Indore —”
Professor McGonagall ignored him and continued shouting through him .
Megaphone:
“All students will return to the main rooms of the House,
where their Home Officers will provide them with more information. as
As fast as you can, please!”
Then she put down the megaphone and summoned Harry to come to her.
“Potter, I think you better come with me. . . .”
Wondering how to cheat this time, Harry looked
Ron untangles himself from the complaining crowd; He came running to
in them as they turned towards the castle. Surprising Harry, Professor
McGonagall disagreed.
“Yeah, maybe you better come too, Weasley. . . .”
Some students around them were complaining about
Meeting canceled; The others looked worried. Harry and Run followed.
Headmaster McGonagall returned to the school and returned through the marble fountain.
But they weren’t taken to anyone’s office this time.
"This is going to be a bit of a stretch," Professor McGonagall said in a
in a surprised voice as they approached the shrine. " was
It was another disease . . . another double whammy.”
Harry's insides made a violent groan. Professor McGonagall stands.
The door opened, and in walked he and Ron.
Madam Pomfrey was scowling at a sixth year girl with long, curly hair.
hair. Harry recognized her as the Ravenclaw they asked for sneakily
The steps to the common hall of Slytherin. And on the film that was next to him was
—
“Hermione!” Run shouted.
Hermione sat still, her eyes open and glazed over.
"They were found near the library," Professor McGonagall said. "I don't
Suppose one of you could explain that? She was on the floor in front of the
them. . . .”
She was holding a small, round mirror.
Harry and Ron nodded, both looking at Hermione.
“I’m taking you to Gryffindor Tower,” the Headmaster said .
McGonagall heavily. “I have to talk to students at any time.”
“All students will return to their original House rooms by 6pm in 2020.
the evening. No student may leave the dorms after that time. You will
The teacher will accompany him to each lesson. No student will use a tank.
Not to the teacher. All other training and other Quidditch matches
are to be postponed. No more evening activities.”
The Gryffindors gathered inside the common room listened to the Headmaster
Macgonagal in silence. She took out the paper from which she had
I was saying and he said in a slightly hushed voice, “I don’t need to add that .
I rarely ever go back and forth. School may be closed
If he was not arrested behind the murders. Would recommend to anyone who
He probably thinks some of them to go forward.”
You left some problems from the window ship, and
Griffindor started talking just.
“And two Gryffindors down, not counting one Gryffindor ghost, one .
Ravenclaw, and a Huffleff,” Weasley's partner, Lee .
Jordan, feels about the legs. “No one of teachers have seen this .
Slitherin are all safe? It is unclear that all the illegal prayer from it
Slytherin? Slitherin leader, Slitherin’s headquarters — a hungry rather than
Just download all Slitherin?” missile, and will become a sacrifice
sound.
Percy Weasley was sitting in a chair behind Lee, but for once he didn't mind
The fact that she’s like to hear the views. He was singing a laser and he was locked.
"Percy is in shock," George told Harry quietly. “That Ravenclaw girl — .
Pinilvi Clirowater — was a predecessor. I don’t think he thought
The winner runs one leg at a time”.
But Harry was just half a fire. The phenomenon is unclear can remove.
of the image of Hermione, you focused on the absorption of the same as the same.
of stone. And if he wasn’t caught soon, he was looking at a
His later life with the Dursleys. Tom Riddle defeated Hagrid because
He had been faced with the prospect of a Muggle orphanage if the school was closed.
Harrie saw the game how to feel.
“What shall we do?” Ron said quietly in Harry's ear. “You think
Are they suspecting Hagrid?”
“We need to go talk to him,” Harry said, finishing his point. "I
I can’t like it’s this time, but if he’s lost the school last time
It’s going to know how to enter the Yfoyla’s Texamt, so this is the beginning.”
“But McGonagall said we should stay in the bourgeo if we are not in 2019.
class -"
“I’m grief,” Harry said, more quickly, “Awan to bring my father .
Cloak Ut also.”
Harry received just one thing from his father: one long and illness
We are not seen. It was their only chance of sneaking out of the school to
Visit Hagrid without anyone knowing about it. They are in .
usual tempy, waited until Neville, Dean, and Seamus has stupped descussing
The government's department's administrative accompanied the end of the end of his open, open,
again, and throw the Cloak over themselves.
A trip through the streets of the castle is dark and deserted and not
happy. Harry, who performed at night several times
Before, he could barely see it as he passed by with the sun. Teachers, prefects, and
Gust are moving in both directions, looking at some
The monks are not alien. Ther Invisibility Cloak didn't stop the making anan
A pity, and there was a good moment when Run put his hand
Even cards from the place where Snab Sabbab started. thank you
Snape denied it almost immediately after Run happened. It was with relief
that they had reached the front doors of the inn and eased them open.
It was a clear, starry night. They hurried toward the lit windows of
Hagrid's House rings the bell even when they're out of the woods.
His front door.
Seconds after they put it on, Hagrid put it on. They found .
Themselves face to face with Him for the purpose of crushing on them. Fang As
the boarhound barked loudly behind him.
“Oh,” he said, the figure of the gun looking at them. “What are you
Two do here?”
“What’s this for?” Harry said, referring to the novel when they left.
inside.
“Nothin’ — nothin’ —” Hagrid muttered. “I’m waiting — I’m not waiting.”
Matter — Sit down — I’ll make tea —”
He hardly seemed to know what he was doing. I'm almost out.
the fire, spilling water from the kettle on it, and then smashed the teapot
with a nervous jerk of his massive hand.
"Are you okay, Hagrid?" Harry said. "Did you hear about Hermione?"
“Yeah, I heard, all right'”, Hagrid said, a slight hiccup in his voice.
He kept glancing nervously at the windows. He poured them both large
Drinking water mugs (forgot to add tea bags) are the only
putting a slab of fruitcake on a plate when there was a loud knock on the
gate.
Hagrid dropped the fruitcake. Harry and Ron exchanged panic-strucken
He returns, puts the clock infixible clock on their heads and returns
In one of the corners. Hagrid checked his crossbow,
and flung open his door once more.
“Good evening, Hagrid.”
It was Dumbledore. He entered, looking deadly serious, and was
followed by a second, very odd-looking man.
The alien had green hair and a light accent, and was
wearing a strange mix of clothes: a pinstriped suit, a scarlet tie, a long
black cloak, and pointed purple boots. Under his arm he carried a limegreen bowler.
“This is my father’s coach!” Ron left. “Cornelius Fudge, the Minister of
Magic!”
Harry elbowed Ron hard to make him shut up.
Hagrid was pale and sweaty. He dropped into one of his chairs and
looked from Dumbledore to Cornelius Fudge.
“Bad business, Hagrid,” said Fudge in rather clipped tones. “Not very good
business. Is it going to. Four attacks on the Muggle-born. Things went outside.
enough. Ministry’s got to act.”
“I never,” said Hagrid, looking imploringly at Dumbledore. "You know
I’m not, Professor Dumbledore, sir —”
“I want it understood, Cornelius, that Hagrid has my full confidence,”
Dumbledore said, drawing Fudge's attention.
“Lave, A Albus,” said Fodge, he doesn’t like. “Hagard’s record vs.
he. We had to do anything — school owners in
touch -"
“But, Cornlius, I told you that Hagrid’s satisfaction is not in
A little,” Dumbledore said. Her blue eyes filled with fire Harry had
I’ve never seen it before.
"Look at it from my point of view," Fudge said, rubbing his eyes .
American. “I’m under a lot of pressure. Got to be seen to be doing something.
If he turns out not Hagrid, he would become nothing else. But I have
This should be aware. It came to. There’s no work hard —”
“Take me?” Hagrid said, who was getting nervous. “Take me where?”
“For a short stetch only,” said Foding, not meting Hagrid's ess. “It’s not
Punishment, Hagrid, more than a threat. If another is taken, the
They issued a full apology —”
“Are you Azkaban? Kruakd Hagrid.
Before Foodge, another rap was strongly on the door.
Dumbledore replied. and Napaa of Harry for a ceiling;
He would let out an audible gasp.
Mr. Lalkius Malfoy arrived at the Hagrid shop, was arrested with a long-term official
traveling cloak, smiling a cold and satisfied smile. Fang began to grow.
“Already here, Fudge,” he said approvingly. “My example, good . . .”
“And what do you work Dagie?” Hagrid Supremely said. “Get out of my house!”
“Manwei Aziz,'us the sensitive I didn't, I didn't know all in the family
Inside the — er — d'you call this a house?” Lucius Malfoy said, sarcastically
as he looked around the small cabin. “I spoke proudly at the school and there was
He said the principal was here.”
“And what exacty dyd yant with me, Lucius?” Dumbledore said.
He talked joy, but the fire was still a blessing in his red eyes.
“The beautiful thing, Dumbledore,” said Malloy in a quick way, appeared to be a long game
of parchment, “but the governors feel it's time for yo to step aside. this
is an Order of Suspension — yo'll fen'all tweelve signors on it. am
We think you want to check it out. How many murders were committed
now? Two other evenings, isn’t it? With absence, it’s not
He was born from Mugle left Hogarts, and we can see all the greatest affairs to come
He’ll be at school.”
"Oh, now, look here, Lucius," Fudge said, looking confused, "Dumbledore
He’s distracted—no, no—the last thing we want right now—”
“The establishment — or suddenly — school manager is a 2019 issue.
the governors, Fudge,” said Mr. Malfoy smoothed. “And like Dumblur
He didn’t have to stop the attack —.”
“Look Dagi, A Malfoy, if Dumbledore can’t stop,” said Fodgee, who has .
The upper cold was coming through now, “I mean, who could it be?”
“That will remain,” said Mass Malfoy through the vision of slaves. “But am
We thankfully we’ve found the election —”
Hagrid is divided into his legs, his head of the Shaggji and snapped on the slot.
“An’ several Yeh has the story of the Ann’ Ann’t before the formation of the .
You agree, Malfoy, yes?” he shouted.
“Honey, honey, you know, your temper is going to get you in trouble .
One of the days, Hagrid,” said Mass Malfoy. “I would advise you not to do it .
I destroy the teams of Azkaban. They didn’t know all.”
“Yeh can’t take Dumbledore!” Hagrid shouted, making Fang a
the boarhound coughs and sighs in his jacket. “Take it off, an' t
They were born with Mugle don’t change! It will be a palm' before!”
“I was silent, A Hagrid,” Dumbledre said quickly. He looked at Lucius.
Malfoy.
“If the governors want to remove me, Lucius, I will indeed step aside .
—”
“But —” Fodget said quickly.
"No!" he said Hagrid.
Dumbledore did not remove the brilliant blue lungs from Lucius Malfoy
Bullets.
“However,” Dumbledore said, speaking widely and obviously
No one can make a word, “To find that I’ll have just really.
I left this school when no one here was loyal to me. You’ll also find that
Help will always be given at Hogwarts to those who ask for it.”
For the season, the Harry is to be sure that the Dumbledore alleles are illuminated
With the average average where he and Ron flyed.
“Beautiful feelings,” Malfoy said, smirking. “We will all miss
— ER — The very African approach to raising things, Albus, and only hope
Will your follower get to stop any — ah — killings.”
He strode to the cellar door, opened it, and let Dumbledore out.
Fodged, and he is slaughtered with his player, and he likes Hagrid to go before him, but
Hagraid stands in the place, his last sentence and said: “Ma had one.
I want to find some things, everything to work
The spider. It’s going to do with good! It’s just what I say.”
Foodge saw the joy.
“And you should, you’re relaxing,” said Hagrid, the earring of the ear ear.
But while he was almost following Foodge from the door, he stopped again .
And he said aloud, “An' someone's gonna need ter feed Fang while I'm gone.”
The door slams shut and Ron brings out the cloak of invisibility.
“We are in difficulties,” he said with Lhaeri. “There is no Dumbledore. They can be .
Like closing the school tonight. There will be an attack during the day with
gone."
Vang began to harassed, singing at the closed door.
S
second
RAGUG
Ammer was crawling on the ground round the castle; Ocean and Sea
Similarly it became periwinkle as a great flowers as well as a sick in
They flourish in greenhouses. But with no Hagrid visible from the castle
The tablets, and stands on the backs with Vang in its environments, and don’t see the list
Right to Harry; Inevitably, in fact, more inner inside of the tower, where things
They were shouting in horror.
Harry and Ron tried to see Hermione, but the written was done for visitors
From the hospital bed.
“We don’t eat any other skills,” Madam Pumfreys said
With a knock on the door. “No, I’m sorry, there’s every chance
The virus will return and destroy these people. . . .”
With Dumbledore, democracy was divided like never before, this was the sun.
The threat of the villages of the outer city begins in the end
The doors. There aren't any faces to see in the school that we haven't seen.
Fear and despair, and every laugh that echoed through the streets
It sounded silly and unnatural and quickly turned off.
Harry kept repeating Dumbledore's last words to himself. "will
No really leave this school when no one here is loyal to me. . . . help
It will always be given at Hogwarts to those who ask for it.” But what’s the point
Are these words? Who exactly should they ask for help, when
Everyone was as confused and scared as they were?
Hagrid's hint about the spiders was far easier to understand — the
The problem is, it doesn't seem like there's a fixer who's going to stay in town until
follow. Harry looked around, aided (reluctantly) by
run. It is, of course, true that they are not allowed
They will fly on their own but must go around the castle in a herd.
With the other Gryffindors. Most of their fellow students assume that
They were shuttled from school to school by teachers, but Hari
He got it right.
One person, however, seems to be enjoying the atmosphere a lot .
of terrorism and conflict. Draco Malfoy was looking around the school like
although he had just been appointed as Head Boy. Harry didn't understand what he was
It is so popular that the Buttons exhibition will be held about two days later in
Dumbledore and Hagrid left, while, staying behind Malfoy, Harry
He could be heard scolding Crabbe and Goyle.
“I always thought that my father was the one who kidnapped Dumbledore,”
he said, not bothering to keep his voice down. “I told you he thinks
Dumbledore is the worst headmaster the school has ever had. Maybe we’ll get
A good principal now. Some never win a room n
The secret was kept. McGonagall won't stay long, she's just doing it. . .”
Snape walked past Harry, who didn’t say anything about Hermione’s infidelity
Seat and cabinet.
"Sir," Malfoy often said. “Sir, why can't you use
the principal’s job?”
“Now, now, Malfoy,” Snape said, although he couldn’t stop the smug grin. “Professor Dumbledore has only been suspended by the
Governors. I think he's coming back to us and he's not done.”
“Hey, wow,” Malfoy said, surprised. “I wish you were Daddy.
vote, sir, if you want to apply for the job — I’ll tell my dad you’re the
Excellent teacher here, Sir —”
Snape called as he climbed out of the hut, surprisingly not
She looked at Seamus Finnigan, who was pretending to pack his bag.
“I’m rather surprised that Mudblood didn’t quite get their cars parked with
Now now,” said Malfoy. “Bet you five Galleons the next one dies. Love it
It’s not Granger—”
The lightning went down at that moment, which was nice; In Malfoy's final words,
Ron left the carrier, and at the party to meet the troops and books,
They are hoping to reach Malfoy incredible.
“Let me at him,” Ron growled as Harry and Dean hung on the his arms. "I
ⵓⵔ ⵉⵢⵉⵜⵃⵓⵣⴰ ⴰⵔⴰ, ⵓⵔ ⵃⵡⴰⴵⴻⵖ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵜⴰⵄⴻⴽⴽⴰⵣⵜⵉⵡ, ⴰⴷ ⵜⵏⵖⴻⵖ ⵙ ⵓⴼⵓⵙⵉⵡ ⴰⵄⴻⵔⵢⴰⵏ.
sleeve -"
“Hurry up, I’ve got to get you all to Herbology,” Snape hollered over the
ⵉⵇⴻⵔⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵖⵉⵡⴰⵏⵜ, ⵓ ⴼⴼⵖⴻⵏⴷ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴽⵍⵉ, ⵙ Harry, Ron, ⴷ Dean ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵡⵡⵉⵏ
ⵙⴷⴰⵜ ⵏ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ, Ron ⵎⴰⵣⴰⵍⵉⵜ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵄⴻⵔⵔⵉⴹ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⴼⴼⴻⵖ. ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵍⴰⵎⴰⵏ ⴽⴰⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜⴻⴵⴵⴻⴹ.
When Snape sought out of the sanctions and they had their own
A path across vegetable gardens to greenhouses.
Herbological ranking is a widely used system; There are now two missing.
From their number, Justin and Hermione.
Professor Sprut puts them all to work by organizing the Apssini .
Shrivelfigs. Harry went with a brilliant brush on .
the locker room and found himself face to face with Ernie Macmillan. Ernie
He took a deep breath and said, officially, “I just want to say, Harry, so
Sorry I didn’t remember. ⵏⴻⴽⴽ ⵥⵔⵉⵖ ⵡⴻⵔⴵⵉⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜⴻⵟⵟⴼⴻⴹ ⵖⴻⴼ Hermione.
Granger, and I apologized for everything I said. We are all in the same boat.
Now, and, thankfully —”
He held out his prosthetic hand, and Harry squeezed it.
Ernie and his girlfriend Hannah came to work at a Shrivelfig like .
Harry and Ron.
“Draco Malfoy,” said Ernie, and wound up dead, “He’s .
It's getting very confusing in all this, isn't it? ⵜⴻⵥⵔⵉⴹ, ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵍⵉⵖ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ
It can be Slitherin.”
“It’s what he feels,” Ron said, the same like not .
I grew up like Harry.
“Do you’re Malfoy, A Hari?” Ernie asked.
"Oh," Harry said, very quietly when they saw Irnie and Hannah.
Second, Harry Iowa something.
Several main streets are on the ground on the other side of the
Gas, and grows in a directly nonirrivering mosque
The process to the pre-existing match. Harry hit Ron on the arm with
his thick clothes.
“Ouch! What’re you —”
Harry mentioned the plates, after seeing them with his own eyes.
Scorsea vs. sun.
“Oh, hey,” Ron said, crying, trying to answer her a note. “But we can’t
Follow the following —”
ⵉⵔⵏⵉ ⴷ ⵀⴰⵏⵏⴰⵀ ⴰⵔ ⵙⵍⵍⴰⵡⵏ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⵜ.
Harry's eyes narrowed as he looked back at the streets. If they pursued their
A fixed way, it can’t be difficult to leave.
“It’s similar to how they go to the zoo. . . .”
And Ron banks did not need more this.
At the end of the lesbon Professor Sport escorted the class to their
A lesson in defense against the dark arts. ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⴷ Run ⵇⵇⵉⵎⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ
ⵡⵉⵢⴰⴹ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵣⴻⵎⵔⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵎⵙⴻⴼⵀⴰⵎⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ.
“We'll have to use the Invisibility Cloak aagain,” Harry tuld Ron. "we
Fang may lead to us. Running around the forest with Hagrid, he
might be some help.”
“That,” said Ron, who was snapped on his hand really on his fingers.
“R — no — there’s no woman’s fear of .
Forest?" he added as they took up their usual positions in the shadow of Lockhart .
A school.
When asked not to comment on the request, Harry said, “They’re very
The stuff in there, too. Centaurs are all right, they’re unicorns . . .”
Ron had never been into the Enchanted Forest before. Harry entered.
He didn't do it once and he didn't hope he wouldn't do it again.
Luckhart came to the ring and that was it. Everyone else
The teacher on the scene was looking more nervous than usual, but Lockhart
Nothing appears.
“Come now,” he shouted, admonishing her. “Why all this long .
?”
People post happy pictures, but no one writes.
“You don’t want to know,” Lokhart said, speaking in an uncharacteristic way.
They were all a little dazed, “the danger is over! This report is being made.
away -"
“He said who?” Dean Taumas was called aware.
"Il close the young, the Minister of Magic didn't get
Hagrid wouldn’t have been ten million dollars since he was a nurse,” he said
Lockhart, in the form of one who explains that one and one makes two.
“Ah, yes, you’ll be satisfied with,” Ron, with a more Dean than Dean.
"I put myself knowing that he had more to do with hunting Hagrid than she did,
Mr. Widley,” Luckhart said in a self-recommended read.
Ron started saying that he didn’t think so, as far as he was concerned, but he stopped at
Midsentence when Harry slammed him hard under the desk.
“We’re not there, are we?” Harry muttered.
But Lockhart’s worried, the ideas he always had
He thought that Hagrid wasn't well, his confidence that it was all work .
Now in the end, it annoyed Harry so much that he wanted to stab Gadding
with ghuls on the face of lukhart. Instead he made himself
By adding a note to Ron: Let's do this tonight.
Ron read the message, swallowed hard, and looked away at the
The house clock is set primarily by Hermione. Turns out he saw it
The solution, and agreed.
Gryffindor hall was always very controversial these days,
for from six o'clock onwards, the Gryffindors had nowhere else to go.
They also have a lot to talk about, thus the common room
Sometimes he wouldn't wake up until after midnight.
Harry went to pull the Infixible Cloak out of his hole after
dinner, and spent the afternoon sitting on it, waiting for the room to clear.
Fred and George drag Harry and Ron to some Exploding game
Snap, and Ginny sat watching them, quite shocked at Hermione 's reaction.
chair. Harry and Run keep losing on purpose, trying to finish the game
Slowly, but even so, it was well past midnight when Fred, George, and the
Ginny finally went to the hotel.
Harry and Ron Rajon's distant two-door sound
It smells before they take a bell, they throw it on their heads, and
He ran out of the picture of the picture.
And other smooth behaviors in the pilgrimage, keeping all
teachers. Finally they reached the entrance hall, they turned a computer on ... they returned to
The gateways of potatoes, were kept attached to each other, seeking to stop some of the cocktails, and
He left to the monthly field.
“'Right,” Ron said quietly as they trudged through the black woods, “we .
It can be back to find no if it comes to. ⵜⵉⵙⵙⵉⵙⵜⵏⵏⵉ
Maybe there is no snack there all. I have been looking for by the same as Nutni.
ⴰⵎⵓⵙⵙⵓ ⴳ ⵡⴰⵏⴰⵡ ⴰⴷ ⵏ ⵜⵏⵉⵍⴰ ⵜⴰⵎⴰⵜⴰⵢⵜ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ . . .”
His voice returned with a hope.
They reached Hamigred's house, prisoned and cursed and cars in the ear.
The doors. When Harry opened the door, Fang freaked out with
Their view. Ghadd can make every one in the palace with the Wesis.
French, with satellites, were smuggling the tripod tokee of a shop on
mantelpiece, which supported his teeth.
Harry left Taqboct of Ur Nettwali on the Hagrid’s atmosphere. There is no
He takes him in the forest for the field.
“C'mon, Fang, let’s go,” Harry said, stops on his foot, and .
Vange left joy from the house behind, quickly moved to the average
Forest, and the text was about a large tree of forests.
Harry left his joy, he felt, “loss!” ⴷ ⵜⴰⴼⴰⵡⵜ ⵜⴰⵎⴻⵥⵢⴰⵏⵜ ⵉⴱⴰⵏ-ⴷ
In the end, with the same value to let them see the path on the ears of the ears.
“Goding awareness,” Ron said. “To my light, too, but you know — and
Perhaps it will be clean or something. . . .”
Harry yesterday Ron yesterday, he remembered for the forests. forces
The statistics are sliced ​​from the vein light to the beaches of trees.
“Yea,” Ron said in the likes of the likes of goodness, “Nkk Hegad. will
go."
So, with Fang crawling through them, shaking off tree roots and leaves,
They entered the forest. By the light of Harry’s cane, they pursue
Treckle Steady of the simultaneously simultaneously joined the road. ⵜⴻⴷⴷⵓⵏ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔⵙⴻⵏ
About a decade of minutes, not speaking, listening to another smell
More silver distribution and hidden hidden. Then, when the stones are .
There’s more than ever, so they don’t seem to be the stars that were out, and
Harry's wand glowed alone in the dark sea, and they saw their spider masters.
They left the road.
Harry has stopped, trying to see where the second, but everyone
Outside his little sphere of light was black. It wasn't like that.
Within the forest before. ⵉⵖⵢ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵙⴽⵜⵉ ⵙ ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⵖⴰⵔⴰⵙⵜ ⵓⵔ ⵉⴳⵉⵏ ⴰⵏⴼⵍⵓⵙ ⵏ ⵀⴰⴳⵔⵉⴷ.
He didn’t leave the beach last time last time while Dagi was. But Hagarid
He’s miles away now, probably sitting in a cell in Azkaban, and has also
They were told to follow the streets.
Something touched Harry's arm and he jumped back, wincing
Run's run, but it's not just anct of fang.
“And what do you stop?” ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴰⵙ Harry ⵉ Ron, ⵡⵉⵏ ⵉ ⵢⴻⵣⵎⴻⵔ ⴽⴰⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵥⴻⵔ ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏⵉⵙ
The light shone from his hand.
“We’ve done until that,” Ron said.
Hi followed the nuclear calls that take trees to trees. they
He cannot die much now; The roots of vegetables and its vessels are
The path, it is often seen in the regular figure. Harry can feel with Fang luxuries
I’m on phosphate. For more time, they must stop, so Harry can be able to be able to be able to be able to be able to be able to be able to be able to be able to.
You knelt down and found the spiders in the dim light.
They apparently walked for at least half an hour, their clothes
Snagging on the branches and twigs of the woodpecker. After a while, they noticed
that the ground seemed to slope downwards, though the trees were as
Tough as always.
Then, suddenly, Fang let out a loud, screaming roar that doubled Harry .
And Ron jumped out of their bodies.
"what?" Ron said aloud, looking around the corner, and
He took a lot of Harry's touch.
“There’s something moving over there,” Harry muttered. "listen . . .
It looks like something big. . . .”
They heard him. Some distance to their right, something bigger was
She snapped branches as she carved a path through the trees.
“Oh, no,” Ron said. “Oh, no, oh, no, oh —”
“Shut up,” Harry said angrily. “He’ll listen to you.”
“Do you hear me?” Ron said in a less serious voice. “It has already been heard
Fang!”
Darkness seemed to hang over their eyelids as they stood,
Nervously, he waits. There was a soft clicking noise, and then silence.
“What do you think he’s doing?” Harry said.
“Maybe they’re getting ready to disappear,” Ron said.
They waited, squirming, barely managing to move.
“You think she’s gone?” Harry whispered.
"I don't know -"
Then, off to their right, came a beam of light, very bright in
Darkness that the two pushed away with their hands to shield their eyes. Fang
he yelped and tried to run, but got stuck in a thicket of thorns and yelped
Even louder.
“Harry!” Ron shouted, his voice cracking with rage. “Harry, it’s our
car!"
"what?"
"series!"
Harry stumbled behind Ron towards the light, stumbling and stumbling, and
A moment later they emerged in a staircase.
Mr. Weasley's carriage stood, empty, in the middle of a steep corner
The trees beneath a canopy of bright branches, its lights twinkling. As Run goes,
He opened his mouth, towards her, she slowly turned towards him, exactly like an adult,
The turquoise dog greets his owner.
“She’s been here the whole time!” Run said excitedly, walking around the
car. “Look at her. The forest has made her wild. . . .”
The hull parts were torn off and covered with sand. apparently
She took to wandering through the forest alone. Fang never appeared in
All keen on it; He stayed close to Harry, who could feel him getting closer. his
Breathing quickly, Harry put his wallet back in his pockets.
“And we thought it was going to catch us!” Run said, leaning on the
the car and enjoy it. “I wonder where she went!”
Harry looked at the wet floor for signs of other spiders.
But they all managed to free themselves from the clutches of the storms.
“We lost our way,” he said. “C'mon, let's go find them.”
Ron didn't speak. He didn't move. His eyes focused on a point somewhat
Ten feet above the forest floor, behind Harry. His face was pale with
terrorism.
Harry didn't even have time to turn around. There was a loud click.
noise and suddenly felt something long and hairy grab him in the middle of
ⵜⵍⴻⵎⵎⴰⵙⵜ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵔⴼⴻⴷⵉⵜ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵍⵇⴰⵄⴰ, ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⵍⵉ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵄⴻⵍⵍⴻⵇ ⵙ ⵡⵓⴷⴻⵎ ⵖⴻⵔ ⴷⴷⴰⵡ.
ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵔⴰⵔ, ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵔ, ⵉⵙⵍⴰ ⵓⴳⴳⴰⵔ ⵏ ⵓⴽⵛⵛⵓⵎ, ⵉⵥⵕⴰ ⵉⴹⴰⵕⵕⵏ ⵏ ⵔⵓⵏ ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⴼⴼⵖⵏ ⵙⴳ
The ground, too, heard Fang roaring and roaring — time and past, it was
It runs in the schools of the language.
Turning and turning, Harry sees that what he's looking at is what he's asking for.
Six lines long, two feet tall, two feet tall with a clean line less than one
Two red bars. Behind him, he could hear another jar .
The animals, there is no doubt in Ron. They were walking in the heart of
Forest. Harry could hear Fang struggling to free himself from the third
The Beast, screeching loudly, but Harry couldn't scream even if he
Its requires; Looks like he left his tail back by running in
Cleaning.
He had not seen several times for which he was in the ears of the person; He only knew
that the darkness somehow lifted him to see that the leaves were scattered
The land was now covered with snow. He turns his head to his side, he
ⵙⴼⴰⵢⴷⵉⵏⴷ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⵡⵡⴹⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⵖⴻⵔⵖⴻⵔⵜ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵙⵇⵉⴼ ⴰⵎⴻⵇⵇⵔⴰⵏ, ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵙⵇⵉⴼ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⴰⵏ
It was snapped from trees, starks to leave light on light on the minute rhythm
he had never laid eyes on her.
Spread. No smaller substrates like the ones are changing the snacks below.
Spiders the size of carriage horses, eight-eyed, eight-legged, black, hairy.
Agent. It was the biggest secret that Harry takes his way.
Below the script to a bad, edited system in the center of 1000.
Hello, when his colleagues in all areas connected, they put forward their solutions .
With pleasure in the picture of his entrance.
Harry fell to the ground on all fours as he let out a cold. Run d
Fang climbed to his side. ⴼⴰⵏⴳ ⵓⵔ ⴷⴰ ⵉⵜⵜⵃⵢⵢⴰⵍ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵢⴰⴹⵏ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ
He silently walks around the place. Ron looked like Harry was worried. his
ⵉⵎⵉ ⴰⵢ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵡⴻⵅⵅⴻⵔ ⵢⵉⵎⵉ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵡⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⵏ ⵡⴰⵏⴰⵡ ⵏ ⵓⴽⴻⵔⵙⵉ ⵙ ⵜⵙⵓⵙⵎⵉ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⵓ ⵜⵉⵟⵟⴰⵡⵉⵏ-ⵏⵏⴻⵙ ⵍⵍⴰⵏⵜ
way.
Suddenly, Harry realized that the engorged spider was listening
some. It was hard to tell, because he struck a chord with
Every word was concerned about it.
“Aragagog!” She has it. “Aragagog!”
and from the center of the rail, web, a slope of a size of a
The youngest Ellanthan came out, in a very beautiful way. There was songs in his
ⵜⴰⴼⴳⴳⴰ ⴷ ⵉⴹⵕⵉⵚⵏ, ⴷ ⴽⵓ ⵢⴰⵏ ⴳ ⵜⵉⵟⵟⴰⵡⵉⵏ ⵍⵍⵉ ⵉⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵅⴼ ⵓⵣⵡⵓ ⵏⵏⵙ, ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵖⵓⵍ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵖⵓⵍ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵖⵓⵍ
white. It’s a friend.
“What is it?” He said, tapping his thumb briefly.
“Guys,” he entered with the hand Harry was holding.
“Is that Hagrid?” said Aragu, approaching, his 8 wooden eyes
They appear in an unusual way.
“ⵜⵉⵙⵍⴳⵏⵉⵏ”, ⵉⴽⵛⵎ ⵙ ⵓⵙⵎⵎⵉⴹ ⵍⵍⵉ ⵢⵓⵡⵉⵏ ⵔⵓⵏ.
“Kill them,” growled Aragog. “I was sleeping. . . .”
“ⵏⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⴷ ⵉⵎⴷⴷⵓⴽⴽⴰⵍ ⵏ ⵀⴰⴳⵔⵉⴷ,” ⵉⵏⵏⴰ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ. His heart seemed to have
Her chest swelled and ran down her spine.
Get on, get on, get on the blackboards in every corner of the house.
The rabbit stood up.
"Hagrid, men have never come out to our meat before," he said quietly.
“Hagard in trouble,” Harry said, he was slaughteringly satisfied. “That’s what we have
come."
“In trouble?” He said the great Spirit, and Harry thought he knew him a feeling.
below the entrance bincarn. “But why did he send you?”
Harry thought to get to his feet but decided against him; It didn’t work.
They thought his legs would help him. So, he spoke from the ground, and he spoke freely.
as much as possible.
“They think, in the top of the school, that Hagrid is a — a — .
Something about students. He was taken to Azkaban.”
Worg's joined his pinnary really, and all about the roof of .
sound is echoed by the crowd of bees; is like a filter, xs
applause didn't usually make Harry feel sick with dread.
“But that was yars ago,” said Aragog fertfollly. “The years and years ago. I
Remember it is well. That’s why he dropped out of school. they
He believed I was a child who lives in what Taxxamt read
of Secrets. They thought Hagrid had opened the Chamber and set me up.
free."
"Did you . . . not come from the Secret Chamber?” said
Harry, who could feel the cold on his hand.
"I!" Aragog said, squirming with anger. “I’m not listening to the punishment. I came
From a distant land. He gave me a journey to Hagarde when I was white.
Hagrid is not just a boy, but he is running away from us, hidden in a meat in the .
The slave, approaches the things of the premiere. Hagrid is a good friend of mine, and
Good guy. When I was discovered, and blamed for the death of a girl, he
broticted me. I lived here in the forest since I was born, where Hagrid still
She visited me. He also found me a woman, Mosag, and you see how
It was silenced, all with Hagrid’s satisfaction. . . .”
Harry summoned what was left of his courage.
“Yes not — have you got one?”
“They’re not,” she shot him an old smile. “It would be my invitation, but
Out of respect to Hagrid, I didn't harm a human. The boody of the ger
The one was dismissed in a wedding home. I have never seen any part of
Girl but the party I grew up with. Our style like the door is
quiet. . . .”
“But then . . . Do you know what killed this girl?” Harry said.
“Being as he wants, he’s become aggressive and sick again —”
a word written with a voice of the ear of the ear, and sights.
of many long-term feet of the slots; Large black forms are changed in and in oral
he.
“The thing that lives in the town,” said Arague, “It’s a old creature .
We prioritize behavior over all others. Though I do remember how I knew her.
Hagrid to let me go, when I felt the monster moving around the school.”
“What is it?” Harry said quietly.
More than the plant, more than ears; The snaps like you are close.
“We don’t talk about it!” Aragog said solemnly. “We don’t cooperate! I
He never told Hagred’s name of this smoking animal, although he asks
Me, many times.”
Harry didn't want to force the subject, not the witches pressing
closer on all sides. Aragog seemed exhausted from speaking. It was helpful
In a happy way on his Internet, but his friends continue his friends in a happy way .
As Hari and Run.
“Let’s just go, then,” Harry called calmly to Aragog, hearing the leaves .
she moved behind him.
"go?" Aragog said quietly. “I think not. . . .”
“But—but—”
“My sons and my daughters will not prepare for Hajj, because of my assembly. But I
He cannot deny them with pure flesh, when he becomes and becomes in a way that allows us to work in our midst.
Goodbye, Hagrid’s friend.”
Harry turned around. Feet away, towering above him, was a solid wall of
Spiders, they squirmed, their many eyes gleaming in their messy black heads.
Even when he reached for his hand, Harry knew it wasn't a sign, there were
Many of them, but when he was about to stand up, he was ready to die, one of them,
There is a long noise, and a beam of light comes from above.
Mr. Weasley's carriage was rumbling in the background, its headlights flashing,
with the sweet potatoes, and the sweet potatoes aside; Many are thrown on their sides
long, their endless arms waving in the air. The car screeched to a halt in the
In front of Harry and Ron and the doors flew open.
“Get Fang!” Harry snapped, turning back to the start; He took the Run
The boarhound in the middle is squeezed, it falls, it turns and it turns.
car — doors closed — Ron didn’t touch the computer but
the car didn't need him; The engine roared and off they went, beating more
Red. They set up a cross, from the flesh, not long
It fell into the forest, the branches hitting the windows like a car
It made its way safely along the main roads, following a road that was
Obviously he knew.
Harry looked sideways at Ron. His mouth was still open in the silent
She screams, but her eyes don't open.
“Are you okay?”
Ron stares straight ahead, unable to speak.
They made their way quickly, Fang in a clean way
in the backseat, and Harry watched the side mirror dim as they neared
A large meat passed. After ten million minutes, the scores are displayed,
Harry could see the shadows of the sky again.
The car stopped so badly that they almost passed it to .
Windmills. They reached the edge of the cliff. Fang leaned into the
window in his eagerness to get out, and when Harry opened the door, he
she flew through the trees toward Hagrid's house, tail between her legs. Harry
He disappeared as well, and after a minute or so Ron seemed to have regained consciousness in
His fingers and followed, still broken and staring. He gave Harry the box.
They thanked pat as he turned back into the forest and disappeared from sight.
Harry returns to Hagrid's cabin to retrieve the Invisibility Cloak. Fang
He was growing under the blanket in his trousers. When Harry went outside
Once again, Ron was found gravely ill in the bathtub.
“Follow those spiders,” Ron growled sadly, wiping his mouth on her neck.
“I never forgave Hagrid. We add value when we live.”
"I'm sure he thought Aragog wouldn't hurt his friends," Harry said.
“That’s exactly Hagrid’s problem!” Run said, punching the wall of
Cabin. “He always thought that farms wouldn’t be as dangerous as they made out, and
Look where it got him! An Azkaban cell!” He was shivering.
uncontrollably now. “What was the point of sending us in there? what
We found out, I want to know?”
"That Hagrid didn't break into the Sugar Room," Harry said,
Clock asks for Ron and asks for his hand to do it.
walk. “He was innocent.”
Ron gave a clean copy. Obviously imprisoning Aragog in prison was not
Her idea of ​​being innocent.
As the castle got closer, Harry peeked the drum to see if the
feet were hidden, then pushed the creaking front doors ajar. world .
They went back and forth on the entrance hall and up the marble staircase,
They take their interest as they passed the streets where they were old
walking. You finally reach the safety of Gryffindor Hall,
where the fire burned itself to consume it. They left the clock.
and brought him to their field.
Ron collapsed onto his bed without bothering to unbutton his clothes. Harry,
However, I didn’t feel very sleepy. It is located on the midst of the seven nights,
They were seriously considering everything Aragog had said.
The animal that reaches somewhere in the city, think,
It looked like some sort of Voldemort monster — neither did the other monsters .
I want to give it a name. But he and Run were no closer to finding out what was going on,
Or how he Petrified his animals. Not even Hagrid knew what was in the
of the suites chamber.
Harry went to his feet on his dick rolling back and forth against him.
wave, watching the moon rise over him through the window of the tower.
He couldn’t see what else they could do. Dead ceremonies returned
Every place. Riddle had caught the wrong person, the Heir of Slytherin had
went out, and no one could tell he was a man, or a
different, who opened the Chamber this time. There is no one
another you’ll ask. ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵉⴱⴷⴷ, ⵉⵙⵓⵍ ⴷⴰ ⵉⵜⵜⵙⵡⵉⵏⴳⵉⵎ ⵅⴼ ⵓⵢⵏⵏⴰ ⵎⵉ ⵉⵏⵏⴰ ⴰⵔⴰⴳⵓⴳ.
He was becoming sleepy when it seemed their last hope.
He came to him, and I was smoothly.
“Run,” he whispered, “Run —”
Ron woke up with the same scream as Fang, looked out the window and saw Harry.
“Ron — the girl who died. Aragog says she found him in a brothel,”
Harry said, ignoring Neville's echoing snarl from around the corner. “What if
Hasn't she come out of retirement? What if she’s still there?”
Ron opened his eyes, shining in the moonlight. And then he
You understand, too.
“Don’t you think—isn’t Myrtle moving?”
a
Chapter Sixteen
SELECTION ROOM
ⵜⵉⵣⵉ ⵏⵏⴰⵖ ⵏⵍⵍⴰ ⴳ ⵜⴳⵎⵎⵉ ⴰⴷ, ⴷ ⵜⵍⵍⴰ ⵖⴰⵙ ⴽⵕⴰⴹ
Ron by time,” said Ron with destruction on Darir on that day, “weenni.
He could have asked her, and now . . .”
Ithad been hard enough trading to look for spiders. Their escape
Teachers take a lot of time to get into a girls field, girls hospital,
Furthermore, close to the right of the initial attack domain, there was approximately
impossible.
But something happened in their first lesson, Transformation, that caused
The Secret Committee outside their office for the first time in weeks. ten
Minutes into class, Professor McGonagall told them that their exams
It starts the first of June, a week from today.
“Exams?” howled Seamus Finnigan. “Are we still taking tests?”
Harry has a clean bang behind him like Nephil Longbottom.
He stood, resting one of his legs on his hip. Professor McGunagall
She replied with a flick of her wrist and turned, smiling, at Seamus.
“The whole point of keeping school open at this point is you will
Hold on to your education,” she often said. “These tests will take longer, therefore
That’s where it’s going to be every time, and I hope everyone reads it.”
Studying hard! It never occurred to Harry that there would be tests.
With the castle at this point. There is a large number of guests.
Across the room, which made Professor McGonagall even angrier
In clothing.
“Headmaster Dumbledore’s advice was to keep the school going .
Whatever that is,” she said. “That's it, I need no doubt,
It is measured in terms of how much you have learned this year.”
Harry looked down at the two white robes he was
He returns to the fields. What has been learned so far this year? unable
It is thought to be something that will pass an exam.
Ron looked like he was just told he had to go live in
The built environment.
“You can keep me holdings the exams with this?” Harry asked, grabbing
With his cock, which was just starting to swell loudly.
Three days after their first exam, Professor McGonagall held another one .
Newspaper in the morning.
“ⵙⵄⵉⵖ ⵍⴻⵅⴱⴰⵔ ⵢⴻⵍⵀⴰⵏ”, ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ, ⴷ ⵜⵣⴻⵇⵇⴰ ⵜⴰⵎⴻⵇⵔⴰⵏⵜ, ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⵎⴽⴰⵏ ⵏ ⵜⵖⴻⵍⵍⵉⵙⵜ .
He smiled and left.
“Dumbeldur will be back!” several pleople yelled joyfully.
“You’re holding the Heir of Slytherin!” screamed a girl in Ravenclaw
table.
“Quiditch meetings have become!” Yuli Wood was well.
When the arguing stopped, Professor McGonagall said, "Professor . . ."
ⵙⵒⵔⵓⵜ ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ-ⵉⵢⵉ-ⴷ ⴷⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵎⴰⵏⴷⵔⴰⴽⴻⵙ ⵡⴻⵊⴷⴻⵏ ⵉ ⵍⵎⴻⵏⴷ ⵏ ⵓⵃⴱⴰⵙ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⴳⴰⵔⴰ.
Tonight, we will be able to bring back those people who were petriped. I
I don’t need to remind you that one of them can tell us
Who, or what happened. I hope this year is wrong.
With our wife.”
There was a burst of activity. Harry looked over at Slytherin.
The table wasn't all that exciting when we saw that Draco Malfoy wasn't going to enter.
Ron, however, was looking more optimistic than he usually does these days.
“It wouldn’t matter if we didn’t ask Myrtle, then!” He told Harry.
"Maybe Hermione will have all the answers when they figure it out!" mind
You guys, she's going to pass when she sees that we have a test in three days.
time. She didn't read it. It may be very nice to leave it where it came from
they're over.”
At the same time, Ginny Wisley went to sit next to Ron. she
She looked tense and nervous, and Harry noticed that her hands were moving.
ⴳ ⵓⴼⵓⵙ ⵏⵏⵙ.
"what's up?" Ron said, helping himself to the top of the tower.
Ginny said nothing, but looked up and down the Gryffindor .
ⵟⵟⴰⴱⵍⴰ ⵙ ⵜⴰⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ ⵏ ⵜⵓⴳⴷⵉ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⴷⴻⵎⵉⵙ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⵎⴻⴽⵜⴰⵏ Harry ⵙ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ,
Although he could not think which.
“ⵙⵙⵓⴼⴻⵖⵉⵜⵜⵉⴷ”, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Ron, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⵉⵜⵜ.
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⴻⵍⵜ ⵢⴻⴼⵀⴻⵎ ⴰⵏⵡⴰ ⵉ ⵜⵉⴷⵢⴻⵙⵎⴻⴽⵜⴰⵢⴻⵏ Ginny. ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵃⴻⵣⵣⵉⴱ.
ⵖⴻⵔ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⴷ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵣⴷⴰⵜ ⵛⵡⵉⵟ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⴽⴻⵔⵙⵉⵉⵏⴻⵙ, ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵉ ⵜⵢⴻⵅⴷⴻⵎ Dobby ⴰⵙⵎⵉ
It revolves around the presentation of established news.
« ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⴼⴽ ⴰⴷ ⴰⴽ-ⴷ-ⵉⵏⵉⵖ ⴽⵔⴰ », ⵖⴻⴼ ⵡⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⵢ ⴷ-ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ ⵊⵉⵏⵉ, ⵙ ⵍⴻⵄⵇⴻⵍ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵥⴻⵔ ⴰⵔⴰ
In Harry.
“What is it?” Harry said.
Ginny looked as if she couldn't find the right words.
"what?" Run said.
Ginny opened her mouth, but no sound came out. ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵉⴼⵍ ⵖⵔ ⴷⴰⵜ
ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴰⵡⴻⵍ ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ, ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⵍⴰ Ginny ⴷ Ron ⵉ ⵙⴷ-ⵢⴻⵙⵍⴰⵏ.
« ⴷ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵖⴻⴼ Texxamt ⵏ Yifuyla? You see
some? ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵡⵉⵏ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴳⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵍⵅⵓⴼ?”
ⴳⵉⵏⵏⵢ ⵜⴻⵙⵙⵓⴼⴻⵖⴷ ⵏⵏⴻⴼⵙ ⵍⵇⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ, ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⴻⵙⵡⵉⵄⵜⵏⵏⵉ ⴽⴰⵏ, Percy Weasley .
ⵉⴱⴰⵏ-ⴷ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴱⴰⵏ-ⴷ ⴷ ⵡⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵄⵔⴰⴹ.
“If you are done eating, I will enter the position, Ginny. ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⵥⴰⵍⵍⴰⵖ, ⵖⵓⵔⵉ
They only have the right to cancel.”
ⴳⵉⵏⵏⵢ ⵜⵏⴻⴳⴳⴻⵣ ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ ⴷ ⴰⴽⴻⵔⵙⵉⵉⵏⴻⵙ ⵉ ⵜⵉⴷⵢⴻⵙⴱⴻⴷⴷⴻⵏ ⴽⴰⵏ ⵙ ⵜⵔⵉⵙⵉⵜⵉ, ⵢⴻⴼⴽⴰⴷ
Percy looked confused, scared, and stormed off. ⵢⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎ Percy ⵓ
ⵢⴻⵟⵟⴻⴼ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵍⵎⵓⵇ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵜⵍⴻⵎⵎⴰⵙⵜ ⵏ ⵟⵟⴰⴱⵍⴰ.
“Exchange!” ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ-ⴷ ⵔⵓⵏ ⵙ ⵍⴻⵄⵇⴻⵍ. « ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴽⴰⵏ ⵇⵔⵉⴱ ⴰⴷ ⴰⵖⴷ-ⵜⵉⵏⵉ ⴽⵔⴰ .
important!"
Halfway through the tea, Percy stopped.
“What kind of thing?” ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ-ⴷ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵏⴰⵖ.
“I just asked her if she saw anything odd, and she started saying —”
« ⴰⵀ — ⴰⵢⴰ — ⴰⵢⴰ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⵙⵙⴰⵖ ⴷ Texxamt ⵏ Yifukal », ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ .
ⴱⵉⵔⵔⵉ ⴳ ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⵉⵣⵉ.
“ⴰⵎⴻⴽ ⵉ ⵜⴻⵥⵔⵉⴹ?” ⵉⵏⵏⴰ ⵔⵓⵏ, ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⵏⴼⴰⵍⵏ ⵉⴼⵔⵉⵙⵏ ⵏⵏⵙ.
“Well, er, if you must know, Ginny, er, walked in on me the other day .
ⴰⵙⵎⵉ ⵍⵍⵉⵖ — ⵙ ⵍⵅⵉⵔ, ⵓⵔ ⵜⵜⵄⴻⵟⵟⵉⵍⴻⴹ ⴰⵔⴰ — ⵍⵃⴰⵍ ⴷ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ, ⵜⴻⵥⵔⴰⵢⵉⴷ ⵜⵜⵅⴻⴷⴷⵉⵎⴻⵖ
Something and I, um, asked her not to mention it to anyone. ⵉⵍⴰⵇ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵏⵉⵖ, ⵏⴻⴽⴽ
ⵜⵅⴻⵎⵎⴻⵎ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵟⵟⴻⴼ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵡⴰⵡⴰⵍⵉⵙ. ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴷ ⴽⵔⴰ, ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ, ⵃⴻⵎⵎⵍⴻⵖ ⴽⴰⵏ —”
Harry had never seen Percy so unhappy.
“What were you doing, Percy?” Ron said, smiling. “Go on, tell us, we
ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⴹⵚⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ.”
Percy ⵓⵔ ⴷⵢⴻⵔⵔⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵙ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉⵙ.
“ⵙⵙⵉⵡⴻⴹⵉⵢⵉⴷ ⵜⵉⴼⴻⵍⵡⵉⵢⵉⵏⵏⵏⵉ, ⴰ Hari, ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵃⴻⴱⵙⴻⵖ ⵙ ⵍⴰⵥ.”
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⵥⵔⴰ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⵍⴱⴰⴹⵏⴰⵏⵏⵉ ⴰⴽⴽ ⵜⴻⵣⵎⴻⵔ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⴼⵔⵓ ⴰⵣⴻⴽⴽⴰ ⵎⴻⴱⵍⴰ ⵎⴰ ⵍⵍⴰⵏ
ⵜⴰⵍⵍⴻⵍⵜ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵣⴳⴻⵔ ⵜⴰⴳⵏⵉⵜ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⴷⵢⴻⵎⵎⴻⵙⵍⴰⵢ ⴷ Myrtle ⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ
ⵜⴱⴰⵏⴷ — ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵙ ⵍⴼⴻⵔⵃⵉⵙ ⵜⴱⴰⵏⴷ, ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⵍⴻⵎⵎⴰⵙⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⴷⴷⵉⵜ, ⴰⵙⵎⵉ ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵄⴻⵣⵍⴻⵏ .
brought about the history of Gilderoy Lockhart's compositions.
Lockhart, ⵉ ⵜⴻⵏⵉⵄⴻⵇⵍⴻⵏ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⵏ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⴰⵍ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴰⴽⴽ ⵍⵅⵉⵇ ⵢⴻⵣⵔⵉ,
ⴰⵍⴰ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⴷⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵙⴱⴰⵏ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵄⴻⵡⵡⵉⵇ ⵉⵎⵉⵔⴻⵏ ⴽⴰⵏ, ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵜⵓⵔⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵇⵏⴻⵄ ⵙ ⵡⵓⵍⵉⵙ ⵎⴻⵕⵕⴰ
ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵍⵇⵉⵎⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵏⵜⵡⴰⵍⵉⴹ ⵙ ⵍⴰⵎⴰⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⴱⴻⵔⴷⴰⵏ.
His hair wasn't as soft as before; He seemed to have stolen most of the
ⵉⴹ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴹⴻⴳⴳⵉⵄ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵍⵇⴰⵄⴰ ⵜⵉⵙ 4.
“ⵙⵎⴻⴽⵜⴻⴷ ⴰⵡⴰⵍⵉⵡ,” ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴰⵡⴻⴹⵉⵜⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵖⴻⵔⵖⴻⵔⵜ. « ⴰⵎⴻⵣⵡⴰⵔⵓ .
The words out of the mouths of those poor trapped creatures would be, "It's Hagrid."
Frankly, I’m surprised that Professor McGonagall thinks this fall at all
Justice is necessary.”
“I agree, sir,” Harry said, causing Ron to suddenly drop his books.
“Thank you, Harry,” Lockhart said in a pleasant manner as they looked for a
the long line of Hufflepuffs to get through. “We said, we teachers have well
You proceed with, regardless of whether you walk students to classes and stand guard
all night. . . .”
“That’s right,” Ron said, laughing. “Why don’t you leave us here, sir,
we've only got one more corridor to go —”
"You know, Wesley, I think I will," Lockhart said. “I really should go
And prepare my next reading—”
And he went quickly.
"Prepare his class," Ron sneered after him. “Gone to curl his hair, more
as."
They let the rest of the Gryffindors get ahead of them and then they drove
Down a side alley, it’s over to the Moaning Myrtle Shrine.
However, they also agree on their optimal
—
"ear! Wezli! what are you doing?"
It’s Professor McGonagall, and his mouth is full of wizards
lines.
“We were — we were —” Ron spoke. “We’re going — we’re going
and look —.”
"Hermione," Harry said. Ron and Professor McGonagall both looked at each other.
he.
“We haven’t seen her in ages, Professor,” Harry continued quietly,
stepped on Ron’s leg, “and we thought we’d sneak into the hospital wing, .
You know, tell him the Mandrakes are almost ready and, er, not to worry
—”
Professor McGonagall was still staring at him, and for a moment, Harry .
She thought she was going to explode, but when she spoke, she was in a
With a terribly crackly voice.
“Of course,” she said, and Harry, surprised, saw a tear glistening in her .
The eye of the needle. “Of course, I think this has all been hardest on the 2019 classmates.
Those who are . . . I understand everything. Yes, butter, obviously you guys
Visit Mrs. Granger. I will inform Professor Binns where you've gone. tell
Madam Pomfrey I have given my permission.”
Harry and Ron walk, not expecting to .
The sentence was postponed. When they were in the corner, they heard a sound.
Professor McGonagall left her seats.
“That’s,” Ron exclaimed, “the best story you’ve ever come up with .
with."
They have no choice now but to go to the hospital and tell Madame
Pomfrey that they had Headmaster McGonagall's permission to visit
Hermione.
Madame Bumphrey is helping them, but in an uncomfortable way.
"There's just no point in talking to a convicted person," she said, and there are
She had to admit she had a point when they took their seats in front of the
Hermione. Obviously Hermione doesn't have the explanation to leave.
She had visitors, and that might be called her dip party.
They don’t worry about all the good that’s going on.
“Well, if she knew who attacked her?” said Ron, looking sadly at
Hermione's hardened face. “Because if he poured over all of them, there would be no one.
Abda to know. . . .”
But Harry couldn't see Hermione's face. It is widely used in
his hand. She was close to the night, and close,
He noticed that a piece of paper had been twisted inside his sleeve.
ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⴳⴳⴰ ⵎⴰⵙ ⴷ ⵎⴰⴷⴰⵎ ⴱⵓⵎⴼⵔⵉ ⵓⵔ ⵉⴳⵉ ⴰⵏⵙⴰ ⵏⵏⵙ, ⵉⵙⵙⴽⵏ ⴰⵢⴰ
Out to the Run.
“Try to push it off,” Ron growled, shifting his chair to stop .
Harry from Madam Pomfrey's point of view.
There was no reasonable job. Hermione's hand was widely designed on
the paper that Harry was watching to destroy. While Ron kept watching he
Added and Tutistad, and the end, after a few minutes of leap, it was keen
free.
It was a page ripped out of a very old library book. Harry corrected her.
excitedly and Ron leaned closer to read it as well.
Of the many dangerous plants and animals that roam our planet, there
Nothing that leads alarm or more death than Basilisk, is also known as
Yizerfan King. This snake, which can reach enormous size and
I was living a lot of hundreds of years, born from the sight of this, ended up
Under a bush. His offensive qualities are quite impressive, because aside from
From the death of the death of ASM, Basilisk has a memorandum of the house
behold, all who are guarded by the blindness of his eye shall suffer
Time’s death. Spiders flee before the Basilisk, for it is their mortal
enemy, and the Basilisk narrowly escapes the bull swallow,
That’s a death sentence.
And under that, only one word is added, in Harry’s hand .
It identified as Hermione's. Forests.
It’s like someone just turned on a light in his brain.
"Ron," he breathed. “That’s it. This is the answer. The monster in the
Chamber is a basil — a great serpent! That’s why I kept hearing this
sound all over the place, and no one else could hear it. That’s because I
You understand the Parsel language. . . .”
Harry looked at the piled beds.
“The sights of stones has killed people by views. But no one died —
Every with no goods directly in Wallon. Colin is intense
camera. The Basilisk burned all the film in its gut, but Colin only took
Petrified. Justin . . . Justin should be seen Pazilisc with almost
Nicky will not read! ⵏⵉⴽ ⵢⵓⵎⵥ ⴰⴱⵔⵙⴳⴳⵡⴰⴷ ⴽⵓⵍⵍⵓ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵓⵔ ⵉⵣⵎⵉⵔ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵎⵎⵓⵜ . . .
And Hermione is that this ravinkloe was found with a next-middle
to them. Hermione only knew that Agndy was a Basilisk. I bet you
Something what the first person took a supposed to meet in the face with one.
101111111umbian! And that girl pulleed tut miror — and —”
Ron's jaw dropped.
“And Mrs. Noris?” he whispered easily.
Harry thought for a long time, picturing Halloween night.
"water . . .” He told me. “The heat from the Moaning Myrtle .
shower. I bet you Ms. Norris knows just a thought. . . .”
He launched a slide in the phosphate. ⵙⵉⵎⴰⵍ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⵉⵜⵜ, ⵙⵉⵎⴰⵍ
ⵓⴳⴰⵔ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⴰ ⵍⵎⴻⵄⵏⴰ.
“'Basilisk only escapes the ear sand, which is the death .
ⵉ ⵜⵜ'!” ⵉⵖⵔⴰ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⵜ. “Hagrid’s ravens were killed! ⴰⵜⵀⴰⵔⵅ ⴰⵜ ⴳ
Slytherin didn’t want anyone anywhere near the castle when the Room
open! 'The spiders fled before the Basilisk'! It takes everything!”
“But how was the basilisk getting to that place?” Run said. "a
The big snake . . . Someone will notice. . .”
But Harion shows Hermione's words and gives him a kick in the leg.
of page.
“Things,” he said. "things . . . Ron, she was using gas. I
You hear that voice within the walls. . . .”
Ron suddenly grabbed Harry's hand.
“The entrance to the Chamber of Secrets!” He said shakily. " whether
Is he a doctor? If it’s in —”
“— he’s looking at Myrtle’s dress,” Harry said.
They sat there, magic looming over them, unable to be seen .
it.
“This means,” said Harry, “I can’t be the only Parselmouth in the
school. Slytherin Square, too. That's how he's been controlling
Your basil.”
“What is going on?” said Ron, whose eyes were flashing. "should
Are we going straight to McGonagall?”
“Let’s go to the staff room,” Harry said, sighing. “She’ll be there in 2019.
Ten minutes. It’s almost broken.”
They're throwing it under him. He didn’t want to be found hanging in
Alternatively, they directly entered the workroom that was built by the government. He was a
Large, a room with wooden floors. Harry and Ron came.
In turn, he is very excited that he will stay.
But the signal bell never came.
In its place came the passing of Professor McGonagall's pens
voice, magically magnified.
“All students to return to their House dormitories at once. All students
Return to the staff room. In time, you must try.”
Harry wanted to see Ron.
“Not another attack? Not now?"
“Shall we?” Ron said, wind. “Have you been to the army?”
“Oh,” Harry said, shaking his head. There is an unhealthy type of bullying.
To his left, there are pictures of teachers. “In here. Let's hear what it all is.
about. Then we can tell them what we’ve found out.”
They hid themselves inside it, listening to the rumbling of hundreds of
People are moving up, and the door of workers is opening. from
Among the clean rows of color, teachers saw an exhibition
In the room. Some of them regress, others actually change
afraid. Then Professor McGonagall arrived.
“It happened,” she said of the statue of suspicious workers. “The student was
These people caught him. Straight to the House itself.”
Professor Flitwick let out a sigh. The teacher rubbed her hands.
xf his mouth. Snape gripped the back of the chair tightly and said,
“How can you take care of it?”
"The head of Slytherin," Professor McGonagall said, and that was .
White, “She left another note. less than the first. 'His skeleton
He will stay in the House forever.'”
Professor Flitwick was in tears.
“Who?” said Madam Hooch, who had sunk, weak-kneed, into a
chair. “Which student?”
"Ginny Weasley," Professor McGonagall said.
Harry thought Ron was silently looking at Dad's body beneath him.
"We will send all students home tomorrow," the professor said.
McGonagall. “This is the last of Hogwarts. Dumbledore says never . . .”
The door to the staff room opened again. For a rare moment, Harry
It seems it's going to be Dumbledore. But he was Lokhart and he was .
play.
“So forgive me — relax — what’s left?”
He didn't seem to notice that the other teachers were looking at him.
With something really like a box. The snap came forward.
“He’s the same guy,” he said. “The same guy. A girl was caught by
Reader, Luckhart. It is held in the File Room itself. Your photo
He came at last.”
Lukhart blanked.
"That's right, Gilderoy," Professor Sprout said. “It’s not you
He said just yesterday that you have always known where the entrance to
The hand room is?”
“I — well, I —” Lockhart stammered.
“Yeah, didn’t you tell me you were sure you knew what was inside?”
Professor Flitwick exclaimed.
“D-did I? I don’t remember —”
“I actually remember you saying you wished you didn’t have a boat .
in this house before Hagrid was arrested,” Snab said. “You didn't say .
That the whole affair is rigged, and you must be
Given the credit from the first?”
Lockhart looks at his friends stone-faced.
“I — not really John — maybe you’re not the real one —.”
"We'll leave it to you, then, Gilderoy," Professor McGonagall said.
“Tonight would be a good time to do it. We will ensure that everyone is out
of your way. You’ll be able to deal with the beast on your own. A free kid
eventually."
Lockhart looks around for him, but no one comes to his aid.
He doesn’t look remotely handsome. His tongue was growing, and in
The absence of his usual smile makes him look weaker and weaker.
“V-very well,” he said. “I’ll be — I’ll be in my office, I’ll go in — I’ve arrived
ready."
And he left the room.
"Of course," Professor McGonagall said, her brow furrowed, "it is . . ."
Pull it out from under our feet. The heads of the houses had to go and
They immediately informed their students of what had happened. Tell them the Hogwarts Express
He'll take them home first thing tomorrow. Will you do something else please
The students were not left out of their fight.”
The teachers got up and left, one by one.
It was the worst day of Harry's life. He, Ron, Fred, and
George sat all in one corner of the Gryffindor room, unable to
Say something to someone else. Percy wasn't there. He went to send a hand.
to Mr. and Mrs. Weasley, and then locked himself in his bathroom.
No evening lasted the same, not even Gryffindor Tower .
It wasn’t crowded, but it was very quiet. Near sunset, Fred and George went up
Let's stay, he can't stay there long.
“She knows something, Harry,” Ron said, speaking for the first time .
Since they entered the hall in the staff hall. “That’s why she’s
taken. It doesn't do anything good for everyone. Found
Something about the audience committee. This must be why she —.”
Ron widened his eyes in a happy way. “I mean, she was green. There can't
It’s going to be another reason.”
Harry could see the sun sinking, blood red, below the horizon. This was
The worst he didn’t feel. If only there was something they could do.
anything.
"Harry," Ron said. “D’you think there’s some power in everything that’s not —
You know -"
Harry didn't know what to say. He couldn't see how Ginny could be
leave.
“D’you know what?” Run said. “I think we should go see Lockhart.
Tell him what we know. He will try to get into the House. we can
Tell him where we see him, tell him it’s your basil in there.”
Because Harry couldn’t think of anything else to do, and because he
He wanted to be doing something, he agreed. The neighboring Gryffindors
They were so desperate, and felt so sorry for the Weasleys, that no one bothered to
Stop them when they get up, cross the room, and are out of the picture
hole.
Darkness was falling as they walked to Lockhart's office. there
It sounds like a lot of work going on inside it. They can hear the question,
thumps, and quick feet.
Harry approached and there was a sudden silence from within. Then the
The door opened the tiniest crack and they saw one of Lockhart's eyes staring
by him.
“Oh — Mr. Potter — Mr. Weasley —” he said, opening the door slightly .
It's great. “I’m pretty busy at the moment—if you’ll please—”
"Professor, we have some news for you," Harry said. “We think
It will help you.”
“Er — well — it’s not that bad —” The side of Lockhart’s face they were .
He could see he looked very uncomfortable. “I mean—well—well enough—”
He opened the door and they entered.
Almost his entire office was packed. Two large toads standing
open in the ground. balls, jade ones, blue, midnight blue, available on demand
ended up in one of them; The books blend seamlessly into each other. the
The pictures covering the walls are now hung in shelves on
laboratory.
“Are you going somewhere?” Harry said.
"Er, well, yeah," Lockhart said, cutting out a life-size poster of himself from
knocking on the door as he spoke and started fucking her. “Quick call —
He is not detained—he must go—”
“What about my sister?” Ron said sarcastically.
"Well, about that—it's the worst—" Lockhart said, forgiving themselves .
His eyes as he opened a drawer and began pouring out its contents
Bag. “No one would care more than me—”
“You’re a master of defense against the dark arts!” Harry said. "you
I can’t leave now! Not with all the Dark stuff going on here!”
“Well—I must say—when I took the job—” Lockhart thought, now .
He taps the top on his heel. “There was nothing on the job description — it didn’t
expect -"
“You mean you’re leaving?” Harry said disgustedly. “After that
That stuff you do in your books—”
"Books can be intimidating," Lockhart whispered.
“You wrote them!” Harry shouted.
"My dear boy," Lockhart said, straightening himself and leaning over Harry.
“Use your common sense. My books wouldn’t sell half as well if
People don’t think I did all those things. Nobody wants to read about
Some former Arnien’s old guardian, even if he saved the house from
The fox. He would look terrible in the front cover. No sense of leather at all.
And the witch who portrayed the Bandon Banshee had a hairy chin. I mean,
series -"
“So, you just keep taking credit for what a bunch of other people have .
Over?" Harry said in disbelief.
"Harry, Harry," Lockhart said, rubbing his head anxiously, "It's not . . ."
It’s almost as simple as that. There was work involved. I need to follow these
People down. Ask them how they were able to do what they did.
Then I have to put a reminder campaign on them so they don’t remember
do it. If there’s one thing I’m proud of, it’s my Memory Charms.
No, it’s a lot of work, Harry. It’s not all book signings and reveals
Pictures, you know. You want beauty, you have to be prepared for a long time
slog.”
He popped the lids of his jackets closed and tied them.
“Let’s see,” he said. “I think that’s all it is. Yes. Only one thing is left.”
He has found the potatoes, cleaned them.
“I’m so sorry, archives, but I’m going to put you now Memory Charm.
I can’t wait for you to drag my boss all over the place. I will never sell
Another book —”
Harry reached his wand just in time. Lockhart almost raised his,
When Harry yelled, “Expelliarmus!”
Lockhart was blasted backwards and fell on his bike; His wand came out.
It revolves in the wind; Ron grabbed him, and dragged him out the open window.
"Professor Snape didn't have to teach us that one," Harry said .
Angrily, he kicked Lockhart’s wallet aside. Lockhart was staring at him,
Feasible again. Harry was still staring back at him.
“What do you want me to do?” Lukhart said in an awkward manner. "I don't understand
Where is the Fuel Room. There’s nothing I can do.”
“You’re awkward,” says Harry, the Lockhart forced the legs to the ear ear.
“We think we know where it is. It’s what’s inside it. going to."
They took Lockhart out of his office and went down the stairs,
On the central street where they flash the message on the wall, at the entrance
of Myrtle's smiling face.
Send Lukhart first. Harry explained that he was
He's shaking.
Myrtle smiled sitting on the tank top of the end pool.
“Ah, it’s you,” said Harry. “Do you want this
time?"
“To ask you how you died,” Harry said.
Myrtle's entire aspect changed at once. It looks like it has
Never had such a stupid question been asked.
“Ooooh, that’s awful,” she exclaimed. “It happened to 2016.
here. I'm so dead. I remember him well. I'm hiding it because
Olif Hornby tells us about my robbery. The door was locked, and
ⵜⵜⵔⵓⵖ, ⵙⵙⵉⵏ ⴰⴽⵉⵏ ⵙⵍⵉⵖ ⵉ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⴽⵛⴻⵎⴷ. They said something
funny. ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⵓⵜⵍⴰⵢⵜ ⵢⴰⴹⵏ, ⵖⴰⵍⵖ ⵉⵙ ⵉⵅⵚⵚⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵉⵍⵉ. Anyway, what
ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜⵜ ⵢⴻⵡⵡⴻⴹⵉⵢⵉⴷ ⴷ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴷ ⴰⵇⵛⵉⵛ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⴻⵙⵍⴰⵢⴻⵏ. ⵉⵀⵉ ⵍⴷⵉⵖ ⵜⴰⵡⵡⵓⵔⵜ, ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⴷⵉⵏⵉⵖ
ⴰⴷ ⵉⵔⵓⵃ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵇⴷⴻⵛ ⵍⵃⴻⴱⵙⵉⵙ, ⵙⵢⵉⵏ —” Myrtle ⵜⴻⵙⵙⵓⴼⴻⵖⴷ ⵙ ⵡⴰⵣⴰⵍⵉⵙ, .
His face burns. “I’m dead.”
"how?" Harry said.
“No idea,” Myrtle said softly. “I just remember seeing two
ⵏ ⵓⵎⵇⵇⴰⵇ, ⴰⵎⵇⵇⵔⴰⵏ, ⴰⵡⵔⴰⵖ. My whole body took it and then I was
ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴼⴻⴳⴳⵉⴹ. . . .” She looked at Harry dreamily. “Later, I came back
again. I was determined to stop Olive Hornby, you see. Oh, sad.
She laughed at my screen once.”
“Where exactly do you see those eyes?” Harry said.
“ⴰⵏⴷⴰⵏⵏⵉⴹⴻⵏ ⴷⵉⵏⵏⴰ,” ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ Myrtle, ⵜⴻⵙⵎⴻⴽⵜⴰⴷ ⵙ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵥⵔⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵙ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⴱⴻⵔⵜ ⴷⴻⴳ 1990.
in front of his couch.
Harry and Ron quickly made it to him. Lockhart was standing well back, a
A look of complete terror on his face.
It looked like an ordinary hotel. They explored every inch of it, inside
ⴰⴽⴽⴻⴷ ⴱⴻⵔⵔⴰ, ⴳⴰⵔⴰⵙⴻⵏ ⵉⵥⴻⴹⵡⴰⵏ ⵏ ⴷⴷⴰⵡ. And then Harry saw it: It was missing
The side of one of the copper pillars was a small snake.
“ⵜⴰⵥⴻⴳⵡⴰⵏⵏⵉ ⵓⵔ ⵜⴻⵅⴷⵉⵎ ⴰⵔⴰ”, ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ Myrtle ⵙ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜⵉⵙ ⵎⵉ ⵢⴻⵄⵔⴻⴹ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜⵉⴷⵢⴻⵣⵣⵉ.
“ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ,” ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Ron. “Say something. Something in Parseltongue.”
“But —” Harry insisted. The only time it will happen is
ⵙⵙⴰⵡⵍⴻⵏ Parseltongue ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⴰⵙⵎⵉ ⴰⵢ ⵜⵉⴷⵉⵇⴰⴱⴻⵍ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵣⵔⴻⵎ ⵏ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ. flat
Deep in the small pocket, trying to insist it was real.
“Open up,” he said.
He looked at Ron, who shook his head.
ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ: “Tanglizit.”
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵉⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍⴷ ⵖⴻⵔ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵓⵣⵔⴻⵎⵏⵏⵉ, ⵢⴻⵇⴱⴻⵍ ⵉⵎⴰⵏⵉⵙ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴰⵎⴻⵏ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⵢⴻⴷⴷⴻⵔ.
ⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵏⵇⴻⵙ ⴰⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢⵉⵙ, ⵜⴰⴼⴰⵜ ⵏ ⵍⵇⴻⵏⴷ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⴳⴻⵏⵉⵜ ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ ⴷ
looking.
“Open up,” he said.
Though the words weren’t what he heard; There is a strange feeling
He dodged it, and suddenly the flag lit up with a bright white light and
ⵢⴻⴱⴷⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ. The next second, the breath starts moving; The dust, in fact, sank,
ⵙⵔⵉⴷ ⵙⴷⴰⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ, ⵢⴻⴵⴵⴰ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵥⵔⵓ ⴰⵎⴻⵇⵇⵔⴰⵏ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵙⴼⴻⴹ, ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵥⵔⵓ ⵙ ⵡⴰⵣⴰⵍⵉⵙ ⵉ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ
ⴰⵔⴳⴰⵣ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵙⵍⵉⴹ ⴷⴻⴳⵙ.
Harry heard Ron chuckle, and smiled again. ⵢⴻⵟⵟⴻⴼ ⵕⵕⴰⵢⵉⵙ.
What was he going to do.
ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ: “Ad ⴷⴷⵓⵖ ⴷⵉⵏⵏⴰ.”
He couldn't go, not now they'd found the door to
ⵛⵀⴰⵎⴱⴻⵔ, ⵎⴰⵞⵞⵉ ⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵍⵃⴰⵍ ⴷ ⴰⵎⴻⵥⵢⴰⵏ ⴰⴽⴽ, ⴷ ⴰⵥⵉⴹⴰⵏ, ⴷ ⴰⵃⴻⵔⴼⵉ ⴰⴽⴽ
ⴳⵉⵏⵏⵢ ⵜⴻⵣⵎⴻⵔ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵉⵍⵉ ⵜⴻⴷⴷⵔⴻⵎ.
“Me too,” Ron said.
There was a pause.
"Well, you don't seem to need me," Lockhart said, with a shadow of
His old laugh. “ⴰⴷ ⵅⴻⴷⵎⴻⵖ ⴽⴰⵏ —”
ⵢⴻⵔⵔⴰ ⴰⴼⵓⵙⵉⵙ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⵏ ⵜⴻⵡⵡⵓⵔⵜ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ Ron ⴷ Harry ⵙⵙⴻⴽⵏⴻⵏⴷ ⵙⵉⵏⵏⵙⴻⵏ .
Potatoes included.
“You can go first,” Ron whispered.
White-faced and wearing no coat, Lockhart approached the opening.
“Boys,” he said, his voice weak. “Guys, what good does it do?”
Harry poked him in the back with his fist. Lockhart put his feet into the
ⴰⵥⵔⵓⵏⵏⵉ.
“I really don’t think —” he started to say, but Ron gave him a shake, and .
He disappeared from sight. Harry followed quickly. He shook himself slowly.
in the drive, and then unplug it.
It was like falling precipitously into an endless, dark, gray slide. He could see.
More Ibibs are divided in all directions, but there are no paths like theirs,
who looks and looks, looks determinedly down, and knows that he
He was falling under school more and even in prison. After
He could hear Ron, shuffling the courses a little.
And then, as he began to realize what would happen when
He dropped deep, moved the pipe, and shot from the end with a
The blessings, has fallen in the thumbs of a heavy metal ship to
Stand in. Lockhart was rising to his feet a little ways away, wrapped in .
The slime is ghostly white. Harry stood to the side as Ron limped out of the
Stone, too.
“We’re going to be kilometers under the school,” Harry, with Suitis which is in 1990.
The black hole.
“On the lake, oh,” said Run, stepping along the boundary,
The ships Slimie.
The three of them turned to stare into the darkness before them.
"knife!" Harry stood on his hand twisting and turning. “Combine,” he said
to Ron and Lockhart, and off they went, their feet tapping loudly on the
the judge.
The vessel was a vessel that they weren’t thought to even a little bit of things in front of them.
Their insights into these vessels appearing to be slices in the field.
“Remember,” Harry whispered as they walked cautiously forward,
« ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴰⵜⴰⵔⵜ ⵏ ⵓⵎⵓⵙⵙⵓ, ⵇⴻⵢⵢⴻⵎ-ⴷ ⵜⵉⵟⵟⴰⵡⵉⵏ-ⵏⵏⴻⴽ ⵣⵉⴽ. . . .”
But the painting sounds like a grave, and the first sound is not heard.
They heard that it was a hard crew when Ron left what he was out that he was one
The flesh of a lizard. Harry reduced his hand to see on the ground and he saw that he was
They are associated with the small bones of animals. I'm so excited I can't think of anything
Seeing that Ginny had found him, Harry led the way forward,
ahead of a moderate pressure in climate.
“Harry — there are some things up there —” said Ron in a pleasant manner, grabbing
Harry's back.
They blame, seeing. Harry can only see the text of anything.
It is large and curved, lying directly over the bridge. It’s not going to move.
“It’s probably cold,” he shifted, spinning around the other two.
Lukhart’s hands are standing on his eyes. Harry joined the
Thing is, his heart is beating faster and faster.
Little by little, his eyes returned and he ran to see them,
Harry stepped forward, holding his hand up.
Light ran across a giant snake’s skin, of a living, poisonous flower.
The rental depends on the surface of the field. The published animal
It must have been twenty feet tall at least.
“Blimey,” Ron by Honor said.
There was a movement in arrival behind them. The plants of Gildruy Lukhart
He gave the way.
“Do it,” Ron said honestly, pointing his finger at Lukhart.
Luckhart came to his feet — then joined Ruhn, bringing it to 100 years.
soil.
Harry went on, but for many years — Lockhart kept going back and forth,
With a sigh, Ron's wand in hand and a glowing smile was back on his face.
“The ring ended up, Arcs!” he said. “I shalle take a biti of that skin
Go back to school, tell them I was too late to save the girl, and you
They both left your way in the destruction of his old body — I say
Goodbye to your memory!”
Run's gathers Sbilotabid on its head and returns by itself,
“Aberry”
The hand exploded with the power of a small bomb. Harry put down his
His arms over his head and he ran, treading on the snakeskin scales, from
The path of large pieces of tuna meat covered with earth.
The next moment, he was standing alone, walking through a selective line of terrorism .
rock.
“Run!” he shouted. “Are you ready? Run!”
"I'm here!" came Unmistakable Rune Rune from behind the rock. "am
Heya — it didn't happen, though — he was delayed by the car —.”
There was a doll thud and a loud “wow!” He seems to have Run
He just grabbed Lockhart by the shoulders.
“And what’s still?” Ron's voice said, quietly. “We cannot get
S — will take ages. . . .”
Harry looked at the computer display. He seemed very suspicious of her.
He never tried to break anything as big as these rocks with
magic, and now doesn’t seem like the best moment to try — what if all
Tunnel out of it?
There were other moments and another novel “Aha!” from behind the rocks. they
They were wasting time. Ginny was already in the Chamber of Secrets for
hours. . . . Harry knew there was only one thing he could do.
“Wait there,” he called to the run. “Wail is Lukeharth. I'll go on. . . . whether
I won’t be back in an hour. . .”
There was a very early pause.
“I’ll try to replace some of this rock,” Ron said, seemingly trying .
To keep his voice crisp. “With that, you can — you can wrestle. And, Harry
—”
“I’ll see you in a bit,” Harry said, trying to inject some confidence into his body .
A shaky voice.
The sensitivity was left on the massiveness of a large vegetable.
Soon, the distant sounds of Ron struggling to replace the strings faded away. the
It becomes the neck and smooth. All rights in Harry's body are reserved.
It’s not a step up. He wants the ship to end, but he's afraid of what he'll find
When working. And then, finally, as he rounded another bend, he saw
A solid wall in front of them from which two bound snakes were removed, their eyes
They are written in big, simple descriptions.
Harry approaches, it’s very sensitive. There is nothing to do
These stone pieces were real; Their eyes are wide open.
He can figure out what he needs to do. He cleared his throat, an emerald
Alls such as you face.
“Open,” Harry said, in a rare case, being used.
The snakes separated as the wall opened, the halves sliding gently
He doesn't, and Harry, shaking from head to foot, goes inside.
h
Chapter Seventeen
AMWARAS of SLITERIN
E was standing at the end of a very long, dimly lit room.
High rock ledges paired with more carved rights added to the
It helps a wind that comes out of the sky, brings long, black rivers through the
The symbol, the green green that eats in place.
His heart beating fast, Harry stood listening to the deafening silence.
Could it be that the basilisk is lurking in an upper circle, behind a pillar? and
Where is Ginny?
He drew his wand and stepped among the snake.
Ships. Every leg of legs is smoothly on Shadow's walls. he
He kept his eyes closed, ready to close them with a small
pattern. The hollow eye sockets of the stone snakes seemed to be
They followed him. More than once, with a jolt of the stomach, he thought he
He saw a disturbance.
After that, when he led the level with the last meat of the squares, the highest production as in
The chamber itself is visible in view, standing against the back wall.
Harry had to raise his eyebrows to see in the big face above: it was
Old-fashioned and bunky, with a long neck, looking closer to
Behind the rock formations of the volcano of Ufrisd, where two large
Floors stood on the Chamber floor smooth. and between the legs, face down,
Place a small figure with a black figure with red wings.
“Ginny!” Harry sighed, leaning back and running over his hands.
“Ginny — don’t die — please don’t die —” He lowered his wand .
Aside, he took on the legs of Ginny, and he turned to the corner. His face is as well as.
Like marble, it's cold, but her eyes are changing, so she's not beautiful.
But afterwards there must be —
“Ginny, please wake up,” Harry growled, shaking her.
Ginny's head swung hopelessly from side to side.
"She's not going away anymore," one positive reading said.
Harry got up and leaned back on his hands.
Long child, he shines and smoked and frustrated and smooth, watching.
He's a terrorist who spreads the word, like Harry sees
He has a bad boat. But it was not a failure —
“Tom — Tom Riddle?”
Reddle was riddled by the Quréer, not to remove his own from Harry’s face.
"Did you say you wouldn't leave?" Harry said with the Lare. “It’s not
— It's not —?”
"She's still alive," Riddle said. “But only just.”
Harry stared at him. Tom Riddle has been at Hogwarts for fifty years.
But it stands, a bad light, and it is out, and not a previous day
out of sixteen.
“Are you guys?” Harry said unequivocally.
“One idea,” Riddle said quietly. "It's kept in an edition for 50 years."
He conveyed to the long flights in the great flights in the big foot. opens Liring
There's a little black book Harry in Moning Myrtle.
shower. For a second, Harry asked how she went there — but there.
They're more than enough to make us make a mess.
“I have to help you, Tom,” Harry said, and he was looking for the head of Ginny again.
“We need to fix her here. There is a basilisk . . . I don't like
Where, but it may be for a while. . . . Please help me —”
Riddle didn't move. Harry, sweating, managed to lift Ginny up with his half
Earth, and begin to take his hand again.
But his baggage had gone.
“Did you see — ?”
He looked down. Riddle is still watching — holding Harry's hand
between his long arms.
“Thanks,” Harry said, wrapping an arm around her.
A picture adorns the corners of Riddle's mouth. He continued to look at the
Harry, shaking his hand.
“Listen,” Harry said honestly, his hands interacting with Guinea’s dimples.
weight. “We have to go! If taxes come —”
“It’s not until it’s going to be sick,” said Riddell freely.
Harry threw Ginny back to the ground, he couldn't hold her anymore
anymore.
“What do you mean?” he said. “Look, give me my wand, I might need it
—”
Riddle's laughter spread.
“You don’t need to,” he said.
Harry stared at him.
“What do you mean, I wasn’t — ?”
"I've been waiting a long time for this, Harry Potter," Riddle said. “For the
Time to see you. To call you.”
“Look,” Harry said, trying to stop, “I don’t think you did. we were at
The Siric Committee. We can call later —.”
"Let's talk now," Riddle said, still looking great, and he
He held out a hand to Harry.
Harry stared at him. There’s something very interesting going on here. . . .
“How come Ginny is like that?” he asked quickly.
“Wow, that’s a fun question,” Riddle said honestly. “It’s all
Long story. I think the real reason for Ginny Wesley like this is because
She opened her heart and poured out all her secrets to an invisible stranger.”
“What are you talking about?” Harry said.
“Right,” Riddle said. “My diary. Little Genie is writing to her.
For months and months, she would tell me all her worrisome worries and problems — how she
The brothers make fun of her, how she has to come to school wearing second hand clothes
And books, how.” — Reddle's Wilders dance — “How you don’t think .
Well, Harry Potter plays her. . . .”
All of the times it’s talking, Reddle Alls aren’t left out of Harry’s face. was
One is almost hundred of them.
"It's so annoying, you have to listen to the little problems of an eleven-year-old girl," he continued. “But I came in as an invitee. I wrote back. I was
Naturally, I was kind. Ginny just hugged me. One never understands
I’m like you, Tom. . . . I'm so glad I have this diary to compete with. . . is
It’s like having a friend I can carry in my pocket. . . .”
Riddle laughed, a high, cold laugh that didn't belong to him. Made shoes
He stood over Harry's shoulder.
“If I’m saying it by myself, Harry, I can always call people who .
Missing. That's what Ginny told him about his mood, and his soul became
Exactly what I wanted. . . . I grew up with grandparents on a set of his team.
Deepest fears, his darkest secrets. Much bigger, stronger than
Little Miss Wisley. It is very common to buy Miss Wisly some
of Poland, to start with a bit of spirit . . .”
“What did she say?” Harry said, his mouth very dry.
“Don’t really stop, Ari Puter?” Riddle said simply. “Generary
Weasley opened the Case Room. She strangled the school dogs.
It’s a sense of messages based on the ships. She set the snake of
Slytherin on the four of Mudblood, and the cat of Skip.”
“No,” Harry feels.
“Okay,” Riddle said neutrally. “Obviously, she didn’t know what she was .
It worked at first. He was very interesting. I mean you look at it new .
Diadi entries . . . Far more frequently, they became. . . . Hi,” he
Reading, I see Harry's face, “I think I’m glad to me.
There are chicken feathers on my clothes, I don’t know how they got there.
there. Hi, I can't remember what I did on Halloween night,
But a cat killed and had all less than half of me. good afternoon,
Pearsi tells me that I was a monster and I’m not myself. I think it’s hard
we. . . . There was another attack today and I don't know where I am. Tom,
What shall I do? I think I'll get in. . . . He thought I was the one
Everyone’s fighting, Tom!”
Harry's arms were stopped, and the flavors were gathered inside his arms.
“It takes Little Jenny a lot of time for Jenny to get her used to it .
classes,” Riddle said. “But, in the end, she was respectful and tried to make him
Take it out. This is where you come in, Harry. You found her, and I
It couldn't have been easier. Of all the people who could have
You took it out, you were a very nice person when I met you. . . .”
“And whiy did you cant to mete me?” Harry said. Anger is receding.
by him, and it’s an attempt to keep his voice crisp.
“Wow, you see, Ginny told me all about you, Harry,” Riddle said. "your
History is all right.” His eyes are fixed on the rain on
Harry's voice, and their expression grew sad. “I knew I had to find
I’ve been snapped more about you, and I’ll talk about, and I’ll meet if I can. So I decided to show
You my chief guardian of this great court, Hagrid, to gain your confidence — ».
"Hagrid's my friend," Harry said, his voice now shaking. "and you
Screw it, don't you? I thought you made a mistake, but —.”
Riddle laughs and laughs again.
“It’s my word against Hagrid, Harry. Well, you can imagine how
Ardondo sees old Dibt. On the one hand, Tom Riddle, poor but
Brellant, he’s not parents but a guard, a school manager, is a young student . . . in
Another hand, great, affects Hagrid, in the problems each other, is trying to
The pit was under his bed, which he measured at the end of the pit.
wrestle thols . . . But I agree, even though I wonder what the plan is
worked. I think someone needs to understand that Hagrid can’t be
He was a Slytherin henchman. It took me a whole five years to see
All I can about the secret room and finding the secret
entrance . . . As if Hagrid had brains, or power!
“Only the Transfiguration Master, Dumbledore, seems to think Hagrid
He is not a speaker. Debit is forced to protect Hagrid and train him as
Fan of the game. Yes, I thought Dumbledore might think so. . . .
Dumbledore didn't like me like the other teachers.
did. . . .”
"I bet Dumbledore smiles at you," Harry said, smiling to himself.
“Well, he was certainly incredibly protective of me after Hagrid .
He’s being released,” Riddle said quietly. “I knew it wouldn’t be safe to open
Patience again when I'm still in school. But I wasn't leaving.
I spent those long years researching this. I decided to leave behind a
Diary, I kept my sixteen-year-old self in its pages, so that one day,
Luckily, I’ll be able to send another one on my way, and finish
The role of the slide is slide.”
"Well, you didn't," Harry said triumphantly. “Nobody died.
This time, neither did the cat. In a few hours there will be a mandrake project .
Hey and everything that was Petripeev, it will all be right — ».
“Haggai I didn’t tell you already,” Riddle said freely, “she committed murder
Doesn't Modblood allow anything else? Several months ago, my new
The cry does — you.”
Harry stared at him.
“Imagine what I’m going through when I visit next time, this
It’s Ginny writing to me, not you. She sees you through the diary.
and ye see, and ye open. If you want to do it, it's me.
Did she promise you all her secrets? What if, even better, I told you who was
Do you like dogs? Hence, the naughty little boy waited until your bedroom.
He had been misled and stolen back. But I knew what I had to do. It was obvious to
me that you were on the trail of Slytherin's heir. Of all things Ginny
You told me about yourself, I knew you would do your best to solve
secrets — especially if one of your best friends gets shot. and
Ginny told me that the whole school was noisy because you could talk.
Parcel language. . . .
“So I made Ginny write her own jump on the wall, come down
Here we wait. She struggled and cried and became very upset. But there
There wasn't much life left in her. . . . She puts a lot in the diary, in me.
Enough to let me leave its pages at last. . . . I have been waiting for you to
They’ve been visible since we got here. I knew you would come. I have a lot of questions.
For you, Harry Potter.”
“Like what?” Harry let out, fingers still intertwined.
“Well,” Riddle said, smiling widely, “how about you — you’re a fool .
A kid with no extraordinary magical talent — manages to beat the biggest
A regular wizard? How did you run away with nothing but a coat, when
Lord Voldemort’s powers have been destroyed?”
There was an odd red gleam in his hungry eyes now.
“Why do you care how I ran?” Harry said quietly. “There’s Voldemort
After your time. . . .”
"Voldemort," Riddle said quietly, "it's the past, it's the present, it's the future, Harry ."
plate. . . .”
He pulled Harry's hand out of his pocket and began to trail him with
the air, wariting that shimmering words:
TUM MARVUL TAWESSA
Two, a time for once, and his name records were invited
themselves:
I’m SID Fuldimurt
“Do you?” Iwessus. “It’s a name I already used in 1990.
Hogwarts, to my most intimate friends only, of course. singer as
Will you use my filthy Muggle father’s name forever? Me, in my roots
runs the blood of Salazar Slayerin himself, through my mother's side? I,
The name of a Muggle Auspelli, ambassador, came even before
I Love, since only he found a woman? No, Harry - I
I made myself a new name, a name I knew everywhere.
A day you would say, when I became the biggest demonstrating in the
world!"
Harry's brain seemed to have jammed. Riddle is simultaneously simulated, in
The child we don’t have parents who were dissolved to kill Harry’s parents with their mothers, so all
Many more. . . . The finals forced himself to die.
“You’re not,” he said, his silly voice was filled with slavery.
“Not what?” » ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Ridl.
“He’s not the greatest wizard in the world,” Harry said, matter-of-factly.
“Sorry to disappoint you and all that, but the greatest wizard in the world
and Albus Dumbdur. Everyone said that. Even when you were strong, you
He couldn't help but take his place at Hogwarts. Dumbdur sees
When she was in school and still go back now, wherever you
He hid the days- Agie —”
The prayer came from the Reddle's face, to trace a very sick woman
look.
“Dumbledore was guaranteed from the 1990s ceramics.
We are!" he sighed.
“It’s not that for realism!” Harry is becoming. ⴰⵔ ⵉⵙⴰⵡⴰⵍ
Contrary, he wants to prepare Riddle, he loves not to make it
true -
ⵔⵉⴷⴷⵍⴻ ⵢⴻⵍⴷⵉ ⴰⵇⴻⵎⵎⵓⵛⵉⵙ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵢⴻⴼⵔⴻⵙ.
Music is coming from elsewhere. Reddle was cleaned to see.
Under the room’s room. Music is growing in a quick way. It was amazing,
ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜⵏⵏⵉ, ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷ ⵍⵇⴰⵄⴰ; He undefeated the head of Haarry and worked for Winnis
The heart feels like a couple of times of the alphabet. Then, like
The music reached such a pitch that Harry felt the inside of his lungs vibrate,
a fire broke out at the top of the nearest rig.
A grain of Cremson’s bird in the size of a bird, and he turns out his bad music
to the vaulted celing. It has a golden gold is accompanied by the sky is 1000 such as to the smallest.
And they meet gold melts, which contains a brilliant slots.
Secondly, the grass was straight to Harry. He left
The funny thing was, he was getting to his feet and then landed well on .
shoulder. When his greatest snakes came out, he watched Harry and watched by a
And of the gold messengers and silver and upon the ears of the ear.
The berd stupped singing. She stayed and sat down next to Harry's face,
She was responsible for Riddle.
“That’s a phosphate. . . .” Riddle said, and he’s accomplished by knowledge.
“Fox?” And Haruroes were smote, and sighted in the golds of the Iran’s tenth.
His hand is right.
“That’s — ” Riddle said, now thinking of what Fakes was
It turned out, “This is the old school sorting hat —”
So it was. Polished, stained, and worn, the hat lay motionless in Harry's
feet.
Riddle began to laugh again. He laughed a lot and was called Asamir
Rang with him, like ten Ed Riddles laughing at once —
“This is what Dumbledore sends his defender! The ancient songbird
cup! She felt like you have a courage, A Hari Puter? You carefully carefully?”
Harry didn't answer. It may not see what uses Fake or Sorting.
Here’s no alone, Reddle is trying to stop
He laughed with his growing courage.
"For work, Harry," Riddle said, still meets frequently. “Both — g
Your past, in my future — we met. And twice I failed to kill you. how
Are you alive? Tell me everything. The longer you talk,” he added softly,
“She’ll keep you alive.”
Harry was thinking fast, he was confident in his abilities. Riddle has the right. he,
Harry, he has a faux and sorting hat, isn't going to be one of them much
good in a duel. It looks bad, all right now. . . But Long Riddle stood
There, the more life drains from Ginny . . . And at that time,
Harry suddenly noticed Riddle's figure was more, more pronounced
solid. . . . If it's going to be a fight between him and Riddle, he'd rather have some time than
later.
"Nobody knows why you lose your rights when you get hit," he said.
Harry snapped. “I don’t know myself. But I see why you can’t kill
we. Because my mother tried to save me. My common Muggle-born
My mother,” he hurts with the guilt. “She stopped you from killing .
we. And I did see you, I saw you last year. You're a wreck. you
barely alive. That is why all the health. You're in hiding. you
Ugly, you’re a monster —”
Riddle's face lit up. After that, he kept it in a large room.
"Okay. Your mother died to save you. Yes, that's a strong consolation. I can see now. . . . It's nothing to do with you, after all. I
He asks, you see. Because there are some pronouns between me, Harry
plate. You, too, may have noticed. Half-bloods, they cannot, are transfused with
Muggles. Probably the only two Parselmouths that have come to Hogwarts since
The Great Slytherin himself. We only see something like him. . . . But after
Everyone, it wasn't just a happy you that saved you from me. That's all
He wants to know.”
Harry stood there, waiting, waiting for Riddle to take his hand. But Riddle’s
The cold strikes again.
“Well, A Hari, I’ll have a smaller lesson. Let's match the
Rights of Lord Fuldemor, heir of Salazar Slytherin, against the known
Harry Potter, and the best weapons Dumbledore could give him. . . .”
He glanced angrily at Fawkes and the Sorting Hat, then walked away .
away. Harry, fear trembling his limp limbs, watched Riddle stop
Between the high networks and are simultaneously in the face of the Slitherin, Layne .
Above it in half of the body. Riddle opened his mouth and his
'But Harry understood what he meant. . . .
“Let him call him, Slytherin, eldest of the Hogwarts Four.”
Harry goes to see the squirrel, Fox stares at him.
shoulder.
The big stone Slytherin's face was smiling. He shot, Harry saw his
the opening of the mouth, often enough, to make a big black hole.
And something was stirring inside the statue’s mouth. Something is
He bursts out of his couch.
Harry started walking back and forth towards the wall of the Western Chamber, and when he stood
His eyes widen as Fuchs moves his hand as he touches it.
Harry wanted to speak, "I'm not leaving!" But what about the timeframe in which Phoenix
Are they against the Snake King?
Something large landed on the stone floor of the Hall. Harry felt it shudder.
— he knew what was going on, he could feel it, he could almost see
The giant snake wrenches itself from the Slytherin's mouth. Then he hears
Riddle's whispering voice:
“Kill him.”
The basilisk walks towards Harry; He can feel his body heaving.
Slithering vigorously across the dusty ground. Still eyes tightly closed, Harry
He started running blindly to the side, arms outstretched, feeling his way—
Voldemort was laughing —
Harry tripped. He fell hard on the rock and bled—and .
The snake was feet away, and he could hear it coming —
There was a loud, booming sound above him, then
Something very heavy Harry turns and turns towards the wall.
Waiting for his jaws to fall into his palm, he heard more ghostly roars,
Something bouncing heavily from the graves —
He couldn’t stop—he opened his eyes wide to see what .
On ittili.
The large, bright green, poisonous snake was as thick as a bamboo trunk.
He lifted himself high into the air and his big brown cock was shining.
With salt between the pillars. As Harry shivers, he prepares to close his eyes
If he turned, he saw what had distracted the snake.
Fawkes was flying overhead, and the basilisk was grinning
furiously at him with fangs long and thin as sabers —
Fawkes dived. His long gold comes out of the picture at once.
The dark heat of blood stained the ground. The serpent's voice was heard,
quickly missing Harry, and before Harry could close his eyes, she looked around —
Harry looked straight at her face and saw that her eyes, both huge,
bulbous yellow eyes, had been punctured by the phoenix; There was blood.
They collapsed to the ground, and the snake was writhing in agony.
"No!" Harry heard Riddle screaming. “LEAVE THE BIRD! leave
BE ANGRY! THE STATEMENT WAS DEFERRED! YOU CAN STILL DRINK!
KILL IT!”
The blind snake hesitates, contorted, still dying. Fawkes was spinning.
His head, laying down his title of Erri, laid here and there in his last field as
Blood gushed from his dirty eyes.
“Help me, help me,” Harry muttered wildly, “someone — anyone —”
The snake's tail whipped across the floor again. Harry growled.
Something dark landed on his face.
The Basilisk thrust the Sorting Goblet into Harry's hands. He took Harry
it. It was all he had left, his only chance—he put it on his head and .
He laid himself on the ground as she made a statue of Basilis.
again.
Help me—help me—Harry thought, his eyes shutting tight under the
The council. Please help —
There was no answering voice. Instead, the shirt shrunk, as if
An invisible hand was squeezing him too hard.
Something very heavy landed on the top of Harry's head,
It’s almost overwhelming. Stars moved in front of his eyes, he took
the top of the shirt to pull it up and she felt something long and hard underneath.
A glittering silver sword appeared inside the cloth, his hand
They sparkled with white-sized rubies.
“KILL THE BOY! LEAVE THE BIRD! THE BOY BEHIND YOU!
SNIFF — LOVE IT!”
Harry was on his feet, ready. The duck’s head was sinking, its body
She moved, hitting pillars as she turned to face him. He could see the
vast, bloody eye sockets, see the mouth stretching wide, wide enough to
Fully swathed, with hair as long as his sword, thin, glistening,
venomous —
Of course — Harry got to take the wall of Chamber. It lunged
Another time, and his forked tongue touched Harry's side. He put down the sword.
His hands both —
The basilisk raged again, and this time its aim was real — Harry threw
His full attention behind the sword and threw him back up towards the top of the
The mouth of the serbnt —
But when Harry's hands are warm blood, it feels like a ghost is coming back.
above his elbow. A long, poisonous snake was sinking deeper and deeper.
In his hand he feels that the basilisk is a sword on its side and falls,
They crumble, to the ground.
Harry slid down the stairs. He grabbed the ring that was channeling poison.
With his body he takes it out of his hand. But he also knew
late. White burning sweat was slowly and steadily spreading from the wound.
Even though he shaved his head and watched as his blood stained his clothes,
His opinion went hand in hand. The Chamber was dissolving in a whirl of dull color.
A black sheet swam away, and Harry heard a pair of blades
But he was there.
“Fawkes,” Harry said quietly. “You were fantastic, Fawkes. . . .” feels
This bird places its beautiful head in the place where the serpent's wing is
traditional.
He can move his feet and return a continental mark that is developed in front of
from him.
"You're dead, Harry Potter," Riddle's voice said above him. "dead.
Even Dumbledore's bird knew it. Did you see what he did, Potter?
cry."
Harry announced. Fawkes's head slid in and out of focus. Sweet, coral-like
Tears have reduced old eruptions.
“I will sit here and watch you die, Harry Potter. Take your time.
I’m not in a hurry.”
Harry felt sleepy. Everything that happens to him seems fleeting.
“So ends the famous Harry Potter,” said Riddle’s distant voice. "alone
In the committee of Sikrist, organized by his friends, who joined him until the end.
The Dark Lord he so inevitably urged. You will become your sweetheart
Mudblood mother soon, Harry. . . . She bought you twelve years of
Borrow time . . . But Mr. Voldemort got you in the end, as you know he
must. . . .”
If this was dying, Harry thought, it wasn't all that bad.
Even the pain was pushing him away. . . .
But is this dying? Instead of looking black and white, the Room was like
returning in context. Harry gave his head a little shake and was
Fawkes, still resting his head on Harry's arm. The Pearl Teardrop Box is available
They all sparkle around the wound—except there is no wound—
"Wake up, bird," Riddle's voice said suddenly. “Stay away from him — I’m .
He said, Get out —.”
Harry raised an eyebrow. Riddle was waving Harry's wallet at Fawkes;
There was a thud-like pause, and Fawkes flew back in a stream of
gold and red.
“Tearful Phoenix . . .” Riddle said quietly, staring at Harry's hand. "of
course . . . Healing skills . . . forget. . .”
He looked into Harry's face. “But it won’t make a difference. In fact, I
I preferred it that way. It’s just you and me, Harry Potter . . . You are me. . . .”
He put his hand together —
After that, in a row of heads, Fuchs was walking backwards towards his head and
Something fell into Harry's lap—a diary.
For a second he blinked, both Harry and Riddle, slowly slowly, looked at him.
After that, without thinking, without hesitation, as he intended it to do
All the while, Harry took Basil's branch on the floor next to him and
It plunges him right into the heart of the book.
There was a long, terrifying, piercing sound. You are out of the book.
When she left, she leaned against Harry's hands and rolled on the floor. Riddle is
Spelling and composition, letter and space and after it —
He's gone. Harry's body fell to the ground with a thud.
silence. Tragedy Apart from the relentless tragedy of rape, it has been 100 years since 2019.
diary. The cold of basilisk casts a bath hall too much into it.
Checking everything, Harry freed himself. His head was spinning like
Although it only goes for miles with flouder. Quickly, he collected
All and his hand is sorting hat, and, to a great extent, he turns and turns
Sword stream from the basilisk's arm hole.
Then a bright stone came from the end of the hall. Ginny was
Hope. As Harry hurried towards her, she sat up. His eyes are happy
He moved from the large form of the dead Basil, on Harry, in his open arms, following him to the diary in his hand. She Drew is great, shuddering
with a smile and tears started streaming down her face.
“Harry — oh, Harry — I tried to tell you in the morning, but I couldn’t .
I said it in front of Bircy — he and I, Harri — but I — I was writing I d-didn't
They say R-Riddle made me, he’s a cock fan for — and — the way it is
kill that — that thing? W-Where are the Riddles? The last thing I r-remember is
It comes out of the book —.”
“ⴰⴽⴽⵏⵉ ⴰⴽⴽ ⴷ ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⵍⵀⴰⵏ”, ⵉ ⴷ-ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ, ⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⴷⴷⴻⵙ ⴷⵉⴰ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⵓ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴽⴰⵏⴰⵢ-ⴷ ⴳⵉⵏⵉ ⵜⴰ.
ⵍⵃⴻⴱⵙ ⵏ ⵜⴼⴻⴽⴽⴰ, “Riddle ⵢⴻⴽⴼⴰ. look! ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ ⴷ ⵍⴱⴰⵟⴰⵟⴰ. Come on, Ginny,
ⴰⴷ ⵏⴻⴼⴼⴻⵖ ⵙⴻⴳ ⴷⴰ —.”
“ⴰⴷ ⴽ-ⵙⵙⴼⵍⵉⴷⵖ!” ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵉⵔⵉⵔ ⵊⵉⵏⵉ ⵍⵍⵉⴳ ⵜⵜ ⵉⵄⴰⵡⵏ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵙ ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⵖⴰⵔⴰⵙⵜ ⵓⵔ ⵉⵃⵍⵉⵏ
to her feet. 'I've been looking forward to coming to Hogwarts since the B-Bill .
He came and we wrote I would have to leave and — what would Mom and Dad say?”
ⴼⴰⵢⴽ ⴰⵔ ⵜⵏ ⵜⵜⵔⴰⵊⴰⵏ, ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜ ⵏⵏ ⵉⴽⴽⴰ ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜ ⵏⵏ ⵉⴽⴽⴰ ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜ ⵏⵏ ⵉⴽⴽⴰ ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜ ⵏⵏ ⵉⴽⴽⴰ. Harry
he pushed Ginny forward; ⴽⵛⵎⵏ ⵅⴼ ⵜⴽⵔⴽⴰⵙ ⵓⵔ ⵉⴳⵉⵏ ⵜⵉⵏ ⵓⵏⵍⵍⵉ ⵏ ⵉⵎⵜⵜⵉⵏ
Basilisk, through the entry plate, and back to the field. ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵢⴻⵙⵍⴰ
ⵜⵉⵡⵡⵓⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵓⵥⵔⵓ ⵜⵜⵇⵍⵇⵏⵜ ⴷⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⵏⵏⵙⵏⵜ ⵙ ⵢⴰⵏ ⵓⵏⴳⴰⵍ ⵉⴼⵓⵍⴽⵉⵏ.
ⴷⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⵏ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵓⵙⴷⵉⴷⵉⵏ ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⴷⴷⵓⵏ ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⵏⴼⴰⵍⵏ ⴳ ⵓⵏⵥⴰⵕ, ⵢⴰⵏ ⵓⵎⵙⵍⵉ ⵉⴱⵄⴷⵏ ⵏ
slowly shifting rock reached Harry’s ears.
“Run!” Harry exclaimed, running. “I's no! I have it!”
I heard Ron let out a strangled chuckle, and they took the next step towards the
ⵥⴻⵔ ⵓⴷⴻⵎⵉⵙ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⴰⵏ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵍⵃⴻⴱⵙ ⴰⵎⴻⵇⵇⵔⴰⵏ ⵉ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴰⵡⴹ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵢⴻⵅⴷⴻⵎ
in the stone.
“Ginny!” They put a hand on him with a stone rod to do it.
ⵙ ⵜⵎⴻⵣⵡⴰⵔⵓⵜ. “You’re alive! I don't believe it! what happened? how -
ⵎⴰ ⴷ — ⴰⵏⴷⴰ ⴰⵢ ⴷ-ⵢⴻⴽⴽⴰ ⵓⴳⴹⵉⴹ-ⵏⵏⵉ?”
ⴼⴰⵢⴽⵙ ⵉⴼⴼⵖ ⵙ ⵜⴱⵔⵉⴷⵜ ⴷⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⵏ ⵊⵉⵏⵏ.
“ⵉⴳⴰ ⴷⵓⵎⴱⵍⴷⵓⵔ”, ⵉⵏⵏⴰ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ, ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵙⴽⴰⵔ ⵉⵅⴼ ⵏⵏⵙ.
“How will he let you make a word?” Ron said, coming back to Unc.
The tool in Harry's hand.
“ⴰⴷ ⴷⵙⴼⴻⵀⵎⴻⵖ ⵎⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷⵏⴻⴼⴼⴻⵖ ⵙⴻⴳ ⴷⴰⴳⵉ,” ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Harry ⵙ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ ⵏ ⵢⵉⴷⵉⵙ .
ⵜⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍ ⵖⴻⵔ Ginny, ⵉ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵔⵓⵏ ⵙ ⵍⴵⴻⵀⴷ ⵓⴳⴰⵔ ⵏ ⵣⵉⴽ.
"but -"
“ⴷⴰⵢⵔ”, ⵉⵏⵏⴰ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⵉⵣⵉ ⵉⴷⵔⵓⵙⵏ. He didn't think it was a good idea to tell
Ron ⵎⴰⵣⴰⵍ ⵡⵉⵏ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵢⴻⵍⴷⵉ Taxxamt, ⵎⴰⵞⵞⵉ ⵣⴷⴰⵜ ⵏ Ginny, ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⴱⵖⵓ ⵢⵉⵍⵉ.
“ⴰⵏⵉⴷⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ Lukhart?”
“ⴷⵉⵏⵏⴰ ⵙⴷⴰⵜ,” ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Ron, ⵎⴰⵣⴰⵍⵉⵜ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⵙ ⵍⵅⵓⴼ ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⴻⵣⵣⵉⴱ ⴰⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢⵉⵙ ⵙ ⴰⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢⵉⵙ ⵙ ⴰⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢⵉⵙ .
tunnel compared to the controller. “It was in a bad way. Come and see.”
ⵙ ⵓⵙⵔⵙ ⵏ ⴼⵓⴽⵙ, ⵏⵏⴰ ⵎⵉ ⵜⵜⴼⴼⵖⵏ ⵉⴼⵔⵅⴰⵏ ⵏⵏⵙ ⵉⵅⴰⵜⴰⵔⵏ ⵢⴰⵏ ⵓⴳⵓⴷⵉ ⵏ ⵡⵓⵔⵖ ⵉⴼⵙⵙⵓⵙⵏ ⴳ
ⵜⴰⴵⴻⵙⵜ, ⴽⴻⵎⵎⵍⴻⵏ ⵎⴰⵔⵔⴰ ⴰⴱⵔⵉⴷ ⵖⴰⵔ ⵓⵖⴻⵥⴷⵉⵙ ⵏ ⵓⵇⴻⵎⵎⵓⵎ.
Gilderoy Lockhart ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎ ⴷⵉⵏ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⴻⵎⵎⵉⵍ ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵎⴰⵏⵉⵙ.
“His memory's gone,” said Ron. “The Memory Charm backfired. hit
him instead of us. ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵜⴰⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ ⴰⵏⵡⴰ ⵉ ⴷ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ, ⵏⴻⵖ ⴰⵏⵉⴷⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ, ⵏⴻⵖ ⴰⵏⵡⴰ ⵉ ⵏⴻⵍⵍⴰ
are. I told him to come and wait here. He's a danger to himself.”
Lockhart glared at them all.
"Hello," he said. “Odd sort of place, this, isn't it? ⵜⴻⵣⴷⴻⵖⴻⴹ ⴷⴰⴳⵉ?”
"Oh," Ron said, narrowing his eyes at Harry.
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵉⵇⴻⵔⵔⴻⴱ, ⵉⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⴱⴻⵔⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⴱⴻⵔⵜ ⵖⴻⵣⵣⵉⴼⴻⵏ, ⴷ ⴰⵥⵉⴹⴰⵏ.
“Think about how we can get back to that?” he said to
run.
ⵔⵓⵏ ⵉⵙⵙⵔⵇⴱ ⵉⵅⴼ ⵏⵏⵙ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⴼⵓⴽⵙ ⵉⴼⵓⵏⵉⴽⵙ ⵉⵣⵔⵉ ⵅⴼ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ
And now she appears before him, her feminine eyes shining in the darkness.
ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⴰⵣⵣⴰⵍ ⵅⴼ ⵉⴼⵜⴰⵙⵏ ⵏⵏⵙ ⵏ ⵡⵓⵔⵖ ⵉⵖⵣⵣⵉⴼⵏ. ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵉⵥⵕⴰ ⴱⵍⴰ ⵛⵛⴽ ⴳ
he.
“He looks like he wants you to grab hold . . .” ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ Run, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ
perplexed. “ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⴽⴻⵞⵞ ⵜⵥⵥⵉⴹ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵉⴷⵉⵊⴻⴱⴱⴻⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵖⴻⵔⵙⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⴷⵉⵏⵏⴰ —”
“Fuck,” Harry said, “is not a rare bird.” He turned quickly to the
others. « ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⴼⴽ ⴰⴷ ⵏⴻⵟⵟⴻⴼ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵡⴰⵢⴻⴹ. Ginny, grab Ron's hand.
Professor Lockhart —”
“She warned him,” Ron A often told Lokhart.
“You’re holding Ginny’s other hand —”
Harry walked in with a sword and sorting hat on his way, Ron took .
From the head of Harry's legs, Harry came to win.
Fawkes's lightning bolt stings.
An unusual light seemed to spread throughout his body.
And the next second, in a flurry of wings, they were flying upwards with
way. ⵉⵖⵢ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵙⵙⵏ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵍⵓⴽⵀⴰⵔⵜ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⴰⵣⵣⴰⵍ ⴷⴷⴰⵡ ⵏⵏⵙ, ⵉⵏⵏⴰ,
"ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵡⵀⴰⵎⴻⵏ! ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵡⵀⴰⵎⴻⵏ! ⵡⴰⴳⵉ ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ ⴷ ⵙⵃⵓⵔ ⴽⴰⵏ!” The cold air was deafening.
Through Harry, and before he stopped running, he was
Above — all four of them covered the top of the Moaning Myrtle pool .
The road, and when Lokhart brought him some of his lies, he made a friend who hid the road.
He was looking around instead.
Myrtle glared at them.
“You’re alive,” she whispered to Harry.
"There's not enough talking," he said suddenly, surprised.
ⵜⴼⴻⴽⴽⵉⵡⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵢⵉⴷⴰⵎⵎⴻⵏ ⴷ ⵍⵃⴻⵎⵍⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜⵉⵙ.
“ⴰ, ⵀⴻⵢⵢⴰ . . . ⴰⵔ ⴱⴰⵀⵔⴰ ⵙⵙⵡⵉⵏⴳⵉⵎⵖ . . . if you had died, you'd have been
I hope to share my skiing,” said Merttl, silver silver.
“Don’t!” ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ Run ⵎⵉ ⴷⴼⴼⵖⴻⵏ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵓⵅⵅⴰⵎ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵖⵔⴰ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵟⵟⵍⴰⵎ, ⴷ ⴰⵥⴻⴽⴽⴰ
ⴰⴱⵔⵉⴷ ⵏ ⴱⴻⵔⵔⴰ. “Harry! ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⵉⵖⵉⵍⵖ ⵎⴰⵙ ⴷ ⵎⵉⵔⵜⵍ ⵎⵇⵇⵓⵔⵏ ⵖⵓⵔⴽ! possess
competition, Ginny!”
But the tears were still streaming silently down Ginny's face.
“Where now?” Ron said, with a grave glance at Ginny. Harry pointed.
ⴼⵓⴽⵙ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⴰⵡⵙ ⴰⴱⵔⵉⴷ, ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵖⵓⵍ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵖⵓⵍ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵖⵓⵍ ⵅⴼ ⵜⴰⵖⵣⵉ ⵏ ⵓⴱⵔⵉⴷ. they
They write about it, and after a while, they find themselves outside the teacher.
McGonagall Correctional Facility.
Harry got up and pushed the door open.
F
Installation
DOBBY'S REWARD
Or was there ever a silence like Harry, Ron, Ginny, and Lockhart
He stood in the doorway, covered in dirt and grime and (in Harry's
condition) of blood. ⵙⵢⵉⵏ ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰⴷ ⵜⵎⴻⵖⵔⴰ.
“Ginny!”
It was Mrs. Weasley, who sat crying by the fire. she
She went to her feet, followed closely by Mr. Wissli, and the two of them snuggled.
ⵙ ⵉⵅⴼⴰⵡⵏ ⵏⵏⵙⵏ ⵅⴼ ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⴰⵔⴱⴰⵜ ⵏⵏⵙⵏ.
Harry, however, sees them past. ⴰⵙⴻⵍⵎⴰⴷ Dumbldur ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ
Standing by the table, beaming, next to Professor McGonagall, the
She was taking a big, persistent smile, clutching her chest. ⴼⵓⴽⵙ ⵢⴻⴷⴷⴰ
With a whisper past Harry's ear, he leaned on Dumbledore's shoulder, just as
Harry found himself and Ron wrapped in Mrs. Weasley's
agree.
“You guys saved her! You know her! How did you do it?”
"I think we all want to know that," Professor McGonagall said in disgust.
Ms. Wesley gets out Harry, who has been doing for a while, and goes
At the desk, he placed on it the Sorting Cup, the ruby-encrusted one
Sword, and what's left of Riddle's manual.
Then he started telling them everything. Almost four hours.
He spoke in silence: He told them about the grave.
voice, how Hermione had finally realized that he was hearing a basilisk in
The networks; ⴰⵎⴻⴽ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ ⴷ Run ⴹⴻⴼⵔⴻⵏ ⵜⵉⵙⵙⵉⵙⵉⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⴻⵥⴳⵉ, ⴷ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ
Aragog tells them where the last dragon victim died; how
He thought that Moining Myrtle was Angus, and that
There may be an involvement of the Security Committee in its field. . . .
“Very well,” Professor McGonagall prompted as he paused, “so you
found out where the entrance was — breaking a hundred school rules into
Pebbles in the street, I might add — but how on earth did you all get out .
of there live, butter?”
So Harry, his voice now growing hoarse from all this talking, told them
For Fawkes's timely arrival and for the Selection Cap that gave him
sword. But then he collapsed. He had so far avoided mentioning Riddle's
Diary — or Ginny. She was standing with her head against Mrs. Weasley's
back, and tears were still silently streaming down her cheeks. What if
Did they release it? Harry thought confused. The riddle replacement did not work .
anymore. . . . How can they prove that he is the one who did it.
all?
Instinctively, Harry looked at Dumbledore, who smiled faintly, the
The light of the audience reflects off its half-moon lights.
“What fits well,” Dumbledore said intently, “is that the Lord
Voldemort managed to charm Ginny, when my sources told me he was
they are now hidden in the forests of Albania.”
He was running — running, running, running, attacking Harry.
“W-what’s that?” said Mr. Weasley in a startled voice. “You knowWho?
Did you surprise Ginny? But Ginny is not . . . Ginny wasn’t . . . Has she?”
“This is the diary,” Harry said quietly, picking it up and showing it to .
Dumbledore. “Reddle wrote it when he was 16 years old. . . .”
Dumbledore turned from Harry looking pleased.
Often, a standard is made in its clean and neat pages.
“Brilliant,” he said quietly. “Of course, he was probably the worst .
A Hogwarts student hasn’t seen.” He turned to the Weasleys, who
They were all looking confused.
“Very few people know that Lord Voldemort was once called Tom .
sound. I taught it myself, fifty years ago, at Hogwarts. He fell.
After leaving school. . . He traveled far and wide . . . He fell deeply into
The dark arts, combined with the worst of our race, have thus passed
So many devastating, devastating thoughts, that when he came out back as
Lord Voldemort, barely recognizable. Rarely connected
Lord Voldemort and the smart, handsome, former head boy
here."
"But, Ginny," said Mrs. Weasley. “What does our Ginny have and —
S — him?”
“His diary!” cried Ginny. “I was writing in it, and he was
Writing later a whole year —”
“Ginny!” Mr. Weasley said, confused. “I didn’t teach you
anything? What have I always told you? Never trust anything that can
Think for himself if you can’t see where he’s keeping his mind. Why don’t you do
Show me a diary, or your mother? Such a suspicious thing, there was
Clearly full of dark magic—”
“I don’t know,” Ginny sighed. “I found it inside one of the books .
My mother caught me. I think someone just left it there and forgot
Therefore —”
“Miss Weasley should go to the hospital wing immediately,”
Dumbledore interrupted in a hushed voice. “This has been a huge challenge .
had. There will be no prison. Greater wizards than him
They have been cursed by Lord Voldemort.” He walked to the door and
He opened it. “Relaxing in bed and maybe a big cup of hot chocolate. I
You always find that refreshing,” he added, smiling kindly at her.
“You will find that Madam Pomfrey is still awake. It only gives
The Mandrakra oil — I believe that these are arrested by Bazilisk will benefit from some
moment."
“So Hermione is wrong!” Ron said cheerfully.
"There is no lasting harm, Ginny," Dumbledore said.
Mrs. Weasley pushed Ginny away, and Mr. Weasley followed, still smirking .
It is deeply entrenched.
“You know, Minerva,” Professor Dumbledore murmured to .
Headmaster McGonagall, “I think this all deserves a good party. I can ask
You going to paint the kitchens?”
“Of course,” Professor McGonagall said quietly, also facing the door.
“I’ll let you deal with Potter and the Weasleys, shall I?”
"Certainly," Dumbledore said.
She disappeared, and Harry and Ron stared in shock at Dumbledore. what
So he was hesitant to be a teacher McGonagall, this truth? Really —
Really — they weren’t about to be punished?
“I seem to remember telling you two that I had to kick you out if .
You broke some other school rule,” Dumbledore said.
Ron opened his mouth in shock.
“The future shows that the best of us must sometimes swallow our words,”
Dumbledor continued, smiling. “You will both receive special awards for
Services to the school and — let me see — yes, I see a couple of dots .
Everyone for Gryffindor.”
Roon is a music such as the Valentine's Lockhart of the Valentine and is related to .
Because again.
“But one of us seems to feel very self-conscious about his part in this
horrible stories,” Dumbledore added. “Why are you so generous, Gilderoy?”
Harry gave the beginning. He had completely forgotten about Lockhart. he
He looked around and saw that Lockhart was standing in a corner of the room, still
He wore his vague smile. When Dumbledore told him, Lukhart
He looks at his hand to see what he is talking about.
"Professor Dumbledore," Ron said quietly, "There was an accident downstairs .
In the committee of the students. Professor Luckhart —.”
“Am I a teacher?” Lockhart said with a smile. " fortune. I’m waiting.
I was hopeless, wasn’t I?”
"He tried to make one of Momori's roles a passing one," Run said.
he explained quietly to Dumbledore.
“My dear,” Dumbledore said, shaking his head, his long silver wand .
quivering. “Swords to your swords: Gildario!”
"sword?" said Luckhart well. “It doesn’t have a river. The boy has,
though." Harry pointed out. “I'll lend you one.”
“You’ll want to get a teacher Lukharth to the teacher, too?”
Dumbledore said to Ron. “I want a few more words with Harry. . . .”
Lukhart walked out. Ron took a happy look at Dumbledore and
Harry when he closed the door.
Dumbledore moved to one of the chairs by the fire.
“Sit down, Harry,” he said, and Harry sat up, feeling lost count .
nervous.
“First, Harry, I want to thank you,” Dumbledore said, eyes
It goes back and forth. “Maybe you’re sending me the real deal less than .
room. There are nothing but this can call you a fuck”.
He flicked the lamp, which had fallen on his lap. Harry
He blushed awkwardly when Dumbledore saw him.
“That’s why you met Tom Riddle,” Dumbledore said wisely. "I
I think he's very narcissistic. . . .”
Once upon a time, what was in Harry came out and from Harry came out of
his mouth.
“Headmaster Dumbledore . . . Riddle said that I was like him. strange
illustrations, he said. . . .”
“Is he, now?” Dumbledore said, looking at Harry curiously from
Under his dark silver gloves. “And what do you think, Harry?”
“I don’t think I’m like him!” Harry said, louder than he would have
intended. “They say, I — I was in Grif Indore, I am . . .”
But he hesitated, a pure doubt running through his mind.
“Professor,” he began again after a moment. “The Pirate Dog told me .
I’m going to — I’m going to do well in Slytherin. Everyone thought I belonged in Slytherin
Square some time . . because I can speak the language of Parsel. . . .”
"You may speak in Parsel's language, Harry," Dumbledore snapped, "because . . ."
Lord Voldemort — who is the last remaining hero of Salazar
Slytherin — Barcelona can speak. If I'm not mistaken, he
He transferred some of his own power to you the night he gave you that spell.
It's nothing to do with him, I know. . . .”
“Fildort positioned himself in me?” Harry said, grinning.
“Seems pretty obvious.”
“Therefore, I should be in Slytherin,” Harry said, when he frequently appeared in
The face of Dumbledore. “The Sorting Cup can see Slytherin potential in me, .
And it’s —”
"Put you in Gryffindor," Dumbledore snapped. “Listen to me, Harry.
You happened to have a number of qualities that Salazar Slytherin valued in his handpicked pupils. His own gift is very small, Parseltongue — knowledge .
— height — some legal restraint,” he added, his grin .
It grows again. “But the Sorting Cup puts you in Gryffindor. You know
Why is this. mind."
"She only put me in Gryffindor," Harry said in a defeated voice, "because . . ."
I asked not to go into Slytherin. . . .”
“Exactly,” Dumbledore said, beaming again. “Who left you
It’s very different from Tom Riddle. It’s our choice, Harry, that shows who we are
Certainly more than our capabilities”. Harry sat motionless in his chair,
exciting. “If you want proof, Harry, that you are in Gryffindor, I .
I suggest you look more closely at this.”
Dumbledore reached across to Professor McGonagall's desk and picked up the
The silver sword was covered in blood, and he handed it to Harry. Dully, Harry turned around.
Eat over, Robins Falls in fire light. And the two was called the name;
They are measured just below the navel.
Goodrick Griffin.
“Only a true Gryffindor could pull that off the top, Harry,”
Dumbledore said quietly.
To a tongue, they do not speak, nor does he speak. Then Dumbledore opened a
of the dishes on Professor McGonagall's desk and took out a pair of clothes and a
Ink bottles.
“What you need, Harry, is some food and sleep. I suggest you go.
to the party, while I write for Azkaban — we need our pirate back.
And I have to create a profile for the Daily Prophet too,” he added .
By thinking. “We will need new security against the dark arts .
teacher. . . . Sweetheart, it’s like we’re actually walking through them, aren’t we?”
Harry got up and headed for the door. It just came in handy,
However, when the door was opened so hard that it swung back .
The wall.
Lucius Malfoy stood there, fury in his face. and squirms afterwards
Footsteps, wrapped tightly in blankets, was Dobby.
"Good afternoon, Lucius," Dumbledore said cheerfully.
Mr. Malfoy nearly knocked Harry over when he spit into the room.
Dobby snuck in behind her and sat down at the edge of her blanket, a
a look of sheer terror on his face.
The elf was holding a torn cloth with which he was trying to
She continued cleaning Mr. Malfoy's fingers. Apparently, Mr. Malfoy appeared in a
To a large extent, as not only are his shoes half worn, but they are generally polished
The hair was dyed. He ignores the apologetic looking elf next to him
ankles, he fixed his cold eyes on Dumbledore.
"so!" He said “You’re back. The governors stopped you, but
You're still looking forward to going back to Hogwarts."
"Well, you see, Lucius," Dumbledore said, looking sorrowful, "another
Eleven governments have been formed on it today. It 's the same as what happened
In a hail of monsters, to tell the truth. I learned that Arthur Weasley
They kill a girl who wants to come back here in a while. They appear
I would have thought I was the best man for the job after all. Very reaching stories were told.
me too. . . . Many of them seem to think you threatened
Curse their families if they don’t agree to imprison me in the first place.”
Mr. Malfoy was paler than usual, but his eyes were still the blue of
anger.
“So — have you stopped the pressure yet?” he sneered. “Have you caught
Is he a prisoner?”
"We have," Dumbledore said, chuckling.
"Well?" Mr. Malfoy said quietly. “Who?”
"The same person as last time, Lucius," Dumbledore said. “But this .
time, Lord Voldemort was acting through somebody else. Through this
diary."
He clutched the little black book with the big circle in the middle,
She watched Mr. Malfoy closely. Harry, however, was watching Dobby.
The elf was doing something very strange. Her big eyes gazed
With its focus on Harry, it keeps coming back to the book, followed by Mr. Malfoy,
and then hit himself hard on the head with his fist.
"I see . . ." Mr. Malfoy said directly to Dumbledore.
“Brilliant plan,” Dumbledore said in a level voice, still looking at the Master.
Malfoy straight in the eye. “Because if Harry’s here” — Mr. Malfoy shot up .
Harry a quick, sharp look — “and his friend Ron didn’t get that .
Book, why — maybe Ginny Weasley got all the blame. No one
She could have shown that she did not act of her own free will.
will. . . .”
Mr. Malfoy said nothing. His face was suddenly like a mask.
“And think,” Dumbledore continued, “what might have happened .
so. . . . The Wesleys are one of our most well-known clean families.
Imagine what would happen to Arthur Weasley and his Muggle Protection Act, if
Her own daughter is found torturing and killing Muggle children. . . .
Luckily the diary was found, and Riddle’s stories were deleted
from him. Who knows what it will be .
otherwise. . . .”
Mr. Malfoy forced himself to speak.
“Too bad,” he insisted.
And still, behind his back, Dobby was looking, first at the diary, then at the
Lucius Malfoy, then patted himself on the head.
And Harry suddenly understood. He passes his head to Dobby, and Dobby
He backed into a corner, now twisting his ears in punishment.
“You don’t want to know how the genie got hold of that book, sir.
Malfoy?” Harry said.
Lucius Malfoy was running after him.
“How am I supposed to know how that cute little girl took it?” he said.
“Because you gave into it,” Harry said. “In flurry and bluts. you
She picked up her old Transfiguration book and dropped the diary into it,
Don’t you know?”
He saw Mr. Malfoy's white hands twitch and clap.
“Do it,” he explained.
"Oh, no one would be able to do that," Dumbledore said, looking at Harry.
“That didn’t happen when Riddle left the book. On the other hand, I
I would advise you, Lucius, not to go giving any Lord
Voldemort’s old school stuff. If any of them find their way to
Bare hands, I think Arthur Weasley, for one, would make sure they were
traced back to you. . . .”
Lucius Malfoy stood for a moment, looking at Harry with a straight face.
His hand twitched as if he longed to reach for his cock. Instead, he
He turned home-self.
“Let’s go, Dubby!”
He opened the door quickly, and when the serpent came rushing towards him, he
He just picked it up. They could hear Dobby wincing in pain all the
The road on the road. Harry stood for a moment, thinking deeply. so
He came to her —
"Professor Dumbledore," he said softly. “I can return that diary
For Mr. Malfoy, please?”
“Sure, Harry,” Dumbledore said freely. “But cut. ceremony,
remember. . . .”
Harry grabbed the diary and stormed out of the office. He can hear
Dobby’s sad screams echoed in the shadows. Honestly, I think it
This plan might work, Harry took off one of his shoes and removed it
his clothes were dirty, blue, and he had a diary stuffed into him. Then he went to
The Green Room.
He kept them at the top of the stairs.
" Sir. Malfoy,” he said softly, panting softly, “I have something for you .
—”
And he pressed the smelly cloth into Lucius Malfoy's hand.
“What the — ?”
Mr. Malfoy took the hat out of the diary, tossed it aside, then looked
angrily from the missing book to Harry.
“You’re going to meet the same tail end as your parents one of these days,
Harry Potter,” he said in a pleasant manner. “They were involved rats, too.”
He turns to go.
“Come on, Dobby. I said, come on.”
But Dubi did not move. He was smoking Harry's last, heavy one.
sock, and looks at it like a priceless treasure.
“Master has provided the window,” the boss said in awe. “Given by Mr .
For Duby.”
“What’s that?” Sabbath Mr. Malfoy. “What did you say?”
“He got a haircut,” Dobby said in disbelief. “Master put it down, and Dobby .
Catch him, and Dub — Dub is free.”
Lucius Malfoy turned around and looked at the elephant. Then he turned to Harry.
“You bored my slave, baby!”
But Dobby shouts, “Don’t you ever hurt Harry Potter!”
There's a very popular Bang Group, and Mr. Malfoy is played in the background. he
He went down the stairs, three at a time, when he got stuck in a cemented pillar for 100 years.
Fall down. He came up, faced Fred, stuck out his hand, but
Dobby raised a long, threatening finger.
“You go now,” he growled, pointing at Mr. Malfoy. "you
Harry Potter doesn't run. You must go now.”
Lucius Malfoy didn't have any choice. With one end, it turns out to be more than two
Around them, he ripped off his clothes and quickly disappeared from sight.
“Harry Butter Ifra Debbie!” said the elf shrilly, gazing up at Harry,
The moonlight from the window that shone in his eyes was like a lightning bolt. “Harry
Potter got Dobby out of jail!”
“I wish I could, Dobby,” Harry said, begging. “Just promise never .
Try to save my life again.”
The fox's ugly brown face suddenly split into a wide, toothy grin.
“I just have one question, Dobby,” Harry said as he pulled away from Dobby .
Harry's son with hands is doing hands. “You told me this was all unrelated .
And Hi-Who-Must-Not-Be-Named, Ktut? Well -"
“Just an idea, sir,” said Dobby, his eyes, like this
sure. “It was a surprise. The Lord burned before his change .
name, could be freely named, you see?”
"Right," Harry said weakly. “Well, I better go. There was a party, and my
Friend Hermione needs to wake up now. . . .”
Dobby wrapped his arms around Harry and hugged him.
“Harry Potter is bigger than Dobby knew!” he shouted. "bye,
Harry Potter!”
And with a final loud crack, Dobby disappeared.
Harry had attended many Hogwarts ceremonies, but never one like this.
Everyone was in their costumes, and the revelry lasted all night. Harry
I don’t know if the best thing was Hermione running to him.
screaming “You solved it! You solved it!” Or Justin shouting from
The Hufflepuff board would shake his hand and apologize endlessly for being suspicious
He, or Hagrid who showed up at half past three, hugged Harry and Ron tightly
On the feet in which they lay in their bags of trinkets, or hers .
and Ron with 400 points for Gryffindor securing the House Cup for
Second year in a row, or Professor McGonagall stood up to tell them .
Everything is set up for tests like a school novel (“ Oh, no!” he said
Hermione), or Dumbledore is reporting that, unfortunately, the Professor
Luckhart was unable to return the following year, as he
He must go out and we must do his work. Quite a few of the teachers
It was in the process that led to this news.
“Oh,” Ron said, helping himself to a can of jam. “He was starting .
He’ll grow on me.”
The rest of the finish passed in a haze of blistering sunshine. Hogwarts
It returns to the center with only a few, minor differences. Defense against
Dark Arts classes were canceled (“but we’re so busy in
And so it’s absent of,” Ron told a Halfius Malfoy .
She was hired as a school governor. Draco is no longer asking for
school as he owned the place. On the contrary, he looked resentful
and sulkiness. On the other hand, Ginny Weasley became perfectly happy.
Pretty soon, it was time for the trip home on the Hogwarts Express.
Harry, Ron, Hermione, Fred, George, and Ginny have a house that
themselves. They enjoyed the last few hours they had
They are allowed to perform rituals before the ceremonies. They played Exploding Snap, set
With Fred and George’s last filibuster, and they practice
Disarming each other with a knife. Harry was getting very good at it.
They were almost at Kings Cross when Harry waskty for something.
“Ginny — what did you see Percy do, he didn’t want you to .
anyone?"
“Oh, that,” said the genie, agreeing. “Wax — Birsi has a wife.”
Fred published a collection of books on George.
"what?"
"It's that Ravenclaw, Penelope Clearwater," Ginny said. “This is
who writes to all last summer. He was meeting her in all
Schooling secretly. I joined them and played in an empty room.
day. He was very upset when she was — you know — arrested. You're not going
You love him, would you?” She said calmly.
“You’re not going to ask him,” said Fred, who was looking his age .
He came early.
“Actually, nothing,” George said, grinning.
The Hogwarts Express moves and at the end stops.
Harry went out for his lies and some of the trouble he was getting with Ron and
Hermione.
“This is called a phone number,” he tells Ron, calling back twice,
They both change, we find them. “I told your father how
He would have used the phone last summer — he would have known. Meet me at Dursley,
okay? I couldn't stand two more months with Dodley even if I had to talk. . . .”
“Your aunt and uncle would be proud, though, wouldn’t they?” Hermione said
When they leave the country, they enter the community and become part of the
evacuated prison. “When I hear what you’re doing this year?”
"proud?" Harry said. “Are you bored? All those times I could have died,
And I didn’t make it? They'll be furious. . . .”
And everyone walks towards the door to Mojl .
world.



Page 1 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban
By JK Ruling
CHAPTER ONE
The Beast's Diary
 Harry Potter was a highly unusual boy in many ways. For one thing, he hated summer.
The holidays more than any other time of the year. For another, he really wants to do his homework but
He was forced to do it in secret, in the dead of night. And he also happens to be a magician.
 It was nearly midnight, and he was lying on his stomach in bed, the blankets pulled right up against his .
A tent-like head, a flashlight in one hand and a large leather-bound book (A History of Magic by
Bathilda Bagshot) pushed open against the tide. Harry lowered the tail of his Eagle feather.
At the bottom of the page, he rummaged around in his head as he searched for something to help him write his essay, 'The Magician .
Stopping in the 14th century makes no sense at all — check.'
 Quill stopped at the top of a probably looking paragraph. Harry pushed his blue orbs back
Bridge of his nose, he brought his light closer to the book and read:
 Non-magical people (better known as Muggles) were especially afraid of magic in
of the Middle Ages, but didn’t take much time to recognize it. On the rare occasion that they caught a
A true wizard or wizard, whispering wouldn't have any effect. A magician or wizard would make a
A basic Flame-Freezing Charm and then screaming in pain while absorbing the pathetic,
The feeling of vulnerability. In fact, Wendelin the Weird enjoyed being burned so much that she let
Himself to be taken no fewer than forty-seven times with different charms.
 Harry tucked his head between his teeth and reached under his chin to find his ink bottle and a
Roll of paper. Slowly and very carefully he opened the ink bottle and dipped his nipple in it,
And he began to write, stopping every so often to listen, because if any of the Dursley's heard .
A tunnel of his own on their way to the bathroom, he'd probably find himself trapped in
Coffee under cover for the rest of the winter.
 The Number Four Dursley family, Privet Drive, was the reason Harry never enjoyed his wedding .
Summer holidays. Uncle Vernon, Aunt Petunia, and their son, Dudley, were the only ones living in Harry .
parents. They were Muggles, and they had a very medieval view of magic. Harry died.
The parents, who were witches and wizards themselves, were never mentioned under the Dursleys.
roof. For years, Aunt Petunia and Uncle Vernon had hoped that if they kept Harry as
Page 2 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Wrapped as much as possible, they would be able to absorb the magic. To their anger, they
He was not unsuccessful. These days they live in fear of anyone finding out that Harry has
They had spent most of the past two years at Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry. A lot of them
He could do, however, was to pack Harry’s spell books, wallet, drawer, and wand in the
starting the summer holidays, and forbidding him to talk to the neighbors.
 This separation between his spellbooks was a real problem for Harry, because his teachers in
Hogwarts gave him plenty of holiday activities. One of those texts, a particularly nasty one about
Shrinking potions, was available to Harry’s least favorite professor, Professor Snape, who would be
Glad he had an excuse to give Harry a month's leave. So Harry took his
right on the first week of vacation. While Uncle Vernon, Aunt Petunia, and Dudley have .
out into the front garden to admire Uncle Vernon’s new company car (very loud,
To the attention of the rest of the street as well), Harry rushed over and lifted the blade onto the
The drawer under the dresser held some of his books, which he hid in his bedroom. as
As long as he didn't leave stray marks on the papers, the Dursleys didn't need to know he was
A magic call in the night.
 Harry was especially keen to avoid getting in trouble with his aunt and uncle at the moment, as they were
Already in a particularly bad mood with him, all because he received a phone call from a
His fellow magician one week during the school holidays.
 Ron Weasley, who was one of Harry’s classmates at Hogwarts, came from a family of
Magicians. This meant that he knew a lot of things that Harry didn't, but he had never used a telephone .
before. To make matters worse, Uncle Vernon answered the call.
 “Vernon Dursley is speaking.”
 Harry, who happened to be in the room at the time, froze when he heard Ron's voice answer.
 "Aeul? Aeul? CAN YOU HEAR ME? I — WANT — TO — TALK — TO — HARRY
— MAN!”
 Ron was shouting so loudly that Uncle Vernon leaned over and held the receiver with one foot over his .
The ear, looking at him with a mixture of amusement and anxiety.
 "who is this?" The grip was on the side of the blade. "who are you?"
 “RUN — WESLEY!” Ron nodded, as if he and Uncle Vernon were talking from
The heads of a football field. “I — AM — A — FRIEND — OF — HARRY — FROM — .
school -"
 Uncle Vernon's small eyes turned to Harry, who was rooted to the spot.
Page 3 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “THERE’S NO HARRY POTTER HERE!” He shouted, now holding the device at arms length,
He seemed afraid to explode. “I don’t know what school YOU’RE
TALKING ABOUT! DON'T TAKE TICKETS WITH ME! Don’t come near me
family!"
 And he threw the receiver back at the phone as if he had thrown a poisonous spit.
 The battle which followed was one of the worst.
 “HOW DARE YOU GIVE TONE TO PEOPLE LIKE — PEOPLE LIKE YOU!”
Uncle Vernon had shouted, spraying Harry with a blanket.
 Ron obviously realized he had gotten Harry into trouble, because he didn't call again.
Harry's other best friend from Hogwarts, Hermione Granger, was also out of sight. Harry
You doubt that Ron warned Hermione not to speak, which he did, because Hermione, the
The smartest witch in Harry's year, she had Muggle parents, she knew exactly how to use a phone,
And she would probably be right not to mention that she went to Hogwarts.
 So Harry hadn't had a word from any of his dragon friends for five long weeks, and that .
The summer was looking almost as bad as the previous one. There was only one very small one.
Improvement — after trying not to use her to send letters to one of his friends,
Harry had been allowed to let his dragon, Hedwig, out at night. Uncle Vernon volunteered because
of the racket Hedwig makes if she is locked in her cage all the time.
 Harry finished writing about Foolish Wendelin and paused to listen again. The silence in
The backyard was visited only by the distant, grumbling wails of his older cousin, Dudley. it
He must be very tired, Harry thought. His eyes were rubbing with pain. Maybe that will end
Post tomorrow night...
 replaced the top of the ink bottle; He pulls an old mattress from under his bed; put
silver, History of the needle, its pattern, forms, and colors within it; He got out of bed; And very hidden
Under the empty floorboard under his bed. Then he stood up and looked around and checked the time on
A glowing alarm clock on his bedside table.
 It was one evening. Harry's stomach gave a dramatic growl. He was thirteen years old.
The former, without realizing it, for an entire hour.
 And another unusual thing about Harry was how he never looked forward to his birthday. have
He never got a birthday card in his life. The Dursleys completely ignored his last two .
birthday, and he had no reason to think they would remember that one.
Page 4 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry walked through the next room, past Hedwig's large, empty cage to the open window. he
He leaned against the window, the cool night air was good on his face after a long time under the covers.
Hedwig had been gone for two nights now. Harry never forgets her: she leaves
This is long before. But he hopes she’ll come back soon — she’s the only living creature at that .
The house didn’t light up when he saw it.
 Harry, though still a bit small and short for his age, had gained some weight over the past year.
His jet-black hair, however, was the same as it always was — decidedly unstyled, no matter what he did .
had. The eyes behind his shirts were a bright blue, and on his forehead, they looked great s
Her hair, dark brown, shaped like a bolt of lightning.

Of all the unusual things about Harry, this line was the most unusual. It’s not, like
The Dursleys had been acting as if for ten years, a memorial to the car crash that killed Harry .
parents, because Lily and James Potter didn't die in a car crash. They were killed,
He was murdered by the most feared Dark wizard for a hundred years, Lord Voldemort. He had Harry
He escaped an attack with nothing but a scar on his forearm, where Voldemort's
The curse, instead of defeating it, was triumphing over its bearer. As long as he lived, Voldemort had
They fled…
 But Harry came face to face with him at Hogwarts. I remember their last meeting as he
Standing at the central window, Harry had to admit he was lucky even if he made it to the thirteenth.
anniversary.
 He stared at the starry sky for signs of Hedwig, perhaps crawling towards him with a dead mouse .
She bounces off his head, waiting for the praise. He looks vaguely at the peaks, and some of the
It took 10 seconds before Harry realized what he was seeing.
 Silhouetted against the golden moon, and growing bigger each time, it was huge, magical .
One sided creature, and it was floating at Harry's side. He stood perfectly still and watched her fall.
Down and down. For a second he hesitates, hand on the window ledge, thinking
Whether they will sweep it away. But then the odd creature popped up on one of the streetlights on Privet .
Drive, and Harry, when he realizes what it is, steps aside.
 Out of the window three rats came out, two of them grabbed the third, apparently a
he turned. They landed with a hedgehog on Harry's bed, and a medium-sized, massive
and gray, keeled straight ahead and remained motionless. There was a large bag tied to her feet.
 Harry recognized the elusive dragon at once—his name was Errol, and he was from
The Weasley Family. Harry ran to the bed, unfastened the ropes on Errol's shoulders, removed
parcel, then takes Errol to Hedwig's cage. Errol opened one beautiful eye and gave a heavy sigh
of thanks, he started to pour some water.
Page 5 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry turned back to the remaining monsters. One of them, the giant snow woman, was her
Hedwig. She, too, was carrying a parrot and seemed quite pleased with herself. She gave
Harry one loving nip at his cock as he removed his hold and then flew across the room to
Join Irrol.
 Harry didn't recognize the third hero, a handsome hero, but he knew at once where he was
They came from, because in addition to the third box, it contained a letter containing Hogwarts .
peak. After putting Harry out of his misery, she ruffled her precious feathers and waved .
wings, and flew through the tunnel into the night.
 Harry sat down on his bed, grabbed Errol's coat, crumpled up the brown paper, and
He found a gift wrapped in gold and his first birthday card. Fingers trembling slightly,
He opened the envelope. Two pieces of paper fell out — a letter and a newspaper clipping.
 The haircut appeared to have come out of the cartoon newspaper, the Daily Prophet, because
The people in the black and white picture were smiling. Harry picked up the hat and smoothed it,
And read:
 DEPARTMENT OF THE MAGIC OFFICER WINS TOP PRIZE
 Arthur Weasley, head of the Muggle Abuse Bureau at the Ministry of Magic, wins
of the annual Galleon Grand Prize Christmas.
 A delighted Mr Weasley told the Daily Prophet: “We’re going to spend the gold in one winter .
holidays in Egypt, where our oldest son, Bill, works as a waitress for Gringotts Wizarding .
bank."
 The Weasley family will spend a month in Egypt, returning for the start of a new school .
A year at Hogwarts, which five of the Weasley children currently attend.
 Harry scanned the smiling photo, and a smile spread across his face when he saw all nine of the
The Weasleys watched him proudly, standing in front of a large pyramid. Plump little lady.
Wesley; tall, dark Mr. Weasley; six grandchildren; She’s the same daughter, all (though she’s black-and-white
Picture not shown) with fiery red hair. In the center of the picture was Ron, tall and
Gangling, with his nephew, Scabbers, on his back and his arm around his younger sister, Ginny.
 Harry couldn't think of anyone more deserving of winning a giant bar of gold than the Weasleys,
They were very smart and very poor. He picked up Ron's letter and unfolded it.
 Hi Harry,
 happy birthday!
Page 6 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Look, I’m so sorry about that phone call. I hope the Muggles didn't give you a hard time.
I asked my father, and he reckoned I shouldn’t have shouted.
 It’s sad here in Egypt. Bill took us around all the graves and it was unbelievable
We curse those ancient Egyptian archaeologists who put them there. Mom didn't let Ginny come in the last one.
There were all these diseased skeletons there, of Muggles that had moved in and overgrown
Heads and stuff.
 I couldn’t believe it when my dad won the regular Christmas show. Seven hundred galleons! Most of the
It went on this trip, but I will be bought a new coat for next year.
 Harry remembered only too well the occasion when he had smashed Ron's old wand. It happened
When the carriage the two were flying in to Hogwarts crashed into a tree at school.
foundation.
 Let's go back about a week before the start of the new year and go to London to get my coat.
and our new books. Any chance of meeting you there?
 Don't let the Muggles get you down!

Try coming to London.
 run
 PS Percy's Head Boy. He got the letter last week.
 Harry glanced at the screen. Percy, who was in his seventh and final year at Hogwarts,
He was looking especially smug. He tied his Head Boy badge to the fez that hung proudly on
a top of his shaggy hair, his tinted glasses glinting in the Egyptian sun.
 Harry now turned to his curse and unwrapped it. Inside was what looked like small glass.
the peak of the reaction. There was another drawing of Ron underneath.
 Harry — a Tea Sneacoscope. If someone doesn’t trust, they should
Light and dark. Bill says they’re shields sold to witch tourists and it’s not reliable, because he’s taken
Light at dinner last night. But he doesn’t realize that Fred and George have put animals in his apartment.
soup.
 Goodbye - Run
Page 7 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry placed the Pocket Sneakoscope on his bed table, where it sat balanced, balanced on his desk.
point, reflecting the glowing hands of his watch. He looked at her curiously for a few seconds, then
He picked up the bag that Hedwig had brought.
 Inside that as well, was a wedding ring, a card, and a letter, this time from Hermione.
 Hi Harry,
 Ron wrote to me and told me about his phone call to your Uncle Vernon. I hope you all
right.
 I’m on holiday in France at the moment and I don’t know how to send you this —
What if they opened it at customs? 'But then Hedwig appeared!' I think she wants to do
Surely you have something for your birthday for a change. I bought your ticket with the rule of thumb; there
It was a review in the Daily Prophet (I made it; it’s too good to keep up
with what’s going on in the virtual world). Did you see that picture of Run and his family a
Last week? I bet he learned a lot. I’m really jealous — ancient Egyptian magicians were
fascinating.
 There’s some fascinating local history here, too. I rewrote my entire history of
A magic number to summarize some of my findings, I hope it’s not too long — it’s two lines .
of paper than Professor Binns had requested.
 Ron said he would be in London during the last week of the show. Can you do it? to be
Aunt and Uncle let you come over? I certainly hope you can. Otherwise, I’ll see you on the Hogwarts Express on
First of September!

Love from Hermione
 PS Ron said Percy's Head Boy. I bet Percy was really pleased. Run doesn’t look too happy.
therefore.
 Harry laughed as he set Hermione's letter aside and held up his offer. It was very sweet.
Knowing Hermione, he was sure it was going to be a big book full of very difficult spells — but it was .
It doesn't exist. His heart skipped a huge leap as he peeled back the paper and saw a thick black skin.
the case, with silver words embossed on it, says Broomstick Service Kit.
 “Wow, Hermione!” Harry whispered, undoing the seal to look inside.
 There’s a big Fleetwood Polish teapot with a soft handle, and two shiny silvers .
Tailtwig Clippers, which are a small ball of wool that you clip onto your forearm for long distances, and a
The Do-It-Yourself Broomcare Book.
Page 8 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Aside from his friends, Harry’s main interest at Hogwarts was Quidditch, the
The most popular sport in the magic world — it’s very dangerous, very fun, and played in
Fireballs. Harry happened to be a very good Quidditch player; He was young
One person in a thousand would be selected for one of the Hogwarts House teams. One of Harry’s
The sum of its parts is the Nimbus Two Thousand of its cycle.
 Harry set the leather tray aside and picked up the last of his clothes. He knew the inevitable text
The brown paper suddenly: this is from Hagrid, Hogwarts game warden. He took off the top.
drinking rubber and saw something green and leathery, but before he lost
Exactly, the potato gives a tiny crack, and whatever’s inside cracks loudly — like .
although he has bones.
 Harry gathered. He knew that Hagrid would never send him anything dangerous intentionally, but
Besides, Hagrid didn't have a normal person's view of what was dangerous. Hagrid is famous
Living with giant spiders, buying mean, three-headed dogs from men in bars, and robbing wildly
dragon eggs in his pocket.
 Harry pushed the wand around in confusion. She lowered her voice loudly again. Harry reached for the lamp on it.
the bed sheet, gripping it tightly in one hand, and raising it over his head, prepared to strike. Then he
He took the rest of the wrapping paper in his other hand and pulled.
 And he lost — a book. Harry barely had time to register his beautiful, painted green umbrella
With the golden title The Book of Monsters, before tumbling over its edge and disappearing .
sideways on the bed like some damn shit.
 “Uh-oh,” Harry shrugged.
 The book fell off the bed with a loud thud and came to an abrupt halt across the room. Harry
They followed it stealthily. The book was hidden in the dark space under his desk. Praying that
The Dursleys were still asleep, and Harry got down on his hands and knees and crawled to his side.
 "Oh!"
 The book closed awkwardly around his wrist, then he slowly passed it over, still flipping over the covers. Harry
Running over, he threw himself forward and managed to push him off. Uncle Vernon gave a high pitched cry,
With a sleeping bag in the room next door.
 Hedwig and Errol watched in shock as Harry clutched the struggling book tightly in his hands,
He rushed to his desk and pulled out a handkerchief, which he squeezed tightly. the
The Beast Book squirmed in anger, but he couldn't help but squirm and snarl, so Harry pushed him down onto the
bed and reached for Hagrid's map.
Page 9 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Hi Harry,
 happy birthday!
 Think you might find this useful for next year. I won’t say more here. I'll tell you when I see you.
 Hope the Muggles treat you well.
 all the best,
 Hagrid
 It struck Harry as odd that Hagrid thought a spell book would come in handy, but he re
Hagrid's map was right next to Ron and Hermione's, looking more determined than ever. Now there’s
Only the letter from Hogwarts remained.
 Seeing that it was thicker than usual, Harry opened the envelope and took out the first
page inside, and read:
 Hi Mr. Peter,
 Note that the new school year begins September first. Hogwarts Parade
He will leave King's Cross station, Ninety-Three Quarter Station, at eleven o'clock.
 Third years are allowed to visit Hogsmeade village on certain weekends. Please give
enclosed permission form for your parent or guardian to sign.
 A list of books for the coming year has been announced.
 Yours sincerely,
 Professor M. McGonagall
 School principal
 Harry pulled out the Hogsmeade permission slip and looked at it, no longer frowning. to be
It would be wonderful to visit Hogsmeade on the weekends; He knew it was entirely a house of witches, and
He never set foot there. But how would he convince Uncle Vernon or Uncle
Will Petunia sign the paper?
 He looked at the alarm clock. It was now two in the afternoon.
Page 10 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Deciding that he would be worried about the perfume of Hogsmeade when he woke up, Harry went back to bed
And he’s up to wallow another day on the board he’s made for himself, whispering
The remaining 10 days until his return to Hogwarts. Then he took off his shoes and sat down; Eyes open,
next to his three birthday cards.
 Although it was unusual, at that moment Harry Potter felt like all the others—
He was happy, for the first time in his life, because it was his birthday.

CHAPTER TWO
Aunt Marge’s Big Mistake

Page 11 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry came down for breakfast the next morning to find the three Dursleys already sitting out front .
The kitchen table. They were watching the new TV, a welcome home for the summer
They were for Dudley, who was complaining loudly about the long walk between the fridge
and a television in the living room. Dudley spent most of the summer in the kitchen, his
piggy little eyes focused on the screen and his five toes wagging as he ate constantly.
 Harry sat between Dudley and Uncle Vernon, a tall, chubby, very short-statured man and
A lot of resentment. Far from wishing Harry a happy birthday, none of the Dursleys made a fuss .
that they had seen Harry enter the room, but Harry was too late for that to care. It helped
himself to a hot stew, then glanced at the reporter on the television, who was halfway .
with an account of an escaped convict.
 “… The public has been warned that Black is armed and extremely dangerous. A particular hot wall has
They were brought up, and any sight of Black should be reported immediately.”
 “You don’t have to tell us it’s bad,” Uncle Vernon said, glancing over the front of his newspaper at the 100,000.
The prisoner. "Look at his state, filthy layabout!" Look at her hair!”
 He threw the nasty look aside at Harry, to whom he had always been a source of great comfort .
condolences to Uncle Vernon. However, compared to the man on TV, his face was pale .
He was wrapped in a thick, waist-length blanket, Harry actually felt well protected.
 The journalist was back.
 “The Ministry of Agriculture and Fisheries will announce today —”
 “Wait!” Uncle Vernon exclaimed, looking excitedly at the writer. “You didn’t tell us where that was
The maniac escapes from! What’s the point of that? Lunatic could be coming down the street right now!”
 Aunt Petunia, who was skeletal and snake-faced, scowled and watched intently from the
Kitchen window. Harry knew Aunt Petunia would just love to be the one to call the hot bell
number. She was the most special woman in the world and spent most of her life catering to his passions.
Law-abiding neighbors.
 “When are they going to learn,” said Uncle Vernon, tapping the table with his big knife, “that .
Is prison the only way to deal with these people?”
 “It’s very true,” Aunt Petunia said, still staring at the grain of the next door drawer.
 Uncle Vernon drained his teacup, looked at his watch, and added, “I’d better be out in a minute, .
Bitunia. Marge’s train came in at ten.”
Page 12 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry, whose thoughts were upstairs with the Broomstick user interface, returned to
floor with unattractive bubbles.
 “Aunt Marge?” He said quietly. “Shur isn’t coming here, is she?”
 Aunt Marge was Uncle Vernon’s sister. Even though she wasn't a blood relative of Harry's
(His mother was Aunt Petunia's sister), he had been required to call her 'aunt' his whole life.
Aunt Marge lives in the country, in a house with a big garden, where she raises poultry. she
She didn’t stay at Privet Drive very often, because she couldn’t leave her precious dogs, but everyone
His 10 lines suddenly appeared in Harry's mind.
 At Dudley's fifth birthday party, Aunt Marge stabbed Harry in the shins with him
a move to stop him attacking Dudley in the music industry. A few years later, she had
She shows up at Christmas with a computer robot for Dudley and a box of dog biscuits for Harry.
On his last visit, a year before Harry started at Hogwarts, Harry accidentally stumbled upon
The barking of her favorite dog. Ripper follows Harry into the garden and climbs a tree, and Uncle
Marge refused to call him until midnight. The memory of this event is still sweet .
Tears of laughter to Dudley's eyes.
 "Marge will be here for a week," Uncle Vernon said quietly, "and while we're on the subject," he said .
he pointed a clawed finger menacingly at Harry, "we need to get some things straight before I go and . . ."
Gather it.”
 Dudley sighed and took his gaze off the TV. Watching Harry get bullied by
Uncle Vernon was Dudley's favorite kind of comforter.
 “First of all,” Uncle Vernon grumbled, “you’ll keep a civil tongue in your head when you talk to .
Marge.”
 “Very well,” Harry sighed, “if she does that when she talks to me.”
 "Second," Uncle Vernon said, as if he hadn't heard Harry's answer, "like Marge . . ."
She doesn’t know anything about your disorder, I don’t want anything — any surprises while she
here. You’re kidding yourself, do you understand me?”
 “I would if she did,” Harry said through gritted teeth.
 “And thirdly,” said Uncle Vernon, his evil little eyes now boring into his big chubby face, “we have .
He tells Marge you are going to St. John's Security Center.
 "what?" Harry shouted.
Page 13 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "And you stick to that story, boy, or there'll be trouble," Uncle Vernon sighed.
 Harry sat there, white-faced and angry, staring at Uncle Vernon, unable to believe it. aunt
Marge is coming for a weekly visit — the worst birthday present the Dursleys ever had .
was given to him, including Uncle Vernon's old uniform.
 “Well, Petunia,” said Uncle Vernon, rising seriously, “I’m going out to the station, then.
Do you want to come along for the ride, Dudders?”
 “No,” Dudley said, his attention returning to the TV now that Uncle Vernon had .
He ended up threatening Harry.
 “Duddy needs to make himself presentable to his uncle,” Aunt Petunia said, smoothing Dudley’s cheeks .
Red hair. “My mother bought him a beautiful new watch.”
 Uncle Vernon patted Dudley on his pig-tail.
 “I’ll see you in a bit, then,” he said, leaving the bathroom.
 Harry, who was sitting in a sort of cocoon, got a brief idea. They left his property
toast, he quickly rose to his feet and followed Uncle Vernon to the front door.
 Uncle Vernon was pulling on his cowboy hat.
 “I’m not taking you,” he growled as he turned to see Harry watching him.
 “Looks like I wanted to come,” Harry said coldly. “I wanted to ask you something.”
 Uncle Vernon looked at him suspiciously.
 “Third years at the Hog — at my school they’re allowed to visit the village sometimes,” said Harry.
 "so?" Uncle Vernon said, taking his car keys out of a cupboard by the door.
 “I need you to sign a permission form,” Harry snapped.
 “And why should I do that?” said Uncle Vernon.
 “Well,” Harry said, choosing his words carefully, “it’s going to be a tough job, compared to Aunt Marge I .
Go to St. Louis.
Page 14 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "Great. Brutus Security School for Innocent Criminal Children!” shouted Uncle Vernon, and Harry
He was glad to hear a subtle note of panic in Uncle Vernon's voice.
 “All right,” Harry said, looking up at Uncle Vernon’s big, pale face. “It’s a lot to
remember. I have to sound convincing, don’t I? What if I left something off
slip?"
 “You’re going to get that sticky one out, aren’t you?” cried Uncle Vernon, stepping forward
Harry's eyebrows raised. But Harry stood his ground.
 "Getting the dick out of me won't let Aunt Marge forget what I can tell her," he said .
with enthusiasm.
 Uncle Vernon paused, his hand still raised, an evil grin on his face.
 “But if you sign my permission form,” Harry continued slowly, “I swear I’ll remember where I am .
I’ve got to go to school, and act like Mug — like it’s normal and everything.”
 Harry could tell that Uncle Vernon was thinking about him, even if his teeth were gritted and a vein
He was beating in his toilet.
 “Of course,” he said quietly at last. “I will be following your behavior carefully during Marge’s visit. If, in
You finally roll the dice and stick to the story, and I’ll sign your blue box.”
 He drove around, pulled the front door open, and slammed it so hard that one of the younger
glass candles at the ceiling had fallen.
 Harry didn't go back to the bathroom. He went back to his bedroom. If he were to
Like a true Muggle, hurry you better start now. Slowly and painfully, he gathered all his gifts and hers
birthday cards and hid them under the dirty floorboard with his homework. Then he went to
Hedwig's cage. Errol seems to have recovered; He and Hedwig were both asleep, heads down
Their wings. Harry smiled, then pushed them both away.
 “Hedwig,” he growled, “you will have to ease up for a week. Go with the flow. run
Take care of you. I’ll write him a letter and explain. And don't look at me like that.” — Hedwig's
The big blue eyes were justifying — “It’s not my fault. It’s the only way I’ll be allowed to know.
Hogsmead with Run and Hermione.”
 Ten minutes later, Errol and Hedwig (with a note to Ron strapped to her leg) sneak out of the
The window is out of sight. Harry, now reeling, set the cage empty
Inside the store.
Page 15 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 But Harry didn't have much time to explore. In no time at all, Aunt Petunia was literally burning
For Harry to come down and prepare to receive their guest.
 “Do something about your hair!” Aunt Petunia said as he reached the hall.
 Harry couldn't see the point of growing his hair out. Aunt Marge likes to be criticized.
So long as he doesn’t move, she’ll be happy.
 Soon there was a screech of dust outside as Uncle Vernon’s carriage turned into the
The driveway, then a series of car doors and steps on a gravel road.
 “Get the door!” Aunt Petunia smiled at Harry.
 Feeling a huge pit in his stomach, Harry pulled the door open.
 At the top stood Aunt Marge. She was like Uncle Vernon: big, beefy, and
purple-faced, she wore a beard too, though it wasn't as brown as his. In one hand she holds
large suitcase, and tucked under the other was an old and vicious rat of evil temper.
 “Where’s my Dudders?” said Aunt Marge. “Where’s my neffy dish?”
 Dudley came strolling down the hall, his blond hair piled on top of his round head, a button-down tie only
He appeared under his pillows a lot. Aunt Marge shoved the suitcase into Harry's lap and landed in
The wind knocked out of him, he grabbed Dudley in a hug with one firm arm, and planted a big kiss on his forehead.
 Harry knew full well that Dudley only encouraged Aunt Marge's hobbies because he was good .
He paid, and sure enough, when they parted, Dudley bought a beautiful twenty pound note .
He clutched at her thin hand.
 “Bitunia!” Aunt Marge said, running past Harry like he was crazy. Aunt Marge
And Aunt Petunia kissed, or rather, Aunt Marge pressed her big chin against Aunt Petunias .
Bone of a hairy knife.
 Uncle Vernon came in now, looking excited as he closed the door.
 “Tea, Marj?” he said. “What’s the Ripper going to bring?”
 “Ripper can have some tea from my mug,” Aunt Marge said as they all moved into the kitchen .
kitchen, leaving Harry alone in the hall with the suitcase. But Harry wasn't complaining; any
Cause she wasn't Aunt Marge was fine with it, so he started keeping things upstairs in the
Spare bedroom, occupying as much as possible.
Page 16 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Back at the kitchen, Aunt Marge brought him yoghurt and fruit, and
Ripper was noisily nodding in the background. Harry watched Aunt Petunia squirm a bit like tea towels
And drool flecked her clean bottom. Aunt Petunia hates animals.
 “Who takes care of the other dogs, Marge?” Uncle Vernon asked.
 "Oh, I've got Colonel Fubster managing them," Aunt Marge sighed. “He’s retired now, good
So that he would have something to do. But I couldn’t leave poor old Ripper. He wonders if he is far
From me.”
 Ripper started growling again as Harry sat down. This gets Aunt Marge’s attention to Harry
For the first time.
 "so!" She shrieked. “You’re still here, are you?”
 “Yeah,” Harry said.
 “Don’t say 'yes’ in that immature voice,” Aunt Marge whispered. “It’s a lot better than Vernon .
and Petunia to protect you. I don’t do it myself. You would have gone straight to
orphanage if you were knocked on my doorstep.”
 Harry was proud to say that he'd rather live in the inn than with the Dursleys, but
The looming thought of Hogsmeade stopped him. He pressed his face into a pained expression.
 “Don’t you look at me!” said Aunt Marge. “I can see you haven’t improved since I last saw you
you. I hope school spills some wisdom on you.” She took a big sip of tea and sipped it
his clothes, and said, “Where did you get it off, again, Vernon?”
 "The garden. of Brutus,” Uncle Vernon said bluntly. “an institution of the first order for hopeless losers.”
 “I see,” Aunt Marge said. “They’re used to coffee in St. Louis. Brutus, son?” She destroyed the
table.
 “Er—”
 Uncle Vernon crept up behind Aunt Marge’s back.
 “Yeah,” Harry said. Then, feeling he could do things right, he added, “All the time.”
 “It’s fine,” Aunt Marge said. “I don’t have this namby-pamby, wrestling nonsense about .
He doesn’t beat people who deserve it. A good thrashing is necessary in ninety-nine cases out of a
hundred. Have you been beaten many times?”
Page 17 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Oh, yes,” Harry said, “several times.”
 Aunt Marge narrowed her eyes.
 “I still don’t like your tone, baby,” she said. “If you can talk about your tragedies in that gloomy way, .
Turns out they’re not charging you enough. Petunia, I'd write if I were you. Show that
You condone the use of sexual force in this child’s case.”
 Perhaps Uncle Vernon was worried Harry might forget their arrangement; In each case, he
He quickly changed the subject.
 “Did you hear the news this morning, Marge? What about the escaped prisoner, eh?”
 As Aunt Marge began to make herself at home, Harry caught himself thinking almost nostalgically .
of life in fourth place without him. Uncle Vernon and Aunt Petunia usually encourage Harry to
They stayed out of their way, which Harry was only too happy to do. Aunt Marge, on the other hand,
She wanted Harry under her eyes all the time, so she could come up with suggestions for hers
improvement. She was happy to compare Harry to Dudley, and took great pleasure in shopping .
Dudley offers expensive titles while staring at Harry, seemingly getting him to ask why he didn't bring
gift too. She also kept coming up with dark clues as to why Harry was like this.
A dissatisfied person.
 "You mustn't blame yourself for how the boy turned out, Vernon," she said at lunch on the 19
The third day. “If there’s something we don’t have inside, there’s nothing anyone can do.”
 Harry tried to focus on his food, but his hands were shaking and his face was starting to burn with
anger. Remember the perfume, he told himself. Think of Hogsmead. Don't say anything. don't
rise -
 Aunt Marge reached for her glass of wine.
 "It's one of the basic tenets of parenting," she said. “You see it all the time with dogs. whether
Something’s wrong with that baby, there’s got to be something wrong with that baby—”
 At that moment, the glass of wine Aunt Marge was holding exploded in her hand. Glass beads
flickering in all directions and Aunt Marge tossed and turned, her big red face flushed.
 “Marge!” said Aunt Petunia. “Marge, are you okay?”
Page 18 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Don’t worry,” Aunt Marge said, rubbing her face with her pillow. “He had to check it out .
It's very difficult. He did the same thing at Colonel Fubster's kitchen the next day. No need to fret, Petunia, I have
A very strong prison…”
 But Aunt Petunia and Uncle Vernon were both looking at Harry suspiciously, so he decided to
Better to skip the dessert and flee the table as soon as he can.
 Outside in the hall, he leaned against the wall, breathing heavily. It’s been a long time since
He lost control and made something explode. He couldn't let it happen again. the
Hogsmeade's form wasn't the only thing at stake — if he continued like this, he'd be in trouble .
and the Ministry of Magic.
 Harry is still an underaged wizard, and is forbidden by the Law of Wizardry to practice magic abroad
school. His glasses weren't exactly clean either. It was only last summer that he received official warning
That clearly states that if the Ministry gets wind of some more magic on Privet Drive,
Harry would have faced expulsion from Hogwarts.
 He heard the Dursleys leave the table and quickly moved out of the way.
 Harry spent the next three days forcing himself to think about his Do-It-Yourself Broomcare book every time Aunt Marge started on it. This works fine, though
She seemed to give him a pointed look, because Aunt Marge began to voice the opinion that he was .
In his mind under the law.
 Finally, finally, the last evening of Marge’s session arrived. Aunt Petunia cooked something delicious.
Dinner with Uncle Vernon he uncorked several bottles of wine. They got all the way to
Soup and salmon without even mentioning Harry's faults; During the lemon meringue bread,
Uncle Vernon entertained them a with a long talk about Grunnings, his gun company; so
Aunt Petunia served the coffee, and Uncle Vernon brought out a bottle of brandy.
 “Can I try you, Marge?”
 Aunt Marge already had too much wine. His big face was very red.
 “Just a little one, then,” she chuckled. “A little more than that… and a little more… that
Ticket.”
 Dudley was eating his fourth piece of pie. Aunt Petunia was drinking coffee with her little finger.
It's changing. Harry really wanted to disappear into his own bedroom, but was met with Uncle Vernon's .
Ripped little eyes and knew to keep it out.
 “Aah,” Aunt Marge said, licking her lips and pouring the empty brandy glass.
“Nice nosh, Petunia. Normally it’s just a fryup for myself of an evening, with twelve dogs i
Page 19 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Be careful…” she sighed innocently, patting his large tweed coat. “I'm sorry. But I love
See a healthy sized kid,” she finished, looking at Dudley. “Being a man of the right size,
Dudders, just like your dad. Yeah, I’ll have more room than brandy, Vernon…”
 “Now, this one here —”
 She whipped her head towards Harry, and he felt his throat burn. The book, he thought quietly.
 “This one has a fake, creepy look to it. You get that with dogs. I have Colonel Fubster.
One drowned last year. Ratty little thing that is. weak. Under the hood.”
 Harry was trying to remember the twelfth page of his book: The Power to Heal Lying Shifters.
 “It all comes down to blood, as I was saying the other day. Bad blood will flow. Now, I say
Nothing against your family, Petunia” — she touched Aunt Petunia’s bony hand with it .
One whisper “but your sister was a bad white. They appear in the best families. Then she ran away
With the wastrel and here’s the fall right in front of us.”
 Harry was staring at his screen, humor playing in his ears. Hold your body tightly around his neck, he
thought. But he couldn’t remember what happened next. Aunt Marge’s voice sounded piercing.
In as one of Uncle Vernon’s possessions.
 “Oh Potter,” Aunt Marge said aloud, grabbing the bottle of brandy and pouring him more .
glass and over the counter, “you won’t tell me what he did?”
 Uncle Vernon and Aunt Petunia were looking very anxious. Dudley also knew from
Peter would rebuke his parents.
 “He — he’s not working,” Uncle Vernon said, half glancing at Harry. “It doesn’t work.”
 “Just as I expected!” Aunt Marge said, taking a big swig of brandy and clearing her throat.
sleeve. “A countless, useless, fucking bastard who —”
 “It’s not,” Harry said quietly. The table went very quiet. Harry was shaking all over. he
He had never felt so angry in his life.
 “MORE BRANDY!” cried Uncle Vernon, who had gone very white. He put the bottle in
Aunt Marge’s bridesmaids. “You, boy,” he growled at Harry. “Go to bed, keep —”
 “No, Vernon,” Aunt Marge said, holding up a hand, her little bloodshot eyes staring into .
of Harry. “Keep going, baby, keep going. You understand your parents, right? They went off to kill themselves.
In a (drunk, I expect) car accident —”
Page 20 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “They didn’t die in a car accident!” Harry said, getting back on his feet.
 “They died in a car accident, you disgusting little liar, and left you to be a burden on their lot,
Hardworking neighbors!” Aunt Marge said, beaming with excitement. “You’re so incredible,
We don’t like less —”
 But Aunt Marge suddenly stopped talking. For a moment, it seemed like words weren’t enough
her. She seemed to explode with irrational anger—but the flight didn’t subside. her
The big red face started to grow smaller, his little eyes widened, and his mouth opened too tightly for
Word — the next second, several bubbles just popped off his tweed jacket and blew out
The walls — she was leaking like a monster boat, her belly hanging out of her tweed
The ring, each one on his finger melting like salami…
 “MARJ!” shouted Uncle Vernon and Aunt Petunia as Aunt Marge's entire body began
She will rise from her chair and head for the ceiling. It was completely flat, now, like a big life ball with
The bird’s eyes, and her arms and legs bulged in shock as she flew through the air, making
apoplectic noises. Ripper came crawling into the room, barking wildly.
 “UUUUUUUU!”
 Uncle Vernon grabbed one of Marge's ankles and tried to pull her up again, but he almost fainted .
from the earth itself. A second later, Ripper leapt forward, and sank his teeth into Uncle .
Vernon's foot.
 Harry walked out of the bathroom before anyone could stop him, heading for the cupboard under the
Ladies. The dungeon door magically parted as he reached it. Within seconds, he managed
his luggage to the front door. He ran upstairs and ducked under the bed, screaming
The back of the couch was open, and he carried a small tray filled with his books and birthday presents. he
He stormed out, grabbed Hedwig’s empty cage, and raced back down to his trunk, just as
Uncle Vernon came out of the living room, his pant leg in a pool of blood.
 “COME BACK HERE!” he shouted. “GO BACK AND FIX IT!”
 But an uneasy feeling came over Harry. He opened his wallet, took out his wand, and
smiled at Uncle Vernon.
 “You deserve it,” Harry said, breathing out much faster. “She deserved what she got. You're getting away.
From me.”
 He looks behind him for the doorknob.
Page 21 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “I’m going,” Harry said. “I’ve had enough.”
 And the next moment, he was outside on the opposite sidewalk, dragging his heavy pack behind him,
Hedwig's handkerchief under her hand.



Page 22 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Chapter Three
Fighting Vehicle
 Harry was quite a ways away before he stumbled over a low wall at Magnolia Crescent,
He sighs with the effort of pulling his trunk. He remained frozen, anger still rising in him,
She could hear his heartbeat.
 But after ten minutes alone in the side street, a new emotion overtook him: panic. who
The way he saw it, he wasn't in the worst shape. He was stranded, alone, in the dark.
The Muggle world, with absolutely nowhere to go. And worst of all, he just masturbated
Magic, which meant he was about to be kicked out of Hogwarts. broke
Legislation to keep underage girls in bad shape surprised the Women’s Ministry
Agents don’t bother where he stays.
 Harry frowned and looked up and down at Magnolia.
 What, was going to happen to him? to be arrested, or simply barred from the law from
The Wizarding World? Thinking of Ron and Hermione, his heart sank further. Harry
He was sure that, a fight or not, Ron and Hermione would want to help him now, but they were
Both abroad and compared to Hedwig, he was helpless to communicate with them.
 He didn't have any Muggle money, either. There’s a bit of magical gold in the money chest in the
under his box, but the rest of the fortune left to him by his parents was kept in a vault in the
The Widow Gringotts Bank in London. He couldn’t pick up his trunk until
London. unless…
 He looked down at his wand, still clutched in his hand. If it is already downloaded
(His heart was now beating painfully fast), a little more magic couldn't hurt. He had
The Invisibility Cloak he inherited from his father — what if he enchanted the trunk to make it .
A feather light, tied it around his waist, covered himself in blankets, and flew to London? so
He could have withdrawn his remaining money from his wallet and… resumed his life as a nomad. He was a
excited, but he can’t stay on this wall forever, or he’ll find himself trying to explain to
The Muggle police why was he outside at night with a briefcase full of spell books and a
A craft stick.
 Harry opened his wallet again and tossed the contents aside, searching for the invisibility cloak —
But before he could find it, he quickly straightened and looked at it again.
 A funny crack in his head made Harry feel that he was being watched, but
The street was visibly dark, with no light shining from one of the large mansions.
Page 23 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 He bent over his body again, but was about to rise again, his hand clenched at the .
His wand. He had sensed rather than heard it: something or someone was standing in the window
the gap between the garage and the wall behind it. Harry stared at the black street. If only he
He’d watch, and then he’d know if it was just a stray cat or—something else.
 “Lumos,” Harry murmured, and a light flashed at the end of his nose, almost blinding him. he
He held it high over his head, and the smooth walls of number two gleamed suddenly; the
The garage door was illuminated, and through them Harry saw, dimly, the outline of the
Some are very large, with big, shiny eyes.
 Harry stepped back. His feet hit his ribs and he collapsed. His wand slipped out of his hand as if
He reached out to break his fall, and fell, hard, into the pool.
 There was a deafening BANG, and Harry dropped his hands to shield his eyes against a sudden
Blind light...
 Carefully, he made it back to the store, just in time. Seconds later, the two seniors of
cars and windows screeched to a halt exactly where Harry had just been passing by. they
They were, as Harry noticed when he lifted his head, in a three-decker, pink bus, i
It was obvious from thin air. The gold lettering on the hood of the bus reads The Knight Bus.
 For a split second, Harry wondered if he'd been partially fooled by his own fall. Then a boss in
A storm of thunder came out of the bus and started shouting loudly for the night.
 “Welcome to Knight Bus, emergency transportation for babysitter or babysitter who is just left
You wave your hand, press the button, and we can take you anywhere you want to go. My name is Stan.
Shunpike, and I’ll be your boss this Sunday—”
 The driver stopped abruptly. He just caught a glimpse of Harry, who was still sitting on
soil. Harry picked up his wand again and shrugged. Nearby, Stan sees that
Shunpike was only a few years older than him, eighteen or nineteen at least, growing up,
Protruding ears and some earrings.
 “What are you doing down there?” Stan said, putting on his professional manner.
 “He’s lost,” Harry said.
 “'Choo fell on?” exclaimed Stan with a grin.
 “I didn’t do it on purpose,” Harry said, bitterly. One of his fingers in his jeans was torn, and
The hand he held out to break his fall was bleeding. Suddenly, he remembered why he had
Page 24 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
He landed and turned quickly to face the path between the garage and the wall. the
The headlights of the Knight Bus were illuminating it, and it was empty.
 “'Choo looks in?” Stan said.
 “There’s a big red thing,” Harry said, staring uncertainly into the window. “Like a dog… but .
huge…"
 He turned to Stan, his mouth slightly open. With a feeling of annoyance, he looked at Harry
Stan's eyes darted to the scar on Harry's shoulder.
 “Woss this on your 'ead?” Stan said quietly.
 “No,” Harry said quietly, pressing his lips against his forehead. If the Ministry of Magic was
He looked for her, not wanting to spoil them too much.
 “Woss your name?” Stan continued.
 "Neville Longbottom," Harry said, saying the first name that came into his head. “So — so this .
The bus,” he continued briskly, hoping to reassure Stan, “did you say it was going anywhere?
 “Yeah,” Stan said cheerfully, “anywhere you want, 'deep in the ground. Can’t do nuffink underwater.
 “Ere,” he said, again looking suspiciously at him, “have you leaked a secret to us, dincha? Draw your wand.
'And, there?”
 “Yeah,” Harry said quietly. “Listen, how much is it going to cost to get to London?”
 “Eleven Sickles,” said Stan, “but for fifteen you get 'ot chocolate, and for five you get 1 .
'otwater bottle an' toothbrush in the color of your choice.”
 Harry reached into his wallet again, pulled out his wallet of money, and slid some gold into it
Stan's hand. He and Stan then lifted his boat, with Hedwig's balanced cage on top, up and down the stairs .
of the bus.
 There were no seats; Instead, half a dozen brass posts stood next to the corridor windows.
Candles burned in heaps beside each bed, sprinkling the walls with wood shavings. small
The magician in a nightshirt in the back of the bus muttered, “Not now, thanks, I’m picking some magic”
And he fell asleep.
Page 25 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “You’ve got this one,” Stan growled, shoving Harry’s backpack under the bed right behind the .
driver, who was sitting in a chair in front of the car. “This is our driver, Ernie .
Copper. This is Neville Longbottom, Ern.”
 Ernie Prang, an older wizard wearing very thin glasses, nodded to Harry, who smiled in shock .
He blinked again and sat down on his bed.
 “Take'er, Ern,” Stan said, sitting down on the couch next to Ernie's.
 There was another huge BANG, and the next moment Harry found himself collapsed on his bed,
He was hurled backwards by the speed of the Knight Bus. Pulling away, Harry looked up from
the horizon and noticed that they were now swimming in a completely different direction. Stan was
They watched Harry's flushed face with great interest.
 “That’s who we were before you bailed us out,” he said. “Where are we, Ern? Somewhere
In Wales?”
 “Right,” Ernie said.
 “How come Muggles don’t hear the bus?” Harry said.
 "them!" Stan said cautiously. “They didn’t hear right, did they? Don’t look right either.
They don't see your nuffin, they don't'.”
 “You better go wake up Mrs. Marsh, Stan,” Ern said. “We’ll be at Abergavenny in a minute.”
 Stan crossed Harry's bed and climbed onto a narrow wooden staircase. Harry was still smiling.
out the window, I become increasingly anxious. Ernie doesn’t seem to know how to use
The wheel of a locomotive. Knight's bus kept going up and down the pavement, but he didn't catch anything; The lines of
silverware, mailboxes, and trash cans flew out of her way as she approached and returned to .
position when he passes.
 Stan went back downstairs, followed by a slender blond woman wrapped in a traveling suit.
 “'Ere you go, Madam Marsh,” Stan said cheerfully as Ern leaned on the fridge and the beds slid out a .
A foot or so to the front of the bus. Madam Marsh held a handkerchief in her mouth and
she moved quickly. Stan hauled his bag behind him and slammed the doors; was
Another loud BANG, and they were riding down a narrow country lane, trees bouncing off the
way.
 Harry couldn't sleep even if he was traveling in a carriage that didn't take
They beep loudly and leap a hundred miles at a time. His stomach lurched as he dropped to
Page 26 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
They wondered what would happen to him, and if the Dursleys had managed to get their aunt .
Margin of roof still.
 Stan unfolded a copy of the Daily Prophet and was now reading with his tongue between his lips .
teeth. A large portrait of a sunken-faced man with long, shaggy hair slowly stared at Harry .
From the first page. He looks terribly familiar.
 “That man!” Harry said, forgetting his excitement for a moment. “It’s on the Muggle news!”
 Stanley flipped to the first page and chuckled.
 “Sirius Kid,” he said, smirking. "The 'course 'e been on the Muggle news, Neville. where are you
was?"
 Giving a strange sort of smirk at Harry's gloomy appearance, he ripped out the first page, and
He gave it to Harry.
 “You need to read more scripts, Neville.”
 Harry held the paper up to the candlelight and read:
 BLACK IS STILL GREAT
 Sirius Black, possibly the most dangerous prisoner ever held in Azkaban prison, is still
It is undergoing arrest, the Ministry of Defense confirmed today.
 "We're doing everything we can to bring back the black," Meteorological Minister Cornelius Fudge said this
Saturday morning, “and we ask the magical community to remain silent.”
 Fudge has been criticized by some members of the U.S. international for
compared to the Muggle Prime Minister's response to the crisis.
 "Well, I really should, don't you know," said an excited Fudge. “Black is lame. He’s dangerous.
For anyone who crosses it, wizard or Muggle. I have the Prime Minister’s assurance that I will
He didn’t breathe a word of Black’s true identity to anyone. And let’s face it — who would believe it if .
did?"
While Muggles have been told that Black carries a gun (a type of metal wand worn by Muggles
used to kill each other), magical society lives in fear of crime as the twelve
Years ago, when Black killed thirteen people at one party.
Page 27 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry looked into the shadowed eyes of Sirius Black, the only part of the face drooping that
He appeared alive. Harry had never met a vampire, but he had seen pictures of them in his Defense .
Against the Dark Arts doctrines, he is Black, with his waxy white skin looking just like one.
 “Scary looking foot, inee?” Stan said, who was watching Harry read.
 “He killed thirteen people?” Harry said, handing the page back to Stan, “with one party?”
 “Yep,” said Stan, “in front of the witnesses an' all. Daylight is great. The biggest problem he caused, there,
Ern?”
 “Ar,” Ern whispered.
 Stan spun around in his car, hands on hips, as he had to look at Harry.
 "Black woz is a big member of YouKnow'Oo," he said.
 “What, Voldemort?” Harry said, without thinking.
 Even Stan’s hair turned white; Ern reduced the cargo needs so drastically that the farmhouse was completely
We had to jump to the side to avoid the bus.
 “Are you out of your tree?” Stan shouted. “'Choo said 'is the name for?”
 “I’m sorry,” Harry whispered. “Sorry, I — I forgot —”
 "forgot!" Stan said sadly. “Blimey, my 'heart goes' so…”
 “So — so Black was a victim of you-who?” Harry demanded teasingly.
 “Yeah,” Stan said, still pumping his chest. “Yes, of course. Very close to you know-'Oo, they
Tell me… whatever it was, when 'little Arry Potter' got YouKnowOo” — Harry in shock .
They flicked her hair down again — “all of YouKnow-'Oo's supporters are led, not .
They, Ern? Most of them knew that all was over, wiv YouKnow-'Oo was gone, and they came quiet. but
Not Sirius Black. I heard he thought he'd be second in command once You-Know-'Oo 'caught
over.
 “Anyway, they cornered Black in the middle of an alley full of Muggles an' Black blew 'is .
The wand and 'e blasted 'alf way apart, an' a wizard got it, an' so did dozens of Muggles what got
On the road. 'That's awful, yes? An' you know what Black did then?” Stan continued on a stage
whisper.
Page 28 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "what?" Harry said.
 “Laughs,” Stan said. “Jus' standing there an' laughing. An' when the promotion comes from the ministry
of Magic reached there, 'e walked wiv em silent as anyfink, still laughing 'is 'ead off. 'Cause it's easy,
Where, Ern? What?”
 "If he wasn't when he went to Azkaban, he would be now," Ern said in his low voice. “I’m going to push
Myself before I set foot in the place. Served him right, mind you… after what he did…”
 “I'll 'ad work coverin' it, there' they, Ern?” Stan said. “'Ole road is paved an' all of them .
The Muggle is dead. What did they say 'would' happen, Ern?”
 “Too much gas,” Ernie chuckled.
 “An' now 'e's out,” Stan said, using a newspaper picture of Black's flushed face.
"Wasn't he a stray out of Azkaban before, 'cause there, Ern? Beats me 'ow 'e did it. Scary,
Yes? Mind, I don't understand 'is the argument against them Azkaban guards, eh, Ern?”
 Ernie suddenly panicked. “Talk about another summat, Stan, there’s a nice guy. They are Azkaban.
The guards give me stuffed animals.”
 Stan put the paper away reluctantly, and Harry leaned against the back of the Knight Bus,
You feel better than ever. He couldn't help but imagine what Stan might have said to his passengers in
Some night time.
 “'Earring on that 'Arry Potter'? Blew up 'cause you're an aunt! We’re on the knight’s train, aren’t we,
Arn? 'e was trin' to run…”
 He, Harry, violated the same wizarding law as Sirius Black. Was Aunt Marge unwell?
Will he be thrown into Azkaban? Harry knew nothing about the Wizard's Fortress, though everyone
He hadn't heard them talking about him he did so with a tone of fear. Hagrid, Hogwarts Game Warden,
They had spent two months there only last year. Harry would soon forget the look of horror on
Hagrid’s face when he was told where he was going, and Hagrid was one of those who wanted
People who know Harry.
 Knight Bus roared through the darkness, handing out roses and toilet paper, telephone
steam and trees, and Harry sat, restless and sad, on his feather bed. After a while, Stan
He remembered that Harry had paid for the hot chocolate, but he poured it all over Harry’s nose when he left
Bus services are available from Anglesey to Aberdeen. One by one, witches and wizards in uniform
gowns and sandals came down from the upper floors to exit the bus. They all looked very
I would gladly go.
Page 29 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Eventually, Harry was the only passenger left.
 “Just so, Neville,” Stan said, folding his arms, “where in London are you?”
 “Diagon Street,” Harry said.
 “Right,” Stan said. “'Old tight, then.”
 bang.
 They were traveling on Charing Cross Road. Harry kept looking at the building and
Banks are weaning themselves off the Knight Bus route. The sky was slightly overcast.
He’d stay downstairs for two hours, go to Gringotts the moment it opened, and then leave —
Where, he didn't know.
 Ern slammed on the brakes and the Knight Bus stopped in front of a young and
the dungeon of the spectacular view, the Leaky Cauldron, behind which is the trap door to Diagon Alley.
 “Thanks,” Harry said to Ern.
 He climbed down the stairs and helped Stan haul his trunk and Hedwig's cage over the fence.
pavement.
 “Okay,” Harry said. “Bye then!”
 But Stan wasn't paying attention. He was still standing at the bus door, staring at
enter the Leaky Cauldron screenshot.
 “There you are, Harry,” said a voice.
 Before Harry could turn around, he felt a hand on his shoulder. At the same time, Stan shouted,
“Blimey! Ern, come 'ere! Come 'ere!”
 Harry looked at the owner of the hand on his shoulder and felt a bucket full of ice sink into it .
His stomach — he went straight to Cornelius Fudge, the minister of tattooing himself.
 Stan jumped onto the rack next to them.
 “What do they call Neville, Minister?” he said proudly.
 Fudge, a bearded little man with a long, gray moustache, looked cold and tired.
 “Neville?” Again, smiling. “This is Harry Potter.”
Page 30 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “I know it!” Stan shouted angrily. “Arn! Arn! Thought 'oo Nevil was it, Ern! 'E and 'Arry Peter! I can
See 'tis the magic!”
 "Yeah," Fudge sighed, "well, I'm so glad the Knight Bus took Harry, but he and I need
He’s going inside the Leaky Pot now…”
 Fudge increased the pressure on Harry's cock, and Harry found himself being led inside .
The shop. A bowed figure, carrying a lantern, appeared through a doorway at the back of the hallway. compliance
Tom, the toothless landlord.
 “You’ve got it, Minister!” Tom said. “Would you be wanting anything? beer? Brandi?”
 "Maybe a pot of tea," Fudge said, still not letting go of Harry.
 There was a loud crack and splash from behind them, and Stan and Ern jumped out, getting .
Harry's crib was Hedwig's cage and they looked happy.
 “'Ow come on don't tell us 'oo you, eh, Neville?” Stan said, looking at Harry, while
Ernie’s snowflake-like face peered happily over Stan’s shoulder.
 "It's a private saloon, please, Tom," Fudge nodded.
 “Hi,” Harry said sadly to Stan and Ern as Tom pointed Fudge towards the hallway driving .
from the bar.
 “Bye, Nevil!” His name is Stan.
 Fudge walked Harry down the hallway behind Tom's body and then into a small kitchen.
Tom snapped his fingers, a spark sprang into life in the window, and he disappeared from the room.
 "Take a seat, Harry," Fudge said, pointing to a chair by the fire.
 Harry sat up, feeling goosebumps rising up his arms despite the fire's glowing light. He took Fudge.
He took off his striped top and tossed it aside, then buttoned up his blue shirt pants like a button
And he sat down in front of Harry.
 “I am Cornelius Fudge, Harry. Minister of Magic.”
 Harry already knew that, of course; He had seen Fudge once before, but the way he was wearing
The owner of the Invisibility Cloak at the time, Fudge wouldn't have known that.
Page 31 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Tom the restaurant owner returns, wearing a waistcoat over his nightgown and carrying a tray of tea and
balls. Placing the tray on a table between Fudge and Harry, he walked out of the bathroom and closed the
The door behind him.
 "Well, Harry," Fudge said, pouring the tea, "You've got us all in a good heap, I don't mind saying . . ."
you. Run away from your aunt and uncle's house like this! I’m starting to think… but you
Safely, and effectively.”
 Fudge crumpet himself and pushed the plate towards Harry.
 “Eat, Harry, you look dead on your feet. Now then… You’ll be happy to hear that we have
She was met with Mrs. Marjorie Dursley's harmless smile. Two members of the accident
Firefighters were dispatched to Privet Drive a few hours ago. Mrs. Dursley had
His nails were shaved and replaced. She had no recollection of the whole incident.
So that’s it, and no harm done.”
 Fudge smiled at Harry over the rim of his teacup, like an uncle teasing a favorite
nephew. Harry, who couldn't believe his ears, opened his mouth to speak, unable to think of
Something to say, and he knotted it again.
 “Oh, do you miss seeing your aunt and uncle?” Fudge said. “Well, I don’t
I deny that they are very angry, Harry, but ready to have you back next summer
As long as you stay at Hogwarts for Christmas and Easter.”
 Harry cleared his throat.
 “I’ve always stayed at Hogwarts for Christmas and Easter,” he said, “and I’ll never
I want them to go back to Privet Drive.”
 "Now, now, I'm sure you'll feel differently when you rest," Fudge said with a smile .
noise. “They are your family, after all, and I am sure you love each other — er — very deeply .
down."
 It never occurred to Harry to put Fudge right back. He’s still waiting to hear what happens .
to him now.
 "So all that's left," Fudge said, now butting himself with a second car, "is to decide where
You will enjoy the last two weeks of your vacation. I highly recommend booking a room here at
The Leaky Cup is…”
 “Hold on,” Harry whispered. “What about my punishment?”
 Fudge frowned. “Punishment?”
Page 32 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “I broke the law!” Harry said. “Underage Restraint Application!”
 “My dear child, we will not punish you for such a small thing!” Fudge yelled, looking
his crumpet is impatient. “It was an accident! We don’t send people to Azkaban just to celebrate
up their aunt!”
 But that doesn't quite square with Harry's previous dealings with the Ministry of Magic.
 “Last year, I got an official warning just because a housemate burned a bunch of powder in my aunt’s house .
home!" he told Fudge, smirking. "The Ministry of Magic says they'll kick me out of Hogwarts if .
There’s more magic in there!”
 If Harry's eyes didn't lie, Fudge suddenly looked stupid.
 “Circumstances change, Harry… We have to take into account… in the current climate… Really .
Don’t you want to be released?”
 “Of course I didn’t,” Harry said.
 “Well then, what’s all the fuss about?” Fudge laughed. “Now, have a cruise, Harry, while I walk .
And see if Tom has a room for you.”
 Fudge stormed out of the bathroom and Harry watched after him. There was something inexplicable.
It continues. Why was Fudge waiting for him at the Leaky Cauldron, if he wasn't going to punish him for
What did he do? And now Harry had come to think of it, certainly not out of habit for the Minister of
Magic itself to get into underage magic issues?
 Fudge returns, accompanied by Tom the restaurant owner.
 "Room eleven is free, Harry," Fudge said. “I think you will feel much better just one shot, and .
I'm sure you can understand... I don't want you to practice in Muggle London, okay?
Continue to Diagon Street. And be back here before dark every night. Of course you do
understand. Tom will be taking care of you for me.”
 “Okay,” Harry said quietly, “but why?”
 “We don’t want to lose you again, do we?” Fudge said with a hearty laugh. “No, no… best we know .
Where are you… I mean…”
 Fudge cleared his throat loudly, and raised an eyebrow with a sharp grin.
Page 33 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Well, I’m going out, too much to do, you know…”
 “Have you had anything to do with Black yet?” Harry asked.
 Fudge's finger ran over the silver knobs of his robe.
 “What’s that? Oh, you heard - well, no, not yet, but it's just a matter of time. Azkaban
The guards failed… and they’re worse than I’ve ever seen them.”
 Fudge stiffened slightly.
 “Okay, I’ll say goodbye.”
 He held out his hand and Harry, shaking it, had a brief idea.
 “Er — minister? Can I ask you something?”
 “Sure,” Fudge grinned.
 "Well, third years at Hogwarts are allowed to visit Hogsmeade, but my aunt and uncle didn't sign
permission form. You think you can —?”
 Fudge was looking uncomfortable.
 “Oh,” he said. “No, no, I’m so sorry, Harry, but since I’m not your parent or guardian—”
 "But you're the minister of magic," Harry said excitedly. “If you give me permission…”
 "No, I'm sorry, Harry, but rules are rules," Fudge growled.
 “Maybe you’ll be able to visit Hogsmeade next year. In fact, I think it’s best if you don’t…
Yeah... Okay, I'm leaving. Enjoy your vacation, Harry.”
 And with a final wave and a wave of Harry's hand, Fudge left the room. Tom now moved on.
He looks at Harry.
 "If you'll follow me, Mr. Potter," he said, "I've already completed your assignment…."
 Harry followed Tom up a sleek wooden staircase to a door with the number eleven copper on it.
which Tom unlocked and opened for her.
 Inside was a very nice looking bed, some very upholstered oak furniture, a pleasant bed .
A crackling fire and, perched on the staircase—
Page 34 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Hidwig!” Harry sighed.
 The snowflake sliced ​​through his forehead and flew onto Harry's arm.
 “You’ve got a lot of taste there,” Tom quipped. “It arrived about five minutes after you did it. whether
There’s something you need, Mr. Potter, don’t hesitate to ask.”
 He gave another bow and left.
 Harry sat on his bed for a long time, messing with Hedwig with his attention. The sky outside the
The screen was slowly changing from a deep, velvet-like red to a cool, steel-like red and then, slowly, to
Shot pink with gold. Harry couldn't believe he had left Privet Drive only a few hours ago.
that he hadn't been expelled, and now he was facing two weeks of completely no Dursleys.
 “It was a very strange night, Hedwig,” he whispered.
 And without even taking off his glasses, he lay back on the pillows and fell asleep.


Page 35 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Chapter Four
The flying saucer
 It took Harry several days to adjust to his new strange freedom. It was never previously possible
He will get up whenever he wants or eat whatever he wants. He can even go anywhere,
Given that it’s in Diagon Alley, and given that this long stretch of grass is filled with a lot of
the best magic shops in the world, Harry didn't feel like breaking his word to Fudge and
Stray back into the Muggle world.
 Harry ate breakfast every morning at the Leaky Cauldron, where he liked to watch each other
The guests: the little local magicians, up at the camp for the day; Respectable looking witches
They struggled with the last article of Transfiguration Today; zoo lookout guards; noisy dwarves;
And once, what looked suspiciously like a nurse, who ordered a plate of raw liver from behind a
a windbreaker balaclava.
 After breakfast, Harry would go out to the backyard, pull out his wand, and grab the third brick from the
Left beyond the checkpoint, and stand back as the shortcut to Diagon Alley opens in the wall.
 Harry spent long sunny days browsing the shops and eating under the bright colors
smiles outside the coffee shop, where his fellow diners were showing each other their receipts (“D
lunascope, old boy — doesn’t mess with lunar maps, see?”) or at least talk about
the case of Sirius Black (“Personally, I won’t let any of the kids go out alone until he’s back in
Azkaban”). Harry didn't have to do his homework under the covers in disguise; now
He could sit in the beautiful sunshine outside Florean Fortescue’s ice house and finish all his
Editing with occasional assistance from Florean Fortescue himself, who, with the intuitive guidance of a great
Deal about the medieval sex fire, gave Harry free sundaes every half hour.
 One time, Harry filled his money bag with Golden Galleons, Silver Sickles, and Bronze Knuts .
From his shop at Gringotts, he must have exercised extreme caution not to spend all that money in
Page 36 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
one. He had to keep reminding himself that he had fifteen years to go to Hogwarts, and how
He would feel like asking the Dursleys for money for spell books, to stop himself from buying a
A beautiful set of solid gold Gobstones (a marble-like ornate play, in which stones
make the brute smell bad in the other player’s face when they lose a point). It was hurting.
He was awarded, too, with a perfect, moving model of the cosmos in a gigantic glass ball, which would have
It means he doesn’t have to take another Astronomy lesson. But the thing that tempts Harry's
His findings were heavily displayed at his favorite store, Quality Quidditch Supplies, a week after he
He reached the Leaky Rabbit.
 Curious as to what the crowd in the tavern was looking at, Harry made his way inside and
He wandered among the excited wizards and witches until he spotted a newly built temple,
Therefore he threw the biggest gun he had ever seen in his life.
 “Just come out — prototype —” a wizard with a big grin was saying to his companion.
 “It’s the fastest sword in the world, isn’t it, Papa?” yelled a boy younger than Harry, who was
He wriggled out of his father's grasp.
 “The Irish International just placed a ban on seven of these beauties!” The owner of
Store told the crowd. "And they're the World Cup champions!"
 An older nun in front of Harry smiled, and he could read the inscription on the front of the wand:
 ** FIRE **
 THIS SPORTS COMPETITION WEATHER IS ONE TIME WORN, SUPERFINE
HORSE HAND, FINISHED WITH A HARD DIAMOND POLISH AND
RECEIVED by hand with his registration number. To each his own
FOUND BIRCH TWIG IN BROOMTAIL EXTENDED TO
AERODYNAMIC COMPLEMENT, GIVE THE FIREBOLT UNCOMFORTABLE BALANCE
AND PROFESSIONAL STATEMENTS. FIREBOLT HAS A SPEED OF 150 MPH
CLOCKS IN TEN SECONDS AND PROVES UNBREAKABLE OPTION
CHARM. COMMENTARY ON SUTTER.
 Price upon request… Harry didn't like to think how much gold the Firebolt would cost. have
He’d never wanted anything like that in his entire life — but he’d never lost a Quidditch match on
Nimbus Two hundred, what's the point of losing his Gringotts wardrobe for
Firebolt, when he already had a pretty good gun? Harry didn't ask the price, but returned,
Pretty much every day after that, just to look at the Firebolt.
 However, there were things Harry needed to buy. He went to the doctor to get filled up.
his bakery shop, and because his school uniforms were now very rarely in
Page 37 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Hand and foot, he visited Madam Malkin's mansion for every occasion, buying hundreds. further
Most importantly, he had to buy his new textbooks, which would mirror those of his two new
Subjects, controlling magical creatures and magic.
 Harry got a surprise when he looked in the window of the bookstore. Instead of the regular display of
Gold-plated notebooks the size of roadside tables, there’s a giant iron cage behind the glass
which holds about ten volumes of the Book of Monsters. The torn pages were falling apart.
Everywhere as the books battled each other, they were locked in furious wrestling matches
and forceful snapping.
 Harry pulled his list of books out of his pocket and examined it for the first time. The Book of the Animal
of Beasts is listed as a required book for the care of magical beasts. Now Harry
You understand why Hagrid thought it would come in handy. He felt happy; was
They wonder if Hagrid wants help with some strange new pet.
 As Harry entered Flourish and Blotts, the manager came running up to him.
 “Hogwarts?” He said quietly. “Come and get your new books?”
 “Yeah,” Harry said, “I need —”
 “Get out of the way,” the manager growled, shoving Harry aside. produced two
Very heavy glasses, he picked up a large, bell-shaped bag and proceeded to the entrance of the
The hero’s bookcase.
 “Hold on,” Harry growled, “I already have one of those.”
 "possess?" A look of great surprise passed over the leader’s face. “Thank the heavens for that.
I’ve been cut five times already this morning —”
 A loud crackling tone stole the air; Two of the monster books catch the third and pull it
apart.
 “Stop it! Stop it!” shouted the manager, swung the ax into the ropes, and hit the
Books are different. “I will never bother them again, never! It was bedlam! I think we see
Good luck when we bought a couple of copies of The Invisible Book of Invisible — the price is a bargain,
And we haven’t found them… Well… is there anything else I can help you with?”
 “Yeah,” Harry said, looking through his list of books, “I need Cassandra’s Future Unfogging .
Wablatsky.”
 “Oh, the Experiment has started, have you?” The manager said, taking off his gloves and taking Harry
At the back of the hallway, where there’s a corner dedicated to painting. There was a small table
Page 38 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
inspired by books like Unraveling the Unbearable: Brace Yourself Against Threats
and Broken Baskets: When Holidays Become Elusive.
 “Here you are,” the official said, climbing up a ladder to pull out a pair of shovels,
A book with a black cover. “Buying the Future. The best tutor for all your basics
materials — palmistry, crystal balls, avian bones.”
 But Harry wasn't listening. His eyes fell on another book, which was in between a discussion of a
Small Panel: Deathly Hallows — What to Do When You Know the Worst Is Coming.
 “Oh, I wouldn’t say that if I were you,” the Headmaster said lightly, looking around to see what Harry was .
He looks at. “You will begin to see signs of death everywhere. It can scare anyone to death.”
 But Harry continued to look at the front cover of the book; He showed a black dog as big as a bear.
With glistening eyes. It looks awkward…
 The official forced the Future Unfogging into Harry's hands.
 "else?" he said.
 "Yeah," Harry said, tearing his eyes away from the dog's and looking quizzically at his book list. “Er
— I need central change and the spell book, third level.”
 Harry emerged from Flourish and Blotts ten minutes later with his new books under his arms and .
He made his way to the Leaky Cauldron, almost didn’t see where he was going and crashed into it
A lot of people.
 He storms off to his room, enters, and places his books on his bed. somebody
She was in to clean; The doors are open and the sun is pouring inside. Harry could hear the
Carriages traveling down an invisible Muggle street behind him and the sound of an invisible crowd
down on Diagon Street. He caught himself in the mirror above the bathroom.
 "It can't be fatal," he told his immediate reflection. “I was in shock when I saw
That thing in Magnolia Crescent… It’s probably just a stray dog…”
 He automatically lifted his hand and tried to smooth his hair.
 "You're fighting a losing battle there, dear," his mirror said in a low voice.
 As the days passed, Harry began looking anywhere he could for a sign of Ron or Hermione.
Many Hogwarts students had now arrived in Diagon Alley, as the semester was about to begin.
Harry meets Seamus Finnigan and Din Thomas, fellow Gryffindors, at Quality Quidditch
Supplies, where they too were ogling the Firebolt; He also ran into the real Neville Longbuttom, the
Page 39 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
A round-faced, forgetful kid outside of Flourish and Blotts. Harry didn't stop talking; Nephil
Turns out he stumbled upon his book folder and was treated to his very strange comment
Grandpa. Harry hoped she hadn't found out that he had pretended to be Neville while running away
From the Ministry of Magic.
 Harry woke up on the last day of vacation, thinking that he would at least meet Ron and
Hermione tomorrow, on the bus to Hogwarts. He got up, dressed, and went to check one last time
Firebolt, and was just wondering where to eat lunch, when someone yelled his name and he
He turned around.
 “Harry! HARRY!”
 There they were, the two of them, sitting outside Florean Fortescue’s Noble Palace— Ron .
She looked incredibly happy, Hermione was so cute, both of them were looking at her with pleasure.
 "eventually!" Ron said, looking at Harry as he sat down. “We went to the Leaky Dog, but they .
He said you were leaving, and we went to Flourish and Blotts, and Mrs. Malkin’s, and —”
 “I got all my school stuff last week,” Harry explained. “How did you know that I stayed in .
Leaky Coffee?”
 “Dad,” Ron said softly.
 Mr. Weasley, who worked for the Ministry of Magic, would have surely heard the whole story .
of what happened to Aunt Marge.
 “Did you really offend your aunt, Harry?” Hermione said in a very serious voice.
 "I don't mean to," Harry said, while Ron roared with laughter. “I just — I lost control.”
 "It's not funny, Ron," Hermione whispered. “Honestly, I’m surprised Harry hasn’t been expelled.”
 “Me too,” Harry admitted. “Forget I was kicked out, I thought I was going to get caught.” He looked at
run. “Your father doesn’t know why Fudge left me, does he?”
 “Maybe because you are, isn’t it?” Ron said, still chuckling. “The famous Harry Potter and all that .
that. I’d love to see what the Ministry would do to me if I blew my uncle off. Keep in mind, they should work
Cut me off first, because my mother will kill me. Anyway, you can ask Dad yourself this
evening. We even stayed at the Leaky Cauldron tonight! So you can come to King's Cross
with us tomorrow! Hermione was there too!”
 Hermione nodded, beaming. “Mum and Dad sent me this morning with all my Hogwarts .
things."
Page 40 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "excellent!" Harry said excitedly. “So, do you have all your new books and stuff?”
 “Look at this,” Ron said, pulling a long thin box out of a bag and opening it. “A brand new shield.
Four inches, willow, including a unicorn horn head. And we have all our books —” He .
He pointed to a large bag under his chair. “What about those monster books, eh? assistant.
He almost cried when we said we wanted two.”
 “What’s that all about, Hermione?” Harry asked, pointing to not one but three dishes lying in the chair.
Beside him.
 "Well, I get more new suits than you, don't I," Hermione said. “These are my books
For mathematics, dealing with magical beings, reading, studying ancient runes, muggle
studies —”
 “What are you doing Muggle Studies?” exclaimed Ron, averting his eyes from Harry. "you
Born a muggle! Your mom and dad are Muggles! You already know all about Muggles!”
 "But it would be interesting to study them from a magic point of view," said Hermione .
seriously.
 “Do you plan on eating or sleeping at all this year, Hermione?” Harry asked, while Ron grinned.
Hermione ignored them.
 “I’ve still got ten Gauls,” she said, looking at her watch. “It was my birthday in September, and
My mom and dad gave me some money so I could buy myself an early birthday present.”
 “How do you tell a good book? Ron said with a grin.
 "No, I don't think so," Hermione said flatly. “I really wanted a horse. I mean, Harry has
Hedwig and you have Errol—”
 “I don’t,” Ron said. “Errol is a family pet. All I’ve got is Skabbers.” He pulled out his pet mouse.
of his pocket. "And far from it," he added, putting Scabbers on the table in
in front of them. “I don’t think Egypt agrees with him.”
 Scabbers was looking paler than usual, and there was a slight stubble in his cheeks.
 "There's a magical creature shop right over there," Harry said, well aware of Diagon Alley .
so far. “You can see if they’ve got anything for Scabbers, and Hermione can bring her mouse.”
 So they paid for their ice cream and crossed the street to the Magical Menagerie.
Page 41 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 There wasn’t much space inside. Every inch of the walls was hidden by the cage. It was smelly and plentiful.
noise because the occupants of these bags were all either barking, sweating, sweating or sweating.
The sorceress behind the project was already advising a wizard on the care of two-gendered dragons,
So Harry, Ron and Hermione waited, looking at the puppies.
 ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵄⴻⵇⵇⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵢⴰⵏⵉⵏ ⵜⵉⵎⴻⵇⵇⵔⴰⵏⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵢⴰⵏⵜ ⵇⵇⵉⵎⴻⵏ ⵜⵜⵇⴻⵔⵔⵉⴱⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵍⵃⴻⵎⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵜⵜⴼⴻⵕⵃⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵢⴰⵏⵉⵏ ⵢⴻⵎⵎⵓⵜⴻⵏ. senior
an owl with rose petals was burning near the window. Poisonous orange snails
They were flying slowly beside their gas tank, and a huge white rabbit kept changing to silk
top hat and bottom again with the tone of the bell ringing. Then there are cats of all colors, accent
dog cage, a bunch of loudly rocking canvas-colored footballs, and on
counter, a huge cage of fierce black rats that were playing some sort of rough game using their
Long, elegant teeth.
 The two-tailed newt wizard appeared, and Ron approached the counter.
 “That’s my mouse,” he told the nurse. “It’s been a little rough since I got it back from 2019.
Egypt.”
 “Bit him on the table,” said the nurse, pulling out of him two heavy black handkerchiefs .
pocket.
 Ron scooped Scabbers out of his underwear and placed him next to his monster friends' cage,
They stopped their bullying tricks and wired for a good turn.
 Like almost everything Ron owned, Scabbers the pig was second hand (it used to belong to
Ron's brother Percy) is a bit of an asshole. Next to the bright rats in the cage, he looked especially
The pain is gone.
 “Hm,” the nurse said, picking up Scabbers. “How much is this mouse?”
 “I don’t know,” Ron said. “It’s very old. It used to belong to my brother.”
 “What power does he have?” said the nurse, watching Scabbers closely.
 “Er —” The truth was that Scabbers didn’t even show an impressive list of abilities.
The witch's eyes moved from Scabbers' broken left ear to his front paw, which had fur .
He lost, and tutted aloud.
 “He’s gone through a storm, this one,” she said.
 "It was like that when Percy gave it to me," Ron said defensively.
Page 42 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Such an ordinary common or wild animal cannot be expected to live more than three years or .
Thus,” said the woman. “Now, if you were looking for something a little more comfortable, maybe .
Like one of them —”
 She pointed at the black bears, who quickly began to bite again. Ron murmured, “Exciting sights.”
 "Well, if you don't want a change, you can try this plant extract," the nurse said, reaching down .
cone and pulls out a small black bottle.
 “Okay,” Ron said. “What a — OUCH!”
 Ron jumped back as something bigger and orange came flying from the highest cage ceiling,
She landed on her head, then launched herself, breathing heavily, at Scabbers.
 “NO, ACRUKSHANKS, NO!” said the nurse, but Scabbers shot from between her hands as if
bar of soap, he landed cross-legged on the floor, then strode for the door.
 “Scabbins!” Ron shouted, running out of the hallway after her; Harry followed.
 It took them nearly ten minutes to apprehend Scabbers, who swallowed an empty paper bag .
Outside of quality quidditch. Ron put the trembling mouse back in his pocket and
Straight away, he massages his head.
 “What’s that?”
 "It's either a very big cat or a very small tiger," Harry said.
 “Where’s Hermione?”
 “Maybe she’ll bring her base.”
 They made their way up the crowded street to the Magical Menagerie. As they reached him,
Hermione appeared, but she didn't have the eagle. His hands were clasped tightly around the
A giant ginger cat.
 “Did you buy the animal?” Ron said, his mouth open.
 “He’s handsome, isn’t he?” Hermione said, blushing.
 It was a matter of opinion, Harry thought. The cat’s ginger taste was thick and creamy, but it was
Sure he had slightly bent knees and his face looked pale and hurt, like he ran
His head into a brick wall. Now that Scabbers was out of sight, however, the cat was smiling .
with satisfaction in Hermione's arms.
Page 43 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Hermione, that thing almost made me cry!” Run said.
 “He didn’t want to do it, did you, Krukshanks?” Hermione said.
 “What about Skabbers?” Ron said, pointing to the blanket in his chest pocket. “He needs rest .
It's rest! How is he going to get around that thing?”
 “That’s my concern, you forgot your monster speller,” Hermione said, dropping a small red bottle in .
Run’s hand. “And stop worrying, Crookshanks will be sleeping in my dorm, Scabbers in
Your property, what’s the problem? Poor Crookshanks, the Wizard says he’s been there for ages; No one
He wants it.”
 “Wonder why,” Ron muttered as they started towards the Leaky Cauldron.
 They found Mr. Weasley sitting at the bar, reading a regular Christmas.
 “Harry!” He said, smiling when he nodded. "how are you?"
 “Okay, thanks,” Harry said as he, Ron and Hermione and Mr. Weasley walked through their groceries.
 Mr. Weasley put his paper down, and Harry saw the now familiar picture of Sirius Black smiling .
in front of him.
 “They haven’t caught him yet, have they?” he asked.
 “No,” said Mr. Weasley, looking very anxious. “They pulled us all out of our day jobs in
department to try and find him, but no luck so far.”
 “Will we get a reward if we take it?” Ron asked. “It would be nice to get some more money
—”
 "Don't worry, Ron," Mr. Weasley said, looking very relieved.
“Black doesn’t fit a 13-year-old driver. It’s the guards of Azkaban who will get
have it back, mark my words.”
 At that moment Mrs. Weasley walked into the bar, loaded with groceries and followed
The twins, Fred and George, are about to start their fifth year at Hogwarts; The newly elected
Head hair, Percy; and the youngest and only Weasley girl, Ginny.
 Ginny, who had always been so taken with Harry, seemed even more conscious of her heart .
than ever when she saw him, probably because he saved her life during their previous year with
Hogwarts. She went very red and murmured “good morning” without looking at him. Percy, however, took
Page 44 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
They held out his hand as gently as if he and Harry had never met and said, “Harry. How nice to see
you."
 “Hi, Percy,” Harry said, trying not to laugh.
 “I hope you’re okay?” Percy said sarcastically, shaking her hand. It was like checking
For the governor.
 “All right, thanks —”
 “Harry!” Fred said, pushing Percy out of the way and kneeling deeply. “Definitely, it’s great to see .
You, old boy —”
 “That’s fun,” George said, pushing Fred aside and taking Harry’s hand in turn. "exist
With a knife.”
 Percy shouted.
 “That’s about it, now,” said Mrs. Wesley.
 "mom!" Fred said, as if he had just seen her and took her hand as well. “How exactly .
food to see you —”
 “I said, that’s enough,” Mrs. Weasley said, placing her groceries in an empty chair. "Hello,
Harry, dear. I suppose you heard our wonderful news?” She pointed at the new lamp.
Badge on Percy's chest. “Second head child in the family!” She said, beaming with pride.
 “And last,” Fred muttered under his breath.
 “I don’t doubt that,” Mrs. Weasley said, with a slight smile. “I thought they didn’t make you two .
prefects.”
 “What do we want to be prefects?” George said, looking rebellious at the very prospect. “It will take
All the satisfaction from life.”
 Ginny laughed.
 “You want to set a good example for your sister!” said Mrs. Weasley.
 "Ginny has other brothers to set an example for her, Mum," Percy sighed. “I’m going to
changed for dinner…”
Page 45 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 He pulled out and George let out a sigh.
 "We're trying to tie it into a pyramid," he told Harry. “But my mother saw us.”
 Dinner that night was a very special affair. Tom, the restaurant owner, installed three dishes in the
episode, and seven of the Weasleys, Harry, and Hermione eat their way through five wonderful things
Lessons.
 “How about we get to King's Cross tomorrow, Dad?” Fred asked as they dug into a restaurant
chocolate pudding.
 "The Ministry provides two cars," Mr. Weasley said.
 Everyone looked at him.
 "why?" Percy said smirking.
 "It's because of you, Perce," George insisted. “And there will be little flags on the walls,
With HB on them—”
 “— to the great Humongous chief,” said Fred.
 Everyone except Percy and Mrs. Weasley nodded their heads.
 “Why do ministries provide vehicles, Dad?” Percy asked again, in a respectful tone.
 “Well, as long as we don’t have one,” said Mr. Weasley, “and as I work there, they do .
Good for me…”
 His voice was low, but Harry couldn't help but notice that Mr. Weasley's ears had turned red, just .
Like Ron's when he was under the influence.
 “Good thing too,” Mrs. Weasley said softly. “You realize how much responsibility you all have .
Among you? Good idea to be in the Muggle Underground… you’re all full of shit, aren’t you
you?"
 "Ron didn't put all his new stuff in his bag," Percy said, sounding amused. "he
I put them on my bed.”
 “You better go get packed as soon as possible, Ron, because we don’t have much time in the morning,”
Mrs. Weasley called with a grin. Ron smirked at Percy.
Page 46 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 After dinner everyone felt very full and sleepy. One by one they made their way up to their
Rooms to check their belongings for the next day. Ron and Percy were near Harry's door. He had just had
He locked and buckled his pack when he heard angry voices from the wall, and went to see
What was going on.
 The door to number twelve was open and Percy was screaming.
 “She’s here, on the bedspread, and I took her off to wipe her —”
 “I didn’t touch it, okay?” Ron yelled back.
 "what's up?" Harry said.
 “My Head Boy badge is gone,” Percy said, turning to Harry.
 “So does Scabbers’ Rat Tonic,” Ron said, pulling stuff out of his bag to check. “I think I
Maybe he left it at the bar—”
 “You’re not going anywhere until you find my secret!” Pierce shouted.
 "I'll get Scabbers' things, I checked," Harry told Ron, and went downstairs.
 Harry was halfway to the bar, which was now very empty, when he heard .
Two more angry shouts came from the dining room. A second later, he recognizes them as Masters.
and Mrs. Weasley'. He hesitates, not wanting them to know he overheard them arguing, when he
The very sound of his name made him stop, and then he approached the hall door.
 “… it wouldn’t make sense not to tell him,” Mr. Weasley sighed. “Harry has every right to
know. I tried to tell Fudge, but he insists that I treat Harry like a child. He is thirteen years old.
and -"
 “Arthur, the truth will shock you!” Mrs. Weasley said with a chuckle. “You really want to succeed .
Harry went back to school so that depended on him? For heaven’s sake, he’s glad he didn’t know!”
 “I don’t want to make him fat, I want to put him on his guard!” replied Mr. Weasley.
“You know how Harry and Ron were, running on their own — they ended up in
The Forbidden Forest twice! But Harry didn’t have to do that this year! When I think what he might have
It happened to him that night he ran away from home! If the battle cannon hadn’t taken him, I
He’s prepared to bet he’ll be dead before the ministry finds him.”
 “But he’s not dead, he’s fine, so what’s the point —”
Page 47 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Molly, they say Sirius Black is mad, and maybe he is, but he was smart enough to run away from .
Azkaban, and that should be impossible. Three weeks ago, no one had seen him hide or
his hair, and I don’t care what Fudge keeps telling Christmas every day, we’re not close .
taking Black rather than creating self-writing stuff. The only thing we know for sure is what
Black behind —”
 “But Harry will be perfectly safe at Hogwarts.”
 “We thought Azkaban was perfectly safe. If Black can get out of Azkaban, he can get into the
Hogwarts.”
 “But no one really believes that Black is after Harry—”
 There was a thud on the wood, and Harry was sure that Mr. Weasley had knocked his fist on the table.
 “Molly, how many times do I have to tell you? They didn’t mention it in the press because Fudge
He wanted to keep quiet, but Fudge left for Azkaban on the night Black escaped. guards said
Fudge that Blacks travels in his sleep for a while now. Always one word: 'He's in
Hogwarts… he's at Hogwarts.' Black is an idiot, Molly, and he wants Harry dead. If you ask
Me, he thinks killing Harry will bring You-Know-Who back to power. Black loses everything.
The night Harry lost You-Know-Who, and spent twelve years alone in Azkaban to explore
Therefore…”
 There was a silence. Harry lingered still close to the door, straining to hear more.
 “Well, Arthur, you must do what you think is right. But you forgot about Albus Dumbledore. I
Don't think anything can hurt Harry at Hogwarts while he's Dumbledore's Apprentice. I think
Did he know about all this?”
 “Of course he knows. We have to ask him if he’s interested in the Azkaban guards setting themselves up
near the schoolhouse gates. He wasn’t happy about it, but he accepted.”
 “Aren’t you happy? Why shouldn’t he be happy, if they’re there to capture Black?”
 "Dumbledore doesn't like the Azkaban guards," Mr. Weasley insisted. “Me too, if .
It comes down to that… but when you’re dealing with a wizard like Black, sometimes you have to join
Forces with those you’d rather avoid.”
 “If they save Harry—”
 “– then I won’t say another word against them,” Mr. Weasley said sadly. “It’s late, Mully,
We’d better go…”
Page 48 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry heard the chairs move. As quietly as he could, he crept down the street to the bar and left
of view. The hall door opened, and a few seconds later footsteps told her that Mr. and Mrs.
The Weasleys were having sex.
 A bottle of rat tonic was lying under the table they were sitting at earlier. Harry waited until
He heard Mr. and Mrs. Wesley's bedroom door close, and then he headed back upstairs with the bottle.
 Fred and George were cowering in the shade in the backyard, roaring with laughter as they
She heard Percy leave her and Ron's room in search of his secret.
 “We got him,” Fred whispered to Harry. “We’ve been talking about it.”
 The sign now read Bighead Boy.
 Harry forced a laugh and went to give Ron the worm tonic, then locked himself in his room and slept
In his bed.
 So Black Sirius was after him. This explained everything. Fudge was nice to him.
for he was very relieved to find him alive. Making Harry try to stay on Diagon Street
Where there were plenty of wizards to keep him company. and was driving two ministry vehicles.
He was going to take them all to the station tomorrow, so the Weasleys could look after Harry until he was
On the train.
 Harry kept listening to the anger beyond the door and wondered why he didn't feel more
afraid. Sirius Black killed thirteen people with one attack; Mr. and Mrs. Wesley
He obviously thought Harry would stop panicking if he knew the truth. But Harry happened
Agreed wholeheartedly with Mrs. Weasley that the safest place on earth was wherever Albus was .
It was Dumbledur that he happened to be. Don’t people always say that Dumbledore is the only person
Was Mr. Voldemort ever afraid? Surely Black, as Voldemort’s right hand, would
Would you do just that?
 And there were these guards in Azkaban everyone was talking about. They seem scared.
Most people don’t make sense, and if they are posted throughout the school, Black’s powers n
Getting in seemed so far away.
 No, at all, the thing that intrigued him most about Harry was the fact that he was destined to visit .
Hogsmeade now looked the same as zero. No one wanted Harry to leave the safety of the castle.
until Black is attacked; In fact, Harry suspected that every aspect of it would be carefully guarded until
The danger has passed.
Page 49 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 He stared at the dark ceiling. Did they think he couldn’t take care of himself? Fleeing from the Lord
Voldemort three times; It’s not all that useless…
 Unbidden, the image of the animal on the corner of Magnolia Crescent crossed his mind. What will
Do when you know the worst is coming.
 "I won't," Harry said quietly.
 “That’s the spirit, dear,” said her mirror sleepily.



Chapter Five
The dementurn
 Tom woke Harry the next morning with his usual toothless toothbrush and a cup of tea. Harry found
He got dressed and was just convincing a disgruntled Hedwig to go back to her cage when Ron
He bounced his way into the room, pulling a towel over his head and looking irritated.
 “The sooner we get to the bus, the better,” he said. “At least I can leave Percy at
Hogwarts. Now he’s accusing me of stepping on glass for his portrait of Penelope Clearwater. you
They know,” Ron grinned, “his girlfriend. She hid her face under the frame because her nose
It all went wrong…”
 “I have something to tell you,” Harry began, but was interrupted by Fred and George, .
who turned in to yell at Ron for fucking Percy again.
 They headed downstairs into the evening, where Mr. Weasley was reading the front page of the Daily .
Christmas with a crooked beard and Mrs. Weasley was telling Hermione and Ginny about love
potion she made as a young girl. All three were giggling a bit.
 “What were you saying?” Ron asked Harry as they sat down.
Page 50 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Later,” Harry mumbled as Percy slid inside.
 Harry hadn't had a chance to talk to Ron or Hermione in the absence of discovery; They were a lot of work.
They launched all of their garbage into the Leaky Cauldron's pit, gathering it near the
door, with Hedwig and Hermes, Percy's squirrel, living upstairs in their dens. Small
the grape herd stood by the grapevine, breathing loudly.
 “It’s okay, Crookshanks,” Hermione said with a shrug. “I’m going to take you out in the
train."
 “You won’t,” Ron said quietly. “What about poor Skabbers, eh?”
 He gestured to his chest, where a large bruise indicated that Scabbers had been crushed in his throat.
 Mr. Weasley, who was outside waiting for the department vehicles, stuck his head inside.
 “They’re here,” he said. “Harry, come on.”
 Mr. Weasley walked Harry down a walkway to the first of the two
vintage red cars, each driven by a sinister-looking wizard wearing a
Emerald velvet lining.
 “In you, Harry,” Mr. Weasley said, looking up and down the crowded street.
 Harry got into the back of the car, which was soon joined by Hermione, Ron, and, to Ron's .
Hate, Pierce.
 The journey to King's Cross was relatively uneventful compared to Harry's Knight Bus ride.
The vehicles of the Ministry of Magic looked almost normal. Although Hari noticed that they could slip.
with speeds Uncle Vernon’s new company car couldn’t manage. they
reached King's Cross with twenty minutes to spare; Department drivers found vehicles for them.
They emptied their bags, touched their bags in tribute to Mr. Weasley, and drove away, somehow .
He managed to jump over the top of a non-moving wall into the traffic lights.
 Mr. Weasley stayed close to Harry's lap until he entered the room.
 “Just,” he said, looking back at them. “Let’s do this together, since there are so many of us.
I’ll go through first with Harry.”
 Mr. Weasley walked to the corridor between the ninth and tenth floors, pushing Harry's car .
And they seem to be very fond of the InterCity 125 which just reached the ninth gear. with a
A meaningful glance at Harry, who sat calmly over the shock. Harry followed.
Page 51 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 At one point, they fell sideways through the metal plate on the ninth and
Three blocks and he looked up to see the Hogwarts Express, a red steam engine, billowing smoke .
on a table full of witches and wizards watching their children go off to the train.
 Percy and Ginny suddenly appeared behind Harry. They were breathing and obviously holding
line in one pass.
 “Oh, there’s Penelope!” Percy said, thickening his lips and turning purple. Ginny was arrested.
Harry's eyes widened, and they both turned away to hide their laughter as Percy turned to a girl with a .
Her long, dark hair walked with her chest hanging so she couldn’t carry her shiny badge.
 When the remaining Weasleys and Hermione joined them, Harry and Mr. Weasley reconciled .
Road to the end of the train, past the crowded shops, to a very empty looking car.
They put blankets on it, put Hedwig and Crookshanks in the wardrobe, and went .
He went back outside to say goodbye to Mr. and Mrs. Weasley.
 Mrs. Weasley kissed all of her children, then Hermione, and finally Harry. It was embarrassing, but
She was actually very pleased, when she gave him an extra hug.
 “Be careful, won’t you Harry?” She said as she straightened, her eyes wide with shock. so
She opened her large handbag and said, “I made sandwiches for you all. Here you are,
Ron… no, they weren't corn stalks… Fred? Where was Fred? Here you are dear…”
 “Harry,” Mr. Weasley said softly, “come here sometime.”
 He nodded to a pillar, and Harry followed behind him, leaving the others .
she looked like Mrs. Weasley.
 “There’s something I need to tell you before you go —” Mr. Weasley said in a low voice.
 “It’s okay, Mr. Weasley,” Harry said, “I already know.”
 "You ran? How would you know?”
 “I — er — overheard you and Mrs. Weasley talking yesterday. I couldn’t help hearing,” Harry added .
quickly. "Sorry -"
 “That’s not how I chose you to know,” said Mr. Weasley looking sorrowful..
 “No — honestly it’s okay. That way, you don’t break your word to Fudge and I know what the
It’s going on.”
Page 52 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Harry, you must be afraid — “
 “I’m not,” Harry said honestly. “Sure,” he added, because Mr. Weasley was smirking .
He didn't believe it. “I’m not trying to be a hero, but seriously, Sirius Black can’t be any worse than Lord .
Voldemort, could he?”
 Mr. Weasley cringed at the sound of the name, but shrugged it off.
 “Harry, I know you are, well, made of stronger stuff than Fudge thinks, and I .
Obviously you’re glad you’re not afraid, but —”
 "Arthur!" exclaimed Mrs. Weasley, who was now huddling with the rest of us to the bus. “Arthur, what
Do you? He’s almost gone!”
 “Come on Molly!” Mr. Weasley said, but turned back to Harry and kept talking softly .
and a more modest tone, “Listen, I want you to give me your word—”
 “ — that I would be a good boy to stay in the castle?” Harry said calmly.
 "Not entirely," said Mr. Weasley, who sounded paler than Harry had ever seen him.
“Harry, swear to me you won’t go looking for Black.”
 Harry stared, “What!”
 There was a loud bell. The guards were walking through the train, knocking all the doors.
 “Promise me, Harry,” Mr. Weasley said, speaking more slowly, “that whatever happened —”
 “Why would I go looking for someone I know wants to kill me?” Harry said with a shrug.
 “I assure you that whatever you hear —”
 “Arthur, quickly!” said Mrs. Wesley.
 Steam was leaking from the machine and it started to move. Harry ran to the stall door.
And Ron spread it open and stood back to let him enter. They removed themselves from the window and reached for the
Mr. and Mrs. Weasley until the boat turned a corner, blocking them from view.
 “I need to talk to you soon,” Harry whispered to Ron and Hermione as the train pulled away .
speed.
 “Go, Ginny,” Ron said.
Page 53 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Oh, that’s nice,” Ginny sighed and stormed off.
 Harry, Ron, and Hermione set off down the street, looking for an empty lot, but all
were full except for the one at the end of the train.
 This has only one victim, a man sitting fast asleep by the window. Harry, Ron, and
Hermione looked at the ceiling. The Hogwarts Express was specifically reserved for students
And they had never seen an old man there before, except for the witch who ran the food cart.
 The stranger was wearing a very strange Wizard costume, which was introduced in
Lots of places. He looked sick and tired. Although very young, her light brown hair was
He was shot dead.
 “Who do you think it is?” Ron smiled as they sat down, and closing the door, they took seats
farthest from the window.
 “Professor RJ Lupine.” exclaimed Hermione suddenly.
 “How do you know that?”
 “That’s on his mood,” she replied, pointing to the pile of things on the man’s head, where he was .
a small, portable case held together by a large ribbon tied neatly together. The name
Professor RJ Lupine is mounted on a corner in skull lettering.
 “You ask what he teaches?” Ron said, nodding at Professor Lupine's confused expression.
 “Of course,” Hermione whispered. "There's only one spot left, isn't there?" Defense against
The dark arts.”
 Harry, Ron, and Hermione already had two Anti-Dark Arts Defense Arts masters, both of
which only lasted a year. There were rumors that the job was jinxed.
 "Well, I hope he's around," Ron said doubtfully. “Looks like one good hex would complete it .
It's confusing, isn't it? Anyway…” he turned to Harry, “what are you going to tell us?”
 Harry explained all about Mr. and Mrs. Weasley's fate and the orders that Mr. Wesley had .
It’s just given to him. When he was done, Ron looked like thunder, and Hermione had her arms around
His mouth. Finally she shook them off to say, “Did Sirius Black run off to come after you? Oh,
Harry… you have to be really, really careful. Don’t go looking for trouble, Harry…”
 “I don’t go looking for trouble,” Harry said, sternly. “Usually, the problem gets me.”
Page 54 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “How wild does Harry have to be, to go looking for a nutter who wants to kill him?” Run said
S is stirring.
 They took the news far better than Harry had intended. Run and Hermione looked like
He would be afraid of Black a lot more than he was.
 "No one knows how he got out of Azkaban," Ron growled. “No one did
before. And yet he was a maximum security prisoner.”
 “But they’ll catch him, won’t they?” Hermione said anxiously. “I mean, they all have
Muggles search for it too…”
 “What’s that noise?” Ron said quietly.
 A low, low sort of humming was coming from somewhere. They looked around.
store.
 "That's from your trunk, Harry," Ron said, standing up and reaching for the wardrobe.
A moment later he pulled out a pocket Sneakoscope from among Harry's blankets. compliance
She looked very quickly in Ron's hand and glowed bright red.
 “Is that the Sneacoscope?” Hermione said excitedly, standing up to get a better look.
 “Yeah… mind you, that’s a pretty cheap one,” Ron said. “It went haywire as soon as I was attached to
Errol’s foot to send to Harry.”
 “Did you do anything unsafe at that time?” Hermione said knowingly.
 "No! Well... I wasn't using Errol. You know he wasn't really around for long.
Trips… but how else did I get Harry’s gift to her?”
 “Put it back in the box,” Harry said as he whipped out the Sneakoscope with a lightning bolt, “or he’ll wake up .
established.”
 He nodded at Professor Lupin. Run filled the Sneakoscope in two particularly nasty individuals.
of Uncle Vernon's old hat, which had died with the sound, and then she tied on it the keyhole.
 “We can record it at Hogsmeade,” Ron said, sitting up. “They sell that kind of .
thing in Dervish and Banges, magic instruments and so on. Fred and George told me.”
 “Do you know much about Hogsmeade?” Hermione asked curiously. “I thought he was the only
Entirely a non-Muggle residence in Britain —”
Page 55 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Yeah, I think it is,” Ron said quietly. “But that’s not why I want to go. I just
I want them to get inside the Honeydukes!”
 “What’s that?” Hermione said.
 “It’s this swamp,” Ron said, a dreamy look coming across his face, “where they got .
Everything… Pepper Imps — they make you put cigarettes in the mouth — and full fat Chocoballs .
of strawberry mousse and whipped cream, and a really nice sugar coating, which you can suck on
reading and just looking like you’re thinking about what to write next–”
 “But Hogsmeade is a very special place, isn’t it?” Hermione repeated angrily. “In the Places of
Historical Sorcery states that the castle was the headquarters of the Beast Rebellion of 1612, and
Shreiking Shack's got to be the most horribly haunted building in Britain —”
 “– and giant sherbet balls that allow you to lean a few inches off the floor while you’re
Shut them up,” Ron said, obviously not hearing a word Hermione was saying.
 Hermione looked up at Harry.
 “Wouldn’t it be nice if I left school for a bit and we checked out Hogsmeade?”
 “'Spect it will be,” Harry insisted. “You’ll have to tell me when you find out.”
 “What do you mean?” Run said.
 “I couldn’t leave. The Dursleys didn’t sign my permission form, and neither did Fudge.”
 Ron looked shocked.
 “Are you not allowed to come? But — no way — McGonagall or anyone is going to give it to you .
permission -"
 Harry gave a bitter laugh. Professor McGonagall, the head of Gryffindor house, was very strict.
 “– Or we could ask Fred and George, they know every secret passageway out of the castle —”
 “Run!” Hermione said suddenly. “I don’t think Harry should sneak out of school with
Black on the tail —”
 "Yeah, I expect that's what McGonagall will say when I ask permission," Harry sighed.
 "But if we are with him," Ron said spiritedly to Hermione. “Black is not enough —”
Page 56 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Oh, Ron, don’t talk nonsense,” Hermione whispered. “Black has already killed a bunch of
People in the middle of a crowded street, you really think he’s going to tend to pee
Harry just because we were there?”
 Crookshanks’ coat flaps were fading as she spoke.
 “Don’t let that thing out!” Ron said, but too late; Crookshanks jumped lightly from the roost,
He ran, reached, and climbed over Ron's legs; The knot in Run’s pocket tightened and he
ejaculated Crookshanks indignantly.
 “Come out of it!”
 “Ron, don’t do it!” Hermione said excitedly.
 Ron was about to retort when Professor Lupine snapped. viewed with fear,
But he just turned his head away, his mouth slightly open, and he slept.
 The Hogwarts Express moved slowly north and the view out the window became even more brutal
and gray while the clouds overhead towered over their heads. People were following back and
in front of their cabin door. Crookshanks now sits in an awkward position, his
His hardened face turned to Ron, his dark eyes on Ron's top coat.
 At one in the morning, the nurse arrived at the kitchen door with a cart of food.
 “Do you think we should send him?” Run asked nervously, tilting his head at the teacher
Lubin. “Looks like it could do with some food.”
 Hermione approached Professor Lupine cautiously.
 “Er — Master?” She said. “Excuse me — Professor?”
 He didn't move.
 “Don’t worry, sweetheart,” the nurse said, as she handed over a large bowl of cookies. “If he is
He’s hungry when he wakes up, and I’ll be in front with the rider.”
 “I thought he slept?” Ron said quietly, as the woman smoothed the car door closed. "I
Mean — he’s not dead, is he?”
 “No, no, he’s breathing,” Hermione whispered, grabbing the cake Harry had passed to her.
Page 57 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 It may not be the best company, but the presence of Professor Lupine in their company has .
its users. In the afternoon, just as it started to rain, flushing the windows looking out the window,
They heard footsteps outside on the street again, and their three victims appeared very unhappy
At the entrance: Draco Malfoy, flanked by his friends, Vincent the Krab and Gregory Goyle.
 Draco Malfoy and Harry had been rivals ever since they met on their first trip to
Hogwarts. Malfoy, who had a pale, wrinkled, round face, was in the Slytherin house; played
An observer on the Slytherin Quidditch team, the same position Harry played in Gryffindor
staff. Crabbe and Goyle seemed to be there to do what Malfoy said. They are both great and
body; The crabbe was great, with a rich and delicious sauce; Goyle has a brief,
Ragged cheeks and long, gorilla arms.
 “Well, look who it is,” Malfoy grinned in his old-fashioned grin, pulling open the door to the box.
“Potty and toilet.”
 Crabbe and Goyle chuckled shyly.
 "I heard your father finally got his hands on some gold this summer, Weasley," Malfoy said.
“Did your mother die of anxiety?”
 Ron stood so slowly that Crookshanks' box fell to the ground. Professor Lupine offered a
Snort.
 “Who is this?” Malfoy said, taking a step back from the desk when he saw Lupine.
 "The new teacher," said Harry, who had sprung to his feet as well, in case he had to catch up with Ron. "what
Did you mean, Malfoy?”
 Malfoy's glowing eyes; He wasn't stupid enough to pick a fight under the teacher's thumb.
 "C'mon," he growled at Crabbe and Goyle, and they disappeared.
 Harry and Ron sat down again, Ron massaging her shoulders.
 "I'm not taking any shit from Malfoy this year," he growled. “I mean to say. If it does
One more lie about my family, I’ll grab him by the throat and —”
 Ron made a deceptive gesture in the air.
 "Ron," Hermione whispered, pointing at Professor Lupine, "be careful…"
 But Professor Lupine was still fast asleep.
Page 58 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 The rain intensified as the train sped north; The windows were now solid, gleaming.
heavy, which gradually shriveled until flashes burst into life on all street corners and beyond
Shapes of products. The train shakes, the rain pours, the wind blows, but still, the teacher
Lubin fell asleep.
 “We should get closer to there,” Ron said, leaning forward to look up at Professor Lupine in the current
The window is completely black.
 The words barely left him when the train began to slow down.
 “It’s fine,” Ron said, getting up and carefully walking past Professor Lupine to try and see outside.
“I am starving. I want to get to the wedding…”
 “We can’t be there,” Hermione said, glancing at her watch.
 “Then why did we stop?”
 The car was slowly moving. As the volume of the pistons dropped, the wind and rain
louder than ever against the windows.
 Harry, who was closest to the door, got up to look around the hallway. Along the trailer, the heads
They were drifting wildly from their houses.
 The train came to a screeching halt, and distant noises and noises told them that luggage had fallen
from the boards. Then, suddenly, all the lights went off and they collapsed in total
Darkness.
 “What’s going on?” said Ron's voice from behind Harry.
 "Oh!" exclaimed Hermione. “Ron, that was my back!”
 Harry felt his way to his seat.
 “You think we lost?”
 "I don't know..."
 There was a clicking sound, and Harry spotted Ron's black belt, wiping a clean
at the window and looks out.
 "There's something moving over there," Ron said. “I think people are coming on board…”
 The exit door suddenly opened, and someone fell painfully on Harry's shoulders.
Page 59 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "I'm sorry! Do you know what's going on? Uch! I'm sorry -"
 "Hi, Neville," Harry said, groaning in the darkness and pulling Neville in by a hug.
 “Harry? are you? What’s going on?”
 “No idea! stay -"
 There was a violent thud and a painful crash; Neville had promised to keep up with Crookshanks.
 “I’m going to go ask the driver what’s going on,” said Hermione’s voice. Harry felt it
Past him, he heard the door slide open again, then a gasp and two pained thuds.
 “Who is this?”
 “Who is this?”
 “Ginny?”
 “Hermione?”
 "what are you doing?"
 “I was looking for Ron —”
 “Come in and sit down —”
 “Not here!” Harry said quietly. "I'm here!"
 "Oh!" Nibil said.
 "quiet!" A low voice said.
 Professor Lupine seemed to have finally woken up. Harry could hear movements around him.
 None of them spoke.

 A loud crackling, thumping, and crackling light filled the space. Professor Lupine
He looked like he was holding a firearm. They examined his tired, bruised face, but his eyes
Looking sharp and sharp.
Page 60 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Stay where you are.” He said in a low voice, and slowly rose to his feet.
A hand of fire held out in front of him.
 But the door opened wide before Lupine could reach it.
 Standing in the doorway, enveloped by a burning flame in Lupine's hand, was a cloaked figure .
Figure that stretched up to the ceiling. His face was completely hidden under his mask. Harry's eyes
Darted downstairs, what he saw made his stomach churn. There was one hand sticking out.
from the clothes and it was shiny, pale, looking thin, and crushed, like something dead
who had fallen into the water...
 But it was only visible for a fraction of a second. It sounds like the person under the hair felt
Glancing at Harry, the handle was suddenly pulled into the fold of his black robe.
 And then the thing under the hood, whatever it was, let out a long, slow, steady breath, like
though she was trying to push something more than air out of her surroundings.
 A great cold touched them all. Harry felt his own breath catch in his chest. The cold went away.
deeper than his skin. It was inside his chest, it was inside his very heart…
 Harry's eyes rolled into his head. He couldn't see. He was sinking in the cold. There is a
They ran through his ears like water. was being dragged downwards, the erosion was increasing
Out loud…
 And then, in the distance, he heard screams, terrified, terrified, screaming. He wants to
Help whoever it is, he tries to move his hands, but he can’t… Thin white fog was swirling
in front of it, inside it —
 “Harry! Harry! Are you okay?”
 Someone was covering his face.
 "what is?"
 Harry opened his eyes; There were windows above, and the floor sloped — the
The Hogwarts Express was moving once more and the lights came on. He seemed lost.
He jumped out of his seat to the ground. Ron and Hermione were kneeling beside him, above them he
He could see Neville and Professor Lupine watching. Harry felt very sick; When he raised his hand to
He pushed his glasses away and felt cold sweat on his face.
 Ron and Hermione carried him back to his seat.
Page 61 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Are you okay?” Ron asked confused.
 “Yeah,” Harry said, looking quickly at the door. The hooded creature growled. "what
happened? Where was that — that thing? Who shouted?”
 “No one screamed,” Ron said, even more shocked.
 Harry looked at the rickety shop. Ginny and Neville looked at him, both very
pale.
 “But I hear the screaming —”
 A loud snort made them all jump. Professor Lupine was rotting a large box of chocolates.
in the elements.
 “Here,” he said to Harry, handing him a particularly large plate. “Eat it. It will help.”
 Harry took the chocolate but didn't eat it.
 "What's that thing?" Lupine asked.
 "A Dementor," said Lupine, who was now offering chocolate to everyone else. “One of the
The authorities of Azkaban.”
 Everyone looks at him. Professor Lupine picked up the dirty chocolate bar and put it in the
his pocket.
 “Eat,” he replied. “It will help. I need to talk to the driver, sorry…”
 He ran past Harry and out into the hallway.
 “Are you sure you’re okay, Harry?” Hermione said, looking at Harry with concern.
 “I don’t get it… what happened?” Harry said, wiping more sweat from his face.
 “Well — the thing — the Dementor — stands there and looks around (I mean, I think it works, I
he could not see his face) — it was you — you —”
 “I thought you were sick or something ,” Ron said, still looking scared. “You went
Kind of jumpy and fall out of your seat and start shaking —”
 “And Professor Lupine frowned at you, and walked over to the Dementor, and pulled out his
potatoes,” Hermione said, “and he said, “None of us are hiding Sirius Black under our blankets. go.'
Page 62 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
But the Dementor didn't move, so Lupine grunted somewhat, and a silver object flew out of his hand .
Wand at it, and he turned and he kind of ran…”
 "That's terrible," Neville said, his voice louder than before. “You felt how cold it was when it hit .
Did he come in?”
 “I feel weird,” Ron groaned, shifting his feet awkwardly. “It’s like I’ll never
again…"
 Ginny, who was crouched in the middle of her looking almost as bad as Harry felt, gave a small sigh;
Hermione walked over and threw a hand in greeting.
 “But none of you — fall from your seats?” Harry said nervously.
 “No,” Ron said, looking at Harry worriedly. “Ginny was wet as a bitch, though…”
 Harry didn't understand. He felt weak and vomiting, like he was having a bad cold
of the virus; He also felt the beginnings of regret. Why did he go to such extremes, when nobody
Is there another?
 Professor Lupine is back. He paused as he entered, looked around, and said, with a small smile .
Smile, “I didn’t poison that chocolate, you know…”
 Harry took a bite and much to his surprise felt warmth quickly spread to the tips of his fingers.
They are toenails.
 "We'll be at Hogwarts in ten minutes," Professor Lupine said. “Are you okay, Harry?”
 Harry didn't ask how Professor Lupine knew his name.
 “Fine,” he said sheepishly.
 They didn’t talk much for the rest of the trip. Finally, the train stopped at
Hogsmeade Island, and it was too tempting to get outside; The insects screeched, the cats meowed,
And Neville’s fucking balls clicked loudly from under his shirt. It was freezing in the little bathroom;
The snow was coming down in sheets of ice.
 “Fir years like that!” said a familiar voice. Harry, Ron, and Hermione turned and saw
the huge figure of Hagrid at the other end of the table, beckoning a creepy-looking new
students up for their traditional walk along the beach.
 “Alright, you three?” Hagrid shouted over the heads of the crowd. They surprised him, but they had no
Opportunity to call because a lot of people around them were hovering over them
Page 63 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
The platform. Harry, Ron, and Hermione followed the rest of the school across the pond and
out onto a dirt road, where at least a hundred stagecoaches await the rest
students, each pulled, Harry could only guess, by an invisible horse, because when
He went inside and locked the door, the coxswain went off on his own, kicking and scratching at the
trip.
 The coach smelled of mold and mildew. Harry felt better since the chocolate, but he was still weird.
Ron and Hermione kept looking sideways at him, as if afraid he would fall again.
 As the car turns towards a pair of beautiful iron gates, guarded by stone
cloaked in a winged elk cap, Harry saw two more tall, hooded Dementors standing
honor from all sides. A wave of cold disease threatened to devour him again; He stepped back in
brow furrowed and closed his eyes until the thresholds passed. The car accelerated.
down the long, winding road to the castle; Hermione was leaning out of the small window.
They see many bridges and towers collapse. Finally, the car stopped, and
Hermione and Run left.
 As Harry walked away, a shrill, shrill voice rang in his ear.
 “Are you angry, Potter? Was Longbottorn telling the truth? Are you really tired?”
 Malfoy wrapped his arm around Hermione to block Harry's path up the stone stairs to the castle, his face
gleeful and his blue eyes twinkled mischievously.
 “Shut up, Malfoy,” Ron said, clenching his jaw.
 “Are you angry too, Weasley?” Malfoy said aloud. “Does scary old Dementor scare you .
Even you, Weasel?”
 “Is there a problem?” A low voice said. Professor Lupine just got out of the other car.
 Malfoy gave Professor Lupine a mischievous look, one that took in the plates in his bags and purse.
The empty suitcase. With a small smile in his voice, he said, “Oh, no — er — .
Professor,” then beckoned to Crabbe and Goyle and led them up the stairs to the castle.
 Hermione shoved Ron in the shoulder to get his attention, and the three of them ran back into the crowd .
Up a steep staircase, through wide oak front doors, to the Entrance Chamber of the cave,
which was lighted by a fireplace, and contained a grand marble staircase leading to the
upper floor.
 The door to the Great Hall was open to the right; Harry followed the crowd towards him, but he had
I had scarcely noticed the painted ceiling, which was black and cloudy tonight, when a voice said,
"ear! Granger! I want to see you two!”
Page 64 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry and Hermione turned around, surprised. Professor McGonagall, Master of Transfiguration
and the head of Gryffindor House, he was referring to the heads of the crowd. She was looking hard.
a witch who wears her hair in a tight knot; His heavy eyes were framed by square pupils. Harry
He fought his way to her with a foreboding feeling: Professor McGonagall had a way of .
making him feel that he must have done something wrong.
 "You don't have to look so worried — I just want a word in my office," she told them. "walk
Up there, Weasley.”
 Ron watched as Professor McGonagall pulled Harry and Hermione out of the mess
crowd; They walked with him along the entrance hall, up the marble staircase, and up a
way.
 Once they were in her office, a small room with a large fireplace, it was cozy, Professor McGonagall .
he motioned for Harry and Hermione to sit down. She leaned back behind her desk and said quietly,
"Professor Lupine sent an owl over to say you took ill on the train, Potter."
 Before Harry could answer , there was a soft knock on the door, Madam Pomfrey, the Headmistress,
He came eagerly.
 Harry felt himself throbbing in the face. It was too bad he got lost, or whatever
He would have done, without everyone making all this fuss.
 “I’m fine,” he said, “I don’t need anything—”
 “Oh, you are, are you?” said Madam Pomfrey, ignoring this and bending down to take a closer look at the .
he. “I thought you ended up doing something fun again?”
 "It's a Dementor, Poppy," Professor McGonagall said.
 They exchanged a sideways glance, Madam Pomfrey guilty of disagreeing.
 “A formation of Dementors around a school,” she murmured, pushing Harry’s hair back and feeling his own .
forehead. “He won’t be the last one to go down. Yes, he is all clammy. Amazing things, they
they are, and the effect they have on people who are already vulnerable —”
 “I’m not pretty!” Harry said calmly.
 "Of course you're not," Miss Pomfrey said awkwardly, now taking his pulse.
Page 65 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “What does he need?” Professor McGonagall said quietly. “Resting in bed? He should probably spend
Tonight in the hospital wing?”
 "I'm fine!" Harry said, jumping up. Thinking about what Draco Malfoy would say if he had to go .
To the hospital wing was torture.
 "Well, he should have some chocolate, at least," said Mrs. Pomfrey, who was now
He tries to see into Harry's eyes.
 “I already have some,” Harry said. “Master Lupine gave me something. He gave it all to us.”
 “Is he, now?” Mrs. Pomfrey said determinedly. “So we finally have one defense against
A Dark Arts master who knows his spells?”
 “Are you sure you’re feeling alright, Potter?” Professor McGonagall said quietly.
 “Yeah,” Harry said.
 “Very well. Please wait outside while I have a quick word with Miss Granger about her course.
work, and then we can all go down to the party.”
 Harry returned to the corridor with Madam Pomfrey, who had disappeared into the hospital wing,
She murmurs to herself. He only had to wait a few minutes; Then Hermione came out looking very
happy about something, Professor McGonagall followed, and the three of them settled .
Way back through the marble staircase to the Great Hall.
 It was a sea of ​​bright black jackets; Every one of the tables in the Long Hall was filled with students, their
Faces glistened with the light of thousands of candles, which shone on the tables in the
In the sky. Master Flitwick, who was a tiny little wizard with a white haired wig, was carrying
old clothes and a three-wheeled cart were gone from the hall.
 “Oh,” Hermione said suddenly, “we’ve lost the Fragment!”
 New Hogwarts students are sorted into Houses by inviting the Sorting Cap, which shouts
out of the House they were all supposed to belong to (Gryffindor, Ravenclaw, Hufflepuff, or Slytherin). teacher
McGonagall stormed off to her empty seat at the staff table, and Harry and Hermione set off in
the other direction, as quickly as possible, towards the Gryffindor commons. People look at them
As they passed through the hallway, and some of them pointed at Harry. There is her story
facing the Dementor succeeded that fast?
 He and Hermione sat on either side of Ron, who saved them seats.
Page 66 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “What’s that all about?” he muttered to Harry.
 Harry began to explain in a whisper, but at that moment the Headmaster stood up to speak, and
He broke.
 Professor Dumbledore, although very old, always gives off a vibe of great power. have
several feet of hair and a long silver beard, half-moon earrings, and a very pointed nose.
He is often referred to as the greatest wizard of the age, but that is not why Harry is so revered .
he. You couldn’t help but trust Albus Dumbledore, and as Harry watched him fade into the background .
In the students, he felt truly relaxed for the first time since the Dementor entered the train
store.
 "welcome!" Dumbledore said, the candlelight flickering on his wand. “Welcome to another
A year at Hogwarts! I have a few things to tell you all, and since one of them is pretty important, I guess
Better get him out of the way before you mess with our wonderful surprise…”
 Dumbledore cleared his throat and continued, "As you will all know after their search for
The Hogwarts Express, our school is currently playing host to some veterans of Azkaban,
I’m here on spell ministry business.”
 Pausing, Harry remembered what Mr. Weasley had said about Dumbledore not existing .
You’re glad the Dementors are guarding the school.
 “They’re posted at every gate in the land,” Dumbledore continued, “and while they’re
They were with us, and I should say that no one was to leave the school without permission. Volunteers
They’re not destroyed by trickery or magic — or even by Invisibility Cloaks,” he added sarcastically, and
Harry and Ron looked at each other. “It is not in a Dementor’s nature to understand .
They beg or threaten. So I challenge each and every one of you not to give them a poor excuse .
you. I look to the prefects, and our new Head Boy and Girl, to make sure at least one student runs
afoul of the Dementors,” he said.
 Percy, who was sitting a few places below Harry, puffed out his chest again and moaned .
of the surrounding area with an amazing view. Dumbledore paused again; He looked hard around the cell, and
No one moved or made a sound.
 “Even more exciting,” he continued, “I’m thrilled to welcome two new faculty to our staff this year .
year.
 “First, Professor Lupine, who graciously agreed to fill in as the Defense Against Darkness .
The art teacher.”
Page 67 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 There’s a certain detached, unconscious engagement. Only those in the
Coffee in the machine and Professor Lupine nodded vigorously, Harry among them. teacher
Lupine looks especially ridiculous next to all the other teachers in their best clothes.
 “Look at Snape!” Ron whispered in Harry's ear.
 Professor Snape, the Potions Headmaster, was looking across the staff table at Professor Lupin. compliance
common knowledge that Snape wanted a job defending against the dark arts, but so did Harry,
Whoever hated Snape was surprised at the sight transforming his thin, pale face. is above
Anger: it was cruelty. Harry knew the word only too well; It was the look Snape wore
Every time he laid eyes on Harry.
 “As for our second new project,” Dumbledore continued as a goodbye to
Professor Lupine is dead. “Well, I am sorry to tell you that Professor Kettleburn, Care of .
Magical Creatures teacher, he retired at the end of last year to spend more time with his wife
The remaining legs. However, I’m happy to report that his position will be filled by none other than
Rubeus Hagrid, who has agreed to take on this teaching role in addition to his game coordinator position .
works.”
 Harry, Ron and Hermione looked at each other and nodded. Then they joined in with the exclamation point,
which was challenging at the Gryffindor table in particular. Harry leaned forward to glare at Hagrid.
which was ruby ​​red in the face and looking down into his large hands, his large smile hidden in the
trim of his black beard.
 “We need to know!” Ron shouted, punching the table. “Who else is going to give us a
A burning book?”
 Harry, Ron, and Hermione were the last ones to hold a podium, and as Professor Dumbledore began
They spoke up again and saw that Hagrid was keeping an eye on the wreath.
 "Well, I suppose it's all important," Dumbledore said. “Let the party begin!”
 The golden plates and pitchers in front of them were suddenly filled with food and drink. Harry, at one point
ravenous, helped himself to whatever he could reach and began to eat.
 It was a wonderful party; the hall filled with speech, laughter, loud applause and applause.
However, Harry, Ron, and Hermione were eager for it to be over so they could talk to Hagrid.
They knew how much it would cost to make him a teacher. Hagrid wasn't completely entitled.
The Magician; He had been kicked out of Hogwarts in his third year for a crime he didn't commit.
It was Harry, Ron and Hermione who had cleared Hagrid's name last year.
 Finally, after clearing the last bits of pumpkin tart from the golden trays,
Page 68 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Dumbledore gave the word that it was time for them all to break down, and they got their chance.
“Good luck, Hagrid!” Hermione sighed when they reached the teachers' table.
 “All down ter you three,” Hagrid said, wiping his glowing face on his forehead as he turned to
them. “I can’t believe it… the big guy, Dumbledore… he came straight to me hallway after the Professor .
Kettleburn says he’s got what it takes… That’s what I’ve always wanted…”
 Overcome with a thought, he buried his face in her pillow, and Professor McGonagall shot up .
They're far away.
 Harry, Ron, and Hermione stepped into Gryffindor floating down the marble staircase and, very
I was tired now, for more ways, up the stairs, to the hidden door of Gryffindor .
Tower, where a large painting of a brass-clad female figure asked them, “Password?”
 “Coming with, coming with!” Percy called from the back of the crowd. “New password
Great Fortuna!”
 "Oh no," said Nevil Longbottom sadly. He always had trouble remembering passwords.
 Across the board and into the middle of the common room, the girls and boys split up next to each other .
Different colors. Harry climbed up the ladder with no thoughts in his head except how happy he was.
He was going to come back. They reached their famous inn, spacious with its five four-poster beds, and
Harry, looking around, felt at home at last.


Page 69 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Chapter Six
Talons and tea leaves
 When Harry, Ron, and Hermione entered the Great Hall for breakfast the next day, the first thing
They saw it was Draco Malfoy, who appeared to be entertaining a large group of Slytherins with a
Very funny story. As they walked by, Malfoy did a lightning bolt movement and there
He was a roaring laugh.
 “You’re ignoring him,” said Hermione, who was directly behind Harry. “Just ignore him, it’s not worth it…”
 “Hi, Peter!” exclaimed Pansy Parkinson, a Slytherin girl with a face like a doll. "ear! the
The bullies are coming, Potter! Oooooooooo!”
 Harry sunk into a seat at the Gryffindor table, right next to George Weasley.
 “New third-year high school records,” said George, past then, forward. “What’s wrong with you,
Harry?”
 "Malfoy," Ron said, sitting across from George and heading towards the Slytherin table.
 George looked up in time to see Malfoy pretending to freeze with fear again.
 “That little git,” he growled. “He wasn’t a fool last night when the Dementors were down .
at the end of our train. He came running into our kitchen, didn’t he, Fred?”
 "He almost got himself fired," Fred said, with a warning look at Malfoy.
 “I was very unhappy myself,” says George. “They’re horrible things, those Dementors…”
 “Kind of nature your insides, isn’t it?” Fred said.
 “But, you haven’t melted, have you?” Harry said in a low voice.
Page 70 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Forget it, Harry,” George growled. “My father had to go to Azkaban once, remember,
Fried? And he says it’s the worst place he’s ever been, he’s gotten all wet and shaking again…
They bring fun out of the same place, Dementors. Most prisoners go mad there.”
 "Anyway, let's see how happy Malfoy looks after our first Quidditch match," Fred said.
“Gryffindor vs. Slytherin, first game of the season, remember?”
 The only time Harry and Malfoy faced each other in a Quidditch match, Malfoy had
It’s definitely going to get better. Feeling a bit more excited, Harry helped himself to the cupcakes and
Fried tomatoes.

Hermione was smiling at her new plan.
 “Ooh, good, we’re starting some new subjects today,” she said excitedly.
 "Hermione," Ron said, frowning as he looked over her shoulder, "they've messed up . . ."
Time schedule. Look — they sent you about ten headlines a day. There’s not enough time.”
 “I will manage. I settled it all with Professor McGonagall.”
 “But look,” Ron said, laughing, “you’ve seen this morning? Nine hours, Thesis. And below that,
Nine o'clock, Muggle Studies. And —” Ron approached the timeline, incredulous, “look—
Below this, Arithmancy, nine o'clock. I mean, I know you're good, Hermione, but nobody
correct. How are you supposed to be in three classes at once?”
 “Don’t be ridiculous,” Hermione whispered. “Of course I’m not in three classes at once.”
 “Well then —”
 “Bring back the marble,” Hermione said.
 "but -"
 “Ron, do you mind if my schedule is a little full?” Hermione said. “I told you, I have
Send it all to Professor McGonagall.”
 Just then, Hagrid entered the Great Hall. He was wearing his long fur coat and was
mindlessly swinging a dead polecat from a giant hand.
 “Everything okay?” He said excitedly, stopping on his way to the staff table. “Yer in my usual lesson!
Just before lunch! Bin up from five they are preparing everything… I hope it’s okay… Me, the teacher…
In all honesty…”
Page 71 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 He smiled widely at them and went to the staff table, polecat still waving.
 “Wonder what he’s planning?” Ron said, a hint of sadness in his voice.
 The hall was starting to empty as people headed off to their first lesson. Run inspected his property
schedule.
 “We’d better go, look, Divination is at the top of the North Tower. It will take us ten minutes to reach
there…"
 They finished breakfast quickly, said goodbye to Fred and George and headed back to
hall. As they passed the Slytherin table, Malfoy made another light-headed pose. the
howls of laughter followed Harry to the Entrance Hall.
 The journey from the castle to the North Tower was a long one. Two years at Hogwarts would not
They had been taught everything about the castle, and they had never been inside the north tower before.
 “It — should — be — a — fast — ,” Ron whispered, as they made the long seventh trip .
clock and disappeared into an unfamiliar lobby, where there was nothing but a large painting of a
the line of grass hanging on the stone wall.
 "I suppose so," Hermione said, looking down the dim path to the right.
 “Impossible,” Ron said. “It’s the South. Look, you can see a little bit of the beach outside the window…”
 Harry was watching the moment. A pale, gray horse just stepped out onto the grass and
He was eating obscenely. Harry was used to the subjects for Hogwarts moving portraits
And they leave their frames to visit each other, but he’s always happy to see them. picture
behind him, a short, bespectacled knight leaned into the picture behind his shield. by
The look of the grass clippings on his metal boots just disappeared.
 "go ahead!" he exclaimed, seeing Harry, Run, and Hermione. “What are these bastards, who wander about .
My personal land! Come to embarrass my safety, perhaps? Shut up, you fools, you dogs!”
 They watched in amazement as the young knight drew his sword from its scabbard and began to .
brandishing it hard, she rocked up and down. But the sword was too long for him; a
Especially wild swing he did it balanced, and landed face down in the green.
 “Are you okay?” Harry said, approaching the picture.
 “Come back, you scoundrel! Come back, you bastard!”
Page 72 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 The knight grabbed his sword again and used it to stab himself in the back, but the blade landed deeply
into the woods and, although he pulled with all his might, he could not get it out again. Finally, he
He had to lay back down on the grass and pull up his visor to wipe his sweaty face.
 “Listen,” Harry said, taking advantage of the knight’s fatigue, “we’re looking for the North .
The tower. You don’t know the way, do you?”
 "search!" The knight ship seemed to disappear instantly. He leaned to his knees and sighed,
“Come follow me, comrades, and let us find our purpose, or else fall boldly into
charge!"
 He gave the sword another useless strike, tried and failed to mount the fat horse, gave up, and .
They cried, “On foot then, good sir and gentle lady! on! on!"
 And he ran, clapping loudly, to the left side of the frame and out of sight.
 Quickly following him down the hallway, following the sound of his breathing. whenever
They saw him running in a picture in front of him.
 “Be brave, the worst is yet to come!” cried the knight, and they saw him return in
in front of a random group of women whose picture is hung on the wall of a restaurant
The tip of the stick.
 Panting loudly, Harry, Ron, and Hermione climbed onto the slick bars, getting wetter and
Dizzier, until at last they heard the murmur of voices above them, and knew they had reached the
A school.
 "bye!" cried the knight, who poked his head into a painting of some strange looking monks.
“Farewell, my fellow soldiers! If you ever need a healthy heart and iron kidneys, call
About Sir Cadougan!”
 “Yeah, we’ll call you,” Ron smiled as the knight left, “if we ever need one .
mental."
 They climbed the last few steps and came out on a small clearing, where most of the class was .
They are already collected. There were no doors up here, but Ron warned Harry and pointed to .
the ceiling, where there was a door to the living room with a brass knob on it.
 “'Sybill Trelawney, Headmaster of the Memory,'” Harry read. “How are we supposed to get up there?”
 As if in answer to his question, the sliding door suddenly opened, and a silver laptop .
He got right to Harry's feet. Everyone was silent.
Page 73 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “After you,” Ron said, nodding, so Harry went up the stairs first.
 He walked out into the alley with the strangest look he had ever seen. In fact, it doesn't look like
reading together, more like a cross between someone’s attic and an old-fashioned tea shop. in
At least twenty small, circular sofas are crammed inside, all surrounded by chintz chairs
and little poufs of feathers. Everything was bathed in dim, dim light; Gardens at the Window
they were all tied together, and many of the pipes were lined with black cloth masks. It was so hot,
And the fire that was burning beneath the crowded platform exuded a heavy, sickly quality .
of perfume as she heated the large copper pot. The beams running along the round walls were
Full of dust-looking feathers, candlesticks, several packets of tattered playing cards,
silver crystal ball count, and a large range of tea kettles.
 Ron appeared at Harry's shoulder as the class gathered around them, all whispering.
 “Where is she?” Run said.
 A distinct voice sounded from the darkness, a sort of shrill, shrill voice.
 “Good morning,” she said. “How nice to see you in the physical world at last.”
 Harry's immediate vision was of a large shiny mouse. Professor Trelawney went to
The light of the fire, and they saw that it was very dim; Her big tits enlarged her tits considerably
times their natural size, and it was draped in a veil of purple gray. Innumerable chains and
Beads hung in her blond hair, and her arms and wrists were covered in bandages and
Forests.
 “Sit down, my children, sit down,” she said, and they all climbed awkwardly into the rocking chairs or slumped over .
Buffs. Harry, Ron and Hermione sat themselves down at a round table.
 “Welcome to Divination,” announced Professor Trelawney, who was parked in one of the wings .
A chair by the fireplace. “My name is Professor Trelawney. Maybe you don’t know me.
before. I found that getting too deep into the hustle and bustle of big school drained me
The inner eye.”
 No one said anything to this unusual claim. Professor Trelawny Sincerely
She adjusted her skirt and continued, “So you chose to study Literature, which is the hardest .
of all magical arts. I should warn you at the outset that if you don’t have perspective, there’s a lot
There is little I can teach you… Books can only take you so far in this area…”
 At these words, both Harry and Ron glanced, startled, at Hermione, who was staring in shock at the woman .
News that the books are not very helpful on the subject.
Page 74 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Many wizards and witches, skilled though they are in the realm of charms and spells and
Naturally, they still cannot penetrate the suppressed mysteries of the future,” says the teacher .
Trelawney continued, her big, shiny eyes darting from face to nervous face. “It’s a Gift
given to few. You, boy,” she said suddenly to Neville, who was about to drop his pouf. "is
Is your mother good?”
 “I suppose so,” Neville said quietly.
 "I wouldn't be so sure if I were you, dear," Professor Trelawney said, the firelight shining on him .
long emerald earrings. Nevil growled. Professor Trelawney continued abruptly. “We will be
covered the basic stages of Memory this year. Priority will be given to the class of
Tea leaves. Next term we will move on to palmistry. By the way, my dear,” she fired a quick shot at .
Parvati Patil, “Beware the Man with Black Hair.”
 Parvati gave a confused look to Ron, who was directly behind her, moving her chair from .
he.
 “During the second semester,” Professor Trelawney said, “we’ll move on to the crystal ball — if .
We end up shooting omens, that is. Unfortunately, classes will be closed in February until 2020.
A horrible viral infection. I myself will lower my voice. And around Easter, one of our number will be leaving
We are forever.”
 A very heavy silence followed these words, but Professor Trelawney seemed unaware .
it.
 “I was thinking, darling,” she said to Lavender Brown, who came closest and leaned back in her chair, “if .
Can you pass me the biggest pepper pot?”
 Lavender, looking satisfied, stood up, took a large box off the shelf, and slammed it on the .
smiling in front of Professor Trelawney.
 “Thank you, my dear. By the way, that thing you’re dreading — it’s going to happen on Friday
October 6th.”
 The lavender is growing.
 “Now, I want you two to split up. Grab a cup of tea from the store, come to me, and I’ll do it
Fill it up. Then keep drinking and drinking until only the streaks remain. Swill these on the cup
Three times with the left hand, then turn the cup upside down on its plate and wait for the last of
tea to brew, then hand your cup to your partner to read. to define rules using
Page five and six of Future Unfogging. I will move among you, supporting and mentoring.
Page 75 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Oh, and my dear,” — grabbing Neville’s arm as he struggled to stand up, “after you broke .
Your first cup, would you be so kind as to choose one of the blue-rimmed ones? I love
It’s paired with pink.”
 Sure enough, Neville had barely reached the spaceship board when the
They broke China. Professor Trelawney turned to him holding a flaming spoon and a brush and said:
“One of the red ones, then, dear, if you don’t mind… thank you…”
 After filling their teacups, Harry and Ron returned to their table and tried to drink
The coffee roasts quickly. Swivel the blades as suggested by Professor Trelawney,
They then took out the balls and exchanged them.
 “Right,” Ron said as they both opened their books to pages five and six. “What can you expect in 2019
mine?"
 “Pretty stupid baby stuff,” Harry said. In that room he was making
He felt sleepy and lethargic.
 “Expand your minds, beloved ones, and let your eyes look beyond the things of the world!” teacher
Trelawney cried softly.
 Harry tried to pull himself together.
 "It's true, you have kind of a twisted sense of humor…" Unfogging the Future asked. “It means
You will have 'aches and pains' — sorry about that — but there is a possibl
The sun. Hold on... means 'great happiness'... so you will feel sad but be very
happy…"
 “You need your inner eye tested, if you ask me,” Ron said, and they both had to gasp .
He laughed as Professor Trelawney looked in their direction.
 "My turn…" Ron looked down at Harry's bag, his forehead furrowed tightly. “There is a ship
It’s a bit like a bubble bath,” he said. “Maybe you’ll work in the Ministry of Magic…”
 He turned the tea cup the other way back up.
 “But it all looks more like a spell… what is that?” He scanned his Unfogging copy of
future. “'Damn, unexpected gold.' Great, you can lend me some. And there’s a thing
Here,” he lifted the cup again, “that looks like a beast… yeah, if it’s head… it looks .
Like a fox… no, a sheep…”
 Professor Trelawney turned around as Harry let out a bark of laughter.
Page 76 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Let me see that, sweetheart,” she cautiously told Ron, reaching out and taking Harry’s .
A cup from it. Everyone paused to watch.
 Professor Trelawney was staring at the teapot, examining it in a puzzled manner.
 “A beast… my dear, you have a mortal enemy.”
 “But everyone knows that,” Hermione said with a chuckle. Professor Trelawney stared at her.
 “Well, I do,” Hermione said. “Everyone knows about Harry and you-know-who.”
 Harry and Ron looked at her with a mixture of confusion and amusement. They didn’t hear
Hermione had talked to a teacher like this before. Professor Trelawney chose not to respond. she
She peeked her big eyes at Harry's cock again and continued to rummage through it.
 “The team… it’s a disease. Dear, dear, this is not the cup of happiness…”
 “I thought he was a butt-head,” Ron said politely.
 “Chief… danger on your way, my dear…”
 Everyone stares, stares, stares, at Professor Trelawney, who gives the hat one last, silent, .
And then he screamed.
 There was another sneeze of china crackers; Neville had spilled his second cup. teacher
Trelawney sank into an empty chair, her hand burning at her heart and her eyes closed.
 “My dear boy—my poor dear boy—no—it’s better not to say—no—don’t ask me…”
 “What is it, Professor?” Dean Thomas said suddenly. Everyone got to their feet, and quickly
They crowd around Harry and Ron's table and approach Professor Trelawney's chair to get
Nice view towards Harry's cup.
 “My dear,” Professor Trelawney’s big eyes slowly opened, “You have Grim.”
 “What is that?” Harry said.
 He could tell that he wasn’t the only one who didn’t understand; Din Thomas put his arm around him
and Lavender Brown looked shocked, but pretty much everyone else flipped their hands over their
Because in a panic.
Page 77 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Grim, my dear, a Grimm!” shouted Professor Trelawney, who looked shocked that Harry .
He didn't understand. “That big, boisterous dog that haunts churchyards! My dear boy, you are a miracle.
— a bad omen — of death!”
 Harry's stomach lurched. The dog in the death painting Omens in Flourish is Blotts — and .
The dog in the shadow of the magnolia moon… Lavender Brown holds her hands to her mouth
also. Everyone was looking at Harry, everyone except Hermione, who got up and looked .
near the back of Professor Trelawney’s chair.
 "I don't think he looks like Grim," she whispered.
 Professor Trelawney examined Hermione with growing concern.
 “You will forgive me for saying this, my dear, but I see little aura around you. Very little
facing the future.”
 Seamus Finnigan was shaking his head from side to side.
 “It looks like Grim if you do that,” he said, his eyes nearly glazed over, “but it looks more like .
Bull from here,” he said, leaning to the left.
 “When you’re all done deciding whether or not I’m going to die!” Harry said, grabbing even
Himself with contempt. Now no one seems to want to see it.
 "I guess we'll leave the lesson here for today," Professor Trelawney said in her raspy voice.
“Yeah… please pack your things…”
 In silence, the seniors turned their teacups to Professor Trelawney, closed their books, and .
they tied their boxes. Even Ron was avoiding Harry's eyes.
 “Until we meet again,” Professor Trelawney said quietly, “the good will be yours. Oh, and dear,”
— Neville reminded, “you’re going to fail next time, so be sure to work extra hard to keep up.”
 Harry, Ron, and Hermione had descended from Professor Trelawney's clock and the revolving alarm clock in
They smiled, then left for Professor McGonagall's Transformation lesson. It took them a long time to
His class found that, long ago as they left Divination, they were just in time.
 Harry chose a seat right at the back of the room, feeling like he was sitting in a bright spot .
light; The rest of the class continued to stare at him curiously, as if he was about to
Dead drop at any time. He barely heard what Professor McGonagall was saying to them .
animagi (magicians who can be transformed into animals at will), and he wasn’t even aware when she was
Page 78 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
she transformed herself before their eyes into a gray cat with directional markings around her.
eyes.
 “Really, what’s gotten into you at all today?” Professor McGonagall said, coming back to herself .
With a pop of relief, and he looks at them all. “Not that it matters, but it was the first time I
Change doesn’t have support from one class.”
 Everyone's heads turned to Harry again, but no one spoke. Then Hermione introduced her
hand.
 “Please, Professor, we just had our first Divination class, and we were studying tea leaves,
and -"
 "Oh, right," Professor McGonagall said, quickly nodding. “We don’t have to say anything .
More, Ms. Granger. Tell me, which one of you is going to die this year?”
 Everyone looks at her.
 “I am,” Harry said, finally.
 "I see," Professor McGonagall said, fixing Harry with her piercing eyes. “So you should know, .
Potter, that Sybill Trelawney has witnessed the death of one student a year since arriving at
This school. None of them have died so far. Seeing the omen of death is her favorite way to greet someone new
class. If it weren’t for the fact I wouldn’t speak ill of my friends —” Professor McGonagall .
They nodded and saw that his hair had turned white. She continued, more passionately, “The design .
It is one of the most underrated components of a hair dryer. I’m not going to hide from you that I have a lot
little patience with him. True critics are very rare, and Professor Trelawney…”
 She paused again, then said, in a much more serious tone, “You look in good health for .
I am, Potter, so you'll excuse me if I keep you away from homework today. I assure you that if you
Die, you don’t need to give it up.”
 Hermione laughed. Harry felt a little better. It’s hard to feel scared of a tea leaf bug.
Away from the bright red lights and bright colors of Professor Trelawney's classroom. not
Everyone was convinced, however. Ron was still looking worried, and Lavender sighed, "But what . . ."
About Neville’s cup?”
 After the Transformation ceremony was completed, they joined the invited crowd towards the Elder .
A room for lunch.
 “Ron, have fun,” Hermione said, holding out a tray of gifts towards him. “Did you hear what Professor said .
McGonagall said.”
Page 79 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Ron spooned the stew onto his plate, and raised his fork but didn't start.
 "Harry," he said, in a low, serious voice, "you don't see a big black dog anywhere, you have
you?"
 “Yeah, I have,” Harry said. “I saw one the night I left the Dursleys.”
 Ron let his fork fall with a sigh.
 “Maybe he’s a coward,” Hermione sighed.
 Ron looked at Hermione as if she had gone mad.
 "Hermione, if Harry sees Grim, it's — it's bad," he said. “My — Uncle Bilius saw .
One is — and he died 24 hours later!”
 “It’s an event,” Hermione sighed, pouring herself some mush.
 “You don’t know what you’re talking about!” Ron said, starting to unpack. “Grims are scary
The living daylights out of most witches!”
 "There you are, then," Hermione said in a low voice. “They see Grim and die of fear.
Grim isn’t a curse, it’s a cause of death! And Harry is still with us because he wasn’t
You’re busy enough to see one and think, right, well, I’d better drop the ball then!”
 Ron nodded wordlessly at Hermione, who opened her bag and took out her new Arithmancy book, .
and set it open against the glass cabinet.
 "I think Divination seems quite iron-rich," she said, turning her page. “A lot of emotions, if any .
You asked me.”
 “There aren’t any Grim spirits in that cabin!” Ron said calmly.
 "You didn't seem very confident when you told Harry he was a sheep," Hermione said .
With the cold.
 “Professor Trelawney says you don’t have enough aura! Don’t you just like being bad at
Anything for a change!”
 He had touched a vein. Hermione slammed her Science book down on the table so hard that
Meatballs and carrots popped up everywhere.
Page 80 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “If I’m good at magic, it means I have to pretend to see the portent of death in a pile of tea leaves,
I don’t think I’ll be reading it for a long time! That lesson was a complete waste compared to mine.
Math class!”
 She grabbed her bag and stormed out.
 Ron nodded after him.
 “What is she talking about?” He told Harry. “She’s not in Arithmancy class.”
 Harry was glad to be out of the castle after lunch. Yesterday’s snow had melted; The sky was d
It was clear, crisp, and the grass was springy and soft beneath their feet as they set out on their first
Care for magical creatures.
 Ron and Hermione didn't speak to each other. Harry walked over to them in silence as they
He descended through the lush forest to Hagrid's hut on the edge of the Forbidden Forest. There was only
Seeing three very familiar figures in front of them made him realize that they must have
These collaborations with Slytherins. Malfoy was having a friendly chat with Crabbe and Goyle, who was
With a smile. Harry was pretty sure he knew what they were talking about.
 Hagrid was waiting for his class by the door of his shop. Standing in his camel coat, s
Fang the boarhound in his heels, looking impatient to get started.
 “C'mon, now, lead the way!” he called out as the school approached. “Got a real treat for yeh today!
Big lesson to come! Everyone here? Of course, follow me!”
 For an awful moment, Harry thought that Hagrid was going to lead them into the forest; Harry
He had too many unpleasant memories there to last a lifetime. However, Hagrid went
out over the edge of the trees, and five minutes later, found themselves outside the sort of
The platform. There was nothing there.
 “Everything gathers 'round the wall here!” he called out. “That’s it — sure yeh can see — now, .
Firs' thing yeh'll want ter to do is open yer books —”
 "how?" said the cold, withdrawn voice of Draco Malfoy.
 "Yes?" Hagrid said.
 “How about we open our books?” Malfoy repeated. He pulled out his copy of the 1990 monster book.
animals, which depends on the length of the string. Other people published theirs, too; some,
Page 81 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Like Harry, they had their book backed up; Others enclosed them inside heavy boxes or confined
they all have structural elements.
 “Hasn' — hasn' anybody bin been able ter open their books?” Hagrid said, looking confused.
 The class shook its head completely.
 "Yeh've ter stroke 'em," Hagrid said, as if that was the most obvious thing in the world.
"look -"
 He grabbed Hermione's copy and tore off the Spellotape that was wrapped around it. The book tries to eat, but
Hagrid ran his thumb over his shoulder, and the book creaked, then slid open and sat .
spit in his hand.
 “Oh, how foolish we all are!” Malfoy sn pleased. “We have to protect them! Why don’t we
guess!"
 “I — I thought they were joking,” Hagrid said nervously to Hermione.
 “Oh, so funny!” Malfoy said. “Really clever, he gives us books that try to get our hands dirty .
off!"
 “Shut up, Malfoy,” Harry growled. Hagrid was looking adorable and Harry wanted Hagrid's
The first lesson would be success.
 “Righ' then,” said Hagrid, who seemed to have lost his composure, “then — then yeh've yer books .
An'… an'… now yeh need magical creatures. Yes. So I go get them. Wait…”
 He walked out of them into the forest and was never seen again.
 “Oh my God, this place is going to the dogs,” Malfoy said aloud. “That’s the oaf of teaching classes, mine .
My father will be disappointed when I tell him —”
 “Shut up, Malfoy,” Harry repeated.
 “Watch out, Potter, there’s a Dementor after you —”
 “Ooooh!” Lavender Brown said, looking across the hallway.
 Trotting alongside them were dozens of the worst creatures Harry had ever seen. They had
the body, hind legs, and legs of the horses, but the forelegs, wings, and heads of what appear to be
They would be huge birds, with fake, steel-colored feathers and big, bright, blue eyes. Feathers on
Page 82 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Their front legs were half a foot long and looked deadly. Each of the animals had gray skin.
a bow on his head, which was suspended from a long chain, and the ends of all these were held
Into the large hands of Hagrid, who came running into the park after the humans.
 “Get up, there!” he yelled, loosening the chains and shoving the victims against the wall where
Standing level. Everyone pulled back slightly as Hagrid reached them and tied the goblins shut.
to the wall.
 “The hybrids!” Hagrid exclaimed happily, waving at them. “Beautiful, aren’t they?”
 Harry could see what Hagrid meant. Once you get past the initial shock of seeing
Anything that is half horse, half bird, you start to appreciate the beauty of Hippogriffs
coat, varying gracefully from feather to hair, each a different color: steam grey,
bronze, dark roan, shiny cotton, and pitch black.
 “Well,” said Hagrid, rubbing his hands together and his forehead, “if yeh wan' ter come a little .
soon..."
 No one seems to want to. Harry, Run, and Hermione, though, were closer to the wall.
honestly.
 “Now, what you need to know about Hippogriffs is that they’re smart,” Hagrid said. "easily
Welcome, Hippogriffs are. Don’t bully anyone, because it might be the last thing you do.”
 Malfoy, the Crab, and Goyle didn't speak; They were talking low voices and Harry had
Nasty feeling they were figuring out how to ruin the lesson.
 “Yeh always waiting fer Hippogriff ter to do a butterfly trick,” Hagrid continued. “It's a shame, you see?
Yeh walk to it, and yeh kneel, an' yeh wait. If he turns back, yeh're ordered ter to be taken care of.
If he doesn’t buckle, then step gently on him, because those knees hurt.”
 “Of course — who wants ter to go first?”
 Most of the district retreated further in response. Even Harry, Ron, and Hermione have
doubt. The hippogriffs were bobbing their hard heads and flapping their mighty wings;
They don’t seem to like being tied up like that.
 “No one?” Hagrid said, smiling broadly.
 “I’ll do it,” Harry said.
Page 83 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 There was a breathy sigh from behind her, and both Lavender and Parvati coughed, .
“Oooh, no, Harry, remember your tea leaves!”
 Harry ignored them. He climbed over the line of boats.
 “Good man, Harry!” shouted Hagrid. “Just — let’s see how yeh get on with Buckbeak.”
 He unfastened one of the chains, pulled the gray Hippogriff away from his friends, and wriggled out of it .
Leather strain. The formation on the other side of the platform seemed to be holding its breath.
Malfoy's eyes widened mischievously.
 “It’s easier now, Harry,” Hagrid said softly. “Yeh've made eye contact, now try not ter blink…
Hippogriffs don’t trust if they look too long…”
 Harry's eyes immediately began to widen, but he didn't close them. Buckbeak turns his
His broad, sharp chin and he was looking at Harry through one bright orange eye. “That’s it,” Hagrid said.
“That’s it, Harry… now, turn around.”
 Harry didn't feel much like exposing the back of his neck to Buckbeak, but he did as he was told.
He gave a short nod, then looked up.
 He was still staring at the Hippogriff with a smile. He didn't move.
 “Oh,” Hagrid said, sounding annoyed. “All right—later, now, Harry, easily done—”
 But then, to Harry’s great surprise, the Hippogriff suddenly bent his front legs into feathers and
He fell into what was an unbuttoned suit.
 “Hi, Harry!” Hagrid said, excited. “Of course — yeh can touch it! Pat his head, go on!”
 Sensing that the best outcome would be to turn back, Harry sprinted towards the
The hippogriff reached out towards him again. He tapped his head several times and the Hippogriff became
His blue eyes seemed to admire her.
 The class started in shock, all but Malfoy, Crabbe, and Goyle, who looked
with a lack of enthusiasm.
 "Very well then, Harry," Hagrid said. “I reckon he might let her ride him!”
 This was more than Harry had bargained for. It was treated with a syringe; But he wasn’t lost
The hippogriff would be the opposite.
Page 84 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Yeh get up there, jus' behind the lighthouse,” Hagrid said, “an' mind yeh don' pull none of it .
Rice out, he would want that…”
 Harry put his foot on the top of Buckbeak's thighs and hoisted himself up onto his back. Mouth of the Beast
stood. Harry didn't know where to grab; Everything in front of it is covered with
feed.
 “Go on, then!” Hagrid said, grabbing the Hippogriffs hind legs.
 Without warning, twelve finger wings unfurled on either side of Harry, he had just enough time to
Grab the Hippogriff by the neck before it's flying upwards. It’s nothing like
the bomb, and Harry knew who he preferred; The Hippogriff’s wings beat gently.
On either side of her, she holds him underfoot and makes him feel closer to being
He was thrown out; the dull silver crunched beneath his feet and he couldn’t get a stronger grip;
Instead of the action of his Nimbus Two Thousand, he now felt himself staggering
Back and forth as the Hippogriff's legs grew falling with its wings.
 Buckbeak shoved him once in the middle of the square, then headed back to the ground; This was
Bit Harry was afraid; He recoiled as his middle finger sank and felt like going
There was a click, and then he felt a heavy thud as the four unsteady paws hit the ground. He only
He managed to catch and straighten himself again.
 “Good job, Harry!” Hagrid shouted as everyone except Malfoy, Crabbe, and Goyle cheered.
“Okay, who else wants to go?”
 Due to Harry's success, the rest of the class moved cautiously into the classroom. Hagrid
They unleashed the Hippogriffs one by one, and soon people were panicking, all over the
The platform. Neville ran several times backwards from his, never seeming to bend his knees.
Ron and Hermione practiced on the cakes, while Harry watched.
 Malfoy, the Crab, and Guyle were holding Buckbeak. He had fallen for Malfoy, who was now
He shakes his head, looking embarrassed.
 “That’s too easy,” Malfoy said, loud enough for Harry to hear. “I knew he had to have
Been, if Potter can do it… I suppose you’re not dangerous at all, are you?” He said to the Hippogriff.
“Are you, you big dirty bastard?”
 It happened in a background of steel shoes; Malfoy let out a high pitched cry and the next moment,
Hagrid was fighting Buckbeak back to his senses as he struggled to get to Malfoy, who was lying down .
curled up in the grass, blood glistening on her clothes.
 “I’m dying!” Malfoy yelled as the school disappeared. "I'm dying, look at me!" He killed me!”
Page 85 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “And don’t die!” said Hagrid, who went very pale. “Somebody help me — I’ve got to get it .
From here —”
 Hermione ran to hold the door open as Hagrid lifted Malfoy with ease. As they walked along, he noticed Harry
that there was a long, deep gash in Malfoy's hand; Blood stained the grass and Hagrid ran through
to him, up the slope to the castle.
 Tough enough, the Care of Magical Creatures class is taken on a tour. The Slytherins were all
Out of pity for Hagrid.
 “They should fire him immediately!” said Pansy Parkinson, who was in tears.
 “It’s Malfoy’s fault!” said Dian Thomas. Crabbe and Goyle flexed their muscles
Through intimidation.
 They all climbed the stone staircase to the deserted entrance hall.
 “I’ll see if it’s all right!” Pansy said, and they all watched her running up the marble stairs.
The Slytherins, still focused on Hagrid, turned their heads in the direction of their hut .
Common room; Harry, Ron, and Hermione walked down the hall to Gryffindor Tower.
 “Do you think he’ll be okay?” Hermione said in shock.
 “Of course he will. Madam Pomfrey can fix wounds in about a second,” said Harry, who had a lot of .
nasty wounds were magically healed by the nurse.
 “It was really bad what happened in Hagrid’s first class, though, wasn’t it?” Run said,
He looked confused. “Trust Malfoy to make things easy for him…”
 They were among the first to arrive at the Great Hall at dinner time, hoping to see Hagrid, but he .
It wasn’t there.
 “They didn’t fire him, did they?” Hermione said sternly, not moving her steak dish and flight.
 “It’s better if they don’t,” said Ron, who wasn’t eating either.
 Harry was examining the Slytherin table. The largest group including Crabbe and Goyle were suspended .
All, deep in conversation. Harry was sure they were cooking their own version of how
Malfoy was hurt.
 "Well, you can't say it wasn't a wonderful first day after all," Ron sighed.
Page 86 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 They moved into the crowded Gryffindor common room after dinner and tried to make
homework that Professor McGonagall had given them, but they kept boring together and
Looking out the window of the tower.
 "There's a light in Hagrid's body," Harry whispered.
 Ron looked at his watch.
 “If we try, we can go down and see him. It’s still too early…”
 “I don’t know,” Hermione whispered, and Harry noticed her gaze.
 “I got to walk on the beach,” he said simply. “Sirius Black never passed over .
Dementors still, right?”
 So they put on their things and walked out of the shade window, excited that they hadn’t met anyone on their back .
way to the front doors, as they weren't quite sure they had to leave.
 The grass was still wet and nearly black in the morning. When they arrived at Hagrid's hut,
they cried, in lowered voices, “C'min.”
 Hagrid was sitting in his leather jacket at his polished wooden table; His pig-dog, Fang, has his own
Head into Hagrid's trap. One look told them that Hagrid had been very drunk; There’s a bucket.
The tankard was almost as wide as the box in front of him, and he seemed to have trouble getting
putting them in context.
 “'Spect is a record,'' he said quietly, recognizing them. “Don’t assume they have
The teacher who stayed on'y the day before.”
 “You’re not fired, Hagrid!” exclaimed Hermione.
 “Not yet,” Hagrid said sadly, taking a big bite of whatever was in the tankard. “But no
A matter of time, I’m not, after Malfoy…”
 “How was he?” Ron said as they all sat down. “It’s not weird, is it?”
 "Madam Pomfrey fixed it as best she could," Hagrid said quietly, "but he says it's still pain…."
They're covered in cobwebs… moanin'…”
 “He’s getting it,” Harry said suddenly. “Miss Pomfrey can fix anything. She raises my half
Bones last year. Trust Malfoy to lose it for all it’s worth.”
Page 87 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “The schoolmasters bin said, o' true,” Hagrid said sadly. “They thought I had even started
huge. Should have left the Hippogriffs behind... one was a squirrel or summat... Jus' thought he'd make a
Good lesson it’s all my fault…”
 “It’s all Malfoy’s fault, Hagrid!” Hermione said anxiously.
 “We’re witnesses,” Harry said. “You said Hippogriffs attack if you provoke them. It belongs to Malfoy.
Problem that he wasn’t sure. We’ll tell Dumbledore what really happened.”
 "Yeah, don't worry, Hagrid, we'll cover you," Ron said.
 Tears rolled down the corners of Hagrid's slit-like nostrils. He caught two Harry
and Ron and pulled them into a bone crushing hug.
 "I think you've had enough to drink, Hagrid," Hermione insisted. She took the tankard from
The table and went outside to clear it.
 "Oh, maybe she's right," Hagrid said, leaving Harry and Ron, who had both stormed out,
They rub their teeth. Hagrid jumped out of his chair and followed Hermione relentlessly.
outside. They heard a loud splash.
 “What did he do?” Harry said in shock as Hermione returned with the empty tankard.
 “He’s stuck his neck in the water tank,” Hermione said, putting the tankard down.
 Hagrid returned, his hair and long beard dripping, wiping the water from his eyes.
 “That’s better,” he said, wagging his tail like a dog, waving them all over. “Listen, it was good .
N yeh ter come an' see me, of course —”
 Hagrid stopped dead, staring at Harry as if he had just realized he was there.
 “WHAT D'YEH DO YOU THINK YOU'RE DOING, EH?” he shouted, so suddenly that we jumped a foot
In the sky. “It’S HARD NOT TO CRY AND SLEEP BEHIND THE CROWN, HARRY! is,
YOU SIN! GO!”
 Hagrid trotted over to Harry, grabbed his arm and pulled him towards the door.
 “Come on!” Hagrid said angrily. “I’ll take you all the way to school and don’t let me catch you
Walk-in 'dda ter to see me after lunch again. I’m not worth that!”
Page 88 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com


Page 89 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Chapter Seven
Boggart in the clothing closet
 Malfoy didn't return to class until Thursday evening, when the Slytherins and
The Gryffindors were halfway through two spells. He went to jail, his right hand
Covered in bandages and bound with a noose, he pretended, Harry thought, that he was the
heroic survivor of some terrible battle.
 “How about that, Draco?” gasped Pansy Parkinson. “Hurts too much?”
 “Yeah,” Malfoy said, putting on a brave sort of grin. But Harry saw him looking at Crabbe and
Goyle when Pansy was looking away.
 “Clean up, clean yourself up,” Professor Snape said softly.
 Harry and Ron grinned at each other; Snape wouldn't have said 'deploy' if they'd gotten in
Late, he would give them a break. But Malfoy was always able to get away with
Something in Snape's classes; Snape was the head of Slytherin House, and he generally liked his
students above all others.
 They are making a new scent today, the Chicken Solution. Malfoy positioned his ship perfectly.
in front of Harry and Ron, as they prepared their spices on a table.
 “Sir,” Malfoy called out, “Sir, I’m going to need help cutting these magic ropes, because of my arm —”
 "Weasley, cut off the Malfoy roots," Snape said without looking up.
 Ron went brick red.
 “There’s nothing wrong with your hand,” he whispered to Malfoy.
 Malfoy grinned broadly.
 “Weasley, you heard Professor Snape; cut these roots.”
 Ron grabbed his knife, pulled Malfoy's veins towards him, and began slicing them slowly, to
They are all different sizes.
 "Headmaster," Malfoy complained, "Weasley is picking my nerves, sir."
Page 90 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Snape approached their table, looked up at his root-wrinkled nose, then handed Ron a
staring uncomfortably from under his long, oily black hair.
 “Switch strings with Malfoy, Weasley.”
 “But, Mr. —!”
 Ron had spent the last quarter of an hour painstakingly plucking his own veins over and over again .
pieces.
 “Now,” Snape said in his most horrible voice.
 Ron tossed his beautifully cut vegetables across the table to Malfoy, then picked up the knife again.
 "And, sir, I'm going to need this shrivelfig lightly," Malfoy said, his voice filled with evil laughter.
 “Potter, you can unlock Malfoy’s magic beast,” Snape said, giving Harry a curious look for him .
Always reserved just for him.
 Harry took Malfoy's shrivelfig as Ron began trying to repair the lack of nerves he now had .
to use. Harry scooped the shrivelfig up as quietly as he could and tossed it back on the table for
Malfoy without speaking. Malfoy was looking more determined than ever.
 “Have you seen your boyfriend Hagrid lately?” He asked them bluntly.
 “None of your business,” Ron snapped, without looking up.
 "I'm afraid he won't be a teacher for much longer," Malfoy said in a voice of pure sadness. “My father’s
I’m not too happy about my injury —”
 "Keep talking, Malfoy, and I'll give you a real wound," Ron growled.
 “– Complaining about school governors. And to the Ministry of Entertainment. My father had a lot of
Power, you know. And such a lasting injury” — he gave a big, fake sigh — “who knows .
Would my arm be the same as before?”
 “So that’s why you put it on,” Harry said, accidentally decapitating a dead mouse .
because his hand was shaking with anger, “To try and get Hagrid fired.”
 'Well,' Malfoy said, lowering his voice to a whisper, 'partly, Potter. But there are other benefits
also. Weasley, pack my bags.”
Page 91 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 A few boxes away, Neville was in trouble. Neville visits the units daily in Alcohol
lessons; It was her worst subject ever, and her absolute fear of Professor Snape made things tenfold worse
bad. His smile, which was supposed to be a bright, glowing green, turned —
 “Orange, Longbottom,” Snape said, spooning up a few drops and letting them drip slowly down the
The coffee, so that everyone can see.
 "Chinese. Tell me, baby, is there anything getting into that fucking ass of yours? Didn't you hear me say,
It’s pretty clear, that only one cat’s body is needed? I didn't explicitly say that a drop of olive oil
Will it be enough? What do I have to do to understand you, Longbottom?”
 Neville was gray and trembling. He looked like he was on the verge of tears.
 “Please, sir,” Hermione said, “please, can I help Neville make it right—”
 "I don't remember asking you to introduce yourself, Miss Granger," Snape said coldly, and Hermione
He went as blue as Neville. “Longbottom, at the end of this lesson we are going to feed a few drops of this .
potion to your brain and see what happens. Maybe that will help you do better.”
 Snape pulled away, leaving Neville breathless with fear.
 “Help me!” he said to Hermione.
 “Hello, Harry,” Seamus Finnigan said, tipping Harry’s glass scales, “have you .
heard? Christmas this morning — they thought Sirius Black had been spotted.”
 "where?" Harry and Ron said quietly. Across the table, Malfoy looked and heard
Closely.
 “Not too far from here,” said Seamus, who looked pleased. “A Muggle saw him.
'Of course, she didn't really understand. Muggles thought he was just an ordinary criminal, not
they? So she phoned the phone line. By the time the Ministry of Magic got there, it was
gone."
 “Not too far from here…” Ron repeated, looking down at Harry. turned around and
He saw Malfoy looking closer. "What, Malfoy?" Do you need anything else physically?”
 But Malfoy's eyes sparkled dangerously, and they reassured Harry. depends on
table.
 “Thinking about trying to catch Black single handed, Potter?”
Page 92 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Yeah, right,” Harry said with a smile.
 Malfoy's gray mouth was twitching in a lewd smile.
 “Of course, if it had been me,” he sighed, “I would have done something before now. I wasn't a ra
I stayed in school like a good boy, I’d be out there looking for it.”
 “What are you talking about, Malfoy?” Ron said determinedly.
 “Don’t you know, Potter?” Malfoy said, his blue eyes narrowing.
 “You know what?”
 Malfoy let out a weak, sarcastic laugh.
 “Maybe you’d rather not worry your ass,” he said. “You want to keep the Dementors away, don’t you?
But if it were me, I’d want revenge. I’ll take care of it myself.”
 “What are you talking about?” Harry said excitedly, but at that moment Snape called out, 'I have to .
You have finished adding your spices for now; This medicine needs to be diluted before being consumed.
So turn it off while it’s heating up, and then we’ll test the Longbottom one…”
 Crabbe and Goyle laughed innocently, watching Neville sneer as he rocked his hat with fire.
Hermione was mumbling a warning to him from the corner of her mouth, as Snape
He doesn't see. Harry and Run froze their spices unused and went to wash their hands.
and pickles in the stone basin in the background.
 “What does Malfoy mean?” Harry looked at Ron as he slipped his hands under the ice pick for
It came out of the gargoyle’s mouth “Why would I want revenge on black? It didn’t work.
Something to me—still.”
 “He’s making it up,” Ron said innocently. “He’s trying to get you to do something stupid…”
 The end of the lesson in sight, Snape trotted over to Neville, who was packing his bag.
 “Everyone assemble a 'voice,'' Snape said, his black eyes sparkling, “and see what happens to .
The Longbottom Forklift. If he succeeds in casting the Reduction Solution, it will reduce to a
The platform. If, as I doubt not, he does not do it right, his bakery may be destroyed.”
 The Gryffindors looked on in fear. The Slytherins looked excited. Snap picks up Trevor.
toad in his left hand and pressed a small kiss into Neville's, now empty forehead. he
She trickled a few drops down Trevor’s cheek.
Page 93 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 There was a brief moment of silence, during which Trevor sighed; Then there was a small pop, and
Red Trevor was shivering in Snape's lap.
 The Gryffindors exploded in excitement. Snape, looking gray, pulled a small bottle from his pocket.
of his clothes, threw a few fingers at Trevor, and again he was completely exhausted.
 "Five points from Gryffindor," Snape said, wiping the glasses off each face. “I told you
Not to help him, Miss Granger. Class was dismissed.”
 Harry, Ron and Hermione rose to the top of the table. Harry was still thinking about
What Malfoy said, while Ron was bubbling over Snape.
 “Five points from Gryffindor because the flavor was so good! Why didn't you lie, Hermione?
You’d have to say Neville did it all by himself!”
 Hermione didn't answer. Ron looked around.
 “Where is she?”
 Harry turned too. They were now at the top of the stairs, watching the rest of the class pass them by,
Head to the Big House and lunch.
 “She’s right behind us,” Ron said, grinning.
 Malfoy pushed past them, walking between Crabbe and Goyle. He smiled at Harry and left.
 “There she is,” Harry said.
 Hermione was a little hesitant, leaning towards the window; One hand holds her bag, the other
She seemed to be stepping on something by her desk.
 “How did you do that?” Run said.
 "what?" Hermione said, joining them.
 “One minute you’re right behind us, the next moment, you’re back in the middle of the stands .
Listen again.”
 "what?" Hermione looked a little confused. “Oh — I need to go back for something. Oh no —”
 She spread a kiss on Hermione's chair. Harry wasn't surprised; He could see it was full.
with at least a dozen large and heavy books.
Page 94 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Why are you taking all that with you?” Run asked her.
 "You know how many subjects I take," Hermione whispered. “I can't take these
For myself, can you?”
 “But —” Ron was rummaging through the books she’d given him, looking through the covers. "you
I have none of these scenarios today. It’s a protest against the dark arts only this afternoon.”
 “Oh yes,” Hermione said vaguely, but shoved all the books back into her bag just the same.
“I hope there’s something good for lunch, I’m starving,” she added, walking towards 1,000.
The great room.
 “Do you have a feeling that Hermione isn’t going to tell us anything?” Run Harry asked.
 Professor Lupine wasn't there when they arrived for his first lesson in defense against the dark arts.
They all sat down, took off their books, coats and jackets, and were talking when it finally came .
He stepped into the room. Lupine smiled vaguely and placed his tatty old briefcase on the teacher's desk.
He was as lethargic as ever but he looked healthier than he did on the train, like he had
Fewer square meals.
 “Good afternoon,” he said. “I’ll give you all your books back in your drawers. today
It will be a lesson learned. You’ll just need your feet.”
 Some misgivings were exchanged when the young people put down their books. They don’t have
Reading the dark arts first, if you don’t count reading The Last Supper
The year when their old teacher brought a cage of rats into class and shot them.
 “Just,” Professor Lupine said, once everyone was ready. “If only you would follow me.”
 Shocked but excited, the class scrambled to their feet and followed Professor Lupine out of the classroom.
He led them through the woods and around a corner, where they first saw
Peeves Poltergeist, who was flying headfirst into the air and cheering up a nearby tanker
With a smile.
 Peeves didn't look until Professor Lupine took two steps; Then he rubbed his sore foot.
feet and broke into song.
 "Stupid, stupid Lupine," Peeves sings. “Fake, fake Lupine, fake, fake Lupine —”
Page 95 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Rude and unruly as he almost always is, Peeves usually shows some respect towards
teachers. Everyone quickly looked at Professor Lupine to see how he would take this; to them
Surprisingly, he was still smiling.
 "I'd take that glass out of the kitchen window if I were you, Peeves," he boasted. " Sir. Filch doesn’t want to
He’ll be able to get into his pajamas.”
 Filch was a Hogwarts spy, a disgruntled wizard who failed, fought a constant battle
Against students are, of course, Peeves. However, Peeves ignores Professor Lupin 's reaction.
words, except he spat the damp raspberry out loud.
 Professor Lupine gave a small sigh and pulled out his wand.
 “This is a useful little ritual,” he told the class quietly. “Please look closely.”
 Raising the stick to shoulder height, he said, “Waddiwasi!” And pointed him at Peeves.
 With the force of the bullet, the tiny squirrel flew out of the hood of the car and fell straight down
Peeves left nose; He turned right around and smiled, pleading.
 “Cold, sir!” Dean Thomas said nervously.
 "Thank you, Dean," Professor Lupine said, picking up his wand. “Shall we continue?”
 They started walking again, the class looking at the confused Professor Lupine with added respect. directs
They led them down a second hallway and stopped, right in front of the door to the staff room.
 "Inside, please," Professor Lupine said, opening it and standing back.
 The staff room, a long, boarded-up room filled with mismatched old chairs, was empty except for one .
teacher. Headmaster Snape was sitting in a dark chair, and looking around as the class entered.
His eyes were twinkling and there was a wicked smile playing on his lips. as a teacher.
Lupine came in and made to close the door behind him, and Snape said, “Leave it open, Lupin. will
They don’t ship that.” He rose to his feet and sauntered across the courtyard, his black robes flashing
After him. At the door he turned on his heel, and said, "It may be that no one is attacking you,
Lupine, but this class includes Neville Longbottom. I would advise you not to trust the s
Something difficult. Not unless Mrs. Granger is whispering advice in her ear.”
 Neville went gray. Harry glared at Snape; It wasn't bad enough that he had Neville in himself.
classes, let alone doing it in front of other teachers.
 Professor Lupine had raised his eyebrows.
Page 96 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “I was hoping Neville would help me with the first phase of the operation,” he said, “and I .
Am sure going to do it right.”
 Neville's face went, if possible, red too. Snape's lips clenched, but he left, closing the door
With a snap.
 “Now, then,” Professor Lupine said, motioning the class to the far end of the room, where he was .
It was nothing more than an old closet where teachers kept their spare uniforms. Like Professor Lupine
He went to stand in front of her, the sofa gave a sudden roar, bouncing off the wall.
 “There’s nothing to worry about,” Professor Lupine said annoyed as a few people jumped .
later in the process. “There’s a Boggart over there.”
 Most people seemed to feel that this was an insult. Neville gave Professor Lupin
A look of pure terror, and Seamus Finnigan looked in horror at the now rattling doorbell.
 "Buggers like tight, confined spaces," Professor Lupine said. “The blankets, the closet under the beds, .
the prison under the stairs — I even met someone who was grounded in my grandfather’s clock. this
One came in yesterday afternoon, and I asked the manager if the staff would allow it to give
My third years some work.
 “So the first question we have to ask ourselves is, what is a Boggart?”
 Hermione dropped her hand.
 “It’s shape-shifting,” she said. “He can take the shape of whatever he thinks will scare us more.”
 "I couldn't have said it myself," Professor Lupine said, and Hermione brightened. "so
Boggart sat in the darkness inside and took no form. He still doesn’t know what
It will frighten the person on the other side of the door. Nobody knows what Boggart looks like
When he’s alone, but when I let him out, he immediately becomes what each of us wants
fears.
 "That means," Professor Lupine said, choosing to ignore Neville's little chuckle of terror, "that we . . ."
They have a huge advantage over Boggart before we start. Did you see him, Harry?”
 He tried to answer a question with Hermione by his side, bobbing up and down on his boot .
Fingers with her hand in the air, she was too slow, but Harry had a go.
 “Er — since there are so many of us, doesn’t she know what form it’s supposed to be?”
Page 97 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Sure,” Professor Lupine said, and Hermione shrugged, smiling slightly .
disappointed. “It’s always good to have company when dealing with a Boggart. he
He becomes vulnerable. Who should he become, a headless corpse or a flesh-eating monster? I once
He saw a Boggart make the same mistake — he tried to scare two people at once and turned himself in .
in the half-pitch. Not remotely scary.
 — The trick Boggart produces is simple, but it requires brainpower. You see, that thing
Really ended up a Boggart is a laugh. All you have to do is force it to take the shape you have
Find is interesting.
 “Let’s have sex without drugs first. After me, please… ridiculous!”
 “Ridiculous!” The whole series said.
 “Okay,” Professor Lupine said. "Pretty good. But that's the easy part, I'm afraid. You see,
Words alone are not enough. And that’s where you come in, Neville.”
 The wheels tightened again, though unlike Neville, he walked forward as if he were .
They were heading to jail.
 "Of course, Neville," Professor Lupine said. “First things first: what would you say is the thing that
Does it scare you the most in the world?”
 Neville's hips moved, but no sound came out.
 "I didn't catch that, Neville, I'm sorry," Professor Lupine said angrily.
 Neville looked around, as if begging for someone to help him, and then said, desperately .
More teasing, “Professor Snape.”
 Almost everyone laughed. Even Neville smiled mischievously. However, Professor Lupine,
He looked thoughtful.
 “Professor Snape… hmmm… Neville, I assume you live with your grandmother?”
 “Er — yes,” Neville said nervously. “But — I don’t want Boggart back at it either.”
 "No, no, you don't understand me," Professor Lupine said, now smiling. “I asked, can you tell
Us what kind of clothes does your mother usually wear?”
 Neville looked confused, but said, “Well… it’s always the same hat. A long one with a stuffed animal
at the top. And long coats… green, regularly… and sometimes a wolf fur coat.”
Page 98 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Is that a handbag?” Professor Lupine said.
 “A big black one,” Neville said.
 “Just,” Professor Lupine said. “Can you see the dress through, Neville? can
Do you see them in your mind’s eye?”
 “Yeah,” Neville said weakly, obviously wondering what was coming next.
 “When Boggart comes out of this barn, Neville, and sees you, he takes the form of .
Professor Snape,” Lupine said. “And you raise your stick—like that—and shout 'Riddikulus'— .
And pay close attention to your mother’s clothes. If all goes well, Professor Buggart Snap
He’ll be forced to get into that shirt with the pink top, and the blue shirt, with the big black handbag.”
 There was a great roar of laughter. The cupboard was painted more vigorously.
 "If Neville succeeds, Boggart may very well turn his sights on any of us very soon," he said .
Professor Lupine. “I want you all to take a moment right now to think about the amazing .
You’re too you, and you’ve figured out how to force him to appear famous…”
 The room went silent. Harry thought… What in the world was wrong with him?
 Her first thought was of Mr. Voldemort—a Voldemort who had returned to full strength. But before he had
Even as he began to consider a possible attack against a Boggart-Voldemort, a mixed picture came up .
Floating to the top of his mind…
 A broken, glistening arm trailing beneath a black mask… a long, shaky breath from a
An invisible mouth… Then a cold that penetrates so much I feel like I’m drowning…
 Harry frowned, then looked around, hoping no one had seen him. Many people lost their eyesight.
tight. Ron was muttering to himself, “Take her shoes off.” Harry was sure he knew what that was.
about. Ron’s biggest fear was sweating.
 “Everyone ready?” Professor Lupine said.
 Harry felt a twinge of fear. He wasn’t ready. How do you make a less scary Dementor?
But he didn’t want to ask for more time; Everyone else was smiling and twirling their fingers.
"Neville, let's go to the back," Professor Lupine said. “Let me have the field clear, okay?
I’ll call the next person up front… Everyone back, now, so Neville can get a clear shot —”
Page 99 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 They all backed away and leaned against the walls, leaving Neville alone by the locker. he
She looked pale and scared, but he pushed up the sleeve of his robe and held her hand
Prepare the noodles.
 "On the count of three, Neville," said Professor Lupine, who was pointing his own blade at the
The hand of the car. “One — two — three —now!”
 A single spark flew off the end of Professor Lupine's cane and hit the doorframe. The dressing room
Open open. With a loud bang and a whimper, Professor Snape appeared, his eyes fixed on Neville.
 Neville drew back, slowly opening his mouth wordlessly. Snape was being wary of him,
He reached inside his blankets.
 “R — r — ridiculous! “ said Nivil.
 There was a noise like a prison breaking. Snape growled; He was wearing a long, patterned robe.
It was a tall hat topped with an eagle-eaten chicken, and he was swinging a giant red fox
A handbag.
 There was a roar of laughter; Boggart hesitates, confused, and Professor Lupine yells,
“ Bearded! forward!"
 Parvati walked forward, her face determined. Snape turned to her. There is one more partner, and where
He was standing a bloodied, bruised mummy; His face invisible turned to Parvati and
He started walking towards her slowly, stomping his feet, his stiff arms trembling—
 “Ridiculous!” exclaimed Parvati.
 A mystery was discovered in the woman’s pockets; She became stuck, fell face forward, and her head
He left.
 “Simus!” Professor Lupine said.
 Seamus rushed over to Parvati.
 crack! Where was the woman with black hair and cheeks,
Rock face — a banshee. She opened her mouth wide, and an unearthly sound filled her.
room, a long, shrill scream searing Harry's skull bones— "Riddiculous!"
shouted Seamus.
 Banshee made a strange noise and held her fist; His voice was gone.
Page 100 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 crack! Banshee turns into a hero, who follows her tail around a corner, and then —crack!- turns into a ghost .
the horned owl, which had whipped around and rattled before—crack! — turned one-eyed, bloodshot.
 “That’s terrible!” shouted Lupine. “We are getting there! There!”
 Dean hurried forward.
 crack! The corner of the eye became a severed hand, which turned and began crawling along the
The earth is like a crab.
 “Ridiculous!” Dean shouted.
 There was a sniffle, and the arm was trapped in a rat snare.
 "Cockroaches! Ron, you're next!”
 Run leapt forward.
 crack!
 Many people shouted. The huge spider, six feet long and covered in hair, was advancing
Ron, biting his lip menacingly. For a moment, Harry thought Ron was frantic. so -
 “Ridiculous!” said Ron, and the dragon's feet disappeared; it is quickly dissolved; Lavender
Brown scowled and moved out of his way and up to Harry's feet. He raised his wand.
Ready, but —
 "here!" Professor Lupine shouted suddenly, rushing forward. crack!
 The legless spider disappeared. For a second, everyone looked curiously to see where
was. Then they saw a silvery white orb suspended in the air near Lupine, he said:
“Ridiculous!” Approach with a knife.
 crack!
 “Go ahead, Neville, get on with it!” Lupine said as Boggart dropped to the ground like a
car. crack! Snape returned. This time Neville charges forward looking determined.
 “Ridiculous!” he shouted, and they had a view of Snape in his straitjacket before .
Neville let out a resounding “Ha!” of laughter, and Boggart exploded, exploding into a thousand small
a puff of smoke, and he was gone.
Page 101 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "excellent!" Professor Lupine shouted as the thunder began. “It’s alright, Nivil. Well
It works, everyone… let me see… five points to Gryffindor for each person to challenge a Boggart
'Ten for Neville for doing it twice… and five each for Hermione and Harry.'
 "But I didn't do anything," Harry said.
 "You and Hermione answered my questions right at the beginning of class, Harry," Lupine said .
With light. “All right, everyone, good lesson. Homework, please read chapter
Boggarts and proposed to me... o be given on Monday. That would be all.”
 While chatting happily, the class filed out of the staff room. Harry, however, wasn't having fun. teacher
Lupine had deliberately stopped him from confronting Boggart. why? Was it because he saw
Harry got off the train, and he supposed it wasn't for much? If he thought Harry would pass
Out again?
 But no one else seemed to notice anything.
 “Did you see me following that banshee?” shouted Seamus.
 “It’s a hand!” Dean said, looking around himself.
 “It’s Snape in that hat!”
 “It’s my mother!”
 “I wonder why Professor Lupine is afraid of crystal balls?” Lavender said with a smile.
 “That was the best dark arts defense lesson we’ve ever had, wasn’t it?” Run said
cheered as they made their way to class to get their bags.
 “He seems like a pretty good teacher,” Hermione said contentedly. “But I wish I had a
Turn to Boggart—”
 “What will you be?” Ron said, chuckling. “The piece of homework that just got .
Nine out of ten?”


Page 102 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
CHAPTER EIGHT
Blue Lady Plane
 Within a short span of time, the Dark Arts Defense Unit became a popular class. except
Draco Malfoy and his Slytherin gang had something bad to say about Professor Lupin.
 “Look at the state of his suits,” Malfoy sneers as Professor Lupine passes by.
“He’s dressed like our old house boss.”
 But no one else cared that Professor Lupine’s clothes were ripped and torn. Some of his next lessons
They were just as good as the first ones. Before the Boggarts, they studied the Red Caps, a strange little monster
Humans who have bred themselves wherever blood is found: in the castle courtyard and
Empty battlefield pits, waiting to refresh the fallen. From Red Balls
They headed for Kappas, confused. Aquatic inhabitants that resemble frogs with fur, webbed
Hands straining to squeeze fuzzy animals into their holes.
 Harry only wished he was as happy as some of his other classes. Worst of all are Potions.
Snape was in particularly defensive mode these days, and no one was in any doubt as to why. the
The story of Boggart taking the form of Snape, and how Neville transformed him into his own form
dress from his mother, went through school like wildfire. Snape didn't seem to get it.
funny. His eyes flashed menacingly at the mere mention of Professor Lupine’s name, and he was .
You worried about Neville more than ever.
 Harry was also growing in fear of the hours spent in Professor Trelawney's shocking tower .
room, flashing sided shapes and symbols, attempting to block the path of Professor Trelawney .
Wide eyes filled with tears every time she looked at him. He couldn’t care less about the teacher.
Trelawney, although treated with a respect that bordered on respect by many of the
class. Parvati Patil and Lavender Brown Arrive at Professor Trelawney Tower
room at lunchtime, and they always return with gorgeous smiles on their faces, as
even though they know things that others don’t. They also started using hushed tones every now and then
They spoke to Harry, as if he was on death row.
Page 103 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Nobody really cares about Care of Magical Creatures, which, after an action-packed debut,
They became very aggressive. Hagrid seemed to have lost confidence. They were spending now
Lesson after lesson learn how to care for flobberworms, which must be some of the most
female creatures on earth.
 “Why would anyone bother taking care of them?” Run said, after another hour of questioning
Peel off the pulp of the flobberworms.
 But, in early October, Harry had something else to occupy him, something so .
enjoyable it more than makes up for its unsatisfactory reading. Quidditch season is on
It was close, and O1iver Wood, the captain of the Gryffindor team, called a meeting on Thursday .
afternoon to discuss tactics for the new season.
 There are seven people on a Quidditch team: three Chasers, whose job it is to score with
By placing a Quaffle (black ball, about the size of a football) in one of the fifty-foot sections at each end .
n field; Two Beaters, which were armed with heavy tanks to destroy the Bludgers (two heavy
black boxes circling for player access); A defender, who is defending the goal
posts, and the Seeker, who has the most difficult task, that of tracking down the Golden Snitch, the youngest,
A winged, walnut-sized ball whose catch ended the game and earned the Seeker an extra ball
One hundred and fifty points.
 Oliver Wood was a boy of seventeen, currently in his seventh and final year at Hogwarts.
There was a quiet sort of wonder in his voice when he spoke to six teammates in
brick-and-mortar stores with a vibrant Quidditch field scene.
 “This is our last chance—my last chance—to win the Quidditch Cup,” he told them, and stormed off .
and down in front of them. “I’m leaving at the end of this year. I’m not getting another shot.
 “Gryffindor hasn’t won in seven years. Well, then we have the worst luck in the world —
injury — and then the show got canceled last year.” The animal burned, as if
The memory still brought a lump to his throat. “But we also knew we had the best — Ruddy — .
The team — at — the school,” he said, fingering his other hand, the sassy old .
In his eyes. “We have three wonderful Chasers.”
 Wood recalled Alicia Spinner, Angelina Johnson, and Kathy Bell.
 “We have two irrefutable changes.”
 "Stop it, Oliver, you're embarrassing us," Fred and George Weasley said together, pretending to .
Corn.
Page 104 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “And we have the unbeaten Seeker to win us a match!” The reader is cool, looking at
Harry kind of cheered happily. “That’s me,” he added as an afterthought.
 "We think you're pretty good too, Oliver," George said.
 “Good ass,” Fred said.
 “The other thing,” Wood said, starting off, “A Quidditch Cup is supposed to have
name on it the last two years. Ever since Harry joined the team, I think that thing is in
That girl. But we didn’t get it, and this year is the last chance we get to finally see our name in the
That thing…”
 Wood spoke so calmly that even Fred and George seemed shocked.
 "Oliver, this is our year," Fred said.
 “Let’s do it, Oliver!” Angeline said.
 “Sure,” Harry said.
 Filled with determination, the team began training sessions, three evenings a week. The weather is
It’s getting colder and wetter, the nights are getting darker, but no amount of heat, wind or rain can ruin it
The beautiful vision of Harry finally winning the big, silver Quidditch Cup.
 Harry returned to the Gryffindor common room one morning after training, cold and stiff but
Pleased with how the ceremony went, he would find the room buzzing with excitement.
 “What’s going on?” he asked Ron and Hermione, who were sitting in the two best chairs with
temperature and the completion of some star charts for Astronomy.
 “The first weekend of Hogsmeade,” Ron said, pointing to a news item about the former outcast .
The bulletin board. “The end of October. They’re fine.”
 “Excellent,” Fred said, following Harry around the window. “I need to know
of Zunko. I’m almost out of Stink Pellets.”
 Harry slumped into a chair next to Ron, his high heart rate rising. Hermione appeared.
Read his mind.
 “Harry, I’m sure you’ll be able to go next time,” she said. “They’re not going to catch Black.
It’s already been seen once.”
Page 105 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "Black wasn't stupid enough to try anything at Hogsmeade," Ron said. “Ask McGonagall if you can .
Go this time, Harry. The next one might not be forever —”
 “Run!” Hermione said. “Harry needs to stay in school —”
 "It couldn't have been just third year lagging behind," Ron said. “Ask McGonagall, go on, Harry —”
 “Yeah, I think I will,” Harry said, taking his chances.
 Hermione opened her mouth to argue with him, but at that moment Crookshanks lunged for her.
A large, dead spider was dangling from his mouth.
 “Does he have to eat this in front of us?” Ron said, frowning.
 “Righteous Crookshanks, you took this all on your own?” Hermione said.
 False arms; He quickly swallowed a drink, his brown eyes staring mischievously at Ron.
 “Just keep it there, that’s all,” Ron sighed, turning back to his star board. "I have
Scabbers slept in my car.”
 Harry shuddered. He really wanted to go to bed, but he still had his star chart to complete. he
Pulling his bag over to him, he took out the paper, paper and glue and got to work.
 “You can pick it, if you want,” Ron said, turning his last star on a pencil and letting out .
Card to Harry.
 Hermione, not admitting to being recorded, pursed her lips but said nothing. Crochet shoes
Ron was still looking motionless, flicking the end of his razor blade. Then, without warning,
he said.
 “OY!” Ron yelled, grabbing his bag as Crookshanks dropped four pieces of fat deep inside it and
He started coughing harder. “SUGER, YOU FUCKING PIGEON!”
 Ron tries to pull the bag away from Crookshanks, but Crookshanks holds onto it, smiles and .
kidding.
 “Ron, don’t hurt her!” cried Hermione; The whole club room was watching; Run turned around.
the barn ahead, Crookshanks still holding on, and Scabbers came flying from the top—
 “CATCH THE CAT!” Shouted Run as Crookshanks pushed himself out of the rest of the van,
it slid across the table and followed the panicked Scabbers.
Page 106 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 George Weasley made a move for Krukshanks but missed; Scabbers with twenty
Two windows and a fireplace under an old chest. Crookshanks stopped and turned
low on her bandy legs, and started doing fun swipes underneath her with her front paws.
 Ron and Hermione reacted quickly; Hermione grabbed Crookshanks by the throat and stopped
far away; Ron laid on his stomach and, with great difficulty, pushed Scabbers out with .
sound.
 “Look at him!” He said excitedly to Hermione, tapping Scabbers in front of her. “He’s a skin and
yeast! Get that cat away from him!”
 “Crookshanks doesn’t realize it’s wrong!” Hermione said, her voice shaking. “All cats chase
Mice, Run!”
 “There’s something amazing about that animal!” said Run, who was trying to convince someone of the fun
He looks Scabbers back in his car. “You heard me say that Scabbers was in my car!”
 “Oh, what the hell,” Hermione groaned. “Krukshanks can tolerate it, Ron, how else .
Do you think —”
 “The cat got it for Scabbers!” Ron said, ignoring the people around him, who had started .
She'll smile. “And Scabbers was here first, and he was sick!”
 Ron walked through the common room and unexpectedly snuck out to the boys dorms.
 Ron was still on bad terms with Hermione the next day. I think he talked to her at all.
The jewelry scene, despite the fact that he, Harry, and Hermione were all working on a Puffapod.
 “How’s Scabbers doing?” Hermione asked in surprise as they removed the furry red needles from the plants and
They emptied the glowing corn into a wooden bowl.
 "He's hiding in the corner of my bed, snoring," Ron growled angrily, missing a wand and picking .
fruit on the greenhouse floor.
 “Be careful, Weasley, be careful!” Professor Sprout shouted as the bean flew past the
Many eyes.
 They had Change in front of them. Harry, who made sure to ask Professor McGonagall after the
Lesson learned if he could get into Hogsmeade with the rest, he went into the tunnel outside the classroom trying
To decide how to frame his case. He was halted, however, by a breakdown in the
in front of the wall.
Page 107 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Lavender Brown looked like she was crying. Parvati had her hand in it and was saying
Something for Seamus Finnigan and Dean Thomas, who are looking very serious.
 “What’s wrong, Lavender?” Hermione said solemnly as she, Harry, and Ron walked into the
assembly.
 “She got a letter from home this morning,” Parvati whispered. “It was his rabbit, Binky. was
A wolf killed him.”
 "Oh," Hermione said, "I'm sorry, Lavender."
 “I have to know!” Lavender said sadly. “Do you know what day it is?”
 “Er—”
 “The sixteenth of October! 'That thing you're doing, it's going to happen on the sixteenth of
october!' remember? She was right, she was right!”
 The whole class is gathered around Lavender now. Seamus shook his head firmly.
Hermione sighed in relief; Then she said, “You — were you afraid that Binky would kill a werewolf?”
 "Well, not fair by the Beast," Lavender said, looking up at Hermione with flashing eyes,
“But obviously I’m afraid he’s going to die, aren’t I?”
 “Oh,” Hermione sighed. She paused again. so -
 “Was Binky an old rabbit?”
 “N — no!” exclaimed Lavender. “H — it was just a baby!”
 Parvati tightened her grip on Lavender's shoulders.
 “But then, why should you be afraid of dying?” Hermione said.
 Parvati glared at her.
 “Well, look at the code,” Hermione said, turning to the rest of the group. “I mean, Binky didn’t
He died today too, didn’t he? Lavender just got the news today —” Lavender cried out loudly. “– she
He couldn’t have been afraid of it, because it came as a real shock—”
 “Don’t worry about Hermione, Lavender,” Ron said aloud, “she doesn’t think about other people’s pets .
Very fair.”
Page 108 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Professor McGonagall opening the classroom door at that moment was probably for good reason;
Hermione and Ron were grinning at each other as they entered the classroom and sat
themselves on either side of Harry and didn't speak to each other for the distance.
 Harry was still undecided on what to say to Professor McGonagall when the bell rang .
At the end of the lesson, however, she brought up the topic of Hogsmeade first.
 “One moment, please!” She called out as the class was ready to leave. “As you are all in my House, you .
He should have handed me the Hogsmeade permission slips before Halloween. No form, no visit to
Village, so don’t forget!”
 Neville threw up his hand.
 “Please, Professor, I — I think I’ve lost —”
 "Your mother sent me yours right away, Longbottom," Professor McGonagall said. "she
He seemed to think it was safer. Well, that’s it, you might as well go.”
 “Ask her now,” Ron whispered to Harry.
 "Oh. But —' Hermione began.
 “Go to it, Harry,” Ron whispered.
 Harry waited until the rest of the school had disappeared and then nervously walked over to the teacher
The McGonagall Portfolio.
 “Yes, Peter?” Harry took a deep breath.
 "Professor, aunt and uncle — er — forgot to sign my paper," he said.
 Professor McGonagall looked up at him with her arrogant expression but didn't say anything.
 “So — er — do you think it would be okay mean, it would be okay if I — if I went to Hogsmeade?”
 Professor McGonagall looked down and began shuffling papers on her desk.
 "I'm afraid not, Potter," she said. “You heard what I said. No perfume, no village visit. This
legal."
 “But — Professor, uncle and aunt — you know, they’re Muggles, they don’t really
You understand about — about the Hogwarts stuff and stuff,” Harry said, while Ron amused him with .
seriously. “If you say I can go—”
Page 109 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "But I wouldn't say that," Professor McGonagall said, standing up and gathering her papers neatly into a
drawer. “The form clearly states that a parent or guardian must give permission.” She turned to
Look at him, an odd expression on his face. Was he handsome? "I'm sorry, Potter, but it's mine
The last word. You better hurry, or you’ll be late for your next lesson.”
 There was nothing to be done. Ron called Professor McGonagall a lot of weird names
exclaimed Hermione; Hermione took the 'all for the best' expression which made even Ron
He got angrier, and Harry had to put up with everyone at school talking loudly and angrily about what
they were going to do first, once they got into Hogsmeade.
 "It's always fun," Ron said, in an effort to cheer Harry up. “You know, Halloween .
feast, in the morning.”
 “Yeah,” Harry sighed, “great.”
 The Halloween party was always nice, but she would have a lot more fun if he came to her after the
A day at Hogsmeade with everyone else. Nothing anyone said made him feel any better
He was left behind. Dean Thomas, who was good with a knife, had asked to copy Uncle Vernon's .
Signing on the form, but as Harry had already told Professor McGonagall wasn’t enough
Signed, this is not okay. Ron half-heartedly suggested the Invisibility Cloak, but Hermione
tied into that one, she reminded Ron of what Dumbledore had told them about Dementors being
He could see through them. Percy had what were probably very unhelpful words of comfort.
 “They’re making rumors about Hogsmeade, but I assure you, Harry, it’s not all it’s cracked up to be,”
He said seriously. “All right, the sweetshop is pretty good, and the Joke Shop from Zonko honestly
It’s awful, and yes, the Shrieking Shack is always worth a visit, but really, Harry, given that,
You lack nothing.”
 On Halloween morning, Harry woke up with the rest of them and went downstairs, feeling
Frequently stressed, despite his best efforts to act accordingly.
 “We’ll get you lots of roses from the Honeydukes,” Hermione said, looking solemn .
Sorry about that.
 “Yeah, court,” Ron said. He and Hermione had finally forgotten their argument about
Crookshanks in the face of Harry's difficulties.
 "Don't worry about me," Harry said, in what he hoped was a softer tone, "I'll see you in . . ."
party. Have a good time.”
Page 110 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 He walked them to the entrance hall, where Filch, the guard, was standing inside the
The front lines, checking names against a long list, a suspicious look on every face, and
making sure no one accidentally left and didn’t have to go.
 “Are you going to stay here, Potter?” shouted Malfoy, who was standing in line with Crabbe and Goyle.
“Afraid to cross Dementors?”
 Harry ignored him and made his lonely way up the marble staircase, down the garden path
stores, and back to Gryffindor Tower.
 "password?" said the old woman, waking up.
 “Great fortune,” Harry murmured.
 The trap opened and he climbed through the window into the common room. It was full of
Speaking are first and second year students, and some senior students, who obviously visited
Hogsmeade so often the jade appeared.
 “Harry! Harry! Hey, Harry!”
 It was Colin Creevey, the second year who was deeply concerned about Harry and had no
A chance to talk to him.
 “Aren't you going to Hogsmead, Harry? why not? Hey —” Colin looked around frantically .
Friends — “You can come and stay with us if you want, Harry!”
 “Er — no, thanks, Colin,” said Harry, who wasn’t in the mood to have too many people staring .
avidly in his throat. “I — I have to go to the library, I have to do some work.”
 After that, he had no choice but to turn right around and head back out of the screen hole again.
 “What use are you showing me?” An older woman called out angrily to him as he walked away.
away.
 Harry carefully headed for the library, but halfway through, he changed his mind; It didn’t work.
I felt like I was working. He turned and came face to face with Filch, who had obviously just been .
It was seen from the last of Hogsmeade's visitors.
 "what are you doing?" Filch growled skeptically.
 “No,” Harry said honestly.
Page 111 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "nothing!" exclaimed Filch, his eyebrows twitching unpleasantly. “A story that could have been! It increases in
You — why aren’t you at Hogsmeade buying stink bottles and belch powder and
Whizzing Worms like the rest of your ugly little friends?”
 Harry shrugged.
 “Well, go back to your common room where you belong!” Filch said, and stood looking
Until Harry passed out of sight.
 But Harry didn't go back to the common room; He comes out in uniform, thinking quickly about
They visited the Owlery to check on Hedwig, and he was walking down a different corridor when a voice from
Inside a room he said, “Harry?”
 Harry doubled back to see who had spoken and bumped into Professor Lupine, peering into his office .
gate.
 "what are you doing?" Lupine said, though in a much different tone than Filch's. “Where are Ron .
and Hermione?”
 "Hogsmeade," Harry said, in a voice that would have been a joke.
 “Oh,” Lupine said. He thought about Harry for a moment. “Why didn’t you come in? I just got
delivering a Grindylow for our next lesson.”
 “Oh what?” Harry said.
 He followed Lupine to his office. In the middle stood a very large pool of water. Sick Green
The person with sharp little muscles has his face pressed against the glass, pulling faces and scrunching his face
Long, slender fingers.
 “Watery demon,” Lupine said, fixing Grindylow with a smile. “We shouldn’t have too much
Trouble with him, not after Kappas. The trick is to break his hold. You see
Absurdly long fingers? Strong, but very weak.”
 Grindylow bared his sharp teeth and then buried himself in a clump of grass in a corner.
 “A cup of tea?” Lupine said, looking around the corner of his pack. “I was just thinking about doing one.”
 “All right,” Harry insisted.
 Lupine tapped the cage with his fist and a steady stream of steam erupted from the spout.
Page 112 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Sit down,” Lupine said, removing his hat from one of the pillowcases. “I have nothing but teacups, I am afraid—but I
Daresay you’ve had enough of the tea leaves?”
 Harry looked at him. Lupine's eyes narrowed.
 “How did you know about this?” Harry asked.
 "Professor McGonagall told me," Lupine said, handing Harry a steaming cup of tea. “You’re not
You’re worried, are you?”
 “No,” Harry said.
 He thought for a moment about telling Lupine about the dog he had seen on Magnolia Crescent but .
He decides not to. He didn't want Lupine to think he was a coward, especially since Lupine was already
He seemed to think he couldn't resist a Boggart.
 Some of Harry's emotions seemed to show on his face, because Lupine said, .
“Something bothering you, Harry?”
 “No,” Harry snorted. He drinks a bit of tea and watches Grindylow rub his back with a stick.
“Yeah,” he said quietly, setting his glass down on Lupin’s desk. “You know that day we fought
The Bogart ?”
 “Yeah,” Lupine said quietly.
 “Why didn’t you let me kill her?” Harry said quietly.
 Lupine raised an eyebrow.
 "I would have thought so, Harry," he said, voice amused.
 Harry, who had expected Lupine to deny doing anything like that, was shocked.
 "why?" He said again.
 “Well,” Lupine said, frowning slightly, “I suppose if Boggart confronted you, he would
Lord Voldemort’s character.”
 Harry blushed. Not only was this the last answer he expected, but Lupine said Voldemort's .
name. The only person Harry had ever heard say the name out loud (besides himself) was
Professor Dumbledore.
Page 113 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "I was obviously wrong," Lupine said, still staring at Harry. “But I don’t think it’s a good idea for
Lord Voldemort would appear in the staff hall. I imagine people are going to freak out.”
 "I wasn't thinking about Voldemort," Harry said honestly. “I — I remember those Dementors.”
 “I see,” Lupine murmured. “Okay, well… I’m impressed.” He smiled slightly at the look of
Surprise flashed across Harry's face. “That shows that what you’re afraid of more than anything else is — fear. He is very active,
Harry.”
 Harry didn't know what to say to that, so he drank some more tea.
 “So you were thinking I didn’t believe you were capable of fighting Boggart?” Lubin said
With knowledge.
 “Well… yeah,” Harry said. Suddenly, he was feeling extremely happy. “Master Lupine, you know .
The Dementors—”
 He was interrupted by a knock on the door.
 “Come in,” Lupine said.
 The door opened and Snape entered. He had brought a pot, smoked a little, and
He stopped at Harry's gaze, his black eyes piercing.
 "Oh, Severus," Lupine said, smirking. “Thank you very much. You can leave it here on the desk for
we?"
 Snape lowered the flashing cape, his eyes flicking between Harry and Lupine.
 "I was just showing Harry my Grindylow," Lupine said excitedly, pointing to the box.
 “That’s interesting,” Snape said, without looking at him. “You need to drink this right away, Lupine.”
 "Yes, Yes, I will," Lupine said.
 “I made a whole pot,” Snape continued. “If you need more.”
 “I should probably have some again tomorrow. Thank you very much, Severus.”
 “Not at all,” Snape said, but there was a look in his eyes that Harry didn’t like. He stepped back from
room, motionless and cautious.
Page 114 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry looked at the hat with interest. Lupine smiled.
 "Professor Snape very kindly whipped up a spell for me," he said. “I am not much .
of a bowhunter and this one is particularly dangerous.” He picked up the bag and took it out.
"Sugar of poverty doesn't make it interesting," he added, taking a sip and pausing.
 "why -?" Harry began. Lupine looked at him, answering the unfinished question.
 “I felt a bit colorless,” he said. “This vaccine is the only thing that helps. I am very
good for working alongside Professor Snape; Not many wizards have evolved
it."
 Professor Lupine took another sip and Harry had the mad urge to push the container out of his hands.
 "Professor Snape is very fond of the dark arts," he whispered.
 "really?" Lupine said, looking just mildly amused as he took another bite of the potion.
 "Some people think —" Harry blinked, then choked, "Some people think they'll . . ."
He did something to get a defense job against the dark arts.”
 Lupine scooped up the coffee and pulled a face.
 “It’s amazing,” he said. “Well, Harry, I better get back to work. I’ll see you at the party later.”
 “Of course,” Harry said, setting down his empty cup of tea.
 The damn ball was still leaking.

 “There you go,” Ron said. “We’ve got as much as we can take.”
 A wave of pink liquid fell into Harry's head. It was evening, and Ron and Hermione
He’d just come out of the common room, pale-faced from the cold wind and looking like
They were having the time of their lives.
 “Thanks,” Harry said, picking up a can of little black Pepper Imps. “How was Hogsmead?
Where are you going?”
 By his voice — everywhere. Dervish and Banges, Drug Store, Zonko's
Joke Shop, on three square tables for cocktail beer tastings, and multiple locations
besides.
Page 115 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “The post office, Harry! About two hundred animals, all sitting in boxes, all colored
Depending on how fast you want to get your letter there!”
 “Honeydukes has a new kind of thirst; They were offering free lessons, there was a bit, look
—”
 “We think we saw an animal, frankly, they get all kinds in three holes —”
 “Maybe we could get you some cheese beer, it really refreshes you —”
 “What did you do?” Hermione said, smiling softly at her. “Do you have any work?”
 “No,” Harry said. “Lupine made me a cup of tea in his office. And then Snape came in…”
 He told them all about the coffee. Ron's mouth hung open.
 “Is Lupine drunk?” He's silent. “Is it nice?”
 Hermione looked at her watch.
 “We’d better hurry up, you know, the party starts in fifteen minutes.” They passed quickly.
the shadowy block with the crowd, still talking about Snape.
 "But if he—you know—" Hermione lowered her voice, looking nervously around, "if he was . . ."
He’s trying to — to destroy Lupine — not to do it in front of Harry.”
 “Yeah, maybe,” Harry said as they reached the entrance hall and crossed into the main hall. it
It was decorated with hundreds and hundreds of candles filled with candles, a floating cloud
Live frogs, and lots of floating orange butterflies, which were swimming lazily in the tub
The roof is like a beautiful water right.
 The food was delicious; Neither did Hermione and Ron, who were stuffed to the brim with Honeydukes .
Sweets, enjoying the second supports of everything. Harry sat looking around the staff table. teacher
Lupine looked happy and as usual; He was speaking gently to the little rabbit.
Professor Flitwick, the Charms master. Harry looked his eyes across the table, to the spot where
Snape sat down. Was he imagining it, or Snape's eyes flickered to Lupine more than 100 times.
Was it public?
 The ceremony ended with a bandstand by the Hogwarts wizards. They came out of
walls and boards to do a little natural gliding; Nick is nearly headless, the Gryffindor ghost,
He had great success with a reboot of his classic recipe.
Page 116 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 It had been such a good evening that not even Malfoy could spoil Harry's good looks,
who shouted among the crowd as they all filed out of the hall, “The Dementors send their love, Potter!”
 Harry, Ron, and Hermione followed the rest of the Gryffindors down the usual path to the
Gryffindor Tower, but when they reached the hallway that ended with Fat's portrait .
lady, they found it full of students.
 “Why doesn’t anyone come in?” Ron said with a wry smile.
 Harry stared at the heads in front of him. The image seems to be distorted.
 “Let me through, please,” Percy said, and he came hard enough with a .
crowd. “What is the court here? You can’t all forget the password — sorry, I
Head bastard —”
 And then a silence fell over the crowd, from the front first, so that it seemed as if a cold had spread below .
That way. They heard Percy say, in a high pitched voice, “Someone get the Professor .
Dumbledore. quickly."
 People’s heads turned; Those behind were standing on their toes.
 “What’s going on?” said Ginny, who had just arrived.
 A moment later, Professor Dumbledore was there, staring at the figure; Gryffindors
They scrambled to let him pass, and Harry, Ron, and Hermione were about to see what .
The problem exists.
 “Oh, my —” Hermione grabbed Harry’s arm.
 The blonde stepped out of her painting, which was so viciously shredded that the pieces of
the canvas covered the floor; Large chunks were torn out of it all. Dumbledore caught a
Quickly he looked at the broken envelope and turned, eyes longing, to see Professor McGonagall, .
Lupine, and Snape run up to him.
 "We need to find her," Dumbledore said. “Headmaster McGonagall, please go to Mr. Filch at once .
And tell him to search every notebook in the castle for the old woman.”
 “Good luck!” A quivering voice said.
 It was Peeves Poltergeist, bubbling over the crowd and looking proud, as he always did, at the 1,000,000.
perception of frustration or difficulty.
Page 117 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “What do you mean, Peeves?” Dumbledore said sternly, and Peeves' brow furrowed slightly. he
He couldn't fool Dumbledor. Instead, he held an olive belt that was no better than his own.
she takes. “Shame, your boss, sir. He didn't want to be seen. She is a terrible mistress. She saw her
He runs across the country up on the fourth floor, sir, and stalks among the trees. cry
Something interesting,” he exclaimed. “Poor thing.” He added unconvincingly.
 “Did she say who did it?” Dumbledore said quietly.
 "Oh yes, Professorhead," Peeves said, with the air of someone wielding a giant gun in his hands.
“He was very angry when she wouldn’t let him in, you see.” Peeves turned and jumped into the
Dumbledore from between his knees. “Worst hostage he has, that’s Sirius Black.” CHAPTER
nine
Grim Defense
 Headmaster Dumbledore sent all of Gryffindor to the Great Hall, where they joined as ten .
Twenty minutes later by the Hufflepuff, Ravenclaw, and Slytherin students, who were all looking on .
It's very funny.
 "The professors and I need to conduct a thorough search of the castle," Professor Dumbledore said .
their as Professors McGonagall and Flitwick closed all the hall doors. “I am afraid of this, i
Your safety, you will have to spend the night here. I want leaders to stand up and take notice
Hall rounds and I leave the Head Boy and Girl in charge. Any problem
I should have been informed immediately,” he added to Percy, who looked incredibly proud .
And it’s important. “Send word to one of the ghosts.”
 Professor Dumbledore hesitated and was about to leave the cell, "Oh, yes, you'll need to…"
 A glimpse of her waist and long tables went out to the corners of the hall and stood
themselves against the walls; Another wave, and the floor is littered with hundreds of pumpkins
Mesh sleeping bags.
 "Sleep well," Professor Dumbledore said, closing the door behind him.
 The hall immediately began to bubble with excitement; They were Gryffindor-speakers for the rest of the school.
What just happened.
 “Everyone’s asleep!” shouted Pierce. "Come on, now, don't talk!" Lights out
In ten minutes!”
Page 118 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Come on,” Ron said to Harry and Hermione; They grabbed three sleeping bags and pulled.
In one of the corners.
 “Do you think Black is still in the castle?” Hermione smiled bitterly.
 "Dumbledore obviously thinks he can be," Ron said.
 “It’s very lucky he chose tonight, you know,” Hermione said as they climbed in fully clothed in .
their sleeping bags and leaned back on their couches to talk. “The only night we weren’t into it .
The tower…”
 "I figured he got lost in time, because he was in the car," Ron said. “I didn’t realize it was Halloween.
Otherwise he would have come flying here.”
 Hermione whispered.
 Around them, people were asking each other the same question: “How did he get in?”
 “Maybe he knows how to Apparate,” said a Ravenclaw a few feet away, “Just bad from the lighthouse .
The air, you know.”
 “He’s sacrificed himself, probably,” a fifth-year Hufflepuff said.
 “He could get in a car,” Dean Thomas suggested.
 “Honestly, am I the only person who ever studied Hogwarts, A History?” said
Hermione looked at Harry and Ron.
 “Maybe,” Ron said. "why?"
 "Because the castle is protected by more walls, you know," Hermione said. “They are all
Kind of barriers on it, to stop people sneaking in. You can’t just Apparate here.
And I wanted to see the kid who could bump those Dementors. They care about everyone.
the gift of the land. They’ll even see him flying. And Filch knows all the secrets
The numbers, they’ll have them covered…”
 “The lights are going out now!” Pierce shouted. “I want everyone in their sleeping bags and nothing .
More talking!”
 The clothes all disappeared at once. The only light now came from the silver pipes, which were
drifting about speaking loudly to prefects, and a painted ceiling, which, like the sky
Page 119 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Outside, it was sprinkled with stars. What with that, and the whisper that still filled the room,
Harry felt like he had fallen asleep outside in the light wind.
 Once an hour, a teacher would appear in the Hall to make sure everything was quiet.
Around three in the afternoon, when many of the students had fallen asleep, the teacher
Dumbledore entered. Harry watched him glance around at Percy, who was grinning .
Between sobs, people are told to leave on conversation. Percy was just a long way over
Harry, Ron, and Hermione, who had quickly settled down as if they were asleep when Dumbledore's steps drew
soon.
 “Any sign of it, Professor?” Percy asked teasingly.
 "No. Is everything alright here?”
 “Everything under control, sir.”
 "It's over. There's no point in moving them all now. I found a temporary replacement for
The Gryffindor shadow wall. You’ll be able to pick them up tomorrow.”
 “Is that Miss Body, sir?”
 “It’s hidden in a map of Argyllshire on the second floor. Apparently, she refuses to let Black inside.
without a password, so it blocks. She’s still very sad, but when she calms down, she
Ask Mr. Filch to return it.”
 Harry heard the door to the hall closing again, and more footsteps.
 “Headmaster?” It’s Snap. Harry sat still and listened. “The whole third floor .
is searched. It wasn’t there. And Filch made the break; Nothing there either.”
 “What about the Astronomy Tower? Professor Trelawney's room? The Owler?”
 “They’re all trying…”
 “Very well, Severus. I certainly don’t expect Black to stay.”
 “Do you have any theory as to how he got in, Professor?” Snap asked.
 Harry lifted his head just slightly from his arms to free his other ear.
 “Very, Severus, every one of them is not next.”
Page 120 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry opened his eyes a fragment and nodded back to where they stood; Dumblur’s back was to
to him, but he could see Percy's face, filled with shock, and Snape's expression, which looked relieved.
 “Remember the conversation we had, Principal, just before — oh — the semester started?”
Snape said, who was about to open his mouth, as if trying to stop Percy from
conversation.
 "I do, Severus," Dumbledore said, and there was something like advice in his voice.
 “It seems — almost impossible — that Black was able to get into the school without inside help. I
You didn’t show my concern when you put —”
 "I don't think a single person inside the castle would support Black going into it," he said .
Dumbledore, and his tone clearly indicated the subject was closed, didn't answer Snape. "I
It must come down to the Dementors,” Dumbledore said. “I said I would check them out when …
The search was complete.”
 “Aren’t they willing to help, sir?” Birch said.
 "Oh yes," Dumbledore said coldly. “But I’m afraid no Dementor will top that .
The castle while I’m the headmaster.”
 Percy looked a little embarrassed. Dumbledore stepped out of the hall, walking slowly and carefully. snap
He stood for a moment, gazing at the deputy with a look of deep anxiety on his face;
Then he too left.
 Harry looked sideways at Ron and Hermione. Both had their eyes open too, thinking
The roof of the stars.
 “What’s that all about?” Ron's mouth.
 The school talked about nothing but Sirius Black for the next few days. Theories about how
He had entered the castle becoming quite wild; Hannah Abbott, from Hufflepuff, enjoyed a lot
of their next Herbology class telling anyone who will listen that Black can become a vegetarian
green.
 The Fat Lady’s hanging boards have been removed from the wall and replaced with a portrait of Sir .
Cadogan and his stepmother. Nobody was very happy about that. Sir Cadogan spent half of it
time they lead people to duels, and the rest they think about ridiculously complex passwords,
which changes at least twice a day.
 "He's a complete idiot," Seamus Finnigan said angrily to Percy. “Can’t we get another one?”
Page 121 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “None of the other personalities wanted the job,” Percy said. “They were afraid of what happened to Fat .
wife. Sir Cadogan was the only one who had the courage to volunteer.”
 However, Sir Cadogan was the one who intrigued Harry the most. He was now closely guarded.
The teachers found an excuse to go on the streets with him, and Percy Weasley (the actor, Harry
suspicious, on his mother’s advice) had been following him everywhere like a very avid spy
dog. To wrap it all up, Professor McGonagall summoned Harry to her office, in a similar mood .
the look on his face Harry thought that someone must be dead.
 "There's no point hiding it from you any longer, Potter," she said in a very serious voice. "I
I know this will come as a shock to you, but Sirius Black —”
 “I know he’s after me,” Harry said sadly. “I heard Ron’s dad talking to his mom. Mr. Weasley
Work for the Ministry of Engineering.”
 Professor McGonagall looked very shocked. She watched Harry for a moment or two, then
He said, “I see! Well, in that case, Potter, you’ll understand why I don’t think it’s a good idea to
You would be practicing Quidditch in the morning. Out on the field it’s just your team members.
It looks too much, Potter —”
 “We have our first match on Saturday!” Harry said, excited. “I have to fish, Professor!”
 Headmaster McGonagall thinks about it deeply. Harry knew she was very interested in
Gryffindor club meetings; She was, after all, the one who asked him to be a Seeker in the first
place. He waited, holding his breath.
 “Hmm…”Headmaster McGonagall stood up and looked out the window at the Quidditch field, .
It just looks rainy. “Well… goodness knows, I want to see us win the Cup eventually…
But all the same, Potter... I'd be more than happy to have a teacher. I’ll ask Ms. Huch to
Stick to your training sessions.”
 The weather was rapidly deteriorating as the first Quidditch match approached. He is not afraid,
The Gryffindor team was more alert than ever under Madam Hooch's watchful eye. Then, in their
Last training session before Saturday’s match, Oliver Wood gave his team some unfortunate
news.
 “We’re not playing Slytherin!” He told them, sounding very angry. “Flint was just going to see me.
We’re playing Hufflepuff instead.”
 "why?" chorused the rest of the group.
Page 122 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "Flint's excuse is that their Seeker's arm is still injured," Wood said, gritting his teeth in anger.
“But it’s obvious why they do it. You don’t want to play at this point. Think it will ruin
their right…”
 All day there was a strong wind and heavy rain, and as Wood spoke, a distant voice was heard .
The sound of thunder.
 “There’s nothing wrong with Malfoy’s hand!” Harry said excitedly. “He’s faking it!”
 “I knew that, but we couldn’t prove it,” Wood lamented, “and we’ve been working on all those .
Looks like we’re playing Slytherin, and instead it’s Hufflepuff, and their style is awesome
different. Announce a new captain and scout, Cedric Diggory —”
 Angelina, Alicia and Katie suddenly pissed him off.
 "what?" Wood said, frowning at this lightweight move.
 “It’s the long, good one, isn’t it?” Angeline said.
 “Strong and quiet,” Katie said, and they started kissing again.
 "He just sucks because he's so dumb he can't string two words together," Fred sighed. "I
I don’t know why you care, Oliver, Hufflepuff is a slut. Last time we played them,
Harry caught the Snitch in about five minutes, remember?”
 “We’ve been playing in completely different conditions!” Wood shouted, his eyes bulging slightly.
“Diggory's put up a very strong side! He’s the best Analyst! I'm afraid you'll get sick.
similar! We must not rest! We need to keep our focus! Slytherin is trying to wake us up! we
He must win!”
 “Oliver, calm down!” Fred said, looking a little confused. “We get Hufflepuff a lot .
really. really."

 The day before the meeting, the wind reached a gusty speed and it rained harder than ever. it
It was so dark inside the shops and around that tw windows and other windows were repaired. the
The Slytherin team was looking very anxious indeed, and none more so than Malfoy.
 “Oh, if only my hand felt a little better!” He sighed as the wind outside blew
The doors.
Page 123 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry didn't have the space in his head to worry about anything but the meeting tomorrow. Ulifer
Wood kept calling to her between classes and giving her tips. Third time this
It happened, Wood talked so much that Harry suddenly realized he was ten minutes late for
Defense against the dark arts, and set off on a run with Wood shouting after him, “Diggory's .
He’s got a very sharp swerve, Harry, so you might want to try and jump—”
 Harry stopped quickly outside the dark arts defender's classroom, pulled open the door .
It opened, and he climbed inside.
 “I'm sorry I'm late, Professor Lupine. I -"
 But it wasn't Professor Lupine who dragged him out of the teacher's office; It’s Snap.
 “This lesson started ten minutes ago, Potter, so I think we’ll be done with ten points from Gryffindor.
stay."
 But Harry didn't move.
 “Where’s Professor Lupine?” he said.
 "He said he felt too ill to teach today," Snape said with a twisted smile. “I believe I said
You staying?”
 But Harry stayed where he was.
 “What happened to him?”
 Snape's black eyes sparkled.
 “Nothing life-threatening,” he says, as if he wants to be. “Five more points from
Gryffindor, and if I have to ask you to sit down again, it’ll be fifty.”
 Harry slowly walked to his seat and sat down. Snape looked around.
 “As I was saying before Potter interrupted, Professor Lupine leaves no trace of subjects .
You’ve followed so far —”
 "Please, sir, we're doing Boggarts, Red Caps, Kappas, and Grindylows," Hermione whispered,
“And we’re just about to start —”
 “Shut up,” Snape said coldly. “I didn’t ask for information. I was just talking about
Professor Lupine’s lack of organization.”
Page 124 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "He's the best fine arts major we've ever had," said Dean Thomas .
bravely, and there was a roar of agreement from the rest of the class. Snape looked around.
avoiding it more than ever.
 “She melted easily. Lupine won’t beat you — I’d expect first years could .
They’ll hang out with the redheads and the Grindylows. Today we’re going to talk about —”
 Harry watched him flip through the textbook, to the back chapter, he needed to know .
They didn't cover.
 “— Pigs,” Snape said.
 "But, sir," Hermione said, as if she couldn't contain herself any longer, "we don't have to . . ."
characters still, we’re looking forward to starting Hinkypunks —”
 "Miss Granger," Snape said in a deadpan tone, "I was under the impression that I .
You’re teaching this lesson, aren’t you. And I urge you all to turn to page 394.” He looked down.
again. “All of you! now!"
 With a lot of side-eyed nods and a few smiles, they opened their books.
 “Which one of you can tell me how to tell the difference between a real fox and a wolf?” said
Snap.
 Everyone sat in unmoving silence; Everyone except Hermione, his hand, as he always did,
He had shot straight into the air.
 "anyone?" Snape said, ignoring Hermione. His tried and tested smile returned. “You’re telling me that
Professor Lupine didn’t even teach you the basic distinction between —”
 “We told you,” Parvati interrupted, “we haven’t gotten as far as the dragons yet, we’re still on--”
 "silence!" snapped Snape. “Well, well, well, I never thought I would meet a third party who would
They don’t even recognize wolves when they see one. I will make a point of information.
Headmaster Dumbledore how are you all after…”
 'Please, sir,' Hermione said, her hand still in the air, 'a vampire is different from a real one .
Wolves in many small ways. The fox head —”
 "That's the second time you've spoken out of turn, Miss Granger," snapped Snape. "five
More points from Gryffindor for being an incredibly insecure person.”
Page 125 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Hermione went very red and dropped her hand, staring at the floor with her tear filled eyes. it
He was so emblematic of how the gang bullied Snape that they all turned on him, because everyone
in which she called Hermione a know-it-all at least once, and Ron, who told Hermione she was a know-it-all at least twice a week, exclaimed, “You asked us a question and she knew the answer! Why do you ask
Unless you want them to tell you?”
 The class knew instantly that he had gone too far. Snape pushed past Ron quickly, and the room held his hand
breath.
 "A stop, Weasley," Snape growled, his face very close to Ron's. “And if I ever hear from you .
check out how I teach a class again, you’ll be very impressed indeed.”
 No one made a sound for the rest of the lesson. They sat down and made notes about the fox.
from the textbook, while Snape looked up and down the rows of desks, looking at the work .
They were with Professor Lupine.
 “It’s not well described… That’s wrong, Kappa is more in Mongolia…
Professor Lupine gives this an eight out of ten? I wouldn’t give it three…”
 When the bell finally rang, Snape held them.
 “Let each of you write an account, to give it to me, about the ways you have known and killed .
The fox. I want two paper articles on this topic, and I want them by Monday afternoon.
It’s time someone took this function in hand. Weasley, stay back, we need to arrange your
You stopped him.”
 Harry and Hermione left the room with the rest of the class, the rest waited until well
smirked, then launched into a furious tirade at Snape.
 “Snape wasn’t like that with any of our other dark arts defense teachers, either .
If he wants the job,” Harry told Hermione. "Why did he send it to Lupine?" Are you thinking this
It’s all because of Boggart?”
 “I don’t know,” Hermione murmured. “But I really hope Professor Lupine recovers soon…”
 Ron caught up with them five minutes later, overjoyed.
 “You know what —” (he called Snape something that made Hermione say “Ron!”) ​​“— it was .
Making me work? I had to sweep the bed sheets in the hospital wing. Without magic!” was
Slowly, his fists clenched. “Why couldn’t Black have hidden in Snape’s office, eh? he
He can take it away from us!”
Page 126 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry woke up very early the next morning; Early as it was still dark. For a moment he
He thought the roar of the wind blew him away. Then he felt a cold wind on his back.
his back and sat upright—Peeves Poltergeist was floating next to him, breathing heavily in
his ear.
 “What did you do that for?” Harry said excitedly. Peeves cleared his throat, breathed hard, and
zoomed back from the room, grinning.
 Harry checked his alarm clock and looked at it. It was four and a half. Cursing Peeves, he
He collapsed and tried to go back to sleep, but it was very hard, now that he was awake, to
You ignore the roar of thunder overhead, the howling of the wind against the castle.
Ruins, and cracks of distant trees in the Hard Forest. In a few hours it will be
out on the Quidditch field, fighting that shit. Finally, it leaves some thought for more
He slept, got up, got dressed, picked up his Nimbus Two Thousand, and hurried out of
housing.
 As Harry opened the door, something tapped his shoulder. He landed just in time to catch
Crookshanks with the end of his sledgehammer and dragged him outside.
 "You know, I think Ron was right about you," Harry said to Crookshanks suspiciously. "there are
Lots of rats in this place — go follow them. Go on,” he added, and nudged Crookshanks .
Down the slippery fence with his foot. “Leave Scabbers alone.”
 The clattering noise was louder in the common room. Harry knew better than to think
The meeting will be cancelled; Quidditch matches are not replayed for little things like slapstick.
Nevertheless, he began to feel very frustrated. Wood had pointed out Cedric Diguri to
He is in the shop; Diggory was in fifth year and much older than Harry. Researchers are typically
Light and fast, but Diggory’s radius would be an advantage in this case because there’s
Less likely to be blown off course.
 Harry spent the hours until dawn in front of the fire, getting harder each time to
Stop Crookshanks from rushing out on top of the boys again. Finally, Harry thought he should
It was going to be lunchtime, so he headed into the screened-in window alone.
 “Stand and fight, you mangy cur!” cried Sir Cadougan.
 “Oh, shut up,” Harry whispered.
 He resurrected a bit on a big white shark, and by the time he got started on the paddle, the rest of the
The team was off.
 "It's going to be a tough one," said Wood, who wasn't eating anything.
Page 127 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Stop crying, Oliver,” Alicia growled, “we don’t mind a little rain.”
 But there was far more than a little rain. That’s how the Quidditch match went down to
The whole school came out to watch the match as usual, but they ran across the grass towards the
The Quidditch field, heads bobbing against the fierce wind, boards being knocked off their feet
Hands as they went. Just before entering the dorm room, Harry saw Malfoy, Crabbe, and
Goyle, laughing and waving at him from beneath a large sign on their way to
stadium.
 The team changed into their red jerseys and waited for Wood’s usual pregame pep talk, but
He didn't come. He tried to speak several times, made an odd gasping noise, then shook his head.
hopefully and beckoned them away to follow.
 The wind was so strong, they tipped sideways as they stepped out onto the field. whether
The crowd screams, unable to hear over the new drum beats. It was pouring rain.
On Harry's cheek. How on earth would the Snitch see into that?
 The Hufflepuffs were approaching from across the field, wearing canary blue uniforms .
furniture. The captains walked past each other and shook hands with each other; Diggory smiled at Wood but
Wood now looked like he had lockjaw and just snapped. Harry looked at Mrs. Hooch's.
Mouth forming the words, “Mountain of your arrows.” He lifted his right foot off the ground with
Squelch and launched him onto his Nimbus Two Thousand. Madam Hooch put her keyboard to her chin.
And he gave her a thump that sounded loud and distant—they were gone.
 Harry got up quickly, but his Nimbus was spinning a bit with the wind. He held her just as tightly.
He yawned and turned, staring at the snow.
 Within five minutes, Harry had filled his mug and froze, unable to see his teammates,
Except for the little Snitch. He went back and forth across the field past a fuzzy red and
vague notes, with no clue as to what happened in the rest of the game. He couldn't hear the
description on the wind. The mob hid under a sea of ​​dancers and got beaten
The dishes. Twice Harry came very close to being crushed by a Bludger; His view was as follows
With the snow covering his nose he didn’t see them coming.
 He fell in time. It’s getting harder and harder to keep his stick straight. The sky was
The storm continued, as if night had decided to come early. Twice Harry nearly hit another player.
Regardless of whether you are a teammate or an opponent; Everything was gray now, and the rain
Too heavy, can’t tear them apart…
 Through the first ring of the bell came the shrill voice of Madam Hooch; He could only see Harry
Wood's bright blue eyes stared down at him. The whole group
You floated down into the dirt.
 “I’m calling for a timeout!” Wood yelled at his team. “Come on, down here —”
Page 128 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 They squatted in the middle of the field under the big canopy; Harry took out his sword and
He quickly wiped them on his clothes.
 “What level?”
 “We have a fifty-point lead,” Wood said, “but if we don’t get the Snitch back soon, we play in
night."
 "I'm not used to that," Harry growled, pulling out his glasses.
 At the same moment, Hermione disappeared into his window; She had kept her car on him.
The brain and was, incomprehensibly, glowing.
 “I have an idea, Harry! Give me your ring, quickly!”
 He hands them to her, and as the group looks on in amazement, Hermione clutches them with her .
Wand and said, “Impervious!”
 "there!" she said, handing them back to Harry. “They’re going to spit water!”
 Wood looked like he might kiss her.
 "nasty!" he called softly after her as she disappeared into the crowd. “Okay, team, let’s go
About that!”
 Hermione's glasses did the trick. Harry was still down with a cold, he was still worse than ever
He was in her life, but he could see. Filled with a new desire, he pressed his butt with
Hot air, looking in all directions for the Snitch, avoiding Bludger, rolling underneath
Diggory, who was looking in the other direction…
 There was another crack of thunder, followed immediately by scattered lightning. This was reaching
More dangerous. Harry needs to get the Snitch soon —
 He turned around, intending to head back to the middle of the field, but at that moment, another
Lightning illuminated the corridors, and Harry saw something that made him blush.
throughout, the image of a large black dog, clearly printed against the sky,
He doesn’t move around the ceiling, it’s empty.
 Harry's glowing hands flashed across the lightning bolt and his Nimbus lost a few feet. He is shaking
His sodden eyelids fluttered and he glanced back down the halls. The dog went down.
 “Harry!” came Wood's shout from the Gryffindor goal posts. “Harry, after you!”
Page 129 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry looked around furiously. Cedric Diggory was lining the field, and a small gold coin
It was sparkling in the rain-filled air between…
 Panicked, Harry quickly lowered himself to the touchpad and smiled at the Snitch.
 "series!" growled Nimbus as the rain drenched his face. "quickly!"
 But something odd was happening. An eerie silence was falling around the stadium. wind,
Although he was as strong as ever, he had forgotten to read. Looks like someone lost
Silence, as if Harry had suddenly gone deaf — what was going on?
 And then a dreadfully familiar wave of cold swept over him, inside him, just as he was aware of
Something moving on the field below…
 Before he had time to think, Harry took his eyes off the Snitch and looked down.
 At least a hundred Dementors, their hidden faces staring at her, were standing beneath her.
It was as if the boiling water was rising in his chest, cutting into his insides. And then he hears
It again… Someone was yelling, screaming inside his head… a woman…
 “Not Harry, not Harry, please not Harry!”
 “Stand aside, silly girl… stand aside, now…”
 “No Harry, please no, take me, kill me instead —”
 Swirling, whirling white fog filled Harry's brain... What was he doing? Why is there
Are you flying? He had to help her… She was going to die… She was going to be killed…
 He was falling, disappearing into the ice sheet.
 “Not Harry! Please… please… please…”
 A female voice laughed, the woman giggled, and Harry knew no more.
 “Lucky the ground was pretty wet.”
 “I thought he died for sure.”
 “But he didn't even break his glasses.”
Page 130 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry could hear the voices coming, but they didn't make any sense whatsoever. doesn’t have
Clue where he was, or how he got there, or what he was doing before he got there. He’s all
He knew that every inch of him twitched as if he had been beaten.
 “It was the scariest thing I’ve ever seen in my life.”
 Scariest… Scariest… Black characters in masks… Cold… Scary…
 Harry's eyes snapped open. He was lying in the hospital wing. The Gryffindor Quidditch team,
He was soaked from head to foot, gathered on his bed. Ron and Hermione were also
There, they look like they just got out of a funk.
 “Harry!” Fred said, who looked so white underneath, the floor. “How are you feeling?”
 It seemed that Harry's memory was ahead at full speed. Lightning… Grim… Snitch…
And the Dementors…
 "what happened?" He said, sitting up as quickly they all cleared up.
 "It fell apart," Fred said. “It’s supposed to be — what — fifteen feet?”
 “We thought she was dead,” says a shaking Alicia.
 Hermione made a small, chuckling noise. His eyes were too dark.
 “But a meeting,” Harry said. "What happened? Did we do a replay ?”
 Nobody said anything. The horrible reality hit Harry like a rock.
 “We didn’t win — we lost?”
 "Diggory has found the Snitch," George said. “Right after you fall. He didn’t understand what was going on.
When he looked back and saw you on the ground, he tried to call it to him. He wanted a rematch. but
They’ve added humility and dignity… even Wood acknowledges it.”
 “Where’s Wood?” Harry said, suddenly realizing he wasn't there.
 “I’m still in the kitchen,” Fred said. “We think he’s trying to drown himself.”
 Harry turned his face to her breasts, his hands gripping her hair. Fred patted his shoulder and straightened.
With determination.
 “C'mon, Harry, you’ve never had a Snitch before.”
Page 131 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 George said, “There has to be one time you don’t get it.
 "It's not over yet," Fried said. “We lost by ten points.”
 "The right? So if Hufflepuff loses against Ravenclaw and we beat Ravenclaw and Slytherin…”
 "Hufflepuff will have to lose by at least a couple of points," George said.
 “But if they lost Ravenclaw…”
 “No way, Ravenclaw is too good. But if Slytherin loses against Hufflepuff…”
 “It all depends on the dots — the chance of ten either way —”
 Harry sat there, not saying a word. They lost… for the first time in his life, he lost a
Quidditch match.
 After ten minutes or so, Madam Pomfrey came over to tell the group to leave him in peace.
 “We’ll come see you later,” Fred said. "Don't beat yourself up Harry, you're still a
Best Seeker we’ve ever had.”
 The team charged out, trailing the campaign after them. Mrs. Pumfrey closed the door behind them.
They look disapproving. Ron and Hermione approached Harry's bed.
 "Dumbledore was really angry," Hermione said in a shaky voice. “I didn’t see it as
That before. He ran onto the field when you got knocked down, waved his helmet, and you cheered
Before you hit the ground. He then swung his staff at the Dementors. Silver shot at them.
They walked out of the stadium straight away... he was furious that they had come over. We heard it
—”
 “Then he treats you to a mattress,” Ron said. “And he went to school with you flying .
on it. Everyone thought you were the…”
 His voice disappeared, but Harry didn't notice it. He was thinking about what the Dementors did .
At him… at that screaming voice. He looked up and saw Ron and Hermione looking at him like this
shocked that he quickly drops anything he has to say.
 “Did someone take my Nimbus?”
 Ron and Hermione looked at each other briefly.
Page 132 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Er—”
 "what?" Harry said, looking from one to the other.
 “Well… when you fell, you went flying,” Hermione muttered.
 "and?"
 “And she fell—she fell—ah, Harry—she fell on the weed grass.”
 He moved inside Harry. The Whomping Willow tree was a very tricky tree that stood alone in the
the middle of the country.
 "and?" He said, dreading the answer.
 “Well, you know the owl,” Ron said. “He — he doesn’t like to be beaten.”
 "Professor Flitwick returned it just before you got back," Hermione said in a very small voice .
sound.
 Slowly, she reached for a bag at her feet, turned it upside down, and took a dozen sticks of
With wood and fur spilled out onto the bed, the only thing left of Harry's supporters, they were finally beaten
A craft stick.

 Chapter Ten
Inmate Card
 Madam Pomfrey insisted that Harry stay in the hospital wing for the rest of the weekend. he
He doesn’t argue or complain, but he doesn’t let her drop his remaining
Nimbus Two Thousand. He knew he was a jerk, he knew the Nimbus was beyond repair,
But Harry couldn't help it; He felt like he had lost one of his best friends.
 He had a steady stream of visitors, all intent on pleasing him. Hagrid sent him a set of earplugs
The dark brown-looking flower was Ginny Weasley, squealing happily, walking out with
A get-well card she made herself that sings softly if Harry doesn’t catch it under her boot
of fruits. The Gryffindor team visited again on Monday afternoon, this time with Wood,
The one who told Harry (in a low, dead voice) that he didn't blame him in the slightest. run
Page 133 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
And Hermione left Harry's bedside only at night. But nothing anyone says or does can do
Harry felt worse, because they only knew half of what troubled him.
 He didn’t tell anyone about the Grim, not even Ron and Hermione, because he knew Ron would .
panic and Hermione would be ashamed. The fact remains, however, that it has now been published twice,
And both trips were followed by near-fatal accidents; The first time, he had approx.
He was kidnapped by Knight Bus; Second, he fell fifty feet from his mat. There was Grim
Would he actually choke to death? Is he going to spend the rest of his life looking at
His shoulders for the beast?
 And then there were the Dementors. Harry felt sick and disgusted every time he thought
them. Everyone says Dementors are stupid, but no one else falls down every time they
He approached one. No one else heard the voices in their head of their dying parents.
 Because Harry knew who the screaming voice belonged to now. He was listening to her words, listening
Sometimes at night in the hospital wing while he lay awake, looking
In patches of moonlight at the top. When the Dementors approached him, he heard the last .
The worship of his mother’s life, probably to protect, Harry, from the Lord Voldemort, and
Voldemort's laugh before he killed her… Harry slept soundly, lost in dreams filled with
His hands were dry, clenched and twitching, straining to sit up again at his mother’s voice.
It was a relief to return to the hustle and bustle of the main campus on Monday, where he was
Forced to think about other things, even if he had to endure Draco Malfoy's insults. There was Malfoy.
He was almost beside himself excited about the Gryffindor ritual. Finally he took off his shoes.
And celebrate by making full use of both arms once again with symbols of Harry's fallen soul .
With his smile. Malfoy spent most of their next Potions class working on Dementor spells throughout the
prison; Finally, Ron broke and threw a large, hard fake heart at Malfoy, who knelt down .
to him in the face and caused Snape to get fifty points from Gryffindor.
 "If Snape teaches Defense Against the Dark Arts again, I'm satisfied," Ron said as they
Arrive at Lupine's hut after lunch. “Look who’s over there, Hermione.”
 Hermione moved towards the classroom door.
 "It's okay!"
 Professor Lupine got back to work. He sure looked sick. His old balls.
they were worn more loosely on him and there were dark circles under his eyes; though,
He smiled to the class as they took their seats, and they suddenly broke up in an explosion of
complaints about Snape's behavior while Lupine was ill.
 “It’s not fair, he was just hanging out, why would he give us homework?”
Page 134 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “We don’t know anything about mammals —”
 “— two sheets of paper!”
 “Did you tell Professor Snape we haven’t hunted them down yet?” Lupine asked, a little confused.
 The mystery repeated again.
 “Yeah, but he said we were really behind —”
 “— he doesn’t want to hear —”
 “— two sheets of paper!”
 Professor Lupine sighed as he saw the disgusted look on every face.
 "Don't worry. I'll talk to Professor Snape. You don't have to do that essay.”
 “Oh no,” Hermione said, sounding very upset. “I already finished it!”
 They had a very interesting lesson. Professor Lupine brought with him a glass of juice containing a
Hinkypunk, a tiny one-legged creature that looks like it’s made of smoke cells,
with a flawless sense of ease and comfort.
 “Forced the passengers into the pits,” Professor Lupine said as they made rounds. “You see the window
knocked out of his hand? Hops forward — people follow the light — then —”
 Hinkypunk made a noise of exclamation of applause against the glass.
 When the bell rang, everyone gathered their things and headed for the door, Harry among them .
Of these, however —
 “Wait a minute, Harry,” Lupine called. “I’d like early.”
 Harry took a couple of steps back and saw Professor Lupine covering the Hinkypunk confession with a shirt.
 "I heard about the meeting," Lupine said, going back to his desk and starting to stack the books on his desk .
potatoes, “and I’m sorry for your blush. Is there any chance they will?”
 “No,” Harry said. “The tree broke her into pieces.”
 Lupine sighed.
Page 135 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “The Whomping Willow was planted the same year I arrived at Hogwarts. People in the past
Play the game, trying to get as close as possible to touch the baby. Finally, a boy named Davey
Gudgeon had nearly lost one eye, and we were forbidden to approach him. No toilet seat will have
chance."
 “Have you even heard of Dementors?” Harry said with difficulty.
 Lupine looked at him quickly.
 “Yes, I did. I don’t think any of us have ever seen Professor Dumbledore so angry. are
They were getting restless for a while… Angry that he refused to let them inside the country… I think
Are they the reason you disappeared?”
 “Yeah,” Harry said. He sighs, and then the question he’s supposed to ask slips out of him before he
He can stop himself. "For what? Why do they hurt me like that? I just —?”
 “It has nothing to do with weakness,” Professor Lupine snapped, as if he’d read .
Harry's mind. “The Dementors affect you more than others because there are horrors in your body .
past they have no others.”
 The winter sunlight hit the print, illuminating Lupin’s hair and the lines
On his young face.
 “Hunters are among the most dangerous animals walking this earth. They handle dirty, dirty
Places, boasting of injustice and suffering, exude peace, hope and comfort from heaven .
in their midst. Even the Muggles felt their presence, even if they couldn't see them. Very close to
Dementor is any good feeling, any memory of happiness being cast out of you. If possible,
The Dementor will consume you long enough to reduce you to something like itself — soulless and
bad. You have nothing left but your life experiences. And the worst part about that
It happened to you, Harry, enough to knock anyone off their stumps. You have nothing to worry about.
Shame n.”
 "When they approach me—" Harry looked at Lupin's shoulder, his brow furrowed. "I can hear Voldemurt
They killed my mother.”
 Lupine made a quick movement with his hand as if to bite Harry's shoulder, but thought better of it .
In it. There was a moment's silence, and then —
 “Why do they have to come to the meeting?” Harry said calmly.
 "They're boring," Lupine whispered, closing his plate with a bang. “Dumbledore
It doesn’t allow them into school, so their human animal stock has dried up… I don’t think that
Page 136 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
He was able to deal with the huge crowd around the Quidditch field. The whole release... Feelings running
They’re expensive… it’s their idea of ​​fun.”
 “Azkaban must be dangerous,” Harry muttered. Lupine nodded sadly.
 “The fort was on a little island, way out to sea, but they didn’t need ships and water to keep
Inmates in, not when they’re all trapped inside their own heads, can’t a happy
thought. Most of them get better within a few weeks.”
 "But Sirius Black escaped from them," Harry said quietly. “He’s out…”
 Lupine's portrait emerged from the mailroom; He had to bend over quickly to catch it.
 “Yeah,” he said, brushing himself off, “Maybe Black found a way to fight them. I wasn’t
He believes it could be… Dementors are supposed to drain the wizard of his powers if he stays with
Too long…”
 “You made the Dementor on the train reverse,” Harry growled.
 “There are — some measures that one can exploit,” Lupine said. “But there was only one Dementor in
The machine. The more there are, the more difficult it is to kill.”
 “What protections?” Harry said suddenly. “Can you teach me?”
 “I don’t pretend to be an expert in fighting Dementors, Harry — on the contrary…”
 “But if the Dementors come to another Quidditch match, I should be able to kill them —”
 Lupine looked into Harry's frowning face, frowned, and then said, 'Well... fine. I will try u
help. But it will have to wait until next season, I’m afraid. I have a lot to do before the holidays. I
He picked a very inconvenient time to get sick.”
 What with the promise of anti-Dementor lessons from Lupine, the thought that it might not be
He had to hear about his mother's death all over again, and the fact that Ravenclaw had torn Hufflepuff apart during their engagement .
Quidditch match at the end of November, Harry's mood takes a turn for the worse. Gryffindor was
They weren’t out of the running after all, even though they couldn’t drop another game. wood
He regained his supernatural powers, and worked his team as hard as ever throughout the cold snap
of snow persisting into December. Harry hadn't seen any Dementors within the realm.
Dumbledore's anger seemed to hold them in their clocks at the gates.
 Two weeks before the end of the semester, the sky suddenly faded to a white, crisp white .
And the sand dunes turned out one morning covered in soot. Inside the castle,
Page 137 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
There was a Christmas vibe in the air. Professor Flitwick, the Charms master, has already
He decorated his classroom with twinkling lights that turned out to be real, twinkling lanterns. the
The students were all excited about their holiday plans. Ron and Hermione had
He decided to stay at Hogwarts, and although Ron said it was because he couldn’t stand two weeks
with Percy, and Hermione kept insisting on using the library, Harry was uninterrupted; are
He made it to suit him, and he was very gracious.
 Fortunately for everyone but Harry, there would be another Hogsmeade trip on the very last day .
The last weekend of the year.
 “We can do all our Christmas shopping there!” Hermione said. “My mom and dad would really love
The ones from the Honeydukes!”
 Resigned that he would be the only third year staying behind again, Harry borrowed a
purchase of Which Broomstick from Wood, and decided to spend the day reading various
did. He was riding one of the school uniforms in the band parade, a former Shooting Star,
which is very soft and airy; He really needed a new refresher of himself.
 On Saturday the morning of the Hogsmeade trip, Harry bid farewell to Ron and Hermione, who
they were wrapped in blankets and blankets, and then they stretched out on the marble pavement, and headed back .
Towards Gryffindor Tower. The snow started falling outside the window, and the castle was pretty much
Still and quiet.
 “St — Harry!”
 He turned, halfway down the third-floor terrace, to see Fred and George staring at him from .
Behind the statue of the slender, one-eyed nun.
 "what are you doing?" Harry said with a curious smile. “How come you never went to Hogsmeade?”
 "We came to give you a little break before we left," Fred said, with a mysterious smile.
“Come in here…”
 He nodded towards an empty hill to the left of the one-eyed square. ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵢⴻⴹⴼⴻⵔ Fred
and George inside. George shut the door quietly, then turned, beaming, to look at Harry.
 “An early Christmas present for you, Harry,” he said.
 Fred pulled something from inside his suit with a spoon and placed it on one of the shelves. compliance
A big, huge piece of paper, so blank that he didn’t write anything on it. Harry, suspecting a
of Fred and George memoirs, he looks at her.
Page 138 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “What’s that supposed to be?”
 "That, Harry, is the secret of our success," George said, furiously tapping the paper.
 “It’s clothes, I’ll give it to you,” Fred said, “but we decided last night, your need is bigger than 100,000.
ours.”
 “Either way, we know it by heart,” says George. “We leave it to you. We don’t really need it.
anymore."
 “What do I need with a little old paper?” Harry said.
 “A bit of old paper!” Fred said, closing his eyes with a grin as if he were Harry .
wounded by death. “ⵙⴻⴼⵀⴻⵎⴷ, ⴰ ⴵⵓⵕⴵ.”
 “Well… when we were in our first year, Harry — young, carefree, and innocent —”
 Harry sighed. He doubted whether Fred and George were innocent.
 “ — well, they’re more innocent than we are now — we got into a bit of a rut with Filch.”
 “We threw a Dungbomb in the hallway and it freaked him out for some reason —”
 “So he dragged us into his office and started asking us the same things we used to —”
 "- pause -"
 “— transplantation —”
 “— and we couldn’t resist a cup of coffee in one of his cardboard boxes labeled Confiscated and .
It’s very rare.”
 “Don’t tell me —” Harry said, starting to blush.
 “Well, what are you going to do?” Fred said. “George caused one poisoning by knocking down someone else .
Dungbomb, I spilled the can open, and caught — his.”
 "It's not as bad as it looks, you know," George said. “We don’t think Filch hasn’t found
How you do it. Maybe he doubted what it was, though, or he didn’t catch it.”
 “And you know how to do it?”
Page 139 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Oh yeah,” Fred said, smirking. “This little beauty has taught us more than all the teachers in this
school."
 "You're flattering me," Harry said, looking at the crumpled old piece of paper.
 “Oh, are we?” George said.
 He took out his wand, touched the paper lightly, and said, “I swear that I am up to .
No luck.”
 And suddenly lines of spider web-like blue began to spread out from where George’s wand had been exposed .
He was busy. They went into each other, and they squished, and they flew into every nook and cranny of the paper;
Then words began to flash across the ceiling, big, dark green words that signified:
 Sir. The moon, the bull’s tail, the back of the knife, and the needles
Support providers for magical adventurers are pleased to offer
 MEMBER CARD
 It was a map showing every nook and cranny of Hogwarts castle and grounds. But the really cool
The thing is there are little dots of ink swirling around, each of which has a name in tiny writing.
Surprised, Harry lunged at him. The dot placed in the upper left corner indicates that Teacher
Dumbledore continues his research; The doctor's wife, Mrs. Nouris, is nursing the second
floor; And the Peeves Poltergeist was currently on the rise in the ballroom. And like Harry's
Eyes going up and down familiar streets, he noticed something else.
 This map shows a handful of streets he didn’t enter. And many of them seem to be taking — .
 “Right to Hogsmeade,” Fred said, tracing one of them with his finger. “There are seven in all.
Now, Filch knows about these four” — he points at them — “but we’re really just us .
Those who know about these. Never mind the one behind the mirror on the 4th floor.We
They used it until last fall, but it was gone — completely shut down. And we don’t count on anyone
Don't use this one, because Whomping Willow's planted right on the doorstep. But wa
Here, this one leads directly to the Honeydukes shop. We used it many times. And like you
You may have noticed, the door is outside this room, with that old one-eye
hump.”
 “The moon, the rat’s foot, the squirrel’s foot, and the dragon’s foot,” George chuckled, tapping the top of the card. "we
You owe them a lot.”
 “Decent men, working hard to help a new generation of lawbreakers,” Fred sighed.
Page 140 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Grena,” said George. “Don’t forget to lubricate it after you use it —”
 “— or anyone can read it,” Fred snapped.
 "Just catch him again and say, 'Mischief succeeded!' And he’s going to go free.”
 “Okay, young Harry,” Fred said, mimicking Percy’s uncertainty, “be careful .
yourself."
 “See you at Honeydukes,” George said, smiling.
 They left the room, both looking solemn.
 Harry stood there, staring at the Magic Card. He saw little tiny Mrs. Norris turned to the left.
And they stopped to sniff something on the floor. If Filch didn’t know for sure… he wouldn’t have to
Go through all the Dementors…
 But nonetheless he stood there, full of joy, something Harry had once heard Master do.
Weasley said he came flying out of his grip.
 Don’t trust anything that can think for itself, unless you can see where it keeps its mind.
 This card was one of those horrible magical things that Mr. Weasley had been insisting on…
Aids for those who commit crimes with magic… but then again, Harry thought, he just wanted to use it to get .
Back in Hogsmeade, it wasn't like he wanted to steal anything or hurt anyone... it was Fred .
And George had been using it for years without ill effect…
 Harry traced the secret path to Honeydukes with his finger.
 Then, suddenly, as if following instructions, he drew the card and placed it inside his palm .
clothes, and hurried to the classroom door. He opened it a couple of times. There is no
One outside. With great reluctance, he left the room, behind the one-eyed statue
witch.
 What should he do? He took out the card again and saw to his surprise, that the new ink
body was displayed on it, branded 'Harry Potter'. This figure was standing right where
The real Harry was standing, about halfway down the third floor corridor. Harry watched carefully.
Ink's little self seemed to be teasing the woman with her minute smile. Harry released quickly.
his wand of truth and he holds a machete. Nothing happened. He turned to the map. The youngest
A speech bubble appeared next to his body. The words inside said, "Dissendium."
Page 141 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Dyssendium!” Harry whispered, and snuggled closer to the stone woman.
 Suddenly, the opening of the statue opened wide enough for a very thin person to enter. He glanced at Harry
slowly up and down the street, then he put the card down again and climbed into the ditch
his head, and pushed himself forward.
 He descended way too far down what felt like a cliff and then landed on the cold, flat ground. he
He stood up and looked around. It was dark. He raised his wand and called out, “Lumos!” And he knew
that he was on a very narrow, narrow, dirt road. He picked up the card and tapped it with a
his wallet, and said with a smile, “Mischief succeeded!” The map went blank suddenly. He beat her.
Carefully, he tucked it inside his slacks, and then, heart beating rapidly, both with excitement and fear, he
go.
 The street twisted and turned, more like a steady stream of snow than anyone else’s. Harry
He ran over it, rolling now and then on the uneven ground, swinging his stick in front of the
he.
 It took ages, but Harry had the Honeydukes mind to match. After what felt like a
Hour, the transit begins to increase. Groaning, Harry stumbled away, his face hot and his cheeks too cold.
 Ten minutes later, he came to the foot of some worn stone stairs, jutting out of sight above .
he. Careful not to make any noise, Harry began to climb. One hundred steps, two hundred steps,
He lost count as he walked out, looking at his feet… and then, without warning, his head hit something
hard.
 It looked like a trapdoor. Harry stood there, massaging the top of his head, listening. he
He couldn’t hear any sound above him. Very slowly, he opened the sliding door and peered
side.
 It was in a drawer, filled with wooden bowls and cupcakes. Harry walked out of the closet door.
And he transformed it—mixed so well with the dusty ground that he could scarcely tell it was .
there. Harry hurried over to the wooden railing leading up. Now he really can
They hear voices, not to mention the click of a bell and the opening and closing of a door.
 Wondering what he should do, he suddenly heard a door open very near him; somebody
He was about to come under.
 “And get another can of Jelly Slugs, honey, they’re about to clean us out —” one woman said .
sound.
Page 142 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 A footstep was coming down the stairs. Harry jumped behind a large box and waited.
for the feet to pass. I heard the man banging buttons against the other wall. It may not be
Get another chance —
 Quickly and silently, Harry crept out of his hiding place and climbed onto the deck; They look
floor, he saw a large casket and a shiny bald head, buried in a coffin. Harry reached the door.
At the top of the stairs, he wandered through it and found himself behind the Honeydukes .
— He rolled, rolled to the side, then straightened up.
 Honeydukes was filled with Hogwarts students, and no one looked twice at Harry. he
stepped between them, looked around, and stifled a laugh as he imagined a look that would
it spread across Dudley's pig face if he could see where Harry was now.
 There were tables upon tables of the most delicious looking garden imaginable. Creamy
sheets of nougat, balls of pink and white blossom, a light, dark body; New
different types of chocolate in special boxes; There was a big barrel of grain of all varieties, and
another one of Fizzing Whizbees, the sparkling cherry balls that Ron mentioned; still
The other container were 'special effects' — weed: Droobles Best Blowing Gum (which filled a room
With bluebell colored blisters that refuse to come out for days), Toothflossing is terrible, terrible
Stringmints, Little Red Pepper Imps ('Shoot fire for your friends!'), Ice Frogs ('Listen to your teeth
talk and smile!'), peppermint cream shaped like balloons ('hop right in the belly!'),
sprinkled sugar candles, and exploding bonbons.
 Harry peered through the crowd of sixth years and saw a sign hanging in the middle of nowhere .
the center of the shop (UNUSAL TASTES). Run and Hermione were standing below him,
She peeled off a blood-soaked plate of bacon. Harry hurried after them.
 "Ugh, no, Harry doesn't want one of those, it's for vampires, I expect," Hermione said.
 “How about these?” Ron exclaimed, shoving a vial of Crow's Nest under Hermione's nose.
 “Really, nothing,” Harry said.
 Ron almost dropped the coffee.
 “Harry!” exclaimed Hermione. “What are you doing here? How — how did you —?”
 "nice!" Ron said, looking very excited, “You learn to Apparate!”
 “'Course I didn’t,” Harry said. He lowered his voice so none of the sixth years could hear .
to him and told them all about the Marauder's Card.
Page 143 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “How come Fred and George never ran out of tome!” Ron said, excited. “I’m their brother!”
 “But Harry won’t care!” Hermione said, as if the idea was funny. "he
You’re going to trust Professor McGonagall, aren’t you, Harry?”
 “No, I’m not!” Harry said.
 “Are you leaving?” Ron said, looking at Hermione. “A hand in something this good?”
 "If I give it away, I'll tell where I got it!" Filch will know that Fred and George hit it off!”
 “But what about Black Sirius?” Hermione whispered. “He could be using one of the papers on this .
A card to enter the castle! Teachers know!”
 “He can’t get in the same way,” Harry said quietly. “There are seven secret pools .
On the map, right? Fred and George believe Filch already knows about four of them. and n
Three others — one of them got lost in it, so nobody could get past it. One of them has
Whomping Willow is planted on the door, so you can’t get out of it. And the one I just came
With — well — it’s really hard to see his door down in the hallway — so if he’s not .
They know it’s there —”
 Harry hesitated. What if Black knew the part was there? Run, however, cleared his throat
significantly, and pointed to a notice taped to the inside of the jewelry store door.
By order of the Ministry of Magic
 Customers are reminded that until further notice, Dementors will be patrolling the streets of
Hogsmeade every night after sunset. This code is intended to ensure the security of the
The residents of Hogsmeade and will be relieved when Sirius Black returns. That’s why
You need to finish your shopping well before dark.
 happy new year!
 "see?" Ron said quietly. “I would like to see Black try to break the Honeydukes with the Dementors .
They poop all over the village. Anyway, Hermione, the Honeydukes fans are going to listen to
Break-in, isn’t it? They live on the toilet!”
 “Yes, but — but —” The heroine seemed to struggle to find another problem. “Look, Harry’s still .
He didn't have to come into Hogsmeade. He didn’t have a signed form! If anyone finds it, it will be
In lots of trouble! And it’s still not dark — what if Sirius Black shows up today? now?"
Page 144 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "He'll have a job seeing Harry through this," Ron said, poking his head out of the vents at
The heavy, swirling snow. “Come on, Hermione, it's Christmas. Harry deserves to stop.”
 Hermione bit her lip, looking very concerned.
 “Will you report to me?” Harry asked, looking at her.
 “Oh—of course not—but honestly, Harry—”
 “Have you seen hummingbirds, Harry?” Ron said, grabbing him and leading him towards their
barrels. “And Jelly Slugs? And Acid Pops? Fred gave me one of these when I was seven.
'It burned a hole right off my tongue. I remember my mom taking it with her.
small.” Ron stares curiously at the cover of Acid Pop. “Consider Fred taking a bite of
Cockroach Cluster if I thought it was peanuts?”
 After Ron and Hermione paid for all their sweets, the three of them left the Honeydukes for the
Rain outside.
 Hogsmeade looks like a Christmas card; Houses and small thatched roofed houses were completely buried.
in a dry snowy landscape; There are wreaths on doorways and enchanted candle snakes.
Hanging in trees.
 Harry shivered; Unlike the other two, he didn’t have his back. They headed out into the street, the heads
They rode ahead of the wind, Ron and Hermione shrieking with their spells.
 “It’s the post office—”
 “Zonko’s is up there —”
 “We can go to the amusement park—”
 “Tell you what,” Ron said, teeth gritted, “we’re going for a cheese beer at Three .
Fireballs?”
 Harry was more than willing; The wind was brisk and his hands were freezing, so they passed
street, and in a few minutes they were entering the little shop.
 It was very crowded, noisy, hot, and dirty. Kind of tough girl with a beautiful face
He was servicing a group of revelers up at the bar.
 "That's Mrs. Rosmerta," Ron said. “I’ll get a drink, okay?” He added, going a little red.
Page 145 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry and Hermione made their way to the back of the room, where there was a small, empty cubicle .
ⵟⵟⴰⴱⵍⴰ ⴳⴰⵔ ⵜⴼⴻⴽⴽⴰ ⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵙⴻⴽⵍⵓ ⵏ Noël ⵉⵛⴻⴱⵃⴻⵏ, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵣⴳⴰⵏ ⵣⴷⴰⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵙ. run
He came back five minutes later and brought three warm bacon candies.
 "happy new year!" He said excitedly, picking up his tankard.
 Harry drank deeply. It was the sweetest thing he had ever tried and seemed to get hotter every time.
ns from within.
 A sudden breeze ruffled her hair. The door to the three dwarfs opened again. Harry
He looked over the rim of his tankard and paused.
 Professors McGonagall and Flitwick had just entered the inn with a crash of thunderbolts, soon .
followed by Hagrid, who was in conversation with a muscular man in a muddy green beanie hat
and a suit with a hood — Cornelius Fudge, the Minister of Defense.
 At the same time, Ron and Hermione both put their hands on the top of Harry's head, forcing
His one hand was under the table. He's running with a stick coming out of the hole, Harry
He grabbed his empty tankard and wat ched the teachers and Fudge feet pointed at the bar,
Stop, then turn around and walk straight towards it.
 Somewhere above, Hermione hissed, "Furniture-bus!"
 Nnbi tree who was in front of their tablets removed some symptoms from the grounds, he went to the side, and .
He landed with a thick blanket in front of their table, hiding them from view. Looking at
The bottom branches were thin, Harry saw four chair legs moving back from the table towards him
them, and then they heard the murmurs and sighs of the teachers and the minister as they sat down.
 Then he saw another pair of feet, wearing glowing purple shoes, and heard a voice .
sound.
 “Spice water —”
 “Thanks,” the teacher McGonagall said.
 “Four quarts of milk —”
 “This, Rusmerta,” Hagrid said.
 “Cherry syrup and soda with ice and spice —”
 “ⵎⵎⵎ!” Professor Flitwick said, rubbing his lips.
Page 146 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Then you will be red carrot rum, minister.”
 "Thank you, Rosmerta, baby," Fudge's voice said. “Love seeing you again, I must say. have
One yourself, isn’t it? Come join us…”
 “Well, thank you very much, Minister.”
 Harry watched the glittering footsteps march away and move again. Her heart was pounding.
He didn't care in his temper. Why didn't it occur to him that it was the last weekend of the year
For teachers too? And how long will they stay there? He needs time to go back through the entrance.
At the Honeydukes if he wanted to go back to school tonight… Hermione's shoulder froze
She snuggles up next to him.
 “So, what brings you to this neck of the woods, Minister?” came Mrs. Rosmerta's voice.
 Harry watched the lower part of Fudge's pink body look around in his chair as if checking to see if
The reformers. Then he said in a low voice, "What else, m'dear, but Sirius Black?" I can tell you
Did you hear what happened at Halloween School?”
 “I did hear a noise,” Ms. Rosmerta admitted.
 “Have you told the court everything, Hagrid?” Professor McGonagall said excitedly.
 “Do you think Black is still in the vicinity, minister?” said Mrs. Rusmerta.
 "I'm sorry," Fudge whispered.
 “Did you know that Dementors attacked the entire village twice?” Ms. Rusmerta said, and
quickly raising his voice. “They scared away all my customers… It’s very bad for business, minister.”
 "Rosmerta, sweetheart, I don't like them as much as you do," Fudge growled.
“Concentration is necessary… pain, but there you are… I just met some of them. are in
anger against Dumbledore — not allowing them inside the castle grounds.”
 "I should think not," Professor McGonagall whispered. “How should we teach with
The flying horror?”
 “Hear, hear!” said young Professor Flitwick, his arms dangling a foot from
soil.
 "After all," Fudge said, "they're here to protect you all from much worse…."
We all know what Black can do…”
Page 147 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "You know, I still have trouble believing it," Ms. Rosmerta murmured. “Out of all
People would go to the dark side, Sirius Black was the last one I would have thought of… I mean, I
Remember when he was a boy at Hogwarts. If you had told me then what he would do
Come on, I'll tell you if it's going to hurt you.”
 "You don't know the half of it, Rosmerta," Fudge insisted. “The worst he did was not the best .
known."
 "worst?" said Mrs. Rosmerta, her voice alive with curiosity. “The worst thing is to kill them all .
Those poor people, you mean?”
 “I sure do,” Fudge said.
 “I can’t believe this. What could be more dangerous?”
 "You said you remembered him at Hogwarts, Rosmerta," the woman said with a smile. "do
Do you remember who his best friend is?”
 "Naturally," said Mrs. Rosmerta, with a little laugh. “I’ve never seen one without the other, done .
you? The amount of times I had them here — ooh, they had me laughing. Exactly
Secondly, Sirius Black and James Potter!”
 ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵔⵙⴷ ⵜⴰⵏⴽⴰⵔⴷⵉⵙ ⵙ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵟⵟⵓⵜ. Ron Climate.
 “Sure,” Professor McGonagall said. “Black is Potter. The leaders of their small group. both
very simple, of course — exceptionally simple, in fact — but I don’t think we’ve ever had such a
Two prisoners —”
 “I don’t know,” Hagrid whispered. “Fred and George Weasley can give them a run for their money.”
 “You’d think they were brothers Black and Potter!” Professor Flitwick said.
“Inseparable!”
 "Of course they are," Fudge said. “Potter trusted Black above all of his other allies. nothing
It changed when they left school. Black was a better man when James married Lily. It was then called
He's Harry's father. Harry had no idea, of course. Can you imagine what that idea would be like
Punish him.”
 “Because Black is back in league with YouKnow-Who?” said Mrs. Rusmerta.
Page 148 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "Even better, m'dear…" Fudge lowered his voice, continuing in a sort of whisper .
Rumble. “Not many people know that the Potters know the YouKnowWho behind them.
Dumbledore, who was, of course, actively working against YouKnow-Who, had a lot of
Useful guardians. One of them informed him, and informed James and Lily simultaneously. Instructed them
You will go into hiding. Well, of course, YouKnowWho isn’t an easy person to hide.
Dumbledore told them that their best chance was a fidelius box.”
 “How does that work?” said Mrs. Rosmerta, breathing a sigh of relief. Professor Flitwick
He cleared his throat.
 “It’s a very strange spell,” he said quietly, “involving hiding the magic of a .
secrets within a living soul. Information is hidden within a selected model, or
SecretKeeper, and henceforth impossible to find — unless, of course, it is a Handkeeper .
He chose to ignore it. As long as the Bodyguard refuses to talk, you-know-who might
Search the village where Lily and James lived for years and they won’t be found, even if
He had his nose stuck in their sitting room window!”
 “So Black was the mysterious keeper of the stones?” said Mrs. Rusmerta.
 "Naturally," Professor McGonagall said. “Dumbledore told him the black would die .
Rather than say where they were, that Black was planning to go in and hide himself… and yet,
Dumbledore remained worried. I remember him offering to be a keeper of the mystery of the rocks
Himself.”
 “He suspects Black?” said Mrs. Rusmerta.
 “He was certain that someone close to the Potters had been keeping YouKnow-Who on
Their behaviors,” Professor McGonagall said sarcastically. “Of course, he had been suspicious for some time .
that someone on our side had become a traitor and was passing a lot of information to YouKnowWho.”
 “But James Potter insisted on the use of Cloud?”
 “He did it,” Fudge insisted. “And then it was barely a week after the Fidelius Charm
did -"
 “Does black do them?” said Mrs. Rusmerta.
 “He really did it. Black tired of his dual role, was ready to announce his support
openly to YouKnow-Who, and he seems to be setting this up for the Potters' generation.
death. But, as we all know, you-know-who met his downfall in little Harry Potter. Skills
He walked away, terrified and ran away. And that leaves Black in a very awkward position indeed. Mrs.
Page 149 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
He falls at the very moment he, Black, shows his true colors as a traitor. doesn’t have
Choice but to run —”
 “Filthy turtleneck, stinkin!” Hagrid said, so loudly that half the bar went silent.
 “Chh!” Professor McGonagall said.
 “I met him!” said Hagrid. “I musta bin ter last to see him before he kills all those people! it
It was me who rescued Harry from Lily an' James' house after they were murdered! Jus' got him out of
orphan, poor little thing, with a big scar on her forehead, and her parents dead… and Sirius Black
Turns out, about the flying motorcycle he used ter ride. It did not happen ter me what he was doing there. I
He didn't know he'd have Lily and James' secret keeper. Thought he jus' heard the news of YouKnowWho's attack an' came ter to see what he could do. White an 'shakin', was. An' yeh know what I did?
I LOVE THE LITTLE SHIT!” Hagrid shouted.
 “Hagrid, please!” Professor McGonagall said. “Keep your voice down!”
 “How do I know he’s upset about Lily and James? It’s up to you who cares
Ash! An' then he said, "Give me Harry ter, Hagrid, I'm his godfather, and I'll take care of him —."
Ha! But I got advice from Dumbledore, and I told Black no, Dumbledore said Harry was ter
Go ter his uncle an' uncle. Black argued, but in the end he gave up. He told me ter to take
The motorcycle ter took Harry there. 'I don't need it,' he said.
 “I should’ve known there was something magical back then. Love that motorbike, what a
He gave me ter i? Why doesn’t he need it anymore? Fact was, it was very easy ter trace.
Dumbledore knew he would see the boss keeper of the wardrobes. Black knew he was going to run
Ferit that night, knowing it was a matter of hours before the Ministry was after him.
 "But what if I gave Harry to him, eh?" I bet he would have been thrown off the bike half way
sea. The son of his friends of bes! But when the magician walks on the dark side, nothing and nothing
Nobody’s worth em…”
 A long silence followed Hagrid's story. Then Mrs. Rosmerta said with some satisfaction, “But .
He didn't dare to fall, did he? The hair department caught him the next day!”
 "No, if we had," Fudge sighed. “We didn’t find it. It was Little Peter.
Pettigrew — another one of the Potters’ friends. He’s grief-stricken, no doubt, and he knows that
Black was the boss of the drums, he went after Black himself.”
 “Pettigrew… that little fluffy boy who always sneaked up behind them at Hogwarts?” said
Mrs. Rusmert.
Page 150 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “The Beast — he worshiped black and blue,” Professor McGonagall said. “It’s not all about them .
league, knowing the talent. I was much more subtle with it. You can imagine how I — how I feel .
that now…” She sounded like she had a sudden head cold.
 “There, now, Minerva,” Fudge said kindly, “Pettigrew died the death of an animal. Eyewitness —
Muggles, of course, we refreshed their memories later—we were told how Pettigrew had insulted Black.
They said he was so excited, 'Lily and James, Sirius! How can you ? And then he went to his
A stick. So, of course, Black was wrong. They drove Pettigrew into the spotlight…”
 Professor McGonagall wrinkled her nose and whispered, "Stupid boy… stupid boy… he was . . ."
Always hopeless in a duel… should leave it to the Ministry…”
 “I tell you, if I had ter Black before young Pettigrew did, I wouldn’t have been messing with .
Wands — I’ll tear his legs — off — his feet,” Hagrid said quietly.
 "You don't know what you're talking about, Hagrid," Fudge snapped. “No one but the trained
Hit Wizards from the Magical Law Enforcement Team will stand a chance against Black .
Once convinced. I was a junior minister in the Department of Magical Explosions in
time, and I was one of the first on the scene after Black killed all those people. I — Will
Don't forget it. I still dream about it sometimes. A hole in the middle of the road, very deep
The ignition switch had broken downstairs. Bodies everywhere. Muggles scream. And Black is standing there
He laughed, with what was left of Pettigrew in front of him… a bloodied cleavage and a
Few — a few pieces —”
 Fudge's voice suddenly stopped. There was the sound of five bones being crushed.
 "Well, there you have it, Rosmerta," Fudge snapped. “Black is gained by twenty .
Magical Law Enforcement Task Force members and Pettigrew received Merlin Orders,
First Class, which I suppose was some tribute to his late mother. Black was in Azkaban before
since."
 Madame Rosmerta let out a long sigh.
 “Is he really failing, Minister?”
 "I guess I'd say he is," Fudge said quietly. “I really believe in killing the owner .
Unhinged him for a while. The murder of Pettigrew and all those muggles was the act of a
The average man is sad — villainous… pointless. But I met Black in my last review of
Azqaban. You know, most of the crazies out there are left staring at themselves in the dark;
None of it makes sense… but I’m shocked at how normal Black looks. He talked a lot.
Reasonably well for me. It was amazing. You would have thought he was just tired — he asked if I would
Continue with my newspaper, cool it as you like, he said he liked to do a puzzle. Yes, I was
He was surprised at how little blame the Dementors seemed to have on him — and he was one of
Who is very guarded about the place, you know. Dementors outside his door day and night.”
Page 151 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “But what do you think he’s out to do?” Mrs. Rusmerta said. “Good gracious,
The minister, he’s not trying to go back to YouKnow-Who, is he?”
 "I'm guessing that was his — er — plan in the end," Fudge said with a chuckle. “But we hope to take Black .
Long before that. I have to say, you know-who alone and without friends is one thing… but give it
afterwards his most zealous servant, and I shudder to think how quickly he will rise…”
 There is a small piece of glue on the wood. Someone turned on their glass.
 “You know, Cornelius, if you’re eating with the headmaster, we’d better head back to the basement.
The castle,” Professor McGonagall said.
 One by one, the figures in front of Harry took on the weight of their parents once more; lines
bottles were raised in sight, and Madam Rosmerta's glittering lashes disappeared behind the bar.
The door of the three dwarfs opened again, there was another flurry of snow, and
The teachers were killed.
 “Harry?”
 Ron and Hermione's faces appeared under the mask. They were both looking at him, at a loss for
mandatory.





Page 152 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Chapter Fourteen
Fireball
 Harry didn't have a very clear memory of how he managed to get back to the Honeydukes .
Coffee, with a knife, to the castle again. All he knew was that the journey back
Turns out he didn’t take all the time, and he barely noticed what he was doing, because his head .
He was still beating out the sound he had just heard.
 Why didn’t anyone tell him? Dumbledore, Hagrid, Mr. Uzly, Cornelius Fudge…why
No one said Harry’s parents died because their best friend had
Does it work for them?
 Ron and Hermione watched Harry nervously all dinner, unable to speak of what
They heard him, because Percy was sitting nearby. When they moved up to
crowded into the club room, it’s to find Fred and George unleashing half a dozen Dungbombs into a
Fit the end end of the high spirits. Harry, he didn’t want Fred and George to ask him if he would
Did he make it to Hogsmeade or not, he stormed into the orphanage and headed straight for
his bedside cabinet. He pushed his books aside and quickly found what he was looking for — a
The leather-clad photo album Hagrid gave her two years ago is filled with wizardry
Pictures of his mother and father. He sat down on his bed, pulled the blankets around him, and
I started flipping through the pages, searching, until…
Page 153 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 He paused for a picture from his parents’ wedding day. His father was looking at him.
They are hidden, the unfortunate black rumors for Dai Harry standing everywhere. ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵡⵉⵏⵉⵙ
My mother, collapsed with joy, hand in hand with her father. And there… it had to be him. The best of them
Man… Harry hadn't given it a thought before.
 If he didn't know he was the same person, he wouldn't have assumed he was Black in this early
picture. His face was not gloomy and homely, but gentle, full of smiles. There is already
Were they working for Voldemort when this picture was taken? He was already thinkin
The death of the two people in front of him? Knowing he was facing twelve years in Azkaban,
Twelve years would make him unrecognizable?
 But the Dementors didn't hurt him, Harry thought, looking at the beautiful, laughing face. he
You shouldn’t hear mom scream if they’re too close —
 Harry slammed the album shut, reached over and put it back in his cabinet, taking out his
blankets and glasses and got into bed, making sure that the blanket hid him from view.
 The door to the orphanage opened.
 “Harry?” Ron's voice said uncontrollably.
 But Harry stayed still and pretended to be asleep. I heard Ron leave again, and he hopped on his bike .
After, his eyes opened.
 A lie like no one he had ever known before was swirling around Harry like poison. can
See Black laughing at him in the dark, as if someone had copied the image from
The album over his eyes. He watched, as if someone were playing a movie part for him,
Black Sirius Turning Peter Pettigrew (who looks like Neville Longbuttom) into a thousand
pieces. He can hear (though he has no idea what Black’s voice might sound like) a faint tone,
He looks happy. “It has happened, my Lord… the audience has made me their secret keeper” and .
Then came another voice, laughing softly, the same laugh Harry had heard inside his head .
Whenever the Dementors get close…
 “Harry, you — you look ridiculous.”
 Harry couldn't sleep until daylight. He awoke to find the orphanage empty.
dressed, and went down the barber shop to a common room that was completely empty except
For Ron, who was eating a worm and licking his stomach, and for Hermione, who had
She divides her duties into three tables.
 “Where’s everyone?” Harry said.
Page 154 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "He's gone! It's the first day of vacation, remember?" Ron said, looking at Harry closely "and.
It was almost lunchtime; I’ll come wake you up in a minute.”
 Harry sank into a chair by the fire. Rain was still falling outside the windows.
Crookshanks was stretched out in front of the fireplace like a giant gingerbread man.
 "You really don't look very well, you know," Hermione said, staring affectionately into his face.
 “I’m fine,” Harry said.
 “Harry, listen,” Hermione said, exchanging glances with Ron, “maybe you’re really worried .
What we heard yesterday. But the thing is, you shouldn’t go do anything stupid.”
 “Like what?” Harry said.
 “Looks like you’re trying to catch Black,” Ron said quietly.
 Harry could tell they had this conversation while he was asleep. He didn't say
anything.
 “You won’t, Harry?” Hermione said.
 "Because Black isn't worth dying for," Ron said.
 Harry looked at them. They didn’t seem to understand at all.
 “You know what I see and hear every time a Dementor gets too close to me?” Ron and Hermione
They shook their heads, looking worried. “I can hear my mother screaming and pleading .
Voldemort. And if you heard your mother scream like that, they were just about to kill her, you
Don’t forget it too quickly. And if you find someone who is supposed to be friends with
His betrayed her and he sent Voldemort after her—”
 “Nothing you can do!” Hermione said, looking terrified. “The Dementors will take over .
Black and go back to Azkaban and — and serve him well!”
 “You heard what Fudge said. Black is not affected by Azkaban like normal people. It’s not
Punishment for him like everyone else.”
 “So what do you say?” Ron said, looking very concerned. “You want — to kill Black or .
some?"
Page 155 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Don’t be ridiculous,” Hermione said in a panicked voice. "Harry wouldn't want to kill anyone, you,
Harry?”
 Again, Harry didn't answer. He didn’t know what he wanted to do. All he knew was that the idea
of doing nothing, while Black was at liberty, was almost more than he could stand.
 “Malfoy knows,” he said quietly. “Remember what he said to me in Potions? 'If I were you, I'd
I took care of him myself… I would like revenge.'”
 “You’re going to take Malfoy’s orders instead of ours?” Ron said cheerfully. “Listen… you know .
What did Pettigrew’s mother become after Black ended with her? Dad told me — Text
of Merlin, Section 1, and Pettigrew's finger in a dish. That’s the biggest part of it they can
find. Black is mad, Harry, and miserable—”
 "Maybe Malfoy's father told him," Harry said, ignoring Ron. “He had a sense of humor about Voldemort .
The inner voice —”
 “Say you know-who, will you?” Ron exclaimed angrily.
 “— so clearly, the Malfoys knew Black was working for Voldemort—”
 “— and Malfoy would love to see you disintegrate into a million pieces, just like Pettigrew! Get a hand.
Malfoy just hopes you kill him before he plays you in Quidditch.”
 “Harry, please,” Hermione said, her eyes now shining with tears, “please be serious. Black does
Dangerous, dangerous thing, but don't put yourself in danger, that's what the Black wants... Oh, Harry,
You’ll be playing right into Black’s hands if you go looking for him. Your mom and dad
They wouldn’t want to hurt you, would they? They don’t want you to go looking for Black!”
 “I don’t know what they want, because thanks to Black, I didn’t talk to them,”
Harry said quietly.
 There was a silence in which Crookshanks nervously shuffled his feet. Run Pocket
He's trembling.
 “Look,” Ron said, obviously jumping around to change the subject, “it’s Christmas! soon
Christmas! Let’s — let’s go down and see Hagrid. We haven’t visited in ages!”
 "No!" Hermione said suddenly. “Harry shouldn’t have left the castle, Ron —”
 “Yeah, let’s go,” Harry said, sitting up, “and I can ask him how he never mentioned Black .
When he told me all about my parents!”
Page 156 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Further discussion of Sirius Black seemed not to be on Ron's mind.
 “Or we could have a game of chess,” he said quietly, “or Gobstones. Percy left an item —”
 "No, let's see Hagrid," Harry insisted.
 So they stripped off their clothes from their lounges and set off from the window above (“Stand and
Fight, you white-tailed hawks !”), under the ruined castle, out of the woods .
The front doors.
 They slowly made their way through the sand, making a shallow niche in the shiny, dense sand
Snow, their socks and coats were soaked and frozen. The Forbidden Forest looks
It seems enchanted, every tree is adorned with silver, and Hagrid’s castle looks like
Ice cream cake.
 Ron knocked, but there was no answer.
 “He hasn’t come out yet, right?” said Hermione, who was quivering under her breath.
 Ron had his ear to the door.
 “There was a sense of emptiness,” he said. “Listen — is that Fang?”
 Harry and Hermione also put their ears to the door. From inside the cabin came a lower signal,
looking.
 “Do you think we’d better go get one?” Ron said nervously.
 “Hagrid!” Harry called, pushing against the door. “Hagrid, are you there?”
 There was a sound of heavy footsteps, and then the door clicked. Hagrid stood there with his
His eyes were red and swollen, tears streaming down the front of his leather jacket.
 “Did you hear?” he growled, leaning back against Harry's shoulder.
 Hagrid being at least twice the size of a normal man, this was no laughing matter. Harry, almost
Collapsing under Hagrid's weight, he was rescued by Ron and Hermione, each carrying Hagrid .
down one arm and back into the kitchen. Hagrid allowed himself to be pushed into a
chair and collapsed on the table, crying uncontrollably, his face covered in tears streaming
down into his confused throat.
 “Hagrid, what is it?” Hermione said, confused.
Page 157 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry noticed an official appointment letter lying open on the table.
 “What’s that, Hagrid?”
 Hagrid's eyebrows doubled, but he held out the letter to Harry, who picked it up and read it aloud:
 Mr. Hagrid,
 In addition to our investigation of a Hippogriff attack on a pupil in your class, we have
Accept Professor Dumbledore’s argument that you have no control over
An alleged event.
 “Well, it’s okay then, Hagrid!” Ron said, patting Hagrid on the shoulder. But Hagrid
He continued to smile, and held up one of his large hands, inviting Harry to keep reading.
 However, we must register our concern for the Hippogriff in question. We decided to
They object to Mr. Lucius Malfoy's official complaint, so the matter will be referred to the
Stray Animal Control Committee. The hearing is scheduled for April 20, 2020.
And we ask you to present yourself and your Hippogriff at the offices of the Board in London on
The date. In the meantime, the Hippogriff should be kept tethered and isolated.
 Yours in common…
 A list of school representatives follows.
 “Oh,” Ron said. “But you say Buckbeak isn’t a bad Hippogriff, Hagrid. I bet it goes down.”
 “Yeh don' know the gargoyles in the council fer recruiting missing workers!”
Hagrid said, wiping his eyes on his forehead. “They have it in the fer interestin of the people!”
 A sudden shout from the corner of Hagrid's cabin made Harry, Ron, and Hermione jump up.
The buckbeak Hippogriff was perched in the corner, munching on something that was drawing blood
All on the floor.
 “I can’t leave it stranded there in the snow!” said Hagrid. “All on himself! in
Christmas.”
 Harry, Run, and Hermione looked at each other. They never saw eye to eye with Hagrid
about what he called 'terrible people' and other people 'terrible animals'. in
On the other hand, there doesn’t seem to be anything particularly wrong with Buckbeak. In fact, by Hagrid
Standards, it was awesome.
Page 158 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "You need to put up a good strong defence, Hagrid," Hermione said, sitting up and putting on a
A hand on Hagrid's big forearm. “I’m sure you can confirm that Buckbeak is safe.”
 “Won' made no mistake!” Hagrid shouted. “They’re Disposal devils, they’re all in on Lucius .
Malfoy's briefcase! I'm scared of him! I’ll if I mess things up, Buckbeak —”
 Hagrid pulled his finger quickly across his throat, then gave a huge sigh and lunged forward, his
Face in his hands.
 “What about Dumbledore, Hagrid?” Harry said.
 “He’s done more than enough fer me already,” Hagrid said. “He’s got enough on his plate and what with .
They were kept by the Dementors from the castle, and Sirius Black was wandering around.”
 Ron and Hermione quickly looked at Harry, as if waiting for him to start berating Hagrid for
They don’t tell him the truth about Black. But Harry couldn't bring himself to do it, not now that he was
He saw Hagrid pale and scared.
 “Listen, Hagrid,” he said, “you can’t give up. Hermione was right, you just needed better defense.
You can call us witnesses—”
 "Sorry, I read about a case of a Hippogriff bite," Hermione murmured, "where he
The Hippogriff came out. I’ll look for you, Hagrid, and see what really happened.”
 Hagrid yelled still louder. Harry and Hermione looked to Ron for help.
 “Er — shall I make a cup of tea?” Run said.
 Harry stared at him.
 “That’s what my mom does whenever someone’s tired,” Ron said, holding out his hand.
 Finally, after many more supporting attempts, with a pot of steaming tea in front of him, Hagrid
He blew his nose on a tablecloth-sized piece of cloth and said, “Yer right. I couldn't leave.
ter of the elements. Gotta pull myself together…”
 Fang the hedgehog crawled gingerly from under the table and rested his head on Hagrid's shoulder.
 “I haven’t binned myself lately,” Hagrid said, hugging Fang with one hand and rubbing his face with
another. “I’m worried about Buckbeak, no one’s interested in me in classes—”
Page 159 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “We do the same as them!” exclaimed Hermione suddenly.
 “Yeah, they’re great!” Ron said, tucking his fingers under the blanket. “Er — how they are .
of mammals?”
 “He’s dead,” Hagrid growled. “A lot of fabric.”
 “Oh no!” Ron said, biting his lip.
 “An' them Dementors I'm terrified an' all,” said Hagrid, with a grin on his face.
“I’d have to walk past them every time I wanted a drink in three holes. 's like bein' back in
Azkaban —”
 He sighed, taking a sip of his tea. Harry, Ron and Hermione watched him breathlessly. They had
He had never heard Hagrid talk about his brief sojourn in Azkaban before. After a pause, Hermione said
I whispered, “Is it dangerous there, Hagrid?”
 “You have no idea,” Hagrid said quietly. “I don’t look anywhere like him. Thought I was going crazy.
Keep haunting things in my mind… the day I got kicked out of Hogwarts… the day my father
He died… the day I was ter letting Norbert go…”
 Her eyes filled with tears. Norbert is a stuffed animal that Hagrid once won in a card game.
 “Yeh can' actually remember who yeh are after a while. An' yeh can' really see the meaning of life'.
all. I use ter hope they jus' die in their sleep. When they released me, it was like a rebirth,
ev'rythin' came flodin' back, and bes' feelin' in the world. Mind, Dementors are not
Keen to let me go.”
 “But you were innocent!” Hermione said.
 Hagrid sighed.
 “You think that’s enough for them? They don't care. As long as they have a couple of people
They stayed there with them, so they could suck all the happiness out of them, not giving a damn who was
Beat up an' who ain't.”
 Hagrid was silent for a moment, staring at his glass. Then he said suddenly, “Thought o' jus'.
Let Buckbeak go… Trying to keep him away… but how do you explain him as a Hippogriff
Should he go between hidin'? An' — an' I'm afraid o' I've broken the law…” He glanced up at them, .
Tears were streaming down her face again. “I don’t want to go back ter Azkaban.”
 A trip to Hagrid, while far from happy, had the same effect that Ron and Hermione had .
desire. Though Harry had in no way forgotten Black, he couldn’t help but think constantly of
Page 160 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
revenge if he wants to help Hagrid win his case against the Suppression Council of
Wise creatures. He, Ron, and Hermione went to the library the next day and back to the
The chaos common room is filled with books that can help plan an attack for Buckbeak. the
Three of them sat in front of a roaring fire, slowly turning the pages of leather books about
known cases of predators, occasionally spitting when they encounter something
relevant.
 “Here’s something… there was a case in 1722… but the Hippogriff was convicted — ugh, look .
What they did to him was disgusting—”
 “That might help, see — a Manticore infected someone in 1296, and they let the Manticore get away .
— oh — no, that was only because everyone was too scared to go near him…”
 Meanwhile, in the rest of the castle, the usual gorgeous Christmas decorations were put up .
up, though hardly any of the students stayed to enjoy them. The thin layers of
holly and mistletoe lined the streets, fairy lights shining from inside each
ceremonial clothes, and the Great Hall was filled with its usual twelve Christmas trees, glittering with
Gold stars. The strong and sweet smell of cooking filled the streets, and s
Christmas Eve, it was so strong that even Scabbers blew his nose out of the
Ron of the crew would sniff hopefully in the air.
 On Christmas Eve, Harry was woken up by Ron when he threw his pillow at him.
 “Oh! It works!”
 Harry reached for his glasses and put them on, glancing at the dark half of the classroom.
her bed, where a small pile of strawberries appeared. Ron was already ripping the paper off of him.
gifts of her own.
 “Mom’s other sweater… maroon too… see if you have one.”
 He had Harry. Mrs. Weasley sent her a black dress with the Gryffindor lion embroidered on the
front, also a dozen tins of homemade popsicles, some Christmas cake, and a box of blueberries. As he
He moved all these things aside and saw a long, dark staff lying beneath him.
 “What’s that?” said Ron, looking in the other direction, a half-unfinished brown cap in his hand.
 "I don't know..."
 Harry opened the box and smiled as a beautiful, sparkling orb flew onto the
His bedspread. Ron kicked off his socks and got out of his bed to get a closer look.
Page 161 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “I don’t believe it,” he exclaimed.
 It was the Firebolt, identical to the dream wand that Harry went to see every day in Diagon Alley.
His legs glittered as he picked it up. He could feel him stirring and letting her go; He jumped into the sky.
It is not adjustable, at exactly the right height to do so. His eyes peered from gold
Serial number at the top of the handle, to the full center, painted
The birch splinters lining the window.
 “Who sent you?” Ron said in a hushed voice.
 “Look and see if there’s a map,” Harry said.
 Ron ripped out the Firebolt tapes.
 "No! Blimey, who would treat you like that?”
 “Well,” Harry said, feeling disappointed, “I bet it’s not the Dursleys.”
 “I hope that’s Dumbledore,” Ron said, now twisting and turning around the Firebolt, stepping into it .
Every party singers. “Yourzenk’s dinner is seen in the name…”.
 “It’s Dad’s thing, though,” Harry said. “Dumbledore was just passing me by. he
It didn’t cost hundreds of Galleons on me. He can’t go and give students stuff like that —”
 “That doesn’t mean from her!” Run said. “If some git like Malfoy said .
He was an element. Hey, Harry —” Ron gave a huge roar of laughter — “Malfoy! Wait until he knows
You’re in on this! He's going to be sick as a pig! This is an international-level body, this is it!”
 “I can’t believe this,” Harry muttered, passing his hand over the Firebolt, while Ron knocked over .
Harry's bed, laughing his head off at Malfoy's comment. "who-?"
 "I know," Ron said, defensive, "I know who it could be—Lupin!"
 "what?" Harry said, now starting to laugh himself “Lupine? Listen, if he had a lot of gold, he would
He’ll be able to buy himself some new clothes.”
 “Yeah, but he likes you,” Ron said. “And he was away when your Nimbus fell, and he
Maybe you heard about it and decide to visit Diagon Alley and I’ll get you this —”
 “What do you mean, was he far away?” Harry said. "He was sick when I played in that match."
 "Well, he's not in the hospital wing," Ron said. “I’m in there, washing the bed sheets on that .
punishment from Snape, remember?”
Page 162 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry nodded at Ron.
 “I can’t see Lupine capable of something like that.”
 “What are you two laughing at?”
 Hermione had just walked in, dressed in her dressing gown and hugging Crookshanks, who was
He looked very scary, with a hood strapped to his head.
 “Don’t come here!” Ron said, quickly pulling Scabbers off the bottom of his bed and .
stowing him in his pajama pocket.
 But Hermione wasn't listening. She laid Crookshanks down on Seamus' dirty bed and looked at her,
Open Mouth, in Firebolt.
 “Harry! Who told you this?”
 “No idea,” Harry said. “She didn’t have a map or anything with her.”
 Much to his surprise, Hermione didn't appear either thrilled or shocked by the news. in
opposite, he fell on his face and bit his lip.
 “What’s the matter with you?” Run said.
 "I don't know," Hermione whispered, "but it's a bit weird, isn't it?" I mean, this should be
It’s a pretty good weapon, isn’t it?”
 Ron smiled proudly.
 "It's the best body there is, Hermione," he said.
 “So it must have been really expensive…”
 "It probably costs more than all of Slytherin's bodies combined," Ron said proudly.
 “Well… who would send Harry something so expensive, and not even tell him they got it?”
Hermione said.
 “Who cares?” Ron said calmly. "Listen, Harry, can I handle it?" I can?"
 “I don’t think anyone should be riding that buck just yet!” Hermione said with a chuckle.
Page 163 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry and Ron looked at her.
 “What do you think Harry’s going to do with it—sweep the floor?” Run said.
 But before Hermione could answer, Crookshanks jumped out of Seamus's bed, right in front of Ron .
chest.
 “GET — HIM — OUT — OF — HERE!” Ron shouted as Crookshanks fingers brushed his
pajamas and Scabbers tried to escape in vain on his back. He holds Run Skabbers in his lap.
He also delivered a ruthless blow at Crookshanks who hit the box at the end of Harry's bed, and fell over .
It over and caused Ron to rock up and down, howling in pain.
 Crookshanks's body relaxed suddenly. A low, low chuckle filled the room. the
The Pocket Sneakoscope became uncovered from Uncle Vernon’s old socks and was spinning and
They shimmered on the floor.
 “I forgot about that!” Harry said, bowing and picking up the Sneakoscope. “I don’t wear
Those girls if I can help it…”
 The sneakoscope turned and tilted in his hand. Crookshanks was hissing and hissing at her.
 "You'd better get that cat out of here, Hermione," Ron said angrily, sitting down on Harry's bed .
Nursing her leg. “Can’t you handle that thing?” He added to Harry as Hermione walked out of the
room, Crookshanks blue eyes still focused dangerously on Ron.
 Harry put the Sneakoscope on the inside of the cap and slipped it back on. All that
He could now hear Ron's muffled cries of pain and despair. Scabbers was trapped in Ron
sleeve. It had been a while since Harry had seen it from Ron's box, and he was
He was unhappily surprised to see that Scabbers, formerly handsome, was now very handsome; footballs
He seemed lost too.
 “Doesn’t look very good, does it?” Harry said.
 “It’s crazy!” Run said. “It would have been better if the big fucking furball would have left him alone!”
 Harry, however, remembered what the Magical Menagerie lady had said about living creatures .
Only three years old, he couldn't help feeling that if Scabbers didn't have talents he hadn't shown, he
He was coming to the end of his life. And yet Ron often complained that Scabbers was both
It was annoying and useless, he was sure that Ron would be very upset if Scabbers died.
Page 164 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 The Christmas spirit was really thin on the floor in the Gryffindor common room that morning.
Hermione ties up Crookshanks in his dorm, but is furious at Ron for trying to seduce him .
he; Ron was still fuming over Crookshanks' new attempt to eat Scabbers. Harry gave a nod.
He tries to keep them separate from each other and devotes himself to evaluating Firebolt, which
He had taken her to the common room. For some reason, that seems strange.
Hermione too; She said nothing, but kept staring darkly at the ruins as if
He was teasing his partner too.
 At lunchtime they go down to the great hall and find that the tables of the House have been changed .
in front of the wall also, is that a platform, which is intended for twelve, stands in the middle of the room.
Professors Dumbledore, McGonagall, Snape, Sprout, and Flitwick are there, along with Filch,
The guard, taking off his usual brown hat, and putting on a very old and elegant one
leathery looking straw hat. There were only three other students, two looked very bored
The first years were Slytherin in disguise the fifth year.
 "happy new year!" Dumbledore said as Harry, Ron, and Hermione approached the table. "as
There are so few of us, it seems strange to use the Home tabs… Stay, stay!”
 Harry, Ron and Hermione sat side by side at the end of the living room.
 “Thieves!” Dumbledore said excitedly, giving the end of a great silver tone to .
Snape, who held it close and pulled away. With a bang like a bomb, the robber burst into
A huge blonde top was revealed with a stuffed horned owl.
 Harry, remembering Boggart, caught Ron's eye and they both smiled; Snap Mouth
he smirked and tossed the wand towards Dumbledore, who replaced it with his wizard wand simultaneously.
 “Gz in it!” he said across the table, beaming.
 As Harry was helping himself to the trunk, the doors to the Great Hall opened again. compliance
Professor Trelawney, trotting towards them as if on crutches. She is wearing a blue dress.
dressed in honor of the occasion, making her look more than ever like a glistening, grown-up
The animal.
 “Sybill, this is a nice surprise!” Dumbledore said, standing up.
 “I’ve got crystal vision, Headmaster,” Professor Trelawney said with her wide, wide grin .
in a distant voice, “and to my surprise, I saw myself leaving my lunch alone and .
He will come and join you. Who am I to refuse the temptations of existence? I suddenly went from
Tower, and I beg you to forgive my delay…”
 "Of course, of course," Dumbledore said, his eyes twinkling. “Let me fashion a chair for you—”
Page 165 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 And he actually drew a chair in the air with his thumb, which rotated for a few seconds
before disappearing through the interaction between Professors Snape and McGonagall. Professor Tilawney,
However, it did not last; Her big eyes were fixed on the table, and she
Suddenly he let out a sort of shrill cry.
 “I am not afraid, Headmaster! If I join the table, we will be thirteen! Nothing could be more unfortunate!
Don’t forget that when all thirteen eat, whoever gets up will be the first to die!”
 "We're going to miss him, Sybill," Professor McGonagall growled. “Stay, the potatoes are growing
Cold stone.”
 Professor Trelawney hesitated, then leaned back in the empty chair, eyes closed, mouth .
You tugged harder, like he was waiting for the needle to hit the table. Professor McGonagall posted a
Great coffee in nearby tureen.
 “Trib, Sybil?”
 Professor Trelawney ignored her. Her eyes opened again, she looked again and said, “But .
Where is dear Professor Lupine?”
 "I'm afraid the poor man will become ill," Dumbledore said, indicating that everyone should start .
They serve themselves. “Too bad it had to happen on Christmas Day.”
 “But surely you already knew that, Sybill?” Professor McGonagall said, raising an eyebrow.
 Professor Trelawney gave Professor McGonagall a very serious look.
 "I'm sure I know, Minerva," she whispered. “But one never seems to think that one is .
Everything he knows. I often pretend I don’t have an inner eye, so that I don’t
Others are thriving.”
 “That explains a lot,” Professor McGonagall sighed.
 Professor Trelawney's voice suddenly became much less polite.
 “If you must know, Minerva, I saw that poor Professor Lupine won’t be with us for several days .
long. He appears to feel, himself, that his time is limited. He actually ran away when I handed him the crystal.
See on it —”
 “Imagine this,” Professor McGonagall whispered.
Page 166 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "I doubt it," Dumbledore said, sounding cheerful but depressed, which put an end to the Headmaster .
McGonagall and Professor Trelawney’s voiceover, “that Professor Lupine was in some way off .
hazard. Severus, are you doing that dish for her again?”
 “Yes, Headmaster,” Snape said.
 “Okay,” Dumbledore said. “Then he should be up and out in no time… Derek, you have .
Some of the cybulates? They’re isolated.”
 The first-year boy turned bright red with rage at Dumbledore's direct address, and took
Coffee cakes with trembling hands.
 Professor Trelawney behaved almost perfectly until the end of Christmas dinner, two hours .
later. Filled with Christmas dinner and still wearing their cowboy hats, Harry and Ron
She got up first from the table and yelled loudly.
 “Oh my dear! Which of you left your seat first? which?"
 “Dunno,” Ron said, looking at Harry worriedly.
 "I doubt it would make much difference," Professor McGonagall said coldly, "unless he's a pervert . . ."
The axman waits outside the gates to make the first chop in the Entrance Hall.”
 Ron laughed too. Professor Trelawney looks very frustrated.
 "coming?" Harry said to Hermione.
 “No,” Hermione shrugged. “I want a quick word with Professor McGonagall.”
 “She’s probably trying to see if she can take some more classes,” Ron joked as they made their way .
in the Entrance Room, which was entirely made up of sexually immoral men.
 When they reached the shadowy window they found Sir Cadogan enjoying a portion of Christmas with a
Two souls, several past Hogwarts ministers and her soul mate. He took out his
the visor toasted with a flagon of lead.
 “Happy — hich — Christmas! password?"
 “Screw it,” Ron said.
 “And you too, sir!” exclaimed Sir Cadogan, as the plate looked forward to receive them.
Page 167 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry went straight to the inn and collected his Firebolt and Broomstick Utility Kit
Hermione had given them to him for his birthday and sent them downstairs, trying to find something to
worked with Fire; However, there where no branches bent to bend, and the handle was very shiny
Already it seemed pointless to waste it. He and Ron just kept hugging her from all sides, until
The portfolio opened and Hermione entered, accompanied by Professor McGonagall.
 Though Professor McGonagall was the head of Gryffindor House, Harry had only seen her in
common room once before, and that was to make a very important announcement. He is Ron.
She smirked, and the two grabbed the Firebolt. Hermione walked over to them, sat down, and picked up the
A nearby book and she hides her face behind it.
 “So that’s it, right?” Professor McGonagall said sarcastically, walking towards the fire and smiling .
in Fire. “Miss Granger has just informed me that you have been sent a piece of magic,
network.”
 Harry and Ron looked at Hermione. They could see his reddened tail on the top.
of his book, which was the head.
 "I can?" Professor McGonagall said, but she didn't wait for an answer before pulling away .
The fire went out of their hands. She carefully examined it from the wrist to the tip of the toe. "Yeah. And
No secrets at all, Potter? No map? No messages of any kind?”
 “No,” Harry said with a shrug.
 "I see…" Professor McGonagall said. “Well, I’m afraid I’ll have to take it, Potter.”
 “W — what?” Harry said, tapping his shoulders. "why?"
 "He'll need to be examined for jinxes," Professor McGonagall said. “Of course, I am no expert,
But I’m sure Madam Hooch and Professor Flitwick will be shrugging it off—”
 “Strip down?” Ron replied, as if Professor McGonagall had snapped.
 "It shouldn't take more than a few weeks," Professor McGonagall said. “Will you pick it up again if .
We’re sure he’s jinx-free.”
 “There’s nothing wrong with it!” Harry said, his voice shaking slightly. “Honestly, Professor —”
 "You'll never know, Potter," Professor McGonagall said, kindly, "Not until you wake up . . ."
He is, anyway, and I’m afraid that’s out of the question until we’re confident that he’s not
was replaced by. I’ll let you know.”
Page 168 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Professor McGonagall spun on her heel and pulled the Firebolt out of the window above, which
Close up afterwards. Harry stood looking behind her, the High-Finish Polish mug still clutched to his back .
sleeve. Ron, however, turned away from Hermione.
 “What are you going for a walk to McGonagall for?”
 Hermione set her book aside. She was still pale in the face, but she got up and faced Ron
With breathing.
 “Because I thought—and Professor McGonagall agreed with me—that the bucket was .
Maybe Black Sirius sent it to Harry!”




CHAPTER TWO MRAC
Page 169 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Defender
 Harry knew that Hermione meant well, but that didn't stop him from scolding her.
He had been the world’s best butcher for a few hours of fun, and now, because of
his smile, and he didn’t know if he’d ever see her again. He was adamant that there
There’s nothing wrong with the Firebolt now, but what state will it be in when the
running any kind of anti-jinx tests?
 Ron frowned at Hermione as well. As impressive as it sounds, the stripping-down of a
The brand-new Firebolt is nothing short of a killer good. Hermione, who remained convinced
that she was working for charity and started scouring the clubhouse. Harry and Run realize that she
He was studying in the library and didn't try to convince her to come back. Generally, there are
Fortunately when the rest of the school returned shortly after the new year, and Gryffindor tower became a
The crowd is also noisy. Wood searched for Harry the night before shift started.
 “Did you have a good Christmas?” he said, then, without waiting for an answer, sat down and put on .
his voice, saying, “I was, making some suggestions for Christmas, Harry. After the last match, you
know. If the Dementors come to the next one… I mean… we can’t afford you—well—”
 Wood broke off, looking mischievous.
 “I’m working on it,” Harry said quietly. “Master Lupine said he would train me to defeat
The leaders. We should start this week. He said he’d have time after Christmas.”
 “Oh,” Wood said, his expression brightening. “Well, in that case — I really don’t want to lose you .
Like Research, Harry. And you still ordered new ammunition?”
 “No,” Harry said.
 "What! You'd better keep going, you know — you can't ride that Shooting Star against
Ravenclaw!”
 “Got a Firebolt for Christmas,” Ron said.
 “A fire? No! really? A — is that a real fireplace?”
 "Don't worry, Oliver," Harry growled. “I didn’t get it. He was arrested.”
It also explains exactly how Firebolt is now subject to jinxes.
 “Jinxed? How can he be jinxed?”
Page 170 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Sirius Kid,” Harry said sadly. “It should be behind me. Hence, McGonagall sees him as
He can bring it in.”
 Wood brushed aside reports that a known killer was behind his Seeker, saying, “But .
Black could never buy a Firebolt! He’s on the run! The whole country is in search of
he! How about he just walk into Quality’s Quidditch company and buy a blindfold?”
 “I know,” Harry said, “but McGonagall still wants to shoot her —”
 The mouse became gray.
 “I’ll go talk to him, Harry,” he promised. “I’ll make sure she sees the reason… Oh Firebolt… it’s true .
Firebolt, on our team… she wants Gryffindor to win as much as we do… I’ll make sure she watches
mean. A fire…”
 The next day, classes resumed. The last thing anyone feels like doing is spending two hours
in the basement on a chilly January evening, but Hagrid lights a bonfire full of reindeer
to their amusement, and spent an unusually good lesson combining wood and dried leaves to
Keep the fire burning while the flame-loving animals buzz up and down in the hearth,
Soft white animals. The first Divination lesson of the new term was less than exciting; teacher
Trelawney was currently teaching them handjob, and wasted no time in informing Harry that he had .
the line of life she was cut off to see.
 It was a defense against the dark arts that Harry was desperate to achieve; After his conversation with
Wood, wanted to start his lessons against the Dementor as soon as possible.
 "Oh yes," Lupine said, as Harry smiled at his promise at the end of class. “Let me
See… how about eight o’clock on a Thursday morning? The history of magic class should be
It’s too big… I have to think carefully how we do this… We can’t get a
A real dementor in the castle to train on it…”
 “He still looks sick, doesn’t he?” Ron said as they walked down the hallway and headed for dinner.
“What do you think is the matter with him?”
 There was a loud and impatient “tuh” from behind them. It was Hermione, who was sitting
On the steps of a round table, she keeps packing her bag, full of books that she won’t close.
 “What do you owe us?” Ron said calmly.
 “No,” Hermione said aloud, pushing her bag back over her shoulder.
 “Yes, you are,” Ron said. “I said I wonder what’s wrong with Lupin, and you —”
Page 171 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Well, isn’t it obvious?” said Hermione, with a piercing look of confusion.
 “If you don’t want to tell us, don’t,” Ron snapped.
 “Fine,” Hermione shrugged and continued walking.
 “She doesn’t know,” Ron said, looking worriedly behind Hermione. “She’s just trying to get us to
Talk to her again.”
 At eight o'clock on Thursday morning, Harry left Gryffindor Tower and headed for wizarding history .
A school. It was dark and empty when he arrived, but he lit the lamps with his wand and had
They had only waited fifteen minutes when Professor Lupine showed up, carrying a large box of supplies, which
He came across Professor Binn’s desk.
 “What’s that?” Harry said.
 "Another boggart," Lupine said, removing his mask. “Since I’ve been approaching the castle since .
Tuesday, and with great luck, I found this one sticking inside Mr. Filch’s card. is
We're almost to an actual Dementor. The boggart will turn into a Dementor when it sees you, so
We'll be able to test him on it. I can keep it in my office when we’re not using it; There is a
Coffee under my desk would be nice.”
 “Okay,” Harry said, trying to sound like he wasn’t terrified at all and was just happy to .
Lupine got such a good replacement for the real Dementor.
 "So…" Professor Lupine drew his wand, and pointed out that Harry had to do .
as. “The spell I am going to try to teach you is a very simple magick, Harry—please .
Above the Minimum Maintenance Level. It’s called a Patronus hunter.”
 “How does it work?” Harry said nervously.
 "Well, when it works properly, It summons a Patronus," Lupine said, "It's kind of
anti-Dementor — a guardian who acts as a bridge between you and the Dementor.”
 Harry got a quick shot of himself sitting behind a Hagrid-sized figure holding a .
relationship. Professor Lupine continued, "A patronus is a kind of positive energy, a manifestation of
With so many things the Dementor feeds off of — hope, happiness, the will to live — but he
He can’t feel despair, the way real humans can, so the Dementors can’t worry about him. But I must warn you,
Harry, that spell might be perfect for you. Many advanced magicians have problems.
with him.”
 “What does a Patronus look like?” Harry said with a curious smile.
Page 172 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Each one is unique to the Wizard who created it.”
 “And how do you put it together?”
 “With magic, which will only work if you are pressing down, with all your might, on a
One, a very happy memory.”
 Harry focused on a nice smile. Certainly, nothing happened to him in
the Dursleys' was going to do. Finally, he stopped at the same time he first rode a
A craft stick.
 “Of course,” he says, trying to best describe the wonderful, overwhelming feeling that runs through his body .
stomach.
 "The script is this —" Lupine cleared his throat. “Wait for the guard!”
 “Wait for the guard,” Harry repeated under his breath, “Wait for the guard.”
 “Are you going to focus hard on your happy memories?”
 “Oh — yes —” Harry said, quickly forcing his mind back to that first fancy car. “Wait
patrono — no, patronum — excuse me — expect a guard, expect a guard”
 Something slipped quickly from the end of his nose; It looks like silver gloves.
 “Did you see that?” Harry said excitedly. “Something happened!”
 “Very good,” Lupine said, smiling. “Right, then — ready to try it on a Dementor?”
 “Yeah,” Harry said, clutching his wand very tightly, and looked across the pond .
A school. He tried to keep his mind in the clear, but something else kept interfering… Every second .
Now, he could hear his mother again… but he mustn't think that, or hear her again,
And he doesn’t want to… or does he?
 Lupine grabbed the lid of the cottage and pulled it.
 A Dementor slowly rose from the coffin, its hooded face turned towards Harry, one glowering,
A crooked hand touched his head. The lights in the classroom flickered on and off. the
The Dementor got out of the box and started to silently move towards Harry, holding up a pair of pants,
A shuddering breath. A wave of bitter coldness fell over him—
Page 173 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Wait for the guard!” Harry shouted. “Wait guard! Wait —”
 But the class and the Dementor were fading… Harry was falling down the stairs again
white grass, and her mother’s voice louder than usual echoes inside her head—“Not Harry!
Not Harry! Please — I’ll do something —”
 “Stand aside—stand aside, girl—”
 “Harry!”
 Harry came back to life. He was lying on his back on the ground. The festivals of the cities were
I fell again. He didn’t have to ask what was going on.
 “I’m sorry,” he murmured, sitting up and feeling a cold sweat trickle down the back of his forehead.
 “Are you okay?” Lupine said.
 "Yeah..." Harry pulled himself up onto one of the couches and sat down on it.
 “Here —” Lupine handed him a Chocolate Chip. “Eat this before we try again. I didn’t expect you.
You’ll do it the first time; I really would have been surprised if you had done it.”
 “It’s getting worse,” Harry smirked, patting the Owl’s neck. “I can hear him so loud
Time—that’s him—Voldemort—”
 Lupine looked paler than usual.
 “Harry, if you don’t want to continue, I’ll better understand —”
 "I do!" Harry said gruffly, shoving the rest of the Chocolate Chip into his mouth. “I have to check it out!
What if the Dementors appeared in our match against Ravenclaw? I couldn’t fall again. whether
We lose this game we lose the Quidditch Cup!”
 “Alright then…” Lupine said. “Maybe you want to choose another memory, a happy memory, I
Mean, to make up… That one doesn’t seem to be strong enough…”
 Harry thought carefully and decided about his feelings when Gryffindor won the House Championship .
Last year he was consistently classified as very happy. He gripped his wand tightly again and raised
Its location is in the middle of the class.
 "ready?" Lupine said, holding the lid of the box.
Page 174 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Ready,” said Harry; He tries so hard to fill his head with happy thoughts about Gryffindor victories,
And not pretty clues about what happens when the box is opened.
 "go!" Lupine said, pulling his hat. The room went cold and dim again. the
The Dementor leaned forward and drew his breath; A mangled hand was reaching out to Harry —
 “Wait for the guard!” Harry shouted. “Wait guard! Wait Pat —”
 The white fog clouded his senses… huge fuzzy shapes stared at him… and then someone came
A new voice, a man’s voice, the screaming, the panic —
 “Lily, take Harry and go! he is! go! run! I’ll stop it—”
 Sounds of someone running from the room — door slamming — hoarse laughter —
 “Harry! Harry… wake up…”
 Lupine was punching Harry hard in the face. This time it was a minute before Harry realized
Why was he sitting on the floor of the classroom as a result.
 “I heard Dad,” Harry said with a smile. “That was the first I heard of him — he tried to get
About Voldemort himself, to give my mother time to get ahead of him…”
 Harry suddenly noticed that there were tears on her face mixing with sweat. He closed his.
His face well, he wiped them on his clothes, pretending to work his shirt lace, as
Lupine didn't want to look.
 “Have you heard James?” Lupine said in a low voice.
 “Yeah…” Face dry, Harry looked up. “Why—you don’t know my father, do you?”
 "I—I did, as a matter of fact," Lupine said. “We were friends at Hogwarts. Listen, Harry —
Maybe we should leave it here for tonight. This conversation escalated into ridiculousness… No need
They’re proposing to put you in this…”
 "No!" Harry said. He stood up again. “I will have one more time! I don’t think about enough fun.
Things, it is what it is… Hold on…”
 He turned his brains. A really, really happy memory… one that could make her a better, stronger one .
executive...
Page 175 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 The day he first found out he was a wizard, and would be leaving the Dursleys for
Hogwarts! If that’s not an exhilarating memory, he doesn’t know what is… Very intense handling
About how he felt when he realized he was leaving Privet Drive, Harry got to his feet and
Face the business case again.
 "ready?" Lupine said, who looked like he was doing this against his better judgment.
“Serious attention? All right — go!”
 He removed the prison lid a third time, and the Dementor came out of it; The room collapsed.
cold and dark
 “WAIT THE PRESIDENT!” Harry shouted. “WAIT FOR DELIVERY! wait
PRESIDENT!”
 The humming inside Harry's head started up again—except this time, it sounded like .
they were coming from a less frequent radio — sad and loud and boisterous again… and still he could .
See the Dementor… he paused… Then a huge, silver shadow came streaming in from the end
of Harry's wand, to wedge between himself and the Dementor, and yet Harry's legs felt like
water, still on his feet — though for a long time, he wasn’t sure…
 “Ridiculous!” Lupine said, floating forward.
 There was a loud explosion, and Harry's cloudy Patronus disappeared along with the Dementor; drowned
In a chair, he felt sore as if he had just run a mile, and felt his legs were shaking. Outside the Window
n his eyes, he saw Professor Lupine force Boggart back into the packed carriage with his cane; it
He was the sand of the beach again again.
 "excellent!" Lupine said, storming over to where Harry was sitting. “Great, Harry! is obvious
It’s a start!”
 “Can we have another go? Just one more wave?”
 “Not now,” Lupine insisted. “You have enough for one night. here -"
 He handed Harry a big box of the best Honeydukes chocolate.
 “Eat a lot, or Madam Pomfrey will be after my blood. Same time next week?”
 “Okay,” Harry said. He grabbed a chocolate bar and watched Lupine dim the lights.
that's added to the Dementor's demise. A thought just popped into her mind.
 “Master Lupine?” he said. “If you knew my father, you probably knew Sirius Black too.”
Page 176 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Lupine turned around very quickly.
 “What gives you that idea?” He said seriously.
 “No — I mean, I just know they’re friends at Hogwarts too…”
 Lupine's face relaxed.
 He said quickly: “Yh, I know.” “Or I thought I did. You better leave, Harry, it's getting worse
late."
 Harry left the classroom, walked along the road and a bridge, then took the road
After a long wave and knelt on his stove to finish his chocolate, wishing he hadn’t
He mentioned Black, as Lupine was obviously uninterested in the subject. Then Harry’s thoughts
He went back to his mom and dad…
 It felt light and satisfying, even though it was very chocolatey. Interesting though
He was going to hear his parents' last moments replaying inside his head, those were the only times Harry
He had been hearing their voices since he was a very young child. But it cannot produce a
A necessary Patronus if he wanted to hear his parents again…
 “They’re dead,” he muttered to himself. “They are dead and listening to their screams will never
Bring them. You better hold your own if you want that Quidditch Cup.”
 He stood up, shoved the last bite of chocolate into his mouth, and returned to Gryffindor .
The tower.
 Ravenclaw played Slytherin the week after term started. The Slytherin won, albeit narrowly.
According to Wood, this is good news for Gryffindor, who will take second place if they succeed
He even beat the Ravenclaw. As a result, he increased the number of team practices to five per week. this
Which means that with Lupine's classes against Dementor, which were themselves more painful than six
Quidditch holidays, Harry only had one night a week to do all his homework. Even so, it wasn’t
She showed almost the same temperament as Hermione, with her massive amount of work evident lately and
He reached her. Every night, without fail, Hermione was to be seen in a corner of the living room .
room, several desks scattered with books, Arithmancy sheets, runic dictionaries, notebooks
Muggles grow heavy things, and file upon file of big moves; She rarely spoke to anyone.
And she sneezed when she was interrupted.
 “How was she?” Ron muttered to Harry one afternoon as Harry sat finishing a terrible essay on
An unknown poison to Snape. Harry looked away. Hermione doesn't show up after the
a stack of decorated books.
Page 177 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “You do what?”
 “You’ll get to read all of it!” Run said. “I heard her talking to Professor Vector, that Arithmancy
Witch, this morning. They go on about yesterday's lesson, but Hermione can't be
There, because she’s with us in defending the Magical People! And Ernie McMillan told me she was
He didn’t miss a Muggle Studies class, but half of them were at the same time as Divination, and
She doesn’t have one of them either!”
 Harry didn't have time to comprehend Hermione's impossible schedule immediately;
He really needed to get on with Snape's writing. However, two seconds later, it was interrupted
Again, this time by Wood.
 “Bad news, Harry. I just warned Professor McGonagall about the fire. She — er —
He brought a little fabric with me. He told me my assumptions were wrong. Looks like I like more
About winning the Cup than I am about you staying alive. Just because I said I don’t care if
You’re welcome, as long as you catch the Snitch first.” Wood shook his head in disbelief.
“Honestly, the way she yells at me… you’d think I said something stupid. Then I ask
Her how long will it take…” He screwed up his face, challenging the Professor .
McGonagall's voice was firm. “All right, Wood”… I figured it was time to order a
New memory, Harry. There’s an order sticker on the back of the Which Broomstick… you can get
Nimbus Two Thousand and One, just like Malfoy’s.”
 "I'm not buying anything Malfoy thinks is a good idea," Harry growled.

 January slipped unnoticed into February, with no change in the bitterly cold weather. the
The match against Ravenclaw is getting closer and closer, but Harry still hasn’t asked for a new match
broom. He was now asking Professor McGonagall for Firebolt information after every
The change of change, Ron stands with trauma, Hermie TSDS with a delayed
The face was delayed.
 "No, Potter, you can't make it back yet," Professor McGonagall had told him for the umpteenth time already .
It happened, before he even opened his mouth. “We saved most of the early meals, but .
Professor Fliitwick believes that the girl could have a Hulling Hex. I’ll let you know when we have
He continued his recording. Now, please, stop being rude to me.”
 In order to find out more, Harry’s opposite lessons against Dementor never to go as a .
He was hoping. Several sessions on, can cast a fuzzy, silver shade every time
He approaches BogartDementor, but Patronuseis was very strong to get Dementor .
away. All he did was hover, like a mid-air cloud, robbing Harry of his strength as he struggled to
Hezth protected there. Harrey promised to night, he is forced to law of corruption to call for parents.
The calls also.
Chapter 178 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “You expect too much of yourself,” Professor Lupine said, firmly in their fourth week of
do. “For a 13-year-old surveillance, even with the incredible Patronus is very lucky. you
You’re not going to faint, are you?”
 “I’ve read that one Patronus — supposed Dementors or so,” says Harry .
with enthusiasm. “Let them disappear—”
 “The real Patrondus works all of this,” said Lupin. “But you got a lot in just a while .
The space. If Dementors make an appearance at your next Quidditch match, you’ll be
It can keep them on board long enough to get back to space.”
 “You thought it was difficult to have things there,” Harry said.
 "I have full confidence in you," Lupine said, smiling. “Doga — you’re accustomed.
Something from three diamondbacks. You’ve never tried it before —”
 He took out two bottles from his briefcase.
 “Ad’s beer!” Harry said, without thinking. “Yeah, I like that!”
 Lupine raised an eyebrow.
 “Oh — Ron and Hermione got me a few nights from Hogsmid,” Harry said quickly.
 "I see," Lupine said, though he still looked a bit skeptical. “Aha — let’s get one .
A Gryffindor vs. Ravenclaw victory! It’s not that I have to go to the side, like a teacher…” he
It’s very easy.
 They drank barley beer in silence, until Harry uttered something that had plagued him for years.
while.
 “What’s under the Dementor’s nose?”
 Professor Lupine downed his bottle thoughtfully.
 “Hmmm… Wow, the only people who really know are not in any position to tell us. You see,
The accomplishment has dismissed his snack just to use his last and bad slide.”
 “Is that it?”
 "They called it The Dementor's Kiss," Lubin said, driving a slightly modified car. " what is
They make managers for those who want to manage everything. I think there must be some kind of mouth
Page 179 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Under him, because they meet with their feet on the hand of the angels and — they appear
soul."
 Harry accidentally spits out a little butter beer.
 “Did — kill —?”
 “Oh no,” Lupine said. “Most of that. You can exist without your soul, you know, as long as
Just like your heart and your heart is working. But it will not leave you any meaning of the middle, it will not leave you to leave you,
No…something. There is no time limit for all treatments. You'll just be. Like the head of a monster. and
He didn't leave you forever... He went.”
 Lubin drank a bit of meat and then said, “That’s what Sirius Black expects. is in the
Daily Christmas this Saturday. The Ministry gave him the river of Imhachan
They find him.”
 Harry sat for a moment thinking of someone whose heart had come out of one of their arms.
be. But then he thought of Black.
 “He deserves it,” he said at one point.
 “You think so?” Lupine said lightly. “You really really think someone deserves this?”
 “Yeah,” Harry said honestly. “For some… for some things…”
 He tries to tell Lubin about the speaker who will laugh at Blake in
Three bromes, on Blake he remembers his mother and father, but he will go
He's relieved that he went to Hogsmeade without Assure, and knows that Lubin won't be very
He was impressed by this. So he finished his butter beer, thanked Lupine, and walked out of the magical history .
A school.
 Harry kept trying not to ask what was under one of Dimnor's noses, the answer was
He's very worried, and he's not very good at negative thoughts about what will make your presence
It turned out that he had gone upstairs to Professor McGonagall halfway through the hour.
 “Careful where you’re going, Potter!”
 “Surf, Professor —.”
 “I was just looking for you in the Gryffindor common room, Well, here we are doing .
All we can swing, and we don't see anything that isn't anything —
You’ve got a very good friend somewhere, Peter…”
Page 180 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry's newspaper came out. She was holding her firebolt, acting like a good thing for a while.
 “Do dogs have it back?” Harry said weakly. "really?"
 “Seriously,” Professor McGonagall said, and she was actually smiling. “I’ll daresay you’ll need
You felt it before Saturday’s game, didn’t you? And Potter—you try to win, don’t you?
Or let’s retire for the eighth year in a row, since he was Professor Snape and shit .
Just to remind me of yesterday…”
 Speechless, Harry carried the Firebolt back upstairs toward Gryffindor Tower. As he turned
corner, he saw Ron approaching him, grinning from ear to ear.
 “Did she give it to you? excellent! Listen, can I still have to go on it? tomorrow?"
 “Yeah… something…” Harry said, his heart melting the way it had in a month. “You know what
'We have to deal with Hermione… She was just trying to help…'
 “Yeah, okay,” Ron said. “She’s in the common room now working — for a change.”
 They turned down the corridor to Gryffindor Tower and saw Neville Longbottom, shouting .
Sir Cadogan, who seems to have refused him entrance.
 “I wrote them!” Neville said tearfully. “But I must have lost them somewhere!”
 “The tale that can be!” cried Sir Cadougan. Then, looking at Harry and Ron: “Hello too, my good young
Oh guys! Come smash this loon into steel. He’s trying to insist on entering the rooms inside!”
 “Ah, I was silent,” Ron said when he and Harry said to agree with Neville.
 “I lost the passwords!” Neville told them sadly. “I made him tell me what passwords he had .
Was going to use this week, because he keeps changing them, now I don't know what I have
He worked with them!”
 "Oddsbodkins," Harry said to Sir Cadogan, who looked very disappointed and reluctant .
They moved forward to let them into the common room. There was a quick, happy break as every
His head spun and the next moment Harry was surrounded by people clamoring for his Firebolt.
 “Where did you get him, Harry?”
 “Will you let me go?”
Page 181 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “You ride it yet, Harry?”
 “Ravenclaw doesn’t have a clue, they’re all in the Cleansweep Sevens!”
 “Can I just hold him, Harry?”
 After ten minutes or so, during which Firebolt ran and was impressed from every
roar, the crowd dispersed and Harry and Ron had a clear view of Hermione, the only person
Not universal, she approaches work and protects their eyes. Harry d
Ron approached her table, and finally, she looked up.
 “I got it,” Harry said, smiling and holding up the Firebolt.
 “See, Hermione? There wasn’t anything wrong with it!” Run said.
 “Well — there might have been!” Hermione said. “I mean, at least you know now that it’s safe!”
 “Yeah, I think so,” Harry said. “I’d better put it upstairs.”
 “I’ll take it!” Ron said cheerfully. “I’ve got to give Scabbers his thumbs up.”
 He grabbed the Firebolt, held it like it was gloves, and raised it towards the boys head.
hole.
 “Can I stay, then?” Harry asked Hermione.
 “I’m all about,” says Hermione, a large number of cards from a chair.
 Harry looked at the littered table, at the long Arithmancy script that had a mark on it .
Still shining, in the muggle studies article ('explain why muggles need
electricity') and in translation of the rune Hermione was now smiling.
 “How are you going through all of this?” Harry asked her.
 "Oh, well—you know—you work hard," Hermione said. Up close, Harry noticed that she was looking
He was almost as tired as Lupine.
 “Why don’t you just get a couple of things out?” Harry asked, watching her pick up the books as she
She looks up her rune dictionary.
 “I can’t work all that!” Hermione said, smiling softly at her.
 “Arithmancy looks terrible,” Harry said, holding up a very odd-looking number pad.
Page 182 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Oh no, it’s awesome!” Hermione said anxiously. “It's my favorite subject! is -"
 But exactly what was special about Arithmancy was beyond Harry's grasp. In that of course
Suddenly, a strangled voice echoes the children’s whispers. She was silent to the full-scale room.
They move, and move, in the doorway. Then came hurried footsteps, growing louder and louder — and
Then Ron came leaping into view, dragging a bed sheet with him.
 "look!" ” he said, he went hard to the Hermione aircraft. "look!" He was satisfied, he snapped by the phrases.
In his face.
 “Ron, what —?”
 “ISCABERS! look! SCABBERS!”
 Hermione was leaning over Ron, looking completely confused. Harry's simultaneously went to
sheet Ron was holding. There was something red about him. Something that looks eerily like —
 "bold!" Ron has been inspired in the silver silence. “HE'S GONE! And you know what
IS HE ON THE GROUND?”
 “N — only,” Hermione strongly raising.
 Ron put something down on Hermione's translation of runes. Hermione and Harry leaned
forward. Nestled on top of those black, heavy things were several long ginger cat hairs.


Page 183 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Chapter Thirteen
Gryffindor vs. Ravenclaw

 It looked like the end of Ron and Hermion's friendship. Everyone was so angry at each other that
Harry couldn't see how they would fit together.
 Ron is furious that Hermione doesn’t take Crookshanks’ attempts to eat Scabbers
Seriously, it’s not long before you’re closely monitoring, and he’s still trying to pretend
that Crookshanks was innocent by telling Ron to look for Scabbers under all the boys.
bed. Hermione, meanwhile, insists that Ron has no proof that Crookshanks has
He ate Scabbers, that the ginger bones might have been there since Christmas, and Ron had .
She's considered her partner since Crookshanks knocked Ron's head off in Magical .
The animal.
 Personally, Harry was sure that Crookshanks had eaten Scabbers, and when he tried to confirm
To Hermione that all the evidence pointed so, she lost her temper with Harry as well.
 “Okay, side with Ron, I knew you would!” She said calmly. “First the Firebolt, now Scabbers,
Every false, the person is that! Just leave me, A Hari, I have a lot of prayer I’m going to work!”
 Ron had taken the frustration of losing his wife very seriously indeed.
 “Come on, Ron, you were always saying how pathetic Scabbers was,” Fred growled. "and
He was of folor from the rhythm, he was hidden. Perhaps the beds will succeed.
Luckily — a ear — maybe he didn’t feel with something.”
 “ⴼⵔⴻⴷ!” told Ginny with happiness.
 "All he did was eat and sleep, Ron, you said it yourself," George said.
 “He ate Goyle on us once!” Ron said sadly. “Do you remember, Harry?”
Page 184 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Yes, it’s true,” Hari said.
 “The whole slaves,” said Free, he can’t take a place directly. “Let the ring on Goyle’s finger stay .
As a lasting tribute to his memory. Oh, come on, Ron, drive yourself to Hogsmeade and buy a
A new mouse, what’s the point of fun?”
 In a final storm to make Ron joy, Harry forced to come to Gryfindor .
The final team before Ravenclaw match, so he can have a behavior on Firebolt
After removing. This seemed to take Ron’s mind off of Scabbers for a moment (“Great! Could
I’ve gotten to get some goals on it?”) Isi started the way to the Quidditch space and one.
 Madam Hooch, to the Greffindor works still to protect the eyes on Harry, was just .
As they were loved with Firebolt as well as all others. She held her in her arms before leaving and
She gave them the benefit of her professional opinion.
 “Look at the marks on it! If the Nimbus app has a fault, it’s a short list to the bitter end — you .
Often find they develop drag after a few years. They even made a handle, it’s a little sweet
Beyond Cleansweeps, it reminds me of the old silver spoons — sadly they stopped making them
them. I’ve learned to leave one, and it’s a very sick and a very lucky story too.”.”
 She continued in the vision for a while, until Wood said: “Er — Madam Hooch? Does it matter if
Does Harry have a flamethrower? We need to practice…”
 "A—really—here you are, then, Potter," said Mrs. Hooch. “I’ll stay here
ⵡⴻⵙⵍⵉ...”
 She and Ron left the narrator to stay in the search, and the Gryffindor team supposedly on Wood .
for his final advice for tomorrow’s meeting.
 “Harry, I just found out who plays Ravenclaw and Seeker. ⴷ ⵛⵓ ⵛⴰⵏⴳ. She is the fourth.
A year, and it’s very good… I really hope she’s not a little, she has some problems with
Liverah...” Woods introducing the Hidry as Cho Chanang is good, and then said,
“From the other hand, she is looking for a Comet To Sixty, which will be ill-free as a disease next to the vessel of the
hell." He gave Harry’s advocacy, Seen said, “Ihi, to each, .
go -"
 ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵜⴰⴳⴳⴰⵔⴰ, Harry ⵢⴻⵔⴽⴻⴱ Fireboltis, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⴼⴼⴻⵖⴷ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵡⴰⴽⴰⵍ.
 Finding that he's advocating. Firebolt circled with a spasm; It looks like
follow his ideas rather than his judgment; It's being done on the field at stadium-like speed.
turned in a green-d-gary blor; Harry replied by Alisia Spinet smelled, and then
Chapter 185 out of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
He entered a brilliant snack, snacking a field of houses with his hands before it was ready
ⵜⵍⴰⵜⵉⵏ, ⵔⴻⴱⵄⵉⵏ, ⵅⴻⵎⵙⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵢⵉⴹⴰⵔⵔⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⴳⴻⵏⵏⵉ ⴷⴰⵖⴻⵏ —
 "Harry, I'm taking the snitches out!" Sood is talking.
 Harry got to fight a bludger in the way of things; He passes it easily and sees the Snitch
He came out from behind the door, and in ten hours he was carrying it in a clean way in his hand.
 The team was ready for joy. Harry let Asynch go once more, gave him a minute's breath, then turned around.
after it, weaving in and ot of the others; He saw him and was snapped next to Katie Bell, and snapped
easily, and he took it again.
 It was the best practice; the tuam, inspired by the Presence of the Firebolt in the Midst,
They carried out their good activities without any hesitation, and by the time they took possession of the land again, the wood had not stopped.
They had one mission to carry out, which, as George Weasley said, was the first.
 “I can’t wait to see what tomorrow holds for us!” Wood said. “Not unless — Harry, you’ve sorted
Outside of your Dentor’s problem, aren’t you?”
 "Yeah," Harry said, thinking about his happy patronus and pushing him harder.
 “Don’t seem to be once again Yidementurien, A Oliver. Dumbledore will go a Palestico,” Fried fully said.
 “Well, let’s hopeless,” Wood said. “With any — a good job, everybody. we return
sentence
 “I’ll stay a little bit; Ron wants to go to Firbolt,” Harry told Wood, and when the others
From the group she walked towards the dormitories, Harry stopped by Ron, who made his way to the
They were and discussed. Madam Hooch Had falen asleep in her seat.
 “Let you go,” Harry said, Ren The Virbolt gave up.
 Ron, a novel of ecstasy on his face, made him a novel used in the collection
The story I was going on Harry on the side of the field, and seeing him. He fell night before
Madam Hutch comes first, tells Harry and Ron not to answer her, and suggests that
Returning to the tower.
 Harry stood by Firbulut as he and Ron walked out of Shadowy Stadium, talking about
Firbolt's actions are very exciting, his renovation of the structure, and his development of the building. they
They were halfway through the town when Harry, turning to his left, saw something that had happened to him.
The heart is irresistible — a glimpse of the eyes, he left the dark.
Chapter 186 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry stood out, his heart and sneaks against his head.
 “What’s wrong?” Run said.
 He died Hari. Ron saved the feedback, and said with a woman’s view, “Lumos!”
 A ray of light fell upon the sky, falling under a canopy, illuminating its rays; there,
The entrance between the road fields is Crookshank.
 “Let out of here!” Ron Yuli, is going to throw a stone with rain on the sky, but
Before he could do anything else, Crookshanks hit with a swipe of his long ginger
tail.
 "see?" Ron said excitedly, throwing the stone down. “It still allows her to use her .
Wherever he wants — he’ll probably throw Scabers with two birds for now…”
 Harry didn't say anything. It took the sick of the church as the body’s truth; He was off
For a moment that those eyes belonged to Grim. The tower is brush once again.
They’re a little bit of the season of the LKH season, Harry’s nothing for Ron — nor is the .
The left or right hand arrived at the wooden room that is very sick.
 Harry fell to eat the morning and another Warrasch at the wedding house, all
who seems to think Firebolt deserves a kind of court closure. ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⴽⵛⴻⵎ Hari ⵖⴻⵔ Umeqran
Hall, closed alongside Firebolt, and there was a pleasure .
He's looking. Harry Ewla, with the greatest joy, that the Slitherin team are all flying
Thunder struck.
 “Did you see his face?” ⵉⵏⵏⴰ ⵔⵓⵏ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⵜ, ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵖⵓⵍ ⵖⵔ ⵎⴰⵍⴼⵓⵢ. « ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵣⵎⵉⵔ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴰⵎⵏⴻⴹ! this is
nasty!"
 Wood, too, was enjoying Firebolt’s contagious passion.
 “Site him it here, Harry,” he said, placed the punch in the center of the table and smell it with the tower .
This is his name to bear to bed. Ravenclaw’s beds and Hufflepoff did not
He is to meet the prize. ⵛⴻⴷⵔⵉⵛ Diggory ⵢⵓⵙⴰⴷ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵄⴻⴵⴱⴰ ⵉ Harry ⵉⵎⵉ ⴰⵢ ⴷⵢⴻⵡⵡⵉ ⴰⵎ ⵡⴰ
It’s a brilliant transformation of Nimbus, and Percy’s Ravenclaw wife, Penelope Clearwater,
Stript if it can really take the Firebolt.
 “Now, now, then, Penny, don't worry about it!” The Percy said with a hearty when Firebol was simultaneously succeeded.
« ⵏⴻⴽⴽ ⴷ Penelope ⵏⴻⵙⵄⴰ ⴰⴱⴻⵜ », ⴰⵢ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ ⵉ ⵜⴻⵖⵍⴰⵎⵜ. « ⵎⵔⴰⵡ ⵏ ⵢⵉⴳⴰⵍⵉⵙⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵓⴳⵎⵓⴹ ⵏ 2019 .
match!"
Page 187 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Penelpe has once again inspired Firebolt, thanks Harry, returning to the Tablaines.
 “Harry — make sure you win,” Percy said, quietly. « ⵓⵔ ⵙⵄⵉⵖ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵎⵔⴰⵡ ⵏ Yigaliyen.
ⵉⵀ, ⴰⵔ ⴷ ⵉⵜⵜⴷⴷⵓ, ⴱⵉⵏⵏⵉ!” And he carefully went out to join her in a hot shower.
 “Of course you can follow up, a Potter?” A cold, drawn-out voice said.
 Draco Malfoy arrived to see the free, Crabbe and Goyle were behind just behind.
 “Yes, Kerniun that,” Harry said assuredly.
 “For a lot of tiny, right-free options?” Malfoy said, eyes wide open. “Shocked him
It’s not in tparachut — if you’re getting a lot to a Dementor.”
 Crabbe and Goyle are grinning.
 “Why can’t you keep another hand to yours, Malfoy,” Harry said. « ⵙⵢⵉⵏ, ⵢⴻⵣⵎⴻⵔ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵟⵟⴻⴼ Snitch .
and you."
 The Griffindor team is strongly. Malfoy’s devices insulin, and it’s smoothly. they
They watched him rejoin the rest of the Slytherin team, who tilted their heads, no doubt wondering .
Malfoy if he really was a Firebolt of Harry's magic.
 ⴷⴻⴳ ⵔⴱⴻⵄ ⵏ ⵎⵔⴰⵡ ⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ, ⵜⴻⴼⴼⴻⵖⴷ ⵜⴻⵔⴱⴰⵄⵜ ⵏ Gryffindor ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⵃⵓⵏⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⴱⴻⵔⵜ. The climate can not not do
ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵎⵅⴰⵍⵍⴰⴼⴻⵏ ⵓⴳⴰⵔ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⴻⵎⵍⵉⵍⵉⵜⵏⵙⴻⵏ ⵎⴳⴰⵍ Hufflepuff. ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵙⵙ ⵉⴱⴰⵏⴻⵏ, ⵉⵙⴻⵎⵎⴰⴹⴻⵏ ⵙ
Very light winds; There is no problem with this time, and Harry, though he stopped,
He began to satisfy freely that the Quidditch match could only take. They can listen to something else.
of the school looking at the research beyond. ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⴽⴽⴻⵙⴰⵙ ⵍⵇⴻⵛⵛⵉⵙ ⴰⴱⴻⵔⴽⴰⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵖⴻⵔⴱⴰⵣ, ⵢⴻⴽⴽⴻⵙⵉⵜ
His wand was from his pocket, and he tucked it inside the T-shirt he would wear under his
Quidditch stuff. He just hoped he didn’t need it. He once asked if he was a teacher.
Lupine was in the crowd, watching.
 "You know what we have to do," Wood said as they prepared to leave the locker rooms. “If we
We lose this match, we’re out of the ring, no — just go out like you did yesterday in practice, and
We’ll be fine!”
 They went out onto the field with loud cheers. The Ravenclaw team, dressed in green,
They were already standing in the middle of nowhere. Their secretary, Chu Chang, is the only daughter on
Their group. She was about a head taller than Harry, and Harry couldn't help but notice,
nervous as he was, that she was too pretty. She smiled at Harry as the teams faced each other
the other behind their slaves, and felt a slight tingle in his stomach area uncomfortably
She thinks it has something to do with kidneys.
Page 188 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "Wood, Davies, give her a hand," Mrs. Hooch whispered, and Wood gave the woman a hand .
Ravenclaw captain.
 “Put your fangs… on my cock… three — two — one —”
 Harry flew through the air and the Firebolt moved faster and faster than any other spell; he
bursting into the middle of the stadium, he started looking around the Snitch, listening all the while to
the explanation, which the Weasley twins' friend, Lee Jordan, was giving.
 “They left, and the greatest joy at the meeting was the Firebolt Harry Potter was flying over .
Gryffindor. According to Which Broomstick, the Firebolt will be the broom of choice for
The national teams at this year’s World Championships —”
 “Jordan, will you tell us what was going on in the meeting?” The teacher interrupted.
McGonagall's voice.
 “Of course, Professor—you just gave a little background information—the Firebolt, .
Besides, it has a built-in autobrake and —”
 “Jordan!”
 “Well, then, Gryffindor in disguise, Gryffindor’s Katie Bell, face the goal…”
 Harry frowned at Katie in the opposite direction, scanning her for a hint of gold and noting
that Cho Chang was following him closely. She was undoubtedly a very good host — she took
interrupting, forcing him to change direction.
 “Show him your strength, Harry!” Fred yelled as he sped past in pursuit of the Bludger
That was Alicia’s goal.
 Harry beckoned the Firebolt forward as they approached the Ravenclaw goal posts and Cho disappeared behind them.
As soon as Katie scored the first goal of the match, it was the Gryffindor end of the field .
As he ran — he saw her — Snitch was close to the ground, coming out to the side of one of the roads.
 Harry growled; Cho saw what he was doing and cut in after him—Harry was speeding, .
excitement flooding him; dives were his specialty, he was ten feet away —
 After that, a bludger, hit by one of Rafinkloe Peters’ pieces, left his post; Harry veered.
Sure enough, he misses it by an inch, and in those few, precious seconds, the Snitch disappears.
Page 189 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 There was a big “Ooooooh” of disgust from the Gryffindor gentlemen, but a lot .
happy for their Beater from the end of Ravenclaw. George Wesley took his feelings out on foot
Bludger's second straight into Beter, who was stopped to put himself in the situation.
To leave it.
 “Gryffindor leads with 80 points to ten, and he saw that Ferbult was going! Potter’s really putting it
Through his moves now, watch him move — Chang's Comet just doesn't compare, Firebolt's
The correction — the relationship is actually being made in this long period —”
 “LORDON! ARE YOU PAYING TO REPLACE FIREWORKS? CONTINUE with
EXPLANATION!”
 Ravenclaw was pulling back; They have now scored three goals, which puts Gryffindor only fifty
Forward points — If Chu takes Snitch before him, Rafinklo will win. ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⵖⵍⵉⴷ ⴷⴷⴰⵡ,
He runs in an unpleasant way on a Ravenclaw Chaser, he describes the field in a happy way — a golden sword, a sword
of little wings — The snitch was hanging around the Gryffindor goal post…
 Harry froze, his eyes fixed on the golden sphere in front of him — but just then, Cho appeared from .
The south wind, blowing it —
 “HARRY, THIS IS NO TIME TO BE A GENTLEMAN!” Woud Harry came to
It looks like a cow. “SAVE HER OFF THE HEAD IF YOU HAVE TO!”
 Harry turned and caught a glimpse of Cho; ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵇⴻⵚⵚⵉⵔ. The Snitch had vanished again. Harry
turned his Firebolt upward and was soon twenty feet above the game. ⵙⴳ ⵜⵖⵎⵔⵜ ⵏⵙ
Eye, he noticed Cho was following him... she decided to make it up rather than look for the snitch
Herself... All right, then... if she wants to follow him, she'll have to take her fall...
 He disappeared again, and Cho, thinking he saw the Snitch, tried to follow him; Harry pulled out of the
dive very sharply; It creeps down; he rose fast as a bullet once more, and then saw it, for
Round three — The snitch was burning way up in the middle of Ravenclaw.
 clear; so, several feet below, did Cho. He was winning, gaining on the Snitch with every
Second — both of Akin —
 "Oh!" Cho yelled, smiling.
 Explained, Harry went.
 Three negotiators, three former, black negotiators, and doctors, who were known, were responding.
 He didn't stop to think. Plunging a hand down the neck of his robes, he whipped out his wand
and he returned, "Expectto patronum!"
Page 190 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Something silvery white, something larger, shot out of the corner of his eye. He knew it had
Shot straight at the Dementors but didn't stop to see; His mind was still miraculously clear, he
The dealer forward — almost there would be there. He reached out still holding his wand and just
He managed to wrap his arms around the small, struggling Snitch.
 Madam Hooch’s voice rang out. Harry looked around in the sky and saw six blue flames.
getting on it; The whole team was cheering so hard that they almost
He pulled his body. Below him he could hear the Gryffindor's murmurs in the crowd.
 “That’s my boy!” Wood kept screaming. Alicia, Angelina, and Katie kissed Harry together; Fred has
having him in a tight blanket Harry felt like his dick was going to explode. In complete chaos,
The ball managed to make its way back to the ground. Harry snapped out of his wand and looked up to see.
An uggle of Gryffindor friends rushed onto the field, Ron at the top. Before he knew it, he
they were swallowed up by the cheering crowd.
 "Yes!" Ron shouted, waving Harry's hand in the air. "Yes! Yes!"
 “Hi, Harry!” Percy said, looking amused. “Ten Galleries to me! We need to find Penelope.
I'm sorry -"
 “Good for you, Harry!” said Simon Finnigan.
 “Ruddy is the way!” said Hagrid over the Gryffindor gray heads.
 "That was some kind of Patronus," said a voice in Harry's ear.
 Harry turned to see Professor Lupine, who looked shocked and pleased.
 “The dementors don’t affect me at all!” Harry said excitedly. “I don’t feel anything!”
 "That would be because they're not — er — Dementors," Professor Lupine said. “Come and see .
—”
 He pushed Harry through the crowd until they could see the horizon.
 "You give Mr. Malfoy too much of a fright," Lupine said.
 Harry blushed. Malfoy, the crab, Guyl, and Markus were lying in a wet heap on the ground.
Flint, the captain of the Slytherin gang, all struggle to rid themselves of tall, red, bearded
furniture. It was like Malfoy was standing over Goyle's shoulders. standing over them,
With a look of great pride on her face, it was Professor McGonagall.
Page 191 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “It’s an unworthy trick!” She was screaming. “A black and white attempt to corrupt Gryffindor .
Researcher! A catch for all of you, and fifty points from Slytherin! I will talk to the teacher.
Dumbledore about it, make no mistake! Oh, here he comes now!”
 If anything could put a damper on Gryffindor success, this was it. Ron, who fought his
way to Harry's side, doubled over with laughter as they watched Malfoy struggle to
He pushed himself out of the sheets, Goyle's head still lodged inside him.
 “Come on, Harry!” George said, fighting his way forward. "A party! The Gryffindor common room, now!”
 “Right,” Harry said, and feeling more excited than he had in ages, he and the rest of the team listened .
Street, still in their gray clothes, left the stadium and headed back to the castle.
 It felt like they had already won the Quidditch Cup; The party continued all day until
That night. Fred and George Weasley disappeared for two hours and returned armed .
of cheese balls, raspberry fiz, and several bottles full of Honeydukes nectar.
 “How did you do that?” screams Angelina Johnson as George starts throwing mints
Toads in the crowd.
 "With a little help from Moony, Wormtail, Padfoot and Prongs," Fred whispered into Harry's ear.
 Only one person did not participate in the rituals. Hermione, unbelievably, was sitting in one corner.
They tried to read a huge volume called The Home Life and Social Habits of British Muggles.
Harry left the table where Fred and George began to tap bottles of draft beer.
And he turned to her.
 “Are you even going to the meeting?” he asked her.
 "Of course I did," said Hermione in a strangely high-pitched voice, not looking up. “And I
I’m very happy we won, and I think you did very, very well, but I have to read this by Monday.”
 “Come on, Hermione, come have some food,” Harry said, looking at Ron and .
He wondered if he was in a good mood to bury a hatred.
 “I can’t, Harry. I still have four hundred and twenty-two pages to read!” Hermione said, now
In a slightly embarrassed tone. “Anyway…” She looked up at Ron as well. “He didn’t want to
Participate.”
 There’s no arguing with that, as Ron chooses that moment to say out loud, “If only Scabbers hadn’t .
Edible, might have some of those Fudge Flies. He used to really love them—”
Page 192 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 ⵀⵉⵔⵎⵉⵓⵏ ⵜⴱⴱⵉ ⴳ ⵉⵎⵟⵟⴰⵡⵏ. Before Harry could say or do anything, she put the ledger down
Under her hand, and, she was still screaming, screaming sideways at the girls' butts and outside the
sight.
 “Can’t you give her a hug?” Harry asked Ron suddenly.
 “Oh,” Ron said weakly. “If she’s just acting like she’s been feeling — but she’s not going to admit that she’s not naughty,
Hermione. She’s still acting like Scabbers went on a mission or something.”
 The Gryffindor party ended when Professor McGonagall lost her use of magic
clothes and hair net at one in the evening, so as to insist on going to bed together. Harry and Ron win
line to their orphanage, still talking about the reunion. ⵜⴰⴳⴳⴰⵔⴰ, ⵢⴻⵄⵢⴰ, ⵢⵓⵍⵉ Harry ⵖⴻⵔ
The bed, bent its four-footed legs bent to block a ray of moonlight, leaned back, and
He felt himself almost instantly fall asleep…
 ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⴰ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⴰⵔⴳⵉⵜ ⵜⴰⵊⴹⵉⴹⵜ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ. He was walking through the forest, his Firebolt over his shoulder,
pick up something silvery. She was picking her way through the trees in front of her, and he could
only catch glimpses of it between the leaves. He liked to take it, he ran, but as
moved faster, so did his quarry. Harry started running, and ahead he heard the gathering hooves
speed. Nowadays, he walked far, and in the future he could train a rich man. ⵙⵢⵉⵏ ⵢⴻⵣⵣⵉⴷ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵖⴻⵎⵎⴰⵔ.
In a cleanup and —
 “Aarrghhhh! Awww!”
 Harry woke up as if he had been hit in the face. Suffering in total darkness, he
He is buried in March, can call for the middle of the door to theld man.
from across the room.
 “What’s going on?”
 Harry thought he heard the dorm door close. Eventually he found a flaw in her curtains, he
He slashed them back, and at the same moment Dean Thomas lit his torch.
 Ron was lying on the bed, the sheet torn on one side, a look of absolute terror on his face.
 "Black! Sirius Black! With a knife!”
 "what?"
 "Here! Right now! Slashed the curtains! Wake me up!”
 “Do you’re not looking for, A Ron?” Dean.
Chapter 193 out of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Look at the curtains! I’m telling you, it’s here!”
 They are all lost from now on. Harry arrives the first to the door of the youth home, both smoothly returned
Under the store. The doors behind them, they spoke after the injustice of sleep.
 “Who screamed?”
 “What are you doing?”
 The common room was strewn with the smoke of a dying fire, still littered with the ashes of
party. She was a building.
 “You sure you weren’t running, Ron?”
 “I tell you, I saw it!”
 “And what all?”
 “Headmaster McGonagall told us to go to bed!”
 Some girls were off their station, pulling on shorts and dressing up. children,
They, too, were appearing again.
 “Great, are we done?” Fred Wesley said with a grin.
 “Everyone go back upstairs!” Percy said, quickly entered the Union room and snapped Head Boyis .
Badge into his pajamas as he talked.
 “Perce — Sirius Black!” Ron said quietly. “In our living room! with death! Remember!”
 The big room comes as well.
 “What we don’t have to have!” Percy said, and he is accustomed to slave. “You’ve had too much to eat, Ron — you’ve had a night out —”
 “I’m saying —”
 “Now, it’s really too late!”
 Professor McGonagale has become. She snapped the image behind it when entering
common room ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⵙ ⵍⴼⴻⵔⵃ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⵖⵉⵡⴰⵏⵜ.
Chapter 194 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “I’m glad Gryffindor won the match, but this is getting too much! Percy, wait
Finding!”
 “I really didn’t give permission for that, Professor!” Percy said, licking himself with excitement. "I was
just telling them all to go back to bed! Brother Ron here had a one night —”
 “UR YELLI ARA ⴷ TARGIT!” Run shouted. “ASELMADAN, SEKKRE, D SIRIUS .
BLACK YELLA IBEDD FELI, YETTA TAMGERT!”
 Professor McGonagall glares at him.
 “Don’t you feel like, Oeasley, how can it go from the angle of the window?”
 “Ask him!” said Ron, pointing a shaking finger to the back of Sir Cadogan's picture. “That if .
saw -"
 While Ron looked suspiciously, Professor McGonagall pushed the vial back open and went .
outside. The entire common room heard hitched breaths. “Mr Cadogan, did you just leave a
The person entered the burj of Griffindor?”
 “Sure, good woman!” cried Sir Cadougan.
 There was a tense silence, both inside and outside the common room.
 “You — did?” Professor McGonagall said. “But — but the password!”
 “He had them!” said Sir Cadogan excitedly. “Had all week, my wife! Read them a bit.
A piece of paper!”
 Professor McGonagall pulled back from the screened-in window to face the excited crowd.
She was white as a sheet.
 “What person,” she said, her voice shaking, “what damn fool wrote that .
week of passwords and left them hanging?”
 There was a complete silence, broken by tiny, frightened gasps. Neville Lung,
Trembling from head to toe with muscular muscles, he raised his arm high into the air.


Page 195 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com




Chapter Fourteen
The Fall of Snape
 No one in Gryffindor tower slept that night. They knew the castle was being raided again,
And the whole House hung around in the common room, waiting to hear if Black was available .
caught. Professor McGonagall returned in the morning, to tell them that he had run away again.
 Throughout the day, everywhere serious signs of collapse were observed; Professor Flitwick
He can be seen directing the front doors to recognize the large personality of Sirius Black; Filc was
Suddenly they’re rushing up and down the streets, breaking everything from tiny cracks in
walls to mouse holes. Sir Cadogan was disappointed. His image returned to his revelation.
He arrived on the seventh floor, and the old woman was back. She was professionally rewarded, but she was
She was still very nervous, and agreed to return to work only on the condition that she be given
Extra protection. A group of undercover trolls had been assigned to keep an eye on her. They walk
corridor in an obsessive group, trading corners and measuring the size of their walls.
 Harry couldn't help but notice that the statue of the one-eyed woman on the third floor sat
It is unprotected and unstoppable. It seems that Fred and George were right to think that they —
And now Harry, Ron, and Hermione — they were the only ones who knew about what he was hiding .
way inside it.
 “Do you think we should tell someone?” Harry Ron asked.
 "We know he's not coming in with Honeyduke," Ron grumbled. "Let's hear if
The store was broken into.”
 Harry was glad Ron held this view. If even the one-eyed wizard was transplanted, he wouldn't be
He could get into Hogsmeade again.
Page 196 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Ron became an instant celebrity. For the first time in his life, people are paying more
mind rather than Harry, and Ron was obviously enjoying the experience.
Though he was still strongly traumatized by the night’s events, he was happy to tell anyone who asked what .
It happened, quite simply.
 “… I was lying down, and I heard this cracking noise, and I thought it was my dream, you know?
But they both was the text... I left the adjacent and one side of the ears on my bed was
He pulled down... I flinched... and saw him standing over me... like a figure, with a load of
A epulboe... holds greatest consideration, namely two Msiltic artifacts... and the blessing of
And I looked at him, and then I screamed, and he snapped.
 “Why, though?” Ron added to Harry as a group of second year girls who were traveling i
Her chilling story came out. “Why did he go?”
 Harry was thinking the same thing. Why was Black, because he had the wrong bed, not
Ron smiled and moved on to Harry? The Black remembered twelve years ago that she was no longer.
They killed innocent people, and this time, he was facing five unarmed kids, four of whom were
asleep.
 “Maybe he knew he’d have a job getting out of the castle when you screamed and woke up .
People upstairs,” Harry murmured. “He had to kill the whole house to come back with
portrait hole… then he will meet the teachers…”
 Neville was in complete embarrassment. Professor McGonagall got so furious at him that he stopped him.
Of all future visits to Hogsmeade, he was given a ban, and forbidden from anyone to give him
Password in the tower. Neville is a supposed to wait outside of the charging room every night.
To help one introduce, while the trolen tullen is accompanied by the vision we don’t like. None of them
However, the contracts almost matched the one her grandmother had prepared for her.
Two days after the Black approached Neville what all of Dere can help you love Hogarts .
back at noon — a Howler.
 The school goats marched into the great hall carrying the mail as usual, and Neville was shocked as a
The large store sign fell in front of him, a green sheet clutched to his neck. Harry and Ron,
They were sitting across from him, recognizing the letter as Howler at once — Ron had one .
from his mother the year before.
 “Title on it, Neville,” Ron said.
 Neville didn't need to be told twice. He grabbed the envelope, and held it in front of him like a weapon,
He quickly left the hall, while the Slytherin table erupted in laughter at the sight of him. they
Slanas for Howler Filts in the skiing room — the Neville’s mother’s voice, with silence .
Page 197 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
With stars in the repeat of the outbreak.
The whole family.
 Harry was too busy for Neville to notice immediately that he had a letter too.
I came out of the sights of sight to stain in the hand.
 "Oh! Oh—thank you, Hedwig.”
 Harry was born the team while Hedwiig was slaughtered in some Neville’s slavery things. the
The latter said:
 Hi Harry and Ron,
 How can we make a feast with this festival 'Tazgal of Six? I will gather you from the city.
WAITING AT THE ENTRANCE HALL; YOU ARE NOT GOING OUT ON YOURSELF.
 cheers,
 Hagrid
 “Maybe he wants to hear all about Black!” Run said.
 So at six that morning, Harry and Ron marched out of Gryffindor Tower, past the security trolls .
in a cart, and headed out into the entrance hall.
Hagrid was already waiting for them.
 “Alright, Hagrid!” Run said. “S'pose you want to hear about Saturday night, don't you?”
 "I've already heard all abou' it," Hagrid said, opening the front doors and ushering them out.
 “Oh,” Ron said, looking a little sheepish.
 The first thing they saw when they entered Hagrid's cabin was Buckbeak, sprawled out on the couch .
of Hagrid's embrace, his massive wings tucked tightly against his body, hugging a large
of dead cells. Blinking his eyes from this unpleasant sight, Harry saw an old, brown haired performer
A very messy blue and white suit and tie hung on the door step of Hagrid's hut.
 “What are they for, Hagrid?” Harry said.
Page 198 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "The case of Buckbeak vs. Council Fer for the Control of Dangerous Animals," Hagrid said.
“This Friday. He and I are going to London together. I booked two beds in
Knight frame…”
 Harry felt a twinge of guilt. He had completely forgotten that Buckbeak's trial was so close,
And judging by the impassive look on Ron's face, he had too. They also forgot their promise
for his help to prepare the defense of Buckbeak; The Firebolt rounds got her out clean.
of their minds.
 Hagrid poured them tea and gave them a bag of Bath cookies but they knew better than to
accept; They were very skilled at cooking for Hagrid.
 “I have something to discuss with you two,” Hagrid said, sitting down between them and
She looked so uncharacteristically strong.
 "what?" Harry said.
 "Hermione," Hagrid said.
 “What about her?” Run said.
 “She’s in decent shape, that’s what. She's been bin comin' down visiting me a lot since Christmas Day. bin
I feel lonely. Firs' yeh don't mess with him cause o' Firebolt, now yer don't mess with him
Because her partner —”
 “– eat Scabbers!” Ron exclaimed angrily.
 “Because his cat acts like all cats,” Hagrid continued quietly. “She cried a few times
Times, yeh you know. Goin' through a rough time at the moment. She loses more than she can eat, if
Yeh ask me, all that work you're trying to do. I still found time to help me with the Buckbeak case.
Mind… Found some really good stuff fer me… guess it’ll stand alright now…”
 "Hagrid, we have to help too—sorry—" Harry began softly.
 “I don’t blame her!” Hagrid said, pushing Harry's apology aside. “Gawd knows yeh has
brought ter be carried' by. I saw you practicing Quidditch every hour of the day and night.
'But I gotta say yeh, I thought you two would value your friend more than explosives or monsters. This
all."
 Harry and Ron exchanged uncomfortable looks.
 “Really hot, she was, when Black almost lost yeh, Ron. She has her heart in the
place, Hermione has, an' you two don't talk to her —”
ⴰⵙⴻⴱⵜⴻⵔ 199 ⵙⴻⴳ 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “If she would just get rid of that cat, I’d talk to her again!” ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ Ron ⵙ ⵍⵖⵉⴹⴰ. “But it still goes on
On it! She’s a gentlewoman, and never hears a word against her!”
 “Ah, well, people can be a bit naughty abou' their pets,” Hagrid said knowingly. Afterwards,
Buckbeak brushed some strawberry blossoms across Hagrid's nose.
 ⵙⵄⴻⴷⴷⴰⵏ ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⴰⵢ ⴷⵢⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎⴻⵏ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵜⵉⵔⵣⵉⵏⵙⴻⵏ ⵜⵜⵎⴻⵙⵍⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⵣⴻⵎⵎⴰⵔ ⵏ Gryffindor ⴰⵢ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⵏⴻⵔⵏⴰⵏ ⵉ Quidditch .
cup. At nine o'clock Hagrid took them back to the castle.
 A large group of people were pictured on the bulletin board as they returned to the
Common room.
 “Hogsmead, next weekend!” Ron said, scratching the heads to read the newspaper. "what
ⵜⵃⴻⵙⴱⴻⴹⴷ?” He quickly added to Harry as they went to sit down.
 “However, Filch doesn’t work anything about going to Honeyducks…” Harry said, more than that .
With silence.
 “Harry!” A voice said in his right ear. Harry started and looked at Hermione, who was
They sat at the table right behind them and cleared a space in the wall of books that was
He hid it.
 "Harry, if you get into Hogsmeade again… I'll tell Professor McGonagall about the card!" said
Hermione.
 “Can you hear someone talking, Harry?” said Ron, not looking at Hermione.
 “Ron, how about you let him go with you? After what Sirius Black almost did to you! I mean, I would
tell -"
 “Yes now you’re looking to get Harry’s!” Ron said cheerfully. “You aren’t what should
Less this year?”
 Hermione opened her mouth to reply, but with a loud gasp, Crookshanks jumped over her shoulder.
Hermione watched a frightened look on Ron's face and gathered Crookshanks,
And he quickly reached the girls’ bathroom.
 “Now how?” Ron told Harry as if there was no question. “That, the last
Time goes by and you don't know anything. You’re not even inside Zonko!”
 Harry looked around to make sure Hermione was well out of earshot.
ⴰⵙⴻⴱⵜⴻⵔ 200 ⵙⴻⴳ 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Okay,” he said. “But I’ve been guaranteed to the U
 ⴰⵙⵙ ⵏ ⵙⵙⴻⴱⵜ ⵜⴰⵎⴻⴷⴷⵉⵜ, ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵔⵙ ⵜⴰⵇⴱⵓⵛⵜⵉⵙ ⵏ ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵥⴻⵔ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⴽⴻⵔⵔⵓⵙⵜⵉⵙ, ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵔⵙⴷ ⵜⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵎⴰⵔⴰⵓⴷⴻⵔ .
map in his pocket, and went down to breakfast with all the others. Hermione kept taking shots.
ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵛⵓⴽⴽⵓ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⵉⵜ ⵙ ⵡⴰⴷⴷⴰ ⵏ ⵟⵟⴰⴱⵍⴰ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵢⴻⵄⵡⴻⵊⴰⵙ ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵃⵔⴻⵣ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜⵢⴻⴵⴵ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵍⵉ
You walk up the marble staircase in the entrance hall as everyone moves to
The front doors.
 "bye!" Harry called out to Run. “I’ll see you when you get back!”
 Ron grinned and arched an eyebrow.
 Harriy quickly passed into the third floor, and succeeded in Marader's card from the car as she went.
He sat behind the one-eyed girl and corrected her. The little dot was looking at
direction. Harry stared at her. The small writing next to it read Neville Longbottom.
 Harry quickly pulled out his wand and called out, “Dissendium!” And he put the car for the car in Lebanon.
But before he could venture into himself, Neville came around the corner.
 “Harry! I forgot you didn’t go to Hogsmeade either!”
 “Hello, Neville,” Harry said, backing away from the statue and sliding the map back to
his pocket. “What are you doing?”
 “Something,” Neville was broken. “Has she ever seen a game of Exploding Snap?”
 “Er — not now — I was going to go to the library and do that vampire drawing for Lupine —”
 “I’ll be with you!” Neville said excitedly. “I don’t even do it!”
 “Er — hold on — yes, I forgot, I took it off yesterday!”
 “ⴰⵎⴻⵇⵇⵔⴰⵏ, ⵜⵣⴻⵎⵔⴻⴹ ⴰⴷ ⴰⵢ-ⴷ-ⵜⵄⴰⵡⴻⵏⴷ!” Neville said, his face of evening and relied. “I don’t understand that thing
ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⵛⴻⵎⵎⴰⵄⵜ ⴰⴽⴽ — ⵉⵍⴰⵇ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜⵞⵞⴻⵏ, ⵏⴻⵖ —”
 He opened his eyes with a small smile, staring at Harry's hand.
 It’s Snap. Nephil took a step back from Harry.
 “And what are you two here for?” Snape said, coming to a stop and looking from one to the other .
other. “A place is not a place to meet —.”
Page 201 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry's black pictures appeared, Snape's black eyes appeared at the doors on each side of them,
and then to one's novel.
 “We’re not — we’re negotiating here,” Harry said. “We just — we met here.”
 "Really?" Snap said. "You have a habit of turning up in unexpected places, Potter, and you . . ."
Very rarely there isn't even a good reason... I'm suggesting that each of you go back to Gryffindor Town,
where are you."
 Harry and Neville have gone out of other words. When they reached the bridge, Harry turned back.
Snape was running one of his hands over the one-eyed witch's head, watching her closely.
 Harry managed to get Nephil into Fat Laidi's hands by talking about the word of Uffir, after which he returned.
He went out with his book of visits to the library and returned. Once out with security .
Then he went out with the card again and took it to his field.
 Clearly, the third option appears to be the workable one. Harry unfolded the card in a happy manner, with a
The reason for the development, that a small point named Sephiroth Snab is now back in his library.
 He came to the shadow, opened its seal, thrust himself inside, and put it down
ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵎⵍⵉⵍ ⴷ ⵜⴽⴻⵔⵔⵓⵙⵜⵉⵙ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⵍⴻⵎⵎⴰⵙⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵃⴰⵏⵓⵜ ⵏ ⵡⴻⵥⵔⵓ. ⵉⵙⵙⵓⴼⵖⴷ ⵜⴰⴱⵍⴰⴹⵜ ⵏ ⵎⴰⵔⴰⴷⵔ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⵍⵜ ⵢⴰⴹⵏ, ⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⴰⵙ
Divide into equal parts.
 Harry, all hidden under Infibar's cloak, went out into the sunset outside.
Honeydox and takes out Ron in the corner.
 “It’s me,” he demanded.
 “What’s possessing you?” Run sighed.
 “Senab looks back.”
 They set up High Street Street.
 "where are you?" Run was leaking out of the corner of his mouth. "You're still there? That's
Dreaming…”
 They went to the post office; Ron ⵉⴳⴰ ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵍⵉ ⵙⵙⵓⵎⴰ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵖⴻⵔⵙⵉⵡ ⵉ ⴱⵉⵍⵍ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵎⴰⵚⴻⵔ ⵉⵀⵉ
That Harry can be a good example. The times are changing in a pleasant way, although the three
hundred of them; From Great Grays we got smaller meats from smaller scoops (“Local Deliferies
Only”), which is smaller can stay in the hand of Harry’s hand.
Page 202 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 After that, they visited Zunku, who was well known as the teacher that Harry needed to prepare the Great Sorcerer .
They won’t be supposed to go for someone and make a pleasure. There are stories and photos to just name Fred and
George’s sexual dreams; ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵉⴼⴽⴰ ⵉ ⵔⵓⵏ ⵉⵏⴰⴹⵏ ⵉⵏⴱⴹⵏ ⴰⵔ ⴰⵙ ⵉⵜⵜⴰⵙⵉ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵡⵓⵔⵖ ⵙⴳ 2019
Under the table. They left Zonko's with their money bags much lighter than they had
They were getting in, but their pockets were overflowing with makeup powder, Hiccup's perfume, Frog Spawn soap,
It’s a Tose-Biting Teacup novel.
 The day was so fine and windy that none of them felt like staying home, so they passed
Three angles of the junior and went on a scam to visit the wedding shop, which is a lot of injuries
residing in Great Britain. ⵜⴻⴱⴷⴰ ⵛⵡⵉⵟ ⵏⵏⵉⴳ ⵏ ⵜⴰⴷⴷⴰⵔⵜ ⵏⵏⵉⴹⴻⵏ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⴰⴼⴰⵜ ⵏ ⵡⴰⵙⵙ ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ
It’s a little cluttered, with its plain windows and overgrown garden.
 « ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵉⵖⴻⵔⵙⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ Hogwarts ⵜⵜⵃⴻⵇⵔⵉⵔⴻⵏⵜⵜ », ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Ron ⵎⵉ ⵜⵜⴽⴻⵍⵍⵉⵅⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵍⵃⵉⴹ, ⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⴻⵏⵜⵜ ⵙ ⵍⵇⴻⴷⴷ. "I
asked Nearly Headless Nick… he said that he had heard a very strange crowd lived here. No one can get
In. Fred and George tried, obviously, but all the windows were blocked…”
 Harry, feeling the heat from their pants, was only considering taking the coat off for a few minutes
When they heard the news almost. One was returning home on the other side of
The hill; After that, Malfoy left, followed by Krab and Goyle. Malfoy
On speaks.
 “… He should have an animal from Papa any time now. He had to go to the hearing to tell them about
Photo... about how I can’t use three months…”
 Crabbe and Goyle are grinning.
 "I honestly wish I could hear that big hairy bastard try to defend himself... 'No 'hand in . . ."
'Im, 'honest —'… That hippogriff is as good as dead—”
 Malfoy suddenly caught sight of Ron. His thin face broke into a kind smile.
 “What are you doing, Wissley?”
 Malfoy looked at the crumbling house behind Ron.
 “I said you wanted to live here, didn’t you, Wesley? Are you running to make yourself
bedroom? I heard your family all sleeping in one room — is that true?”
 Harry took over the Ron’s headquarters to stop raising Malfoy.
 “Leave it to me,” he whispered into Ron’s ear.
Page 203 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 The opportunity was too perfect to miss. Harry crept silently around behind Malfoy, Crabbe, and
Goyle, he passed, and has uncovered a large-scale pcil of the basin.
 "We're just talking about your friend Hagrid," Malfoy told Ron. “Just trying to figure out what .
He told the Stray Animal Control Service. D'K thinks he's going to scream.
when they stood for its Hebrew —.”
 SPLATS!
 The Malfoy Head rushed forward as Mudd grabbed him; Her silvery red hair was drooping at the same time.
Pig.
 “What the —?”
 Ron had to hold onto the wall to keep himself upright, laughing loudly. Malfoy,
Crabbe, and Goyle looked defensively at the scene, looking confused, Malfoy trying to clear his
Clean hair.
 “What’s that? Who did it?”
 “Pretty sexy up here, isn’t it?” Ron said, with the air of someone discussing the weather.
 Crabby and Guyle are very responsive. Their swollen bodies were useless against the ghosts.
Malfoy was looking around with interest at the desert.
 Harry sneaks down the street, where an empty bottle gives off some foul smell,
Lhalem the Tazghaw.
 BROOK!
 Crabbe and Goyle caught something this time. Goyle freaks out at the scene, trying to knock him out
of the tiny, green slots.
 “It came from there!” said Malfoy, wiping his face, and staring at a spot some six feet to the
Harry’s left.
 Crabbe leaned forward, his long arms stretched out like a zombie. Harry turned to her,
He picked up a stick and pressed it against Crabbe’s shoulder. Harry added with a quiet laugh as
Crabbe made a sort of pirouette in the air, trying to see who had thrown it. As Run only
The person Crabbe could see was Ron standing next to him, but Harry shrugged. tribe
she stepped — and her big, thin foot caught the sleeve of Harry's apron. Harry felt a big tingle, and then
The cloth is gone from his face.
Page 204 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 For a split second, Malfoy stares at him.
 “Argh!” he yelled, nodding at Harry's head. Then he turned his head and ran, in his head.
He hurried back down the hill, Crabbe and Goyle behind him.
 Harry pulled the hood again, but the damage was done.
 “Harry!” Ron said, stumbling forward and staring hopelessly at the point where Harry was .
He growled, “you better go for it! If Malfoy told everyone — you better get back to .
Less, quickly —”
 “I’ll see you later,” Harry said, and without another word, headed off towards the .
Hogsmeade.
 Would Malfoy believe what he saw? Will one of Malfoy? No one knows about
The Cloak of Invisibility — none other than Dumbledore. Harry's stomach turned —
Dumbledore will be well knows what happened, if Malfoy said something —
 Return to the Honeydukes, back down to the top of the stairs, across the stone floor, and through the trapdoor .
— Harry removed the morning, snapped under the phosphate, Yzzel, quickly, on the border of the turf...
Malfoy would come back first… how much would it cost to find an apprentice? With breathing, hard
Pain in his side, Harry didn't move until he reached the stone wall. He had to go.
dressing where he was, it was a lot more fun if Malfoy tipped off a teacher—
He hid her in a corner of the shadow, then began to climb, as fast as he could, his sweaty palms sweeping over it
side of the cut. He reached the inside of the witch's hump, tapped it with his wand, stuck
Crosses, and he surrounded the Ephes; The singer, and that as soon as Harry left
Behind the scenes, he heard fast footsteps approaching.
 It’s Snap. He approached Harry at a brisk pace, his black coat vibrating, then stopped at the
in front of him.
 “Okay,” he said.
 A wave of suppressed triumph came over her. Harry tried to be innocent, he felt all
The army is the hands of theon, he arrived in eggs in the same prophets.
 “Come with me, Potter,” Snape said.
 Harry followed him down, trying to wipe his hands clean on the inside of his robes without
Snape observes. He went to the Tuesday at the beach of the November, two to the Snape speech.
Page 205 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry had only one time before, and also in very big difficulties. snap
It has received some more fire in the streets since last time, standing all in the night
Behind his desk, he glistened in the firelight and trembled in the menacing atmosphere.
 “Sit down,” Snape said.
 Hari remained. However, it remains silent, stood.
 " Sir. Malfoy was just to see me with a strange story, Potter,” Snape said.
 Harry didn't say anything.
 “He said he was in front of Shriking Shack when he met Weasley — as it seems .
alone."
 Still, Harry doesn’t talk.
 " Sir. Malfoy stated that he was standing talking to the Weasleys, when he was hit by a large chunk of sand
in the center of the head. How do you think it might be?”
 Harry wants to see him a smooth sight.
 “I don’t see, a Provesure.”
 Snape's eyes were shifting at Harry. The same is something he tried to look at the Wales with a Hippogriff.
Harry has tried a lot so he didn’t.
 " Sir. Malfoy then noticed an unusual expression. You can imagine what that might be,
plate?"
 “Oh,” Harry said, now he’s now trying to react to.
 “It’s a charotic, a Potter. It’s accompanied by in the air.”
 There was a long silence.
 “Perhaps the evil to try to Madam Pomfrey,” says Harry. “If he feels like things —”
 “What will the head work in Hogsmeade, a Potter?” Snape said quietly. “Your head
He wasn't allowed in Hogsmead. There is no part of your body has the right to be in Hogsmid.”
Chapter 206 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “I know that,” Harry said, trying to protect the character from harassment or fear. “It looks like the Malfoy .
It has heloxene —”
 “Malfoy didn’t have Hacineus,” Snape, was slaughter, a hand on every hand of .
Harry's chair, so that their faces were a foot apart. "If your boss is in Hogsmeade, even
They stayed.”
 “I managed to stay in front of Griffindor,” says Hari. “As you’ve come —”
 “Is someone to show that?”
 Harry didn't say anything. Snape's pale mouth curled into a smug grin.
 “With that,” he said, nodding. “Every single one of Majal’s interior ministers, it was 20-2.
He tries to keep the famous Harry Potter from Sirius the Black. But the famous Harry Potter is a law that
His hands. Make the official citizen worry about his safety! The famous Harry Potter goes wherever he wants
to, without thinking of the consequences.”
 Harry remained silent. Snape was trying to dissuade him from telling the truth. It wasn’t going to do
it. Snape had no evidence — yet.
 "What an extraordinary father you are, Potter," Snape whispered, his eyes twinkling.
“He was very inviting too. A bit of experience on the Quidditch field did .
She thinks he was a cut above the rest of us too. He’s in the place and
Admirers… The controversy between you is incredible.”
 “My father didn’t hurt,” Harry said, before he could stop himself. “And I haven’t seen it either.”
 "Nor did your father set much of a shop on a regular basis," Snape continued, appealing to his interest, hers .
The sand’s is full of pool. “Rules are for little people, not Quidditch Cup winners. His head was
So, he found —”
 "shut up!"
 ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⴻⵍⵜ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵢⵉⴹⴰⵔⵔⴻⵏⵉⵙ. Pain like no one he had felt since his last night on Privet Drive
He was going through it. He didn't like that Snape's face had turned serious, his black eyes
It flows gracefully.
 “What about me, Potter?”
 “I told you to shut up about Dad!” Harry shouted. “I know the truth, okay? ⵉⵙⴻⵍⵍⴻⴽⵉⴽ
life! ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⵢⵉⴷ Dumbldur! You wouldn’t even be here if it wasn’t for my dad!”
Page 207 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Snape's pale skin was the color of lead.
 “And the principal told you the circumstances in which your father saved my life?” he
cold. “I loves it is that the phrases don’t love many of the most important Potter ears?”
 Harry bit his lips. He didn't know what had happened and didn't want to admit it—but Snape .
It seemed to really resonate.
 “I’d hate for you to run off with a false idea of ​​your father, Potter,” he said, grinning mischievously .
He looks at his face. “Were you planning some heinous act? Then let me fix the
You — your holy father and his friends have played upon me a very interesting drama which will have
He got my death unless your father got cold feet at the last second. ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴽⵔⴰ.
Courage for what he did. He was saving his eyes like mine. If their laughter had succeeded,
He would have been kicked out of Hogwarts.”
 Snape's uneven, yellow teeth were exposed.
 “Empty your pockets, Potter!” He sighed suddenly.
 Harry didn't move. There was a ringing in his ears.
 "Empty your pockets, or we're going straight to the headmaster!" Pull them out, Potter!”
 Cold with fear, Harry quickly pulled out Zonko's bag of tricks and the Marauder's Card.
 Snap picks up Zonko's bag.
 “Ron gave them to me,” Harry said, praying he’d get a chance to tip Ron before he saw Snape .
he. “He brought them back from Hogsmeade last time —”
 "Honestly? And since when have you been taking them? How it takes so… what
this?"
 Snape had picked up the map. Harry tried with all his might to keep his face impassive.
 “Spare Beat of lpergamin,” he said with a woman’s view.
 Snape picked it up, his eyes fixed on Harry.
 “Of course you don’t need a very old part of such a lot?” he said. “Why don’t I just throw .
This far?”
Page 208 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 His hand looked into the fire.
 "No!" Harry said quietly.
 "so!" Snape said, his long lips quivering. "Another preferred gift Mr. Weasley?"
Or is it — something else? A letter, perhaps, written in invisible ink? Or — instructions to get
In Hogsmeade without going through the Dementors?”
 Harry widened his eyes. Snape's eyes twinkled.
 “Let me see, let me see…” he muttered, pulling out his wand and moving the card around on his forearm .
desk. “Show your badge!” He said, touching the wand to the paper.
 Nothing happened. Harry closed his hands to stop them from shaking.
 “Show yourself!” Snape said, tapping the map hard.
 It remains flexible. Harry was taking deep, calming breaths.
 “The recommendation of Sephiroth Schnapp, the principal of this school, is to give you the information that you .
Clever!” Snape said, holding the card in his hand.
 Although the invisible hand writes the words, they came out with words on the happy face of
The map.
 “Mooney expresses his gratitude to Professor Snape, and begs him to spare his extraordinary
Big noses from other people’s business.”
 Snape gathered. Harry stared, dumbstruck, at the message. But the map didn’t stop there. further
The writing is below as below.
 " Sir. Prongs is annoyed with Mr. Mooney and would like to add that Professor Snape is a terrible git.”
 It would be so much fun if the situation wasn’t so serious. And there’s more…
 " Sir. Badfoot tries to fulfill its demand that such a unit is no longer
teacher."
 Harry closed his eyes in shock. When he opened it, the card had his last words.
 " Sir. Wormtail wished Professor Snape a good day, and thanked him for brushing his hair, slimeball.”
Page 209 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry waited for the bell to ring.
 “So…” Snape said quietly. “We'll see about this…”
 He rushed to his fireplace, grabbed a handful of glittering powder from a pot on the stove, and
He threw it into the fire.
 “Lubin!” Snape called into the fire. “I want a word!”
 Utterly bewildered, Harry stared at the fire. A large shape had appeared in it, moving very fast.
A few seconds later, Professor Lupine was emerging from the kitchen, cleaning the hair from his messy head .
furniture.
 “You spoke, Severus?” Lupine said calmly.
 “I really wasn’t,” Snap said, his face serious as he returned to his field. "I have
He simply asked Potter to empty his pockets. That's enough.”
 Snabi mentions the bar, which contains the words of Egypt. ⵎⵓⵏⵉ, ⵡⵓⵔⵎⵜⴰⵢⵍ, ⴱⴰⴷⴼⵓⵜ, ⴷ
The wings still shine. An awkward, tight smile appeared on Lupin's face.
 "Well?" said Snape.
 Lupin ⵉⴽⴻⵎⵎⴻⵍ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⴽⴰⵔⴹⴰ. Harry has a hunch that Lupine is doing some very good work.
Think spending.
 "Well?" Snape said again. “This parchment is plainly full of Dark Magic. This is supposed to be
Your workspace, Lubin. Where do you imagine Potter got such a thing?”
 Lopez saw him and, with a half smile on Harry's side, motioned him not to move.
 “Full of dark magic?” he repeated calmly. “You really think so, Severus? He looks at me like
However, it is only one part of the poem that appeals to everyone who reads it. ⴷ ⴰⵖⴻⵔⵙⵉⵡ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ
not dangerous? I think Harry’s getting it from a photo shop —.”
 "She is?" Snap said. His jaw went rigid with anger. “You think a comic shop can deliver .
to him in such a way? Don’t you think it’s possible to get it directly from
Investors?”
 Harry didn't understand what Snape was talking about. Not, obviously, is Lubin.
Page 210 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Do you want to come, by Mass Wormtail or by one of the men?” he said. “Harri, you know some of the
Men?”
 “No,” Harry said flatly.
 “See, Severus?” Lubin said, turning to the snap. “A Zonko producer is sending us to him —”
 Just then, Ron came bursting into the office. All the breath came out of him, and he paused.
He was just barely up to Snape's desk, clutching his shoulders and trying to speak.
 “I’m — I’ve got up — for Harry — what — the thing,” he said quickly. “St...t...that in Zonko…i.e.....”
 "Well!" Lupine said, clapping his hands together, looking excited. “Obviously
Turn that off! Shall I bring this, or shall I return?” ⵉⴼⴼⵖ ⴷ ⵜⴰⴽⴰⵕⴹⴰ ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜ ⵉⵜⵜⴰⵡⵢ ⴰⴳⵏⵙⵓ ⵏⵏⵙ
furniture. “Harry, Ron, come with me, I need a word about my sloppy writing — I’m sorry, Severus .
—”
 Harry could not be able to meet Snape as they came out of pyrowatis. he. Ron, and Lubin are going all the way.
He returned to the entrance hall before speaking. Then Harry turned to Lupine.
 “Master, I —”
 “I don’t want to hear the girls,” Lupin said quickly. It depends on the non-interesting smoking
The room and the structure of his voice. “I know for sure that this card is held by Mr. Filch very
years ago. Yeah, I know that’s a map,” he said as Harry and Run appeared. "I don't wanna
I know how it affected your denial. I am, however, surprised that you didn’t.
Especially after what happened last time a student accidentally left information about the castle .
around. And I can’t let you do it again, Harry.”
 Harry wants to answer this, and he's very good at explaining.
 “Why did Snape say I inherited it from the makers?”
 "Because..." Lupine blinked, "Because these cartoonists would want to get you out of . . ."
school. They think it’s a pretty cool thing.”
 “Do you know them?” Harry said, surprised.
 "We met," he said shortly. He was watching Harry more closely than before.
 “I don’t expect to hear from you again, Harry. I can’t make you take Black Sirius.
really. But I would think that what you hear when the Dementors approach .
Page 211 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
It will help you in more ways than one. Your parents gave their lives to let you live,
Harry. Worst way to get them back — gambling their happiness on a bag of magic spells.”
 He walked away, leaving Harry feeling much better than he had at any point in Snape's office.
A little while later, he and Ron put their arms around each other. As Harry passed the one-eyed woman, he
He remembered that it was an infisobili cloak — he was down, but he wasn't going to get it.
 “It’s my fault,” Ron growled. “I convinced you to go. Lubin's right, he's a coward, we
He shouldn’t have done it —”
 broken; They reached the hallway where the security trolls were walking, and Hermione was
He walks towards them. One look on her face convinced Harry that she had heard what he had to
happened. Her heart stopped — had she told Professor McGonagall?
 “Come and have a good gloat?” Ron said with a chuckle as she stopped in front of them. “Or do you have
Even if I tell us?”
 “No,” Hermione said. She holds a letter in her hands and her cheeks quiver. “I just
she thought you should know… Hagrid lost his case. Buckbeak will be punished.”
Chapter Five
Quidditch End
 "He sent me this," Hermione said, holding out the letter.
 Harry took it. The paper was wet, and large droplets stained the ink badly.
In places that are very difficult to read.
Dear Hermione,
 We lost. I made it back to Hogwarts. The date of execution shall be fixed. Biky has
You love London.
 I will never forget all the support you gave us.
 Hagrid
 “They can’t do that,” Harry said. “They can’t. Buckbeak isn’t defensive.”
Page 212 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "Malfoy's father scared the Council into it," Hermione said, rolling her eyes. "You know
How was it. They’re a bunch of doddery old fools, and they’re scared. to be
the appeal, though, is always there. Only I can’t see any hope… Nothing would have changed.”
 “Yes, it will,” Ron insisted. “You don’t have to do all the work alone this time, Hermione.
I’ll help.”
 “Oh, Run!”
 Hermione wrapped her arms around Ron's waist and bowed completely. Ron, looking very
Confused, he touched it very gently on the top of the head. Finally, Hermione appeared.
 "Ron, I'm really, really sorry about Scabbers…" she sobbed.
 "Oh—well—it was great," Ron said, looking rather proud of her abandonment.
“And it was a bit useless. You never know, Mom and Dad can get me a bass now.”
 The safety measures imposed on students since Black’s second appearance have made it impossible .
For Harry, Ron and Hermione they were going to go see Hagrid in the afternoon. Their only chance of
Talk to her during Magical Beast Care Lessons.
 He seemed shocked at the prospect.
 “S'all my fault. Got all those tongues. They were all sitting there in black and I kept jogging around.
Me smile and forget all the visits yeh look up at me, Hermione. Then Lucius Malfoy
He stood up an' said his bit, and the Board jus' done as he told 'em…”
 “There’s still pain!” Ron said calmly. “Don’t worry, we’re working on it!”
 They walk back towards the castle with the rest of the gang. Up ahead they could see Malfoy.
who was walking with Crabbe and Goyle, and kept looking back, laughing hysterically.
 “S'no good, Ron,” Hagrid said sadly when they reached the top of the castle. “That council in 2019.
Lucius Malfoy's pocket. I’ll just make sure the rest of Beaky’s time is up to him
He doesn't have. I believe that…”
 Hagrid turned and staggered back to his cabin, his face buried in his pillow.
 “Look at him blubber!”
 Malfoy, Crabbe, and Goyle were standing just inside the castle gates, listening.
Page 213 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Have you ever seen anything so strange?” Malfoy said. “And it should be ours .
teacher!"
 Harry and Ron both eagerly rushed over to Malfoy, but Hermione arrived first —
SMACK!
 She slapped Malfoy across the face with all the strength she could muster. Malfoy growled.
Harry, Ron, the Crab, and Goyle stood in shock as Hermione raised her hand again.
 “Don’t you dare call Hagrid handsome, you scoundrel—you’re evil—”
 “Hermione!” Ron said weakly, and tried to hold onto her hand as she jerked him back.
 “Take it off, Ron!”
 Hermione pulled out her wand. Malfoy stepped back. Krabbe and Guyle look to
commands, quickly ignored.
 “Come on.” Malfoy muttered, and in a moment, all three of them had disappeared into the
The road to the shops.
 “Hermione!” Ron said again, his voice soft and concerned.
 “Harry, you’d better beat him in the Quidditch final!” Hermione said with a chuckle. “You just better
Had, because I can’t stand it if Slytherin wins!”
 "We were working on Charms," ​​Ron said, still staring at Hermione. “ⵢⵉⴼⵉⵜ ⵎⴰ ⵏⵔⵓⵃ.”
 They hurried up the marble stairs to Professor Flitwick's classroom.
 “You’re late, boys!” Professor Flitwick said with a chuckle as Harry opened the classroom door.
“Come on, hurry up, hurry up, we’re experimenting with Cheering Charms today, we have .
They’ve already split in two —”
 Harry and Ron hurried over to a desk in the back and opened their bags. Ron Models behind it.
 “ⴰⵏⵉⴷⴰ ⵜⴻⴷⴷⴰ Hermione?”
 Harry looked too. Hermione never went to high school, but Harry knew she was
right in front of him when he opened the door.
 “That’s wonderful,” Harry said, smiling at Ron. “Maybe — maybe she went to the bathroom or .
some?"
Page 214 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 But Hermione didn't show up to the lesson at all.
 “She could do with the Cheering Charm too,” Ron said as the class left for lunch, together .
With a smile on their face — the Cheering Charms left them with a smile on their faces.
 Hermione wasn't at lunch either. By the time they finished their apple pie, the after effects of
The Cheering Charms were playing, and Harry and Ron were starting to get a little nervous.
 “You don’t think Malfoy did anything to her?” Run said worriedly as they hurried upstairs.
Towards Gryffindor Tower.
 They got past the security trolls, gave the Fat Girl a password (“flibb ertigibbet”), and
squeezed through the upstairs window into the common room.
 Hermione sat down at a table and fell asleep, her head resting on an open Arithmancy book. they
He went to sit on either side of it. Harry prodded her awake.
 “ⵡⵀ — ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ?” Hermione said, getting up with the first and looking around excitedly. « ⴷ ⵍⴰⵡⴰⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵏⵔⵓⵃ?
W — what lesson have we learned now?”
 "Crazy, but not for another twenty minutes," Harry said. "Hermione, why don't you
Are they coming to Charms?”
 "What? Oh no!" Hermione snapped “I forgot to go to Charms!”
 “But how could you forget?” Harry said. “You were with us until we were right outside of .
Class!”
 “I don’t believe it!” cried Hermione. “Was Professor Flitwick angry? ⴰ, ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ Malfuy, ⵍⵍⵉⵖ
I’ve been thinking about it and I’ve called things off!”
 “You know what, Hermione?” Ron said, looking through the large book of Arithmancy .
Hermione was using as a spell. “I thought you were burning. You try to do too much.”
 “ⴰⵍⴰ, ⵓⵔ ⵍⵍⵉⵖ ⴰⵔⴰ!” Hermione said, pushing her hair out of her eyes and staring into the distance hopelessly .
For his bag. “I just made a mistake, that’s all! I better go see Professor Flitwick and tell him
ⵙⵙⵓⵔⴻⴼⵉⵢⵉ... ⴰⴷ ⴽⵡⴰⵍⵉⵖ ⴷⴻⴳ Divination!”
 Hermione walked with them down the stairs to Professor Trelawney's class twenty
Twenty minutes later, he looked very affected.
Page 215 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “I can’t believe I missed out on Cheering Charms! And I bet they’ll stand out in our tests; teacher
Flitwick says they can!”
 All fighting to try the insulting house, which was insulted. It shines on any small table
It was a crystal ball filled with coral white dust. Harry, Ron, and Hermione all stayed in the
a ricket table.
 “I’m not going to have to start the Crystal Alumma and a year for the live,” Ron said with sight of sight, and snapped the story of the Great Housing .
around for Professor Trelawney, if she was lurking nearby.
 “Don’t complain, that’s meaningful sense of body,” Dears Harry with a woman’s vision. “I was feeling sick
of her smile every time she looked at my hands.”
 “Good day to you!” The familiar, misty voice said, and Professor Trelawney made it a habit .
a dramatic entrance from the shadows. Parvati and Lavender jump for joy, their faces
Farrying their crystal earrings.
 "I decided to create a crystal ball a little earlier than I was supposed to," said Professor .
Trelawney, sitting with her back to the fire and looking around. “The texts informed me that .
Akayadik in Younyu will visit Orb, and I feel alive to get the necessary job.”
 Hermione sighed.
 "Well, honestly... 'justice served him.' Who administers the test? Written! what
amazing view!” she said, not bothering to keep her voice low. Harry and Run are stunned
It falls.
 It was hard to tell if Professor Trelawney had heard them because his face was hidden in
shadow. It continues, however, as if it didn’t.
 “Seeing a crystal is a particularly elaborate art form,” she says dreamily. “I don’t expect any of you to .
See when you first look into the infinite depths of the Orb. Let’s start with rest of rest
the rational mind and the outer eye —” Ron began to shiver uncontrollably and he had to distract himself .
Fist in his mouth to quiet the noise — “to purify the inner eye and spiritual mind.
Maybe, if we’re lucky, some of you will see before the end of class.”
 That’s why they started. Harry, at least, felt very foolish, staring blankly into the crystal ball,
He tries to protect his mind without staying when thoughts like “this is a friend” are thrown at him. it
It didn't help that Ron kept cracking silent pranks and Hermione kept smiling.
 “Have you seen anything yet?” Harry asked them after a triangle of a silent crissal era.
Page 216 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Yeah, there’s a hot tub on this table,” Ron said, pointing. “Some one who was guilty of their own.”
 "This is such a violation of time," Hermione said. “I could be missing something useful. I can
Taking in the wedding feasts —”
 Professor Trelawney grimaced nervously.
 “There is the one who wanted to help to understand the circumstances that within Orbnsen?” she
she said with a wave of her eyebrows.
 “I don’t need help,” Ron said. “It’s obviously what’s the meaning of this. It will be covered by the houses of
Ready tonight.”
 Both Harry and Hermione burst out laughing.
 “It’s true, really!” Professor Trewne said when they robbery of everyone denied. Barbati
And Lavender were simultaneously accomplished. “You’re close to ears of ears.” she
Approach their table and approach with their crystal ball. Harry could feel his heart pounding. He was believing
He saw what they’re going to —
 “There’s something here!” Professor Trelawney whispered, leaning her face into the ball, so that
He’s just twice in his big bottles. “Something what is supposed to be… but what?”
 Harry was prepared to bet everything he had, including his Firebolt, that it wasn't good news,
anyway. It’s quite a waste —
 “Oh love,” Professor Trelawney, Harry is succeeded. “It is here, clearer than ever .
Before… my symbol, it takes you, it grows for a while… ”
 “Oh, for goodness sake!” The Hermine was in a good way. “Not that crazy Grim again!”
 Teacher succeeds her big eyes to Hermione's face. Parvati something
to Laveender, and they are accompanied by two even Hermione. Professor Trelawney stood up, looking
Hermione with a non-resistant fragment.
 “I am sorry that since she came to Habio, it is that
Obviously, you don’t have what the smaller art of the face is. Of course, she doesn’t
I once remember a teacher whose mind was hopelessly unpatriotic.”
 There was a moment of silence. so -
Page 217 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "fine!" Hermione said quickly, you’ve been smoothly, you’ve been upgrading, you’re updating the Donfogging of Yimal in it .
bag. "fine!" Tels, he snapped the cake on her hand and almost pulling Ron from her lips
chair. “I give up! I’m going!”
 And at every murmur of the group, Hermione would turn to her husband, hold him open, and
He climbed down the stairs unseen.
 It took a few minutes for the call to answer. Professor Trelawney seems to have
Forget all about Grim. She happily escapes from Harry and Ron's box, spreading the virus.
When she made it a lot more comfortable.
 “Oooh!” Lavender said suddenly, making everyone start. “Oooo, Professor Trelawni, I was .
I just remember! The moment you have left, or no? Orda, teacher? 'Home, one
of our number will give us forever!' You’ve been saying it for years, Master!”
 Professor Trelawney gave him a smug smile.
 “Yes, my symbol, I really know that Miss Granger will leave us. However, one hopes.
If a person can cross an obstacle… The Inner yee can be a road, you know…”
 Lavender and Barbatis saw a lot, and work hard, and work together in this way to satisfy it.
He could join their table instead.
 “Someday she’ll have Hermione, yes?” Ron called out to Harry, looking confused.
 "Yes…"
 Harry broke the ball but he saw something without the white singer and he was back. ancient teacher
Has Trelawney actually seen Grim again? Will you yajj? The only thing that should be close to death.
Surprise, with quidditch final drawing nearby.
 The Easter holidays weren’t exactly exciting. The third years don’t have that much
homework. Niphil longbotum appears to be closely related to an outbreak of influenza, and it is not the only one.
 “Call this a party!” Seamus Finnegan walked into the hall sharing a ceremony. “Examinations
They’re ages away, what are they playing at?”
 But no one had as much to do as Hermione. Even without warning, she was getting more
Themes above everyone. She often went out of the shared house at night, at first she
He arrived at the library the next morning; She had the same shade as Lupine under her eyes, and looked
Close to tears always.
Page 218 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Ron had taken over responsibility for Buckbeak's appeal. When he wasn’t doing his job,
It runs on a bunch of cool codes with names like The Handbook of Hippogfiffi
Is Psychology Full or Full? A study of the bursary of the hibogriff. It is used a lot, even
Forget being dependent on Crookchanks.
 Harry, meanwhile, is supposed to be at his job instead of working on Quidditch every day, not
Mention the incessant debate about resources and wood. The Gryffindor-Slytherin reunion will take
It is held on the first Saturday after the Eucharist. Slytherin was the championship leader with
Exactly two hundred points. This shows (as Wood constantly reminded his team) that .
He must win the match by more than that margin to win the trophy. It also means that the burden
of success falls heavily on Harry, because catching a Snitch is worth a hundred and fifty .
note.
 “Therefore, you should only take it if we are more than five percent,” Wood Harri said without hesitation.
“Only if we have more than 50 points, Harri, or we win the game but we pay for the trophy. possess
Take that, didn’t I warn you? You have to catch the snitch even if we —”
 “It’s me, OLIVER!” Harry shouted.
 The entire Gryffindor house was excited about the upcoming match. Gryffindor didn't win
Quidditch bowl since the legendary Charlie Weasley (Ron's second oldest brother).
researcher. But Harry doubted any of them, including Wood, wanted to win as much as he did.
The animosity between Harry and Malfoy was at its most intense. Malfoy was still right.
about the sand throwing incident at Hogsmeade and was even more furious that Harry had
Somehow he wormed his way out of prison. Harry would never forget Malfoy's attempt to
Sabotages them in the match against Ravenclaw, but it’s Buckbeak’s business that leaves him
Very determined to beat Malfoy in front of the whole school.
 There has never, in anyone’s memory, been a match that has come close in quite such a rich division. by
By the time the festivities were over, the tension between the two teams and their Houses was at
point of failure. Several small fights broke out in the streets, culminating in a riot
An incident in which a fourth year Gryffindor and a sixth year Slytherin ended up in the hospital
Wings with butterflies sticking out of their ears.
 Harry was having a particularly bad time of it. He couldn't go to school without Slytherins.
They stick out their fingers and try to strangle him; Crabbe and Goyle keep popping up everywhere
ⵢⴻⴷⴷⴰ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⵙ ⵍⵅⵓⴼ ⵎⵉ ⵜⵡⴰⵍⴰⵏ ⵜⵜⵡⴰⴹⴻⵍⵎⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵢⴻⵎⴷⴰⵏⴻⵏ. wood
He gave instructions that Harry was to follow him wherever he went, if
Slytherins tried to talk him out of the action. The entire Gryffindor house took the challenge.
Fortunately, just as Harry couldn’t make it to class on time because he was
surrounded by a large, chattering crowd. Harry was more concerned about the safety of his Firebolt than
Aitlas. ⵎⵉ ⵓⵔ ⵜⵢⴻⵜⵜⴼⴻⴳⴳⵉⴹ ⴰⵔⴰ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⴻⴱⴱⵉⵙⵉⵜⵜ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵉⵡⴰⵜⴰ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵍⴱⴰⵟⴰⵟⴰⵉⵏⴻⵙ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵄⴻⴷⴷⴰⵢ ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ ⵖⴻⵔ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ.
Up to Gryffindor Tower at break times to make sure he was still there.
Page 219 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 All previous assignments were left in the Gryffindor common room the night before the meeting.
Even Hermione put down her books.
 “I couldn’t work, I couldn’t concentrate,” she said in shock.
 There was a great deal. Fred and Girj Osalli were the only source of
They were louder and more excited than ever. Oliver Wood was squatting on a model of
The Quidditch field in the background, he rubs his forehead against her and looks
herself Angelina, Alicia, and Katie were laughing at Fred and George's jokes. There is Harry
They sat down with Ron and Hermione, took them off the edge of things, and tried not to think about
The reasons, because every time you work, has a sense of clothes that something is very big
He struggled to get out of his stomach.
 “You’ll be fine,” Hermione told him, though she sounded terribly pleasantly surprised.
 “ⵜⴻⵙⵄⵉⴹ ⵜⴰⴼⴻⴽⴽⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵙ!” Run said.
 “Yeah…” Harry said, his stomach twitching.
 He came to the joy when Wood in once and he was slaughtered: “Team! bed!"
 Harry left with an awkward sigh. First he dreams that he has overslept, and Wood exclaims, “Where .
were you? We should use Nephil instead!” After that, he contacted Malfoy and the others of
ⵜⴰⵖⵍⴰⵎⵜ ⵏ ⵙⵍⵉⵜⴻⵔⵉⵏ ⵜⴻⵡⵡⴻⴹ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⴻⵎⵍⵉⵍⵉⵜ ⴰⵢⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⴻⴷⴷⵓ ⵙ ⵔⵔⵚⴰⵚ. He was sick with a high speed, trying to
Avoiding a blast of steam from Malfoy's horse's mouth, when he realized he'd forgotten his
Firebolt. He fell into the air and woke up with a splash.
 It was a few seconds before Harry remembered that the meeting hadn't happened, that he had .
ⵍⴰⵎⴰⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵡⵓⵙⵓ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⵓ ⴷⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵜⴰⵖⵍⴰⵎⵜ ⵏ ⵙⵍⵉⵜⴻⵔⵉⵏ ⵓⵔ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵄⴻⴹⴹⵉⵍ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵙⵙⴻⵔⵙ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵎⵓⴽⴰⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵄⴻⴷⴷⵉ. he
He feels very good. ⵙ ⵜⵙⵓⵙⵎⵉ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵉⵣⴻⵎⵔⴻⵔ, ⵢⴻⴼⴼⴻⵖⴷ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵕⴻⴱⵄⴰ ⵏ ⵢⵉⴹⴻⴱⵙⵉⵢⴻⵏⵉⵙ, ⵉⵔⵓⵃ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵙⵙⴻⵔⵙ
He poured some water from the silver vessel under the float.
 The skies are still and quiet. No breath of wind shakes the tops of the trees in perforation
forest; the Whomping Willow is motionless and looks innocent. It looks like a
The conditions of this interaction will be pleasant.
 Harry puts his sand and he snapped back to his bed when something sick of his eyes.
A slope of some of the sand was dried up on the silver woods.
 Harry stood up on his hand table, and he left his clothes, and put them, and snapped back to
The fleet. It can’t be Grim — but she now — so she thinks before the meeting — .
Page 220 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 He rejected the country’s center, after a ministry minute of joy, the words. compliance
They are snapped on the border of the forests... Ur was all Girm... a cat... Harry caught in
The skin of the body in the body as well as absorbed the neck of the blotch. He was just Krukshanks...
 Or Krukshanks just there? Harry approaches, surrounded by the Indigenous by the gas on gas.
Crookshank obviously came to a conclusion. Harry was believed that he could see anyone else that is silly.
In the shade of trees too.
 And only, he left — a big black jewelry, with the ear, simultaneously grown in the forests,
Krochankank is still on his side. Harry blushed. What did that mean? Limmer can see Krukshanks to see
The dog also, how could it be an omen of Harry’s death?
 “Run!” Harry sighed. “Run! wake up!"
 “Oh?”
 “I was going to tell me if you can eat something!”
 “S'all, Harry,” Ron was very broken. “What do you think about it?”
 “It was here —.”
 Harry quickly backed after the ship.
 Crookshanks and the jewels were upset. Harry went on to see the windows to see yet
In the middle of the luxury, but they weren’t there. Where is they come?
 A loud sigh told her that Ron had fallen asleep again.
 Harry and the rest of the Gryffindor team entered the Great Hall the next day for the Great banquet .
sound. Harry could not stop by a woman’s view as he thought both Ravenclaw both
Hoflyfffffffffffed stories also show them as well. Slitherin’s tablet helped strongly as they snapped.
Harry noticed that Malloy was smoking and smooth.
 Wood has all the evenings the evenings forces his team to eat, while he with his mother had nothing to stop anything. so
They passed through a fire before so enters, to have their doctors
conditions. As they left the Great Hall, everyone shook hands again.
 “Belt on you, A Hari!” Call Cho. Harry flt himself blushing.
 “Ah — no wind will be talking about it — the sun hurts a little bit, which can affect the views, keep off .
— A lot is very careful, is good, so he will give us a sharply —”
Page 221 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Woodod goes in the field, simultaneously in the middle of the turbine that behind her. Last, Walna’s doors in front
The monarchies are in the bridge and the other school is over the forests.
 “Locker rooms,” Wood quipped.
 None of them were the conversations when they change the right to the right. Emanis Harry asked if they feel
As: the likes of him something with the evening. In turn
The sight of all time, Wood was talking, “Aha, and Lauan, to go —”
 The waleked out on the feeld to a tidal was of noise. Three Glashes are Lsan
Large sands, slain stones were slained with Gryffindor lips on them, or the ears , slain , slain .
With conversations like “RUren to GRIFINDOUR!” And “IZEMREN for TAQBURT.” After
of the goal, however, two green persons are two; Slitherin's slots
They were hungry to their children, and Professor Sanape remains in the center of theatre, is songs such as
Each other, and the experience of the female with the importance.
 “And here are the Gryffindors!” For Lee Jordan, which represents the same like every time.
“Potter, Bell, Gonson, Spinnet, Uzli, Uzli, and Wud. Widely recognized as the best
Group Hogwarts saw in a few good years —.”
 Lee’s talks were guaranteed with a ”boos” from the middle of the Slayerin.
 “And here me the Slytherin team, ld by Captain Flint. It’s some changes in the screen
And it’s like the opposing the opposite of the belief in the sights of the knowledge —”
 More than the buckets from the Slitherin slave. However, Harry thinks Lee has pride. There was Malfoy.
ⵙ ⵍⴼⴻⵄⵍ ⴰⵎⴷⴰⵏ ⴰⵎⴻⵥⵢⴰⵏ Deg ⵜⴻⵔⴱⴰⵄⵜ ⵏ Slytherin; What else are great.
 “The captains, combined the hand!” Mrs. Huc said.
 Flint and Wood almost agreed, caught in the hands of the other with a lot; It looks like
Even though everyone was trying to break others’ legs.
 “You’re arrows!” You said Massa Hoc. “Three... twow.....
 The school market went at the Glasi at the home of the GLAchi when they retained ten feet in the sky.
Harriy felt the sandses out of the head; nervesis left in the body’s cemetery; he
It's closer to the date, Malfoy speak on the village of the village and failed to search for Snitch.
 “It’s Griffindor that’s on hand, Alicia Spinner of Griffindor with Quaffle, with head .
directly to the Slitherin goal legs, is very successful, Alicia! Argh, Ala — Quaffle was arrested by .
Warrington, the Warrington of Sleetrene and smells UP the field — Mam! - good work of Bluedger
There to George Wesley, Warrington and snapped Cofflif, and takes to — Johnson, Griffindor
Page 222 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Return back in the lunch, enter, Angelina — sliding on Mongag — Duke, Angelina,
This is a bludger! – SHE SCORES! You-zoro to Jerevendor!”
 Angelina approachs hurting when you end up on the end of the field; The vegetables below
He shouts his joy
 “AU!”
 Angels is almost locked from the ear as the Marcus Flint went to affecting.
 "Sorry!" said Flint as the crowd booed. “Sorry, didn’t see her!”
 Some time later, Fred Weasley put Beater’s sight in the middle of Flint. Flint Index
He was snapped in the hand of his brush and he starts to break the blood.
 “That’s what to do!” Shriked Madam Hoch, is similar between now. “Pittiti took to Griffindor for the
An unprecedented attack on their loser! Penalty shot to Slytherin for deliberate damage to their
Chase!”
 “Get out of it, miss!” Fred introduced, but Madame Hutch left him her explanation and Alicia left in front of the
He'll get the punishment.
 “ⴰⵙⴷ, ⴰ Alisiya!” ” Isturning Lee in the story of the crash. "Yes! She's
ⴱⵟⵟⵓ ⵏ ⴽⵉⵢⴱⵔ! TWENTY-ZERO TO GRYFINDOR!”
 Harry gently took Firbout to look at Flint, bleeding freely, stepping forward to take
ⴰⵔⵔⴰⵣ ⵏ ⵙⵍⵉⵜⵔⵉⵏ. Wood was hovering in front of the Gryffindor goalposts, jaw clenched.
 “'Turbidt, wood is a great one!” Lee Jordan told the crowd as Flint waited for Madam
Hooch Box. “Superb! Very difficult to pass — very difficult indeed — YES! I don't
Got it! NTTAT ISSELLEKIT!”
 He leaves, Harry moves away, turning back to Snitch, but Sol still thinks he's holding
Every word of Li's novel. It was enough to keep Malfoy from the Snitch until
Gryffindor had more than fifty points —
 “The existing law, don’t, slide into the woods — don’t! Gryffindor to Dungeon and
He’s Katie Bell, Katie Bell for Gryffindor with Koufliff, and she’s tearing up the field — THAT
IT WAS DESTROYED!”
ⴰⵙⴻⴱⵜⴻⵔ 223 ⵙⴻⴳ 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Montag, a Czar of Slytherin, appears before Kathy, and at the entrance to Quaffle .
He holds it in his lap. Katie cart-wheeled in the air, managed to stay on her broom, but dropped
Kufll.
 Madame Hutch's novel is repeated once again when she runs to Montag and begins to talk about
he. After a minute, Katy put another point past Slytherin Sugar.
 “DIRTY-ZERO! TAKE, YOU DIRTY, CHEATING —.”
 “Jordan, if you can’t speak in a non-climatic way —.”
 “I mean it like him, Master!”
 Harry felt a huge sigh of relief. He saw Snitch — twisting and turning on the leg of
One of Gryffindor's letters — but he doesn't have to hold it yet — and as Malfoy sees it —
 A photographer is running at a neat pace, Harry takes out his firebolt and goes out towards the
Slytherin end — it worked. Malfoy came far behind him, noticing that Harry had seen
ⵙⵏⵉⵜⵛ ⴷⵉⵏⵏⴰ...
 WUS.
 One of the Bludgers came crashing down on Harry's right ear, being held by the larger Slytherin Beater,
Your duty. Then again…
 WUS.
 Bloodger II filled the Harry head. The other beater, Bole, was approaching.
 Harry had a vision of Bole and Derrick looking up at him, the walls lifted — He turned .
of Firebolt up at the last second, and Bole and Derrick collided with a deafening crash.
 “Ha haa!” shouted Lee Jordan as the slytherins snapped at each other, tearing up .
ⵉⵇⴻⵔⵔⴰⵏⵙⴻⵏ. “Very good, boys! You'll need to get up earlier than that to beat the Firebolt! and d
Gryffindor in hand once more, as Johnson wields the Quaffle — Flint at his side — attacking him .
ⴷⴻⴳ ⵡⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏ, ⴰ Anjilina! 'It's a shame, Professor, it's a shame — oh no — Flint in hand, .
Flint flies to the feet of the Gryffindor goal, come now, Wood, save the —!”
 But Flint had scored; There was an outpouring of praise from the Slytherin end, and Lee tried so
It was bad enough that Professor McGonagall tried to swing that magic megaphone at him.
Page 224 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Surf, Master, surf! It won't happen again! So, Gryffindor in first place, thirty points to ten, and
Gryffindor in his hand—”
 It was turning into the worst game Harry had ever played.
such a first, the Slytherin were desperately looking for any means to capture the Quaffle. Value
He hits Alicia with his fist and swears he thought she was Bludger. George Weasley
elbowed Bole in the face with a punch. Madam Hooch awarded penalties to both teams, and Wood
they pulled off another successful save, bringing the score to fourteen and forty for Gryffindor.
 The snitch disappeared again. Malfoy was still close to Harry when he suddenly appeared on
Match, staring at him once Gryffindor was fifty points ahead of him —
 Katie scored. Fifty-ten. Fred and George Weasley had been searching for it, walls rising, in
Case everyone from Slytherin was plotting revenge. Bole and Derrick completed Fred's
and George’s plot to drive the two Bludgers to Wood; They caught him in the stomach, one after
Another, and he plunged into the air, clutching at his waist, completely engulfed in smoke.
 Madam Hooch was beside herself —
 “NEVER PASS THE KEEPER UNLESS THE QUAFFLE IS INSIDE THE
THE SPEAKING DEPARTMENT!” She screamed at Bole and Derrick. “Gryffindor punishment!”
 And Angelina scored. Sixty-ten. Moments later Fred Wesley dropped a Bludger in Warrington,
snatching the Quaffle from his hands; Alicia grabbed it and threw it at the Slytherin’s target —
Seventy-ten.
 The Gryffindor crowd below was literally cheering itself on — Gryffindor was six rows in .
Lead, and if Harry catches the Snitch now, the Cup is theirs. Harry could almost feel hundreds.
of eyes following him as he flew around the field, far beyond the rest of the game, with
Malfoy hurried after him.
 And then he saw it. Snitch is getting worse and worse.
 Harry unleashed a huge burst of speed; A chill ran through his ears. He stretched out his hand.
But suddenly, Firebolt was curious —
 He dreams, he sees. Malfoy leaned forward and grabbed Firebolt's hand
The symbol, running backwards.
 "you -"
Page 225 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry begs a lot to get Malfoy, but he can't — Malfoy is too busy
of holding in the Firebolt, but his eyes glittered with evil. Ilkm what he did
He wants to be — Snitch is out again.
 “Penalties! Penalty to Gryffindor! I've never seen such thoughts.” Madam Hooch screeched,
He returns to the place where Malfoy was transferred to the Nimbus Ta Thusand and One.
 “YOU’RE CHEATING SCUM!” Lee Jordan screams into the microphone, shooting from
Professor McGonagall. “YOU FILTHY, CHHEATING B —.”
 Professor McGonagall didn't even come out to tell her. It really slips his hand at
Malfoy's direction, her top dropped, even she was crying out in pleasure.
 ⴰⵍⵉⵛⵉⴰ ⵜⴻⵟⵟⴻⴼ ⵍⵃⴻⴱⵙ ⵏ Gryffindor, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵜⴻⴼⵇⴻⴷ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⴰⵔⵎⵉ ⵜⴻⵅⵚⴻⵔ ⵙ ⵡⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⵏ ⵢⵉⴹⴰⵔⵔⴻⵏ. the
The Gryffindor team was shocked and the Slytherins, rejoicing in Malfoy's absence in
Harry, they're looking for big changes.
 “Sixteen in Unmilla, Slytherin is going through something — Montague levels —” Lee Gwan said.
“7 twelve to Gryffindor…”
 Harry was now marking Malfoy so closely their knees kept hitting each other. Harry is not
ⴷⴷⵓ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴰⵊⵊ ⵎⴰⵍⴼⵓⵢ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵡⴰⵏⵙⴰ ⵜⴰⵎⴰ ⵏ ⵙⵏⵉⵜⵛ...
 “But it, Butter!” Malfoy sighed in annoyance as he was about to answer when he found Harry standing.
he.
 “Angelina Johnson brought the Quaffle for Gryffindor, come on, Angelina, COME!”
 Harry looked to his side. Every Slytherin player except Malfoy draws
With Angelina’s attention, including the warden of Slytherin — they were all going to stop her — Harry .
He saw the river Firebolt, rolling and rolling at arm's length, and prayed for it.
forward. As a group, it serves as a protection for the kingdom.
 “Aaaaaarrrgh!”
 They were given to the origin for Firebolt to them; Angelna’s way is clear.
 “SHE’S LIEING! YOU SUCKED! ⴳⵔⵉⴼⵉⵏⴷⵓⵔ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⴰⵡⵙ ⵙ ⵎⵔⴰⵡ ⴷ ⵎⵔⴰⵡ ⵏ ⵜⵏⵇⵇⴰⴹ ⴰⵔ ⵙⵉⵏ ⵎⵔⴰⵡ!”
 Harry, who almost stood on a stick in the streets, stood on a stick in the street, returning, and
Returning to the middle of the field.
Page 226 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 And he added something that will help the book to stand. Malfoy was smiling, a picture of triumph.
On his face — there, a few feet above the cliff below, was a small, golden — .
 Harry pushed the Firebolt down, but Malfoy was miles ahead of him —
 "Reah! Roh! Roh!" Harry surrounds the ear. He was gaining on Malfoy — Harry flattened himself to
The brurow spoil like Paul sent the Bloodger on it — he was in Maloy's trees — he was the slot —
 Harry leaned forward and removed both hands from his waist. ⵢⴰⵀⵔⴰ ⴰⴼⵓⵙ ⵏ ⵎⴰⵍⴼⵓⵢ ⵙ ⵓⴼⵓⵙ ⵏ
The way is —
 "Yes!"
 He climbed out of his window, fist in the air, and the system exploded. ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⴼⴼⴻⵖⴷ ⵏⵏⵉⴳ ⵏ
the crowd, an odd ringing in his ears. The singer of the gold basket was supposed to be grace in the sand, singing the fragrance
By terrifying against the past.
 Then Wood was rushing towards him, half blind with tears; Hari took in the sandwiches.
And he knew not to stop in the foot. Harry felt two huge tingles as he hit Fred and George
them; ⵙⵢⵉⵏ ⵙ ⵚⵚⵓⵜ ⵏ Angelina, ⵏ Alicia, ⵏ Katie, “Nerbeḥ Taqbuct! We’re achieving Taaqbuck!”
Engulfed in a multi-force embrace, the Gryffindor team collapsed, groaning hysterically, back to the ground.
 Family after family of blue-collar fighters was pouring over the hurdles on the field. There are hands
The snow falling on their feet. Harry had the distinct feeling of noise and bodies pressing against him
he. Then he, and the rest of the band, were carried on the backs of the crowd. push to
Light, he saw hagrid, swathed in red circles — “Yeh beat them, Harry, yeh beat them!
Wait until I tell Buckbeak!”
 There was Percy, jumping up and down like a madman, completely oblivious to modesty. teacher
McGonagall was even more stunned than Wood, rolling her eyes with an elderly Gryffindor .
flag; And there, fighting their way to Harry, were Ron and Hermione. Words are not enough.
They were just clearing out when Harry was led into the hallway, where Dumbledore stood waiting .
with the famous Quidditch Cup.
 If only there was a Dementor around… As Wood ran past Harry shaking the Cup, as it was .
Raising it in the air, Harry felt he could cast the best Patronus in the world.


Page 227 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Chapter Sixteen
Speech by Professor Trelawny
 Harry's bliss at having finally won the Quidditch Cup lasted for at least a week. Even the weather
It sounds like a celebration; As June approached, the days became cloudless and fogless, and all
Everyone felt that would do, crawling across the floor and rolling around on the grass with
Several smoking hot pink teapots, maybe playing a game of Gobstones or watching
The giant squid pushes itself dreamily across the ocean floor.
 But they can’t. Exams are right around the corner, and instead of hanging outside,
Students are forced to stay inside the castle, trying to rack their brains to focus
while gusts of summer air drifted through the windows. Even Fred and George
Weasley had been seen working; They were about to get their OWL (special wizard
levels). Percy was getting ready to take his NEWT (New Engineering Engineering Tests),
the highest standard Hogwarts had ever offered. As Percy hoped to join the Ministry of Magic, he
they need high levels of satisfaction. He was growing bitter, and giving very severe punishment to
Anyone who disturbed the silence of the common room in the morning. In fact, the same person
Seemingly more concerned than Percy was Hermione.
 Harry and Ron stopped to ask her how she managed to attend so many classes at once,
But they couldn’t stop themselves when they saw the exam schedule she had created
Himself. The first function reads:
Monday
 9 hours, Arithmancy
 9 pm, Transfiguration
 lunch
 1 hour, Charms
 1 oclock, Ancient Rones
 “Hermione?” Ron said cautiously, because she was liable to explode when they were interrupting these
days. “Or — are you sure you’re doing this right?”
 "what?" Hermione stood up, set the test level and inspected it. “Yes, of course I
have."
Page 228 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Is there any point wondering how you can sit two exams at the same time?” Harry said.
 “No,” Hermione said flatly. “Give one of you my numerology calculator and
grammar?”
 “Oh, yeah, I borrowed it for a bit of sleep reading,” Ron said, but casually. Hermione
It began to change on the roads of the bar. Harry, Ron, and Hermione have plenty of chances to
Call to Hagarde.
 “Beaky’s getting a little bored,” Hagrid told them, jumping back on the idea of ​​checking this .
Harry's curse was still alive. “They were very cooped up. But still… we’ll know the day after
Tomorrow — one way or another —”
 They had Potions that evening, which was incredible. Try as Harry might, he
Unable to take his Confusing Concoction to cool off, it was Snape, who stood watching with an air of
guilty pleasure, he wrote something that looks suspiciously like a zero in his comments
Before passing.
 Then came Astronomy at midnight, up in the great tower; Magic History Tuesday
The morning, in which Harry recalled everything that Florean Fortescue had told him .
of medieval romance, while wishing for one of Fortescue’s chocolate drinks
with them in the break room. Wednesday afternoons mean Herbology, in greenhouses
Under the hot sun; Then he went back to the common room again, with sunny hair, thinking
With the longing for this time someday, when it’s all over.
 Their second-to-last test, on Thursday afternoon, was for the Dark Arts Defense. teacher
Lupine summed up the most unusual test either of them had ever received; A type of Angas route
Out in the sun, where they have to walk across an empty road field that Grindlow is in,
They went through a whole bunch of bombs in the Red Cabs, working their way onto a meaningless split during the
Ignoring advice from a Hinkypunk, then climbing into an old boat and fighting a
The new buggert.
 “Good, Harry,” Lupine grinned as Harry stepped out of the car, smiling. “Perfect memories.”
 Relieved with his success, Harry kept staring at Ron and Hermione. Run works fine.
Until he reached Hinkypunk, who successfully tricked him into falling backwards into
The envelope. Hermione thought of everything differently until she got on board with Boggart in
it. After about a minute inside her, she emerged again, purring.
 “Hermione!” Lupine said, confused. “What’s wrong?”
Page 229 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “PPP Master McGunagall!” Hermione sighed, staring at the labyrinth. “Sh said I didn’t
everything!"
 It took a while for Hermione to calm down. When she regained her composure,
She, Harry, and Ron returned to the castle. Ron was still a bit reluctant to laugh at the
Hermione's boggart, but a conflict is averted by the scene that meets them at the top of the
steps.
 Cornelius Fudge, sweating slightly in his sweatpants, was standing there looking out at the
foundation. It starts with Harry’s reaction.
 “The heart there, A Hari!” he said. “Just had a test, I expect? ⵇⵔⵉⴱ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴽⴻⵎⵎⴻⵍ?”
 “Yeah,” Harry said. Hermione and Ron, who are not in agreement with the Minister of Magic,
quivered gently in the background.
 “Lookday,” Fodge said, and he snapped the German on the middle of the sea. “They say... are they…”.
 He nodded in agreement and looked at Harry.
 “I’m here in a mission we don’t like, A Hari. The Empire of the tree of problems
People need the witness on the killing of a lack of Hippogriff. As I should see Hogarts
To see the Yiberkenen situation, I have asked me to participate in it.”
 “Does that mean the trial has already taken place?” Ron interrupted and stepped forward.
 "No, no, it's scheduled this evening," Fudge said, looking at Ron quizzically.
 “Well, maybe you don’t have to see the court at all!” Ron said seriously. “The Hippogriff
It can come out!”
 Before Fudge could answer, two scouts came through the castle doors behind him. one
The old seemed to dissolve before their eyes; The other is long and curved, with
The bowl of the Jew. ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⵊⵎⴻⵄⴷ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴷ ⵉⴳⴻⵏⵙⴰⵙⴻⵏ ⵏ Usqamu ⵉ
Revealing the weaklings, because the very old wizard glared at Hagrid's company
He added to the woman: “Hibi, A Habib, I were registered on this.... Sat .
Fudge?”
 The man with the black beer was surrounded by some at the cemetery; ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵉⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍ ⵓ ⵉⵡⴰⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ
A great foot on the back of the ear is skirts. Ruddan runs the mother to say
Something, but Hermione kicked him hard in the hair and poked his head towards the door
hall.
Chapter 230 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “They’re abandoned me?” Ron said joy when they entered the big room for the evening. “You see
them? They even prepare potatoes! It is worthy of you!”
 “Ron, your dad works in the ministry, you can’t go and say that to his boss!” said
Hermione, but even you seem a lot like. “As long as Hagrid got his ass this time, and .
He handles his case well, they can’t raise Buckbeak…”
 But Harry can come to say Hermée don’t really believe in what she said. all
Individuals were joyful when they eat their clients, waiting for the end of the tests.
That evening, but Harry, Run, and Hermione, having lost interest in Hagrid and Buckbeak, failed to
participate.
 Harry and Ron's final exam was Divination; Hermione, Muggle Studies. They went over the
Marmar Suk.; Heremion left in the first occupation, Harry and Ron continues all
Street to Seventh, where many of their classmates sat on the broomstick to the
The Professure Trelawney, is difficult to stop a little more of the final season.
 "She treats us all separately," Neville told them as they went to sit next to him. he
He had his copy of Unfogging the Future open on his lap at the pages devoted to crystal gazing.
“Did any of you see anything in a crystal ball?” he asked them excitedly.
 “Olash,” Ron was added to a woman’s style. He kept checking his watch; Harry knew he was
Lawan’s even felt that the Buckbeak trial started.
 The line of people outside the classroom quickly shrunk. As each person turned back
Under the silver screen, the rest of the class murmured, “What did she ask? ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵍⵃⴰⵍ?”
 But they refused to say all.
 “She said that the crystal ball told her that if I tell you, I’ll have a terrible accident!” He yelled.
Neville as he walked down the stairs alongside Harry and Ron, who had now arrived at the
The fall.
 “That’s fair enough,” Ron chuckled. “You know, I’m starting to think that Hermione was right about
Her”—he jerked his thumb toward the trapdoor opposite—“is a damned old body.”
 “Yeah,” Harry said, glancing at his watch. It was now two in the afternoon. “I wish it would please…”
 Parvati returned from the serpent is hiding with happiness.
 "She said I had all the makings of a real musician," she told Harry and Ron. “I’ve seen a lot of
things… Well, okay!”
Page 231 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 She stormed down the spiral stairs towards Lavender.
 "Ronald Weasley," said the familiar, shrill voice from above their heads. Good run to Harry
And he went up on the silver screen unexpectedly. Harry was now the only one left to be tested. he
He sat on the floor with his back to the wall and listened to an insect basking in the sun
Window, his mind on the floor with Hagrid.
 Finally, after about twenty minutes, Ron's big feet were back on the deck.
 “How did it go?” Harry asked, standing up.
 “That’s what we don’t know,” Ron said. “I couldn’t see anything, so I sneaked a few steps. Don’t think there’s
Convinced, though…”
 “I’ll meet you in the common room,” Harry said mimicking Professor Trelawney’s voice, “Harry .
plate!"
 The tower room is warmer than usual; The doors are locked, the fire is lit and
The constant smell of sickness made Harry sniffle as he drifted through the tangle of chairs and tables to
where Professor Trelawney sat waiting for him in front of a giant crystal ball.
 “Be good day, Ohbio,” she said quickly. “If you’re going to come into Orb… follow your time, .
Now… then tell me what you see inside it…”
 Harry bent over the crystal ball and squinted, blinking as much as he could, wanting her to show him .
Anything but white mist swirled, but nothing happened.
 "Well?" Professor Trelawney said sympathetically. “What do you think?”
 The heat was overwhelming her and her nostrils burned with colored smoke rising from the
The fire beside them. He thought about what Ron had just said and decided to do himself.
 “Er —” Harry said, “the dark form… um…”
 “What do you think?” Professor Trelawney exclaimed. “Think, now…”
 Harry made the Balalis with his view and fell on Buckbeak.
 "It's the Hippogriff," he insisted.
Page 232 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "She is good!" » teacher Trewniy, Trewniy, it is very difficult for the remainder of the library .
feet. “My son, perhaps the harvest of Hagrid’s problem and the ministry .
of the Sahour! Muqel by free... Mamp Hippogriff was clear that... he has a question?”
 “Yes,” Harry said with strong.
 “Are you sure?” He threatened the teacher Trelawney. “Do you’re right, Ahbib? You don't see
Do you go into the ground, perhaps, a middle face for Deader behind potatoes?”
 "No!" Harry said, he started to feel a little bit.
 “No blood? No crying Hagrid?”
 "No!" Harry said again, he wants more than a long time to leave the room and halal. “It’s Benband it’s good,
And — it’s easy….”
 Professor Trelawney is aware of.
 “How, Ahpb, I think they would leave there... A little bit of acquisitions... but I think you're a thing .
best."
 For good, Harry, greeted the cart to go, but sought a story, they have been told, in .
After him.
 “AD YE ḍ Iḍe.”
 Harry visited. Professure Trelawney has been living in the car; eyes are
It doesn’t care and his mouth feels.
 “S — excuse me?” Harry said.
 But the teacher Trelawney Amzaonnors did not. The singer started to dig. Harry sat there in a
panic. The likelihood is almost up to a ear. He remembers, thinks about
The room to Spitar’s body — both the Professor Trewney, so it’s the thing of the thing .
Telement, not food like the ones:
 “SIDI TAMNAWT YEZZIḤy WAḤDES UR YESSAWs ARA IMEDDUKAL, ḤEDREN-T SGUR WAḍiI uABREN.
AMSEQDAIS YETTWAQBEL with SNSELLA ḤRAC N ISEGGASENA. Last, QBEL
MIDNIGHT... AD YERRES UMSEQDAC AD YEFFGEḍḍe and YETTWAQAL in SIDIS.
SIDI TADI TADILNAWT AD DIKKER TIKKEreḍḍen S LEENW of UMSEQDAIS, MEQREN AKKEN
TERRIBLE AKKEN YELLA. NIGHT... BEFORE MIDNIGHT... SERVICE...
AD YEFFGE and... AKKENI AD YEKKEL… ER MASSIS...”
Chapter 233 out of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 The Professure Trewneyy railways back in front of the grasses. The trees of sights. Harry
They sat there and stared at her. Sin, in one time, Professure Trelawney's head backed up.
 “I am very pleased, my son my son”, added by Tariot, “Bayer of day, seen... I am pleased with a
moment…"
 Harry stayed there, and he’s simultaneously.
 “There’s something good, Idebio?”
 “You’re — you just said — Temmast’s Mass will come… that the story .
I’ll get it back to him.”
 Professor Trelawneyy commissioner with good.
 “The Holy Lord? H-ho-mos-nut-b-Nams? My dear boy, that's Hardly something to juck
On… Kkerd again, really —”
 “But you just say it! You told the Lord Odrk —”
 “I think you must have dozed off too, dear!” said Professor Trelawney. " I can't.
You need to come in something that we don’t have to have such that!”
 Harry walked back down the stairs and into the ring, wondering… if he'd just heard
Professor Trelawney made a real proposal? Or is this his perfect ending idea of
test?
 Five minutes later, he was speeding past the security trolls outside the entrance to Gryffindor .
Tower, Professor Trelawney's words still echoing in his head. People were walking past him.
On the flip side, laughter and humor, staring at the ground and a bit of long-awaited
independent; By the time he reached the window above and entered the common room, he was
almost deserted. However, in the shadows, sat Ron and Hermione.
 "Professor Trelawney," Harry snapped, "He just told me—"
 But he stopped abruptly when he saw their faces.
 “Buckbeak got lost,” Ron said sadly. “Hagrid just sent this.”
 Hagrid's letter was dry this time, no tears stained it, but his hand seemed to care so
Much as it is written that it is hardly readable.
Page 234 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Highly recommended. They're going to execute at sunset. There is nothing you can do. Don't run. I don't
I want you to see it.
 Hagrid
 “We’ve got to go,” Harry said at once. “He can’t just sit there by himself and wait for the trial of
Guard!”
 “But, the sunset,” said Ron, who was looking out the window sort of grimly. "we
They never… 'Seriously, Harry…”
 Harry put his head in his hands, thinking.
 “If we only had the cover of invisibility…”
 “Where is he?” Hermione said.
 Harry told her how he left her on the street under the One-Eyed Doll.
 "... If Snape sees me anywhere near there, I'm in big trouble," he finished.
 "Of course," Hermione said, getting to her feet. “If he’s watching you… how did you break into the car
hump again?”
 "You—you stopped him and said, 'Dissendium,'" Harry said. "but -"
 Hermione didn't want her twist to stay; she strode across the room, pushing open the Fat
Lady’s image and disappeared from sight.
 “She didn’t go get him?” Ron said, looking behind her.
 She had. Hermione returned four hours later with a firmly selected silver lining
Under his hood.
 “Hermione, I don’t know what’s gotten, into you lately!” Ron said, surprised. “First take
Malfoy, then take off on Professor Lilou —.”
 Hermione was getting worse and worse.
 They went down to have dinner with everyone else, but they never came back to Gryffindor Tower .
After him. Harry had the cloak hidden down the front of his robes; he had to keep his arms folded
to hide the circle. Skulken in an empty room off the entrance hall, they listened, until
Page 235 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
reported that it was closed. They hear a final group of people running around the hall and a door.
It's getting closer. Hermione poked her head through the door.
 “Well,” she whispered, “there’s no one there—his clothes—”
 They got too close so no one could see them, they crossed the hall hand in hand.
down the stairs, then went through the stone front stairs to the ground. The sun was already
The degradation behind the Forbesden Forest, removes the first elements of the sculptures.
 They reached Hagrid's hut and disappeared. He was a minute late, and when he was, he
He looked all around him, face pale and trembling.
 “That’s us,” Harry corrected. “We are using the Infistip clock. Let us destroy it, and we can destroy it.”
 “Yes he must come!” Hagrid sighed, but stood back, and they finished. Hagrid
Shut the door behind him and Harry released the knob.
 Hagrid didn't cry, nor did he throw himself on their necks. He looked like a man who did
I don't know where he'll do it or how he'll do it. This system is often used to see more tears.
 “Wakan' some tea?” he said. His great hands were shaking as he reached for the kettle.
 “Where’s Buckbeak, Hagrid?” Hermione said wisely.
 “I — I threw him out,” Hagrid said, spilling milk all over the table as he filled the glass.
“He was walking into me in the pickup truck. He thought he must see the stars a' — a clean climate
- before -"
 Hagrid’s hand trembles so violently that the milk pot shoots out of his hand and burns the whole
xf land.
 “I’ll do it, Hagrid,” Hermione said in a quick way, and he asks for the cleaning of the pain.
“There’s another one on the cob,” Hagrid said, sitting up and asking himself about himself.
sleeve. Harry stood over Ron, who stood hopelessly still.
 "Is there nothing that can do anything, Hagrid?" Harry asked in a happy manner, sitting next to her.
“Drum —”
 "It's rewarding," Hagrid said. “He's got no power ter overrule the Committee. He told them
Buckbeak was fine, but they were scared… Yeh you know how… worried Lucius Malfoy was
'em, I expect... an' the guard, Macnair, is an old pal of Malfoy's... but he'll be soon an'.
Pure… I'll stay by his side….”
Page 236 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Hagrid's Invasion. Her eyes moved all over the capsule as if looking for some sort of
hope or despair.
 “Return Dumbledur when she is—when ready. Write about it mornin ad'. Said he
He wanted to be — he wanted to be with me. Old man, Dumbledore….”
 Hermione, who appears in Hagrid's sand for another sand, smoke,
S tfssi to return ssub. She started with a new book in her hands and looked at the texts.
 “We’ll stay with you too, Hagrid,” she began, but Hagrid made a shag head at her.
 “Yeh’re ter go back up ter the castle. I toold yh, I Don' was' yh watchin'. It shouldn’t be
Down here... If Fudge catches a Dumbledore attacking without Assure, Harry, Han will
You’re in big trouble.”
 Silent tears were streaming down Hermione's face now, but she hid them from Hagrid, sighing .
in the tea-making district. Sein, when you’re looking for a pharmacist’s story to find something in the past, a
Scream.
 “Ron, I don’t believe it — it’s Skabbers!”
 Ron grinned at her.
 “What are you talking about?”
 Hermione got a bottle of head to the tablet, and she got back to a slide. With a congratulatory question,
And much scrambling to get back inside, Scabbers the mouse lunged out onto the table.
 “Scabbins!” Ron said with a grin. “Scabbers, what are you doing here?”
 He took the terrains, caught to the light. Subsipping mortgage. was
They’re more likely to be more than ever, the giant smells have left the greatest sights of the ear education and fell in the
Ron's hands seemed desperate to free themselves.
 “It’s okay, Scabers!” Run said. “There’s nothing old! There’s nothing here to hurt you!”
 Hagrid suddenly stood up, his eyes fixed on the window. His green face mostly gone
the color of the paper.
 “They’re coming…”
Page 237 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry, Ron, and Hermione nodded. A group of men are walking through a remote village.
The steps. In front of Albus Dumbledore, his silver hand glistened in the sun. beside
said Cornelius Fudge. Following the former Usqam guilt and
Guard, McNair.
 “Yeh we should get going,” Hagrid said. Every inch of him was getting weaker. “They shouldn’t find you here… Go away
now…"
 Ron stuffed Scabbers into his pocket, and Hermione picked up the lid. “I’m going to push you out of the way
The road,” Hagrid said.
 Access to the door to the behind-the-scenes. Harry is amused in a distant way, even more
So when Buckbeak saw a few yards away, he got stuck in a tree behind Hagrid's makeshift shelter.
Buckbeak seemed to notice something happening. He turned his hard head from side to side.
And he hit the ground in shock.
 “It’s okay, Beaky,” Hagrid said quietly. “It’s not what…” Yzezid to Hari, Ron and Hermione.
he said: “Kemmel.” “Goy.”
 But they didn’t move.
 “Hagred, we can —”
 “Let’s tell them what really happened —”
 “They can’t kill —”
 "go!" Hagrid said calmly. “That’s what Deiri Mela is a lot in the problems’ all'!”
 They don’t have a choice. As Hermione put the cloak over Harry and Ron, they heard voices in the
In front of the capsule. Hagrid looked at the spot where they had just disappeared from view.
 “Go for a walk,” he said in a pleasant manner. “You don’t hear…”
 And he’s headed to his cabinet when one is back in the front door.
 Indeed, in a tremendous kind of wind, Harry, Ron, and Hermione fell silent about Hagrid
house. When they reached the other side, the front gate was closed by a smaller key.
 “But, we’re going to beat for,” said Harmione with ear. “I can’t stand it, I can’t stand it…”
Page 238 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 They began to row towards the city. The sun shone, this day of covenant, this day of mourning, of compassion, of compassion, of compassion. heaven to him
It looked out onto a clear, light blue sky, but to the east there was a dark blue sky.
 Ron stopped dead.
 “Oh, please, Ron,” Hermione began.
 “It’s Scabbers — he can’t — stay put —”
 Ron was screaming, trying to keep Scabbers in his pocket, but the beast kept bouncing around;
He snarls furiously, twisting and screaming, trying to sink his teeth into Ron's arm.
 "Scabbers, it's me, you idiot, it's Ron," Ron growled.
 They heard a door open behind them and male voices.
 “Ron, please let’s move, they will!” Hermione's breath caught.
 “Okay— Scubbers, stay put—”
 They walked forward; Harry, like Hermione, was trying not to hear the echo of the voices
Behind them. Ron paused again.
 “I can’t stop it—Scabbers, shut up, everyone will hear us—”
 The mouse was squealing hard, but not hard enough to cover up the noise emanating from
Hagrid's garden. There was a sound of unknown male voices, silence, and then, nothing .
commands, the swish and unmistakeable thud of a bell.
 Hermione flinched at the spot.
 “They did!” she told Harry. “I’ll — I won’t believe it — they did!”


Page 239 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Chapter Seventeen
Cat, Mouse, and Dog

 Harry's head went gray with shock. The three stood stunned below
clothes of invisibility. The last rays of the setting sun were casting bloody light over
long shadow castle. Then, behind them, they heard a terrible crash.
 “Hagrid,” Harry said with a smile. Without thinking about what he was doing, he made to turn back, but .
Both Ron and Hermione held her arms.
 “We can’t,” said Ron, who was white as paper. “He would be in worse trouble if they knew we existed .
I’ll see…”
 Hermione's breathing was heavy and uneven.
 “How — can — they make it up?” rejoice. “How could they?”
 “Come on,” Ron said, his teeth seemingly chattering.
 They make their way back to the castle, walking slowly to hide under the rubble.
The light was fading fast now.
 When they arrived to the soil, the stone remains to be like the ears to the island.
 “Schabpers, stay confident,” Ron said with the ears, and snapped the sand on the chest. The mouse was moving.
By hell. Ron came running over and tried to force Scabbers deeper into his pocket. “It is
ⵜⴰⵎⵙⴰⵍⵜ ⵢⵉⴷⴽ, ⴰⵖⴻⵔⴹⴰ ⴰⵄⴻⵇⵍⵉ? Stay tuned — OUCH! He ate me!”
 “Ron, shut up!” Hermione smiled softly. “Fudge will be out here in a minute —”
 “Can’t — stay — put —”
 Scabbers looked frightened. He was moving with all his might, trying to get away from Ron's
grip.
 “What happened to him?”
Page 240 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 But Harry just saw — he was staggering towards them, his body slumped to the ground, his eyes a stark blue .
They shimmered eerie in the dark—Crookshanks. Whether it can be seen or is surprising
With the time of Scabbers, Harry could not be able to learn.
 “ⵉⵖⴻⵔⵙⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵜⴽⴻⵔⴽⴰⵙ!” ⵜⴻⵛⴹⴻⵃ Hermiyun. « ⴰⵍⴰ, ⵕⵓⵃ, ⴰ Kruksanks ! go away!"
 ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⴰⵎⵛⵉⵛⵏⵏⵉ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵇⴻⵔⵔⵉⴱ —
 “Scabbars — NO!”
 A lot of time — the school passed between Ron’s legs for the horrors, fell in the ground, and smoothly ended .
away. In a flash Crookshanks took off after him, and before Harry or Hermione could stop him
For her, Ron puts on selfless self-determination, and snapped in Tatla.
 “Run!” Hermione chuckled.
 She and Harry are simultaneously, then then followed with accuracy; ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵣⵎⵉⵔ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⴼⴼⴻⵖ ⵙ ⵍⴻⴽⵎⴰⵍⵉⵙ.
Under the hood; Remove and ended after them as a bank when they searched
ⵔⵓⵏ; They heard for the feet approaches and readers at Crookshanks.
 “Away from it—away from it—Scabbers, come here—”
 ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵍⵃⴻⵙⵙ ⴷ ⴰⵎⴻⵇⵇⵔⴰⵏ.
 "quite! Get off, you stinking cat —”
 ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⴷ ⵀⵉⵔⵎⵉⵓⵏ ⵇⵔⵉⴱ ⵖⵍⵉⵏ ⵅⴼ ⵔⵓⵏ; They went to a stop in front. was
laid on the ground, but Scabbers was back in his pack; He had two arms and was smoothly.
ⵍⵃⴻⵎⵍⴰⵏⵏⵉ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵔⴻⴳⴳⵉⵣⴻⵏ.
 “Ron — reconnected under the midfield —” Hermione reportedly said. « ⴷⵓⵎⴱⵍⴷⵓⵔ — ⴷ ⴰⵏⴻⵖⵍⴰⴼ — .
ⴰⴷ ⴷⵓⵖⴰⵍⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⴷⴼⴼⵖⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⴻⴷⵇⵉⵇⵜ —”
 ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵓⵇⴱⴻⵍ ⴰⴷ ⵔⵏⵓⵏ ⴰⴷ ⴹⴻⵍⵎⴻⵏ ⵉⵎⴰⵏⵏⵙⴻⵏ, ⵓⵇⴱⴻⵍ ⴰⴷ ⵟⵟⴼⴻⵏ ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵏⵏⴻⴼⵙⵏⵙⴻⵏ, ⵙⵙⴰⵡⴹⴻⵏ
I've heard of great legs... Kra was inflation, and used as
Tele — a great, with blue, a black like Jet.
 Harry reached for his tail, but it was too late — the dog made a huge yawn and forth .
his body struck him in the chest; ⵢⴻⴽⴻⵍⴻⴷ ⵖⴻⴼ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵙⵡⵉⵔ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵖⴻⵙ; ⵉⵃⵓⵍⴼⴰ ⵙ ⵏⵏⴻⴼⵙⵉⵙ ⵢⴻⵃⵎⴰⵏ, ⵉⵡⴰⵍⴰ
Incissia’s journalism in the length —
Page 241 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 But the power of the ears has achieved the same; She fell on him. Dazed, he feels like the likes of horses.
They were broken, and Harry tried to stand; It can be heard when he slipped on a new
attack.
 Ron ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵢⵉⴹⴰⵔⵔⴻⵏⵉⵙ. As the dog turned towards them he pushed Harry aside; treasures
She’s instead of the place about the Ron’s hand. Harry outwards, holding hand from
a brute dance, but it was pulling Ron along like a rag doll—
 ⵙⵢⵉⵏ, ⵙⴻⴳ ⵓⵍⴰⵛ, ⴽⵔⴰ ⵢⴻⵖⵍⵉⴷ ⵖⴻⴼ Harry ⵙ ⵍⴵⴻⵀⴷ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵡⵓⴷⴻⵎⵉⵙ ⴰⵔⵎⵉ ⵢⴻⵖⵍⵉⴷ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⴹⴰⵔⵔⴻⵏⵉⵙ .
again. He heard Hermione squeal in pain and collapsed as well.
 Harrey holds Taquake, greeting blood from the Spanish.
 “Thelos”. Iwessus.
 The dim light showed him the trunk of the mulberry tree; ⴹⴻⴼⵔⴻⵏⴷ Skabbers ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⵉⵍⵉ ⵏ
The Whomping Willow and its branches were as painful as in high winds, breaking
ⵙⴷⴰⵜ ⴷ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵏⵃⴻⴱⵙⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵇⵔⵉⴱⴻⵏ.
 And there, at the time of the car, there was a hole, rubbing Ron back in a large jail in
ⵉⵥⵓⵔⴰⵏ — Ron ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵏⴰⵖ ⵙ ⵍⴼⴻⵔⵃ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⴰⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢⵉⵙ ⴷ ⵜⴼⴻⴽⴽⴰⵙ ⵜⵜⴼⴻⴳⴳⵉⴹⴻⵏ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵡⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏ —
 “Run!” Harry shouted, trying to follow, but a dark shadow shot deadly into the air and
He was forced to turn back.
 All they could see now was one of Ron's legs, which he had bent over a root trying to .
Stop Jenny stopped not to go underground — but one of the clothes had dismissed the hat.
Shooting; Ron's lunch, for some time, the text went out of Wallen.
 “Harry — we have to go help —” Hermione whispered; She too was bleeding; Willow has
Cut it across.
 "Now! The thing is hard to eat; we don't have time —"
 “Harry — we’re not likely to get through without help —”
 Another friggle fell on them, the fruits are similar to the body.
 “If the dog can get in, we can,” Harry whispered, pacing here and there, trying to find a way .
with loose, spinning leaves, but can’t get even an inch closer to the tree’s roots
Rather, he was in the middle of the tree trunks.
Page 242 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Ah, Iden, Iden,” Hermione said with happiness, you are illegal in place, “Fa..”
 Croxhanx went before. Lives among the officers taken like the ceremony and put
Its front paws on a groove on the body.
 Suddenly, it was as if the cloud had turned to marble and stopped moving. None isolated or
He cared.
 “Crookshanks!” Hermione smiled helplessly. She now gripped Harry's arm painfully.
“How does he know —?”
 “They’re friends with that dog,” Harry growled. “I saw them all. Come on — and keep going
Your babies are gone—”
 They made it to the car within seconds, but before they reached the exit in the
The roots, Crookshanks was crossed with a sandwiches of the pizza ear. Harry joined him before it; he
it lurched forward, upside down, and tumbled down a dirt slope to the bottom of a very deep tunnel.
Crookshanks was a little on the way, Allenes you’ve been hiding in the light of the Harrry’s ears. seconds
Later, Hermione appeared at his side.
 “Where’s Run?” She said with the pleasure of slavery.
 “Kennary,” said Harry, out, quickly, after Crookshanks.
 “Where did the ship out?” Hermione asked with ahead from her.
 “I don’t know… it’s marked on the Marauder’s Map but Fred and George said no one ever did .
Went into it… it’s off the edge of the map, but it looks like a path to
Hugsmid…”
 ⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⴻⵏ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵣⴻⵎⵔⴻⵏ, ⵜⵜⵇⴻⵔⵔⵉⴱⴻⵏ ⵇⵔⵉⴱ ⵙ ⵙⵏⴰⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⴰⵍ; Before them, Crookshanks’ voice snapped
And outside the view. On and on went the transition; She felt at least she was like that of
Honeydukes… All Harry and Ron could think of and what the big dog could do
He… He was breathing hard, hoarse breath, running with the car…
 And then they started growing and growing; Any slots changed, and Crookshanks went. ahead
Harry can see a sight of the praying of the pray from a small sand.
 He and Hermione have stops, rally, forward, forward, forward. They have built for their twoweight to learn.
Whatever is above.
Page 243 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 It is a house, a job well, and a revolution. Eagle was close to the ships; There are valleys.
All in the score; Each administrator was closed as the same as the one to it. the
The doors were all boarded up.
 Harry died to Hermionee, and you look a lot but mytorian live.
 Harry succeeded himself from the press, and was buried in him. She was room for a green, but the door to them
The Jews stands up and enters a midway. Hermione suddenly grabbed Harry's hand again.
Totals of greatness were living in the slice of the window.
 “Harry,” she said with the ear, “I’m going to be in the ears of the ears.”
 Harry looked to his side. Allensis fell on a tree of color in front of them. ⵉⵃⵔⵉⵛⴻⵏ ⵉⵎⴻⵇⵇⵔⴰⵏⴻⵏ ⵜⵜⵡⴰⴽⴽⵙⴻⵏ
in One of his legs was completely amputated.
 “They don’t do gardens like that,” he said quietly.
 At the time, you were ear on the head. Something was silent by the right. Two of them
The sum to the year. Hermion’s arrest in the Harry’s hand was so lucky that he didn’t feel in the phosphate.
Fingers. the sights; She replied the Quesi again, again, and discovered.
 In short as you can, they quickly went back to the room, they got a shipment to the walls. Everything was
They were occupied by a slot of the Jerusalem, where someone worked for a stroke of fire.
It was made up with the right.
 They reached the far end of the bridge.
 “Nox,” silently silent, and they left the lights in the end of their ears. Only one door
It was open. As they were taken to it, they heard the behavior from behind it; One film is a little, two and one
Now, with the goods. They agreed with the final perspective, with the last view.
 Wanda took carefully in front of him, Harry took the door with a palm.
 In a 4-foot scheme with the slope of the flag, there was Crookshanks, acutely conserved
their view. On the ground to the floor, he took the text, which was left in the rural, was
run.
 Harry and Hermione managed to get advertised.
 “Ron — are you so good?”
 “Where’s the dog?”
Chapter 244 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “It's good is Aydi,” said Ron with Lherrom. His journalist were taken with mirror. “Harry, and potato —”
 "what -"
 “That dog… is an Animagus.”
 Ron was simultaneously associating Harry. Harry visited. Pray, the man in
The shadows closed the door behind them.
 The Working Group, enacting, they have brought to the answers. If they don't leave the rest from the ground
ⵍⵇⴻⵛⵛ ⵏ ⵜⵍⴻⵎⵎⴰⵙⵜ, ⵢⴻⵣⵎⴻⵔ ⵍⵃⴰⵍ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵍⴵⴻⵜⵙⵜⵙⴰ. The Ukraine of the illegality was opened by the curring is open to bones.
of his face, he looks like a monster. The yellow magazine appears in a rest. and Sirius Aberkaan.
 “Spellrum!!” he exclaimed, pointing Ron's backpack at them.
 Harry and Hermione's fists left their hands, high in the air, and Black caught them.
Then a figure approached. His eyes focused on Harry.
 “I thought you were coming to help your friend,” he said calmly.
 His voice sounded like he hadn't been in the habit of using it for a long time. “Your father will have
He did the same for me. Brave of you not looking for a teacher. Thanks… will do
It’s all very easy…”
 The warning about his father sounded in Harry's ears as if Black had screamed it. A biting hatred
erupted in Harry's chest, leaving no room for fear. For the first time in his life, he wanted his ass
Back in his hand, not to defend himself, but to attack… to kill. Without knowing what he was doing,
He started to walk, but there was a slow movement on either side of him and two hands.
He grabbed it and held it…“No, Harry!” Hermiun bumped into a familiar woman; run,
However, he called Black.
 “If you want to kill Harry, you’ll have to kill us too!” He said firmly, despite the strength of the
The setup was often had a lot of steps, and he lowered it a little when he spoke.
 Something appeared in eyes that were very black.
 “Laugh yourself off,” he snapped at Ron. “You’ll hurt that leg even more.”
 “Did you hear me?” Ron said weakly, though he was clinging painfully to Harry to stay upright.
“You should have killed all three of us!”
Page 245 of 317
Get FREE side books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "There will be only one murder here tonight," Black said, his grin widening.
 “Why is that?” Harry sighed, trying to push himself away from Ron, and Hermione. “It doesn’t hurt the last
moment, do you? Didn’t think he’d have to kill all those Muggles to get to Pettigrew… What is
The thing is, go to Azkaban?”
 “Harry!” Hermione whispered. “Be quiet!”
 “Hi my killdy and daddy!” Harry answered, and with a big smile that he didn't answer.
Hermione and Ron stopped themselves and stepped forward —
 He had forgotten magic — he had forgotten that he was short and skinny and thirteen years old,
While Black was a tall, stout man — all Harry knew was that he wanted to hurt Black like .
as badly as he could and didn’t care how much he got hurt in return —
 Harry's song may have been something very special, but Black didn't want to collect photographs in
Time — One of Harry's hands rested on his outstretched arm, stroking the palm of his hand; the
The claws of Harry's other hand collided with the side of Black's head and fell, backwards,
In Ugadir —
 Hermione was blushing; Ron was screaming; There's a secret lurking like spiders in Black's
hand sent a jet of sparks into the air that missed Harry's face by inches; Harry is judging his brother.
The hand beneath his fingers twitches in a gentle, but steady, way, his other hand squeezing every part of the
Black can find.
 But Black’s free hand found Harry’s ring
 “No,” he stammered, “I’ve waited too long—”
 The feet ran, Harry sighed, his boys asked.
 Then he saw Hermione's foot sticking out of the void. Blake goes after Harry with a bird of prey;
Ron threw himself on Blake's arm and Harry let out a happy sigh —
 He struggled free from the feather grasp and saw his bat hitting the floor; ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ ⵉⵙⴻⵖⵔⴰ
Himself to her but
 “Argh!”
 Crookshanks had joined in the fray; Both front fingers sank themselves deep into Harry's core.
arm; Harry dropped it, but Crookshanks now moved towards Harry’s nose —
Page 246 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “ⵓⵀⵓⵢ ⵓⵔ ⵜⴳⵉ!” exclaimed Harry, launching a kick at Crookshanks that made the cat jump
On the other hand, the installation; Harry stood on his hand twitching —
 “Get out of the way!” he shouted at Ron and Hermione.
 They didn’t need to be told twice. Hermione, panting for breath, nostrils bleeding, stepped aside,
With his cock and Ron's cock. Ron picked up four pounds and fell on it, bouncing, bouncing,
His white face was now tinged with red, and both hands were clutching his broken leg.
 Blak is located in the city of Ugadir. His thin breasts rose and fell slowly as he watched
Harry walked stiffly closer, his wand staring straight at Black's heart.
 “Are you going to kill me, Harry?” Iwessus.
 Harry sat just above him, his trunk still pressed against Black's chest, pointing down at him. a
a livid bruise was developing over Black’s left eye and his nose was bleeding.
 “You killed my parents,” Harry said, his voice shaking slightly, but his forearm lingering long enough.
 Blake sees it through our happy eyes.
 “I don’t deny it,” he said very quietly. “But if you know all Holiness at all.”
 “The hardest?” Harry repeated, anger ringing in his ears. “You sold them to
Voldemort. This is all I needed to know”.
 "You should have listened to me," Black said, and there was a hint of anger in his voice now.
“You’ll regret it if you don’t… You don’t understand…”
 "I understand a lot more than you think," Harry said, his voice lower than before. "you
Never heard of it, have you? Mom... you're going to stop Fuldimur from killing you... you're doing this.
You wrote it…”
 Before either of them could say another word, some ginger sprayed Harry;
Crookshanks jumped onto Black's chest and stayed there, right over Black's heart. black
God is looking under the cat.
 “Hellid,” he muttered, trying to get Crookshanks off him.
 But Crookshanks stuck his fingers in Black's pockets and didn't want to change. It goes back and forth,
He craned his face to Harry and looked at him with those big blue eyes. To his right,
Hermione picked a dark box.
Page 247 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry stood over Blake and Crocchans, turning around and leaning against the table. So whatever he has
to kill the cat too? She is in alliance with Black… While she is prepared to die, she vows to protect Black,
Not Harry’s business… If Black wanted to save him, that just proved he cared more about
Crookshanks is more than Harry’s parents…
 Harry collected hand. Now it’s time to do it. Now it's time to avenge his mother
It’s my father. He's going to kill Black. He should kill Black. This is his timeline…
 The sentences were shortened. And still Harry stood there frozen, with his eyebrows raised, Black stared at the
He, crucchans on his face. Ron's ragged breath came from the side of the bed; There was Hermione.
He was very quiet.
 And after that came a new novel —
 Footsteps could be heard from the floor—someone was looking down.
 “GET UP HERE!” Hermione scolded quickly. “WE'RE UP HERE — SIRIUS BLACK —
quickly!"
 Blake was a smoothly with skiing for almost Crookshanks to stop; Harry gripped his wand.
By consensus — it does now! A Soot said in the head — but the legs are close to the ear .
stairs and Harry still didn't do it.
 The door to the room opened with a flurry of red bells and Harry wheeled around as
Professor Lupine came rushing into the room, his face bloodless, his wand raised and ready. his
His eyes flicked over Ron, who was kneeling on the floor, over Hermione, who was crouching by the door, and over Harry,
He stood there with his bow covering Black, and then at Black himself, bruised and bleeding .
At Harry's feet.
 “Spellrum!!” Lobin Issah.
 Harry's wed lew ons more ot of hasand; So did the two Hermione was holding. Lubin
He cleverly took them all in, then entered the room, glancing at Black, who still had Crookshanks .
He sat protectively on his chest.
 Harry stood there, stunned for a moment. Don't do it. His nerves had frayed him. black
He was going to be sacrificed to the Dementors.
 Then Levi spoke with a loud voice.
 "Where is he, Sirius?"
Page 248 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry looked straight at Lewin. He didn't understand what Lupine meant. Who is Lubin talking to?
about? He wanted to see Blake again.
 Blak's face is pretty unimportant. For a few seconds, he didn't move at all. Then, many
Quickly, he raised his empty hand, pointing directly at Ron. Surprised, Harry looked at the
Ron, who looked shocked.
 "But then…" Lupine muttered, staring at Black so closely that he seemed to be trying to read his expression .
brain, “… why didn’t he show up before now? If not” — Lubin’s eyes widen at once,
He seemed to see something beyond Black, something none of the others could see, “—
What if he… what if you changed… without telling me?”
 A little bit, his girl who was just not left the face of Lobbine, Blake made it.
 “Master,” Harry interrupted loudly, “what’s going on —?”
 But he didn't finish asking, because what he saw was that his voice was going to die in his throat. Lubin
He had lowered his wand, looking in Black's direction. The teacher walks towards Blake and takes his
hand, pulled him to his feet so that Crookshanks fell to the ground, and embraced Black as a
brother.
 Harry felt like a lid of the absence from the pistol.
 “I'm staying too!” cried Hermione.
 Lobin letting go from Black and he made it. Istan press from the ground isoled in
Lupine, with green eyes. “You — you —.”
 "Hermione—"
 “– you are him!”
 “Hermione, the wizard —”
 "I didn't tell him!" cried Hermione. “I’m leaving with you —.”
 “Hermione, listen to me, meditate” Lupine urged. “I can explain —”
 Harry could feel himself shaking, not with fear, but with a new wave of pleasure.
Page 249 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "I trust you," he told Lupine, his voice shaking, unable to move, "and all the time you've had
He was her friend!”
 "You're wrong," Lupine said. “I’m not a friend of Sirius, but I’m still — let me understand…”
 "No!" Hermione shuddered. “Harry, don’t believe it, he’s helping Blake get around town,
He wants you to die too — and the person’s voice!”
 There was a pure silence. Everyone's eyes are now in lobby, which is often seen,
Although they were not.
 "It's not entirely down to your field being practiced, Hermione," he said. “Just one in three, I’m afraid. I
Sirius is not helping in the village. I don't want Harry to die.” An uncle.
A frown passed over his face. “But I never said I was a wolf.”
 Ron has made a perfect effort to get into again but he was back to a trauma. Lubin is drunk.
Read it, when we see him, but the brown, “Get me from me, they’ve been inhabited!”
 Lubin stopped dead. After that, with an obvious effort, he turned back to Hermione and said, “How long
Do you know?”
 “Now,” Hermione said in the ear. “Since I did Professor Snape’s portrait…”
 "He'll be happy," Lupine whispered. “It gave the poem hope that someone would know
What she warns me about my dangers.
Full moon? Or you know Bugart changed up to the moon when he saw him?”
 “All of all,” Hermione said quickly.
 Lobin broke a laugh.
 “You were a happy novel of your time when I met you, Hermione.”
 “I’m not,” Hermione whispered. “If I wasn’t a little, I’ll tell people all that’s you!”
 "But they knew beyond that," Lubin said. “But, the actors do.”
 “Dumbledore used you when he knew you’re a monster,” Ron went. “Is it nice?”
 “Some of the staff think about it,” Lobin said. “He needs to do more to allay concerns
Teachers that I was accused —”
 “And he was wrong!” Harry shouted. “YOU'VE BEEN HIMM ALL THE TIME!”
Page 250 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
He’s showing on the Black, who recently passed into the four-speed silence, his face
They hid in one hand. Cruchanks stands by his side and walked on his hand, and he was slaughter.
Ron pulled away from the two of them, waving his hand.
 "I didn't help Sirius," Lubin said. “If you give me a chance, I’m going to perform. look -"

He split the roles of Harry, Ron and Hermione and each bowed to his owner; Harry
He held him, he stood.
 “There,” Lubin said, putting his hand in his field of “You guys, we’re not. now
Would you listen to?”
 Harry didn't know what to say. Is it a slavery?
 “If you don’t support him,” he says, through a good match in Black, “how do you know
and in here.”
 "The map," Lupine said. “The Marader Map. I was in my laboratory listening to it —”
 “Do you know how to do it?” Harry said doubtfully.
 "It's obvious they're going to pass it," Lubin said, throwing up his hand regardless. “I helped her write it.
I am Mono and I’m a comrade of my friends for me in school.”
 “That’s —?”
 “The most important thing is that I’m so grateful this evening, because I have a idea that you,
Ron, and Hermione can try to sneak out of the castle to see Hagrid in front of his Hippogriffs
was confused. And I was right, wasn’t I?”
 He started pacing up and down, looking at them. Little wisps of dust rose to his feet.
 “You must have been wearing your father’s old hat, Harry—”
 “How d'you find out about the bathroom?”
 "The number of times I've seen James pass out underneath…" Lupine said, looking impatient .
hand again. “The thing is, even if you’re wearing an invisibility cloak, you’re still visible in
Marauder's card. I watched as you crossed the castle and entered Hagrid’s hut. Twenty minutes later,
You left Hagrid and made your way back to the castle. But you are now with you alone
else."
Chapter 251 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "what?" Harry said. “No, we’re not!”
 "I couldn't believe my eyes," Lupine said, still going, and not moving Harry's collar. "I
She thinks the card must not work. How about with you?”
 “There’s no one with us!” Harry said.
 “I’ve just been a bit more, it’s faster to the mask, with the name of Sirius Black...Where is similar .
with you; I watched as he pulled two of you into the Whomping Willow—”
 “One of us!” Ron said wisely.
 "No, Ron," Lupine said. “Two of you.”
 He had stopped his pacing, his eyes fixed on Ron.
 “Do you think I can spot the monster?” he said with the Union.
 "what?" Run said. “What’s Scabbers got to do with it?”
 "Everything," Lupine said. “May I see it, please?”
 Ron frowned, then put his hand inside his cock. Scabbers came out, squawking fiercely; run
He had to hold his long snappy tail to stop him from escaping. Crookshanks stood on Black's shoulder and
He made a clicking noise.
 Lupin approaches Ron. He seemed to be holding his breath as he stared at Scabbers closely.
 "what?" Ron said again, holding Scabbers close to him, looking confused. “What does my mouse have
He worked with something?”
 “That’s not a child,” Sirius Black growled.
 “What do you mean—of course it’s a beast—”
 "No, he's not," Lupine said quietly. “He’s a magician.”
 "An Animagus," Black said, "by the name of Peter Pettigrew."

Chapter 252 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com



Chapter Eighteen
The moon, the animal’s tail, the spinning wheel, and the needles

 It took a few seconds for the shock of this statement to sink in. Then Ron breathed out what Harry said .
He was thinking.
 “You two are smart.”
 "ridiculous!" Hermione said suddenly.
 “Peter Pettigrew is dead!” Harry said. “He killed him twelve years ago!” He died with Uberkan,
With his face screaming with a smile.
 “I wanted to,” he growled, his teeth white, “but little Peter held me… that’s not it .
time, though!”
 ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ Crookshanks ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⴹⴻⴳⴳⴻⵔ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵍⵇⴰⵄⴰ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⴼⴻⴹ Black ⵖⴻⴼ Scabbers ; cried Run in pain as
Black's weight landed on his broken leg.
 “Sirius, NO!” Lupin ⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⵖ, ⵉⵄⴻⴷⴷⴰ ⵉⵎⴰⵏⵉⵙ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵙⴷⴰⵜ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵉⵊⴻⴱⴱⴻⴷ Black ⵙⴻⴳ Ron .
Also, “WAIT! You can’t do it just like that — they have to understand — we have to explain .
—”
 “We can clear up later!” Blay shouted, trying to explain to Lubin. One hand is still
You bit the air as you tried to reach Scabbers, who was squealing like a sheep, nipping at Ron's .
His face and head as he tried to escape.
Page 253 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “There — - go — go — a on — to — to — know — everything!” Lubin stood, still trying to stand.
black. “Run kept him a butterfly! There were parts of him I didn’t understand either, and Harry — you .
Amy Harry is right, Sirius!”
 Blake stopped fighting, though his old eyes were still fixed on the swordsmen, who were
ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵙⵖⴰⵍ ⵙ ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⵖⴰⵔⴰⵙⵜ ⵉⵣⴷⴷⵉⴳⵏ ⴷⴷⴰⵡ ⵏ ⵔⵓⵏ ⵏ ⵔⵓⵏ, ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵖⵓⵍ, ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⴱⴱⵉ ⵉⴷⴰⵎⵎⵏ.
 “All right, then,” Black said, without taking his eyes off the animal. “Tell them what you like.
But let it out quickly, Remus. I want to commit the crime I was accused of…”
 "You're awake, everyone," Ron said in a cheerful manner, looking at Harry and Hermione i
support. “I got that. I’m standing.”
 He tried to pull himself up onto his good leg, but Lupine raised his wand again, pointing it at .
Scabbers.
 “You’ll hear about it, Ron,” he said quietly. “Keeping a clean view of Peter when she was
listen."
 “Hi’s not here, HE’S SCABBERS!” Run shouted, trying to force the mouse back into his presence.
Bouquet, but Scarabers was fighting well; Ron swayed and overbalanced, and Harry caught
He runs it down to the seat. After that, when Blake returned, Harry went back to Lubin.
 “There were witnesses who saw Pettigrew dead,” he said. “One way all the way into them….”
 “They don’t know what they think they know!” Blake said truthfully, still seeing Scabbers.
They fight in Rune's hands.
 "Everyone thought Sirius killed Peter," Lupine said, frowning. “I thought it myself — until I watched
The card tonight. Because the Marauder’s map doesn’t lie… Peter is alive. Run grabbed it.
Harry.”
 Harry looked at Ron, and as their eyes met, they agreed, silently: Black and Lupine were .
Two from their minds. Their story made no sense whatsoever. How can you discover them?
Pythyghrus? It had to be abandoned abnormality after all — but why he was lubino and he plays on .
With him?
 After that, Hermione talked, in a farm, about being very sociable, as well as trying to
Professor Lubin will speak to us.
 "But Professor Lupine… Scabbers can't be Pettigrew… it just can't be true, you know it can't…"
Chapter 254 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Wy can't it bet?” Lupine said casually, as if they were in school, while Hermione had
In adversity saw a problem in a grass with Grindylows.
 “Because… because people will know if Peter Pettigrew was an Animagus. We do
The animagegi in the classroom with Professor McGongagagal. And I watch them when I'm doing my job.
— The Department of Witchcraft keeps watch over witches and wizards who may become monsters; There is a
The story shows what kind of life they are in, their skills and their things... and I go with
Professor McGonagal relates to the novel, and there is only seven 7 Animalji so
For a century, there was no Bitijro name on the list.”
 Harry barely had time to internally marvel at the effort Hermione put into her homework,
When Lupine started laughing.
 “At the other time, Hermione!” he said. “But the ministry didn’t see that Gagi was early .
An incredible animagi walking around Hogwarts.”
 “If you’ll say this story, I’m absorbing, Remus,” said Black, who was still
each part of the Scabbers are considered halter. “I’ve been a sight of years, I’m not supposed to wait .
A long time.”
 “Very well… but you’ll need to help me, Sirius,” Lupine said, “I know just how it started…”
Lupin supposed. There’s a brilliant sand behind it. She opened the door of her house by herself.
Kudd. Five of them five looked at him. Sein, Lupin was quickly passing back to it, the driver outward to the station.
 “There’s no one there….”
 “This Place is huntd!” Run said.
 "It didn't," Lubin said, still searching for the door through the blocked path. “The Crieking Shack didn’t even make a move.
It’s used... and feels and trees and indicators for the horses that they heard are they’ve been inspired.”
 He pushed his matted hair out of his eyes, thought for a moment then said, “There’s all n
s starts — with my becoming a wirewolf. None of this could have happened if I hadn’t
bitter… and if only I wasn’t such an idiot…”
 He looked sober and tyred. Ron started to stir, but Hermione, she said, “Shh!” She was born.
Lupine with a big grin.
 “I was like a very young boy when I got the diagnosis. My parents expected everything, but in those days
There is no longer. The campaign that makes me the Uselmad Snape is the recent recent one.
Exit. It allows us to work, you see. When I did it for a week, before the whole month, I became
Page 255 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Keep my mind focused while I’m editing… I can curl up in my office, it’s a harmless wolf, and wait
The moon will shine again.
 “Before Wolfsban Purce was selected, however, I became a very passive agent when it came to that.
month. Turns out I couldn't transfer to Hogwarts. Other parents were not
Maybe they’ll want their kids to impress me.
 “But then Dumbledore became a runner, and he was a surgeon. He said that if we pass .
I got some letters, there's no reason I shouldn't go to school...” Lubin smiles, and
Look straight at Harry. “I told you, months ago, that the Whomping Willow was planted in
The year I came to Hogwarts. The truth is that she was planted because he came to Hogwarts. this
House” — Lupine looked sadly around the room, — “the tunnel leading to it — they were .
Built for my use. Once a month, when I was a visitor from the city, to this place, to visit.
The tree was placed in the mouth of the ship to stop anyone from attacking me while I was
difficult."
 Harry can't see where the story is going, but he hears everyone in a happy way. Even though
another sound than Lupine's voice was Scabbers' frightened grunt.
 “My bets in those days were — it was amazing. It looks very beautiful and looks like a
The fox. I separated from people to focus, so I focused and focused on myself instead. the
Villagers heard noises and shouting and thought they heard a particularly noise.
spirits. Dumbledore encouraged violence… Even now, when the house has silenced
For years, villagers did not dare to approach.
 “But thanks to my experiences, I was happier than I’d ever been in my life. For the first
Time ever, I had friends, three great friends. Sirius the Black… Peter Pittigrew… and, of course,
Your father, Harry — James Potter.
 “Now, three of my friends can’t help but notice that I disappear once a month. I created all
Kind of funny. I told them my mom was sick, and I had to go home to visit her… I was
They are worried that they will leave me the moment they find out what I am. But of course, they, like
You, Hermione, get the truth…
 “And they never abandoned me at all. Instead, they did something to me that made
transformations not only bearable, but the best times of my life. They become this Anima.”
 “And my father?” Harry said, surprised.
 "Yeah, sure," Lupine said. “It took them the best part of three years to work out how to do it.
Your father and Sirius here were the best students in school, and lucky,
because an animagus transformation can go horribly wrong — one of the reasons the Ministry keeps a
Page 256 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Watch out for those who try to do it. Peter needs all the help he can get from James and
Sirius. Finally, in our fifth year, they did it. Can anyone become a different animal in
will."
 “But how does that help you?” Hermione said, looking puzzled.
 "They couldn't treat me like humans, so they treated me like animals," Lupine said.
“The human animal is only a danger to humans. They sneak out of the castle every month under the
James' Invisible Shirt. They change… Peter, as a kid, can crawl under the
Willow pushes his branches and grabs the frozen blade. inxed with
tunnel and join me. Under their spell, I became desperate. My body is still like a wolf.
But the blessings seemed to be the same thing when they were with them.”
 “Get over it, Remus,” Black said, still watching Scabbers in a terrible sort of way .
stone in the face.
 “I’m getting there, Sirius, I’m getting there… well, serious possibilities have opened up for us .
Now that we can all change. Soon we were leaving the Shrieking Shack and walking through
The school grounds are a village at night. Sirius and James transformed into such huge monsters,
They managed to keep a wolf in check. I doubt if any Hogwarts students found
went out further around Hogwarts and Hogsmeade than we did… And that’s how we got to
Write down the Marauder Card, and name our surname. Sirius and Padful. Peter and Wormittal.
James was with the Prongs.”
 “What kind of animal —?” Harry started, but Hermione cut him off. “That’s still really
difficult! Running in the dark with a fox! What if you had given others that card,
And he ate someone?”
 "A thought that still haunts me," Lupine said seriously. “And they were pretty dirty, a lot of them.
We laughed about them afterwards. We were young, unthinking — armed with our own .
Wisdom.
 “Sometimes I feel guilty for betraying Dumbledore’s trust, of course… he had persuaded me to .
Hogwarts when no other headmaster would do that, and he had no idea that I was approaching
the rules he put in place for my safety and that of others. He didn’t know I lost three friends
Students will normally become this Anima. But I always managed to forget my feelings of guilt.
Every time we stayed to get our upcoming monthly date. And I don’t change…”
 Lupine's face hardened, and there was self-pity in his voice. “This whole year, I was
I struggled with myself, wondering if I should tell Dumbledore that Sirius was an Animagus.
But I’m not doing it. why? Because I was so stupid. It would mean accepting that I would
The confidence worked when I was in school, I respect that I had another… and
Dumbledore's trust meant everything to me. He allowed me into Hogwarts as a boy, and gave me
Page 257 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
I’m a workaholic when I’ve been bullied all my adult life, I can’t find a paying job because of what I’m
am. And so I convinced myself that Sirius attended school using the dark arts he had learned .
From Voldemort, that if Animagus hasn’t had anything to do with him… yes, with some idea, Snape was
blame me all the time.”
 “Snap?” said Black sternly, taking his eyes off Scabbers; For the first time in minutes and
She looked at Lupine. “What does Snape have with him?”
 “It’s here, Sirius,” Lupine said. “He teaches here, too.” ⵉⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍ ⵖⴻⵔ Hari.
Run, Hermione.
 “Professor Snape is with us at school. He fights a lot against my request to .
Defense Against Dark Arts job. He’s been telling Dumbledore all year that I’m not
He's trusted. He had his watch… You see, Sirius was playing a trick on him that was nearby,
the trick that sustains me —”
 Black made a warning noise.
 "It's been great," he said. “We checked in, trying to find out what we were…
Hopefully he’ll take us out…”
 “Searus was very excited about where I’m going every sector.” Lupine told Harry, Ron, and
Hermione. “We were in the same year, you know, and we — er — didn’t care much .
quite. He didn't particularly like James. Jealous, I think, of James' art on the Quidditch pitch...
Some of the things that Snape saw I knew she was talking to Madame Bumphrey about when she did
Me heading over to Whomping Willow to get it set up. Sirius thought to be — ar — it’s amazing, to .
Enis for Snape, what all must work is to put the voice on the corner of the harvest by a long weird, will be able to be able to
You will come in after me. Well, of course, Snape trid it — for he'd Got as as as house, he'd have met
Women’s eating for Defrorx with Likmalis — but the father, heard what Sirius works, he went after Snape .
He adds back, with a great deal for life… Snape iwaly, although, at the end of
tunnel. It has been accused Dombledre to say for everyone, but since he saw what it was .
was…"
 “So that’s why Snape didn’t like you,” Harry whispered, “because he thought you were in
that
 “That’s a must,” said a ministry from the wall behind Lupin.
 Severus Snape was stabilized by the uncertainty of the inevitable, and then the Jamazis joins directly to Lupin.

Page 258 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com


The sixteen
ⴰⵎⵇⴻⴷⴷⴰⵛ ⵏ Sidi Buldemurt

Chapter 259 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 cried Hermione. The black brown was on the legs. Harry felt as though he'd received a huge electric
warning.
 “I found this in the midst of Whomping Will,” said Snape, and snapped the story alongside, with silver .
To keep the stone is directly connected to the Lupin slopes. “Very useful, Potter, I thank you…”
 Snape was a bit out of breath, but his face was filled with suppressed triumph. “You think,
I guess, how did I know you were here?” He said, his eyes sparkling. “I've just been to your office,
Lubin. ⵜⵜⵓⴹ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵟⵟⴼⴻⴹ ⵉⴹⴰ ⵍⵃⴻⵎⵍⴰⵉⵏⴻⴽ, ⵉⵀⵉ ⴹⴻⴼⵔⴻⵏⵉⵢⵉⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵍⵇⴰⵀⵡⴰ. And I'm very lucky.
It works… my goodness, I mean. You stumbled onto your desk some card. One look at it tells me all
You need to know. I saw you running this way and I didn’t see you.”
 "Severus —" Lupine began, but Snape cut him off.
 “I told the principal time and time again that you were helping your old friend Black in .
Castle, Lupine, and here's the proof. Nor do I dream you have the guts to use this old
A place is your hiding place —”
 « Severus, ⵜⴳⵉⴹ ⵜⵓⵛⵛⴹⴰ », ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Lupin ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ. “You don’t listen to everything — I .
He could be surprised — Sirius wasn’t there to kill Harry —”
 “ⵙⵏⴰⵜ ⵏⵏⵉⴹⴻⵏ ⵉ Azkaban ⵉⴹⴰ”, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Snape, ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⵜⵜⵛⴻⵔⵛⵓⵔⴻⵏⵜ ⵜⵓⵔⴰ ⵙ ⵜⴼⴰⵏⴰⵜ. “I shalle be
I’d love to know how Dumbledore would take this… He was pretty convinced you were up to no good, you
You know, Lupine… he’s a fucking monster —”
 “ⴰ ⴰⵄⴻⵡⵡⵉⵇ,” ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Lupin ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ. “There is a joke that a schoolboy is apt to put an innocent man inside .
lumb?”
 bang! ⵉⵖⴻⵙ ⴰⵔⵇⴰⵇⴻⵏ, ⴰⵎ ⵓⵣⵔⴻⵎ, ⵢⴻⴼⴼⴻⵖⴷ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵜⴰⴳⴳⴰⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵄⴻⴽⴽⴰⵣⵜ ⵏ Snape ⵓ ⵙⴼⴻⴹⴹⴻⵏ ⵉⵎⴰⵏⵏⵙⴻⵏ
around Lupine’s mouth, nose, and lips; He lost balance and fell to the ground, unable to move.
With a roar of anger, Black started towards Snape, but Snape pointed his wand directly between
Eyes of Black.
 “I’ve got the reason,” he said with seeds. “ⴻⴼⴽ-ⵉⵢⵉ-ⴷ ⵙⵙⴻⴱⴱⴰ ⵉ ⵡⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜ-ⴳⴻⵖ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⵓ ⴰⴷ ⵙⵙⵉⵡⵍⴻⵖ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜ-ⴳⴻⵖ.”
 Black stopped dead. He would have been unable to tell which face showed more hatred.
 ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵉⴱⴻⴷⴷ ⴷⵉⵏ, ⵢⴻⵃⴱⴻⵙ, ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵥⵔⵉ ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵢⴻⵅⴷⴻⵎ ⵏⴻⵖ ⴰⵏⵡⴰ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵢⴰⵎⴻⵏ. He glanced around at
Ron and Hermione. Ron ⵉⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍⴷ ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ ⴷ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ ⵉⵅⵓⵚⵚⴻⵏ, ⵎⴰⵣⴰⵍⵉⵜ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵏⴰⵖ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜⵉⵙ.
Skabbers struggling. Hermione, however, took a silent way to Snape, said, with value .
In a breathless voice, “Professor Snape — it’s not enough to hear what they have to say, to
it?"
Page 260 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “S. Granger, you’ve already been closed from the school,” said Snape with the ear. “You, Obtoer,
ⴰⴽⴽⴻⴷ Weasley ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⴱⴻⵔⵔⴰ ⵉ ⵜⵍⵉⵙⴰ, ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⴷⵓⴽⵍⵉ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵎⴷⴰⵏ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵃⴻⴱⵙⴻⵏ ⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵡⵓⵛⵛⴻⵏ. for
For once in your life, hold your tongue.”
 “But if — if there was a mistake —”
 “SHUT UP, YOU BAD GIRL!” Snape ⵉⵄⴻⴳⴳⴻⴹ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⴻⵍⵜ ⴷ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⵃⴱⴻⵙ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ.
“SHE DON’T TALK ABOUT WHAT YOU DON’T UNDERSTAND!” Some of the shoes came out of
The end of the lab, still continues in the face of Black. Hermione sighed.
 “Punishment is too sweet,” Snape murmured to Black. “How I hoped I would be the one to catch
you…"
 « ⵜⴰⴹⵙⴰⵏⵏⵉ ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴼⴻⵍⵍⴰⴽ ⴷⴰⵖⴻⵏ, ⴰ Severus », ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Black ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ. “As long as this boy brings his mouse to .
The castle” — he jerked his head at Ron — “I’ll come around…”
 “When is the palace?” Snap told Live. “I don’t think we should go until that. All I have to work is
Call out to the Dementors once we're out of Willow. ⴰⴷ ⵙⴼⴻⵔⵃⴻⵏ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⵎⴰ ⵡⴰⵍⴰⵏⴽ, ⴰ Aberkan...
I’d be more than happy to give you a little hug, I dare… I —”
 What little color was on Black's face left him.
 “You — you should have listened to me seriously,” he stammered. “Lit — look at the back —”
 But there was a mischievous glint in Snape's eyes that Harry had never seen before. appears above the
reason.
 “Come on, all of you,” he said. He took out his fingers, and the ends of the ropes connected to Lupine .
It ended up in his hands. “I’ll get the stations. Maybe the Dementors would have a kiss too —
”
 Before he knew what he was doing, Harry crossed the room in three strides, and stopped .
gate.
 “Get out of the way, Potter, you’re already in enough trouble,” Snape growled. “If I hadn’t
Here to save your eyes—”
 "Professor Lupine has probably killed me about ten times this year," Harry said. "I was
Alone with him loads of times, he had lessons fighting Dementors. If it helps
Black, why didn’t he just finish me off then?”
Page 261 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Don’t ask me to understand how a werewolf’s mind works,” Snape snapped. “Get out of the way,
network.”
 “YOU’RE HORRIBLE!” Harry shouted. “AKKEN KAN SSEGDAN-K D ABELLI DI .
SCHOOL DON’T EVEN LISTEN —”
 "Support! UR YITTWASSELEN AKKA!” Snape shouted, looking mad.
More than ever. "Like father, like son, Potter!" I just saved your ass; You should thank me
Asked heat! You would have been better served if he had killed you! She would have died like you
Dad, too stupid to believe you might have been mistaken for Black — now get out of the way, or I
He will do it for you. GET OUT OF THE WAY, POTTER!”
 Harry gave the lawyer at a magician. Snden will take Snape and even one level for her, he
He is found by the speech.
 “Expelliarmus!” Isoyas — even that it’s not the only one that talks. There is a
Paulbaps which has set up the door is facing terrorism; The snake had his legs raised and was placed in .
Agadir, after throwing him to the ground, a drop of blood coming out from under his head. was
ⵉⴼⴼⵖ-ⴷ.
 Harry looked to his side. run, both Hermiun tried to pull the snap out at one point when
moment. Snape's wand soared in a high arc and landed on the bed next to Crookshanks.
 “You don’t have to do this,” Blak says, as we glare at Harry. “You have to allow .
we…"
 ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⵄⵡⴻⵊⵉⵜⵜ ⵡⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏ ⵏ Black. It's not a sign, though, that he's doing a good job.
 “We’re a teacher… we’re a teacher…” Hermione gasps, looking lifeless.
Snape with frightened eyes. “Oh, we’ll be in so much trouble—”
 Lobbine fights against his sins. Black was down down until it didn’t. ⵍⵓⴱⵉⵏ
It’s like, he hangs his hands where their belts are.
 “Thanks, Harry,” he said.
 "I'm still not saying I believe you," he told Lubin.
 "Then it's time we gave you some evidence," Lubin said. “You’re, my son — the creepy potters, Afav.
now."
 Ron took Scabbers almost to the chest.
Page 262 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Get away from her,” he said sadly. “You are trying to say that he broke out of prison just to get it.
Hands on Scabbers? I hope..” Harry looks at Hermione for reassurance, “No, I’m sayin
If Pettigrew answered with a coin — there are millions of coins — how should he know that?
One of them was after being locked up in Azkaban?”
 "You know, Sirius, that's a good question," Lubin said, leaning back towards Blake and smiling slightly.
“How did you find out where he was?”
 Blake puts one of his hands like the center of his street and takes out a happy picture,
which he quickly unfolded and held to show the others.
 This is a picture of Ron and his family published in Daily Profit.
Summer, and there, in the head of the run, was scabers.
 “How did you get to that?” Lobin asked for Black, Tonstrock.
 “Fudge,” said Black. “When he came to inspect Azkaban last year, he gave me his document. and
There’s Peter, on the front page on this boy’s shoulder… I recognized him instantly… how much
The time I saw it I was watching it? Sadly, he said the man would return to
Hogwarts… to where Harry is…”
 “My God,” Lobin often says, and he moves from Scabbers to the picture in the book and back again.
“His foreign use…”
 “What about that?” Ron said with a chuckle.
 “He’s got a missing shoulder,” Black said.
 “Of course,” Lupine sighed. “So that simple… well… changed it for him?”
 “Just before it was converted,” Black said. “When I cornered him, he yelled for the whole street to
I heard that I did Lily and James. Then I can stop him, and he is in the way.
With the hand behind his back, he killed each within twenty feet of himself — and went out
In the campfire with the other animals…”
 “Don’t you hear, Oron?” Lupine said. “The biggest bit of Peter they found was his finger.”
 “Look, Scabbers probably had a fight with another rat or something! It’s been in my family since
Ages, of course —”
 "Twelve years, actually," Lupine said. “Didn’t you ever wonder why he lived so long?”
Page 263 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “We — we were very careful about it!” Run said.
 “Not looking too good at the moment, though, is he?” Lupine said. “I would say he was lost
weight since he heard Sirius was back in jail…”
 “He's been scared of that mad cat!” Ron said, nodding at Crookshanks, still .
He looks at the bed.
 But that wasn't right, Harry thought suddenly… Scabbers was looking sickly before he met .
Crookshanks… ever since Ron returned from Egypt… ever since Black escaped…
“This cat doesn’t give birth,” Black often said. He stuck out his hairy hand and stroked it.
Crookshanks's fluffy head. “He’s the most humble of his kind I’ve ever met. He realized
Peter for what he was right away. And when he met him, he knew I wasn't meat. It was a while
Before he trusted me… Eventually, I was able to communicate to him what I was looking for, and he
He was helping me…”
 "what do you mean?" exclaimed Hermione.
 “He tried to get Peter for me, but he failed… so he stole the passwords in Gryffindor Tower .
I'm.... Akken Abraham, is taken, from the voice of a child.
 Harry's brain semed to beging under the weight of whats he was hearing. He's a coward...
And still…
“But Butros saw what happened, he’s married to him.” Iskr black. “This boy —
Crookshank, is that called? — He told me that Peter left blood on the sheets… I think he burned
Less... Kau alone, the introduction of the moms with Timmais worked once.”
 The words have changed Harry to his feelings.
 “Do Isn’t the lams created?” he said proudly. “Because I knew you were about to kill
He is like the parents fighting!”
 “No,” Lupine said, “Harry…”
 “And now you’ve come to finish it!”
 “Yes, I have,” said Black, with a wicked smile on Scabreraz’s face.
 “So I have to get Snap to take you!” Harry shouted.
Page 264 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "Harry," Lupine snapped, "don't you see?" All this time we thought Sirius betrayed you
parents, and Butros follows — but it’s another way, don’t you see? poert
He left your mother and father—Sirius held Peter down—”
 “THIS IS NOT TRUE!” Harry shouted. “HE WAS THEIR SECRET-KEEPER! INNA AKKA
QBEL AD TURRED. YINNAD NETTEN ING!”
 He was joining Black, and he snapped the reader quickly; Sunken eyes widened in an instant.
bright.
 “Harry … I as god as killed them,” he craked. “I felt Ly and James to change Peter .
At the last minute, he convinced them to use him as SecretKeeper instead of me… I’m serious, I
They know… The night they died, I called Peter and checked to see if he was still safe, but
When I arrived at the church of the Outer, he went. But not the opposition of the fight. He didn't feel
right. I'm scared. Go out and go straight to your parents' house. When I saw their house,
On therefore, it is illegality... Have it he that is who you should do... and what is we done.
 Her voice dropped. He turned around.
 “That’s this,” said Lupin, and there’s a steel ear on the voice doesn’t hear Harry .
before. “There’s a very simple way to show what really happened. Ron, give me the rat.”
 “What will you do with it if I give it to you?” The Ron Lupin calls Hope.
 "Make him prove himself," Lupine said. “If it’s really a kid, it won’t hurt.”
 Ron hesitated. Then, finally, he gives up on Scabbers and Lupine takes him. The markers started.
He shivered uncontrollably, smiling and turning, his little black eyes bulging in his head. "ready,
Sirius?” Lupine said.
 Black had already pulled Snape's wand off the bed. He approaches Lupine and the fighters.
Rat, and it is important tournament with something like they are near the face.
 "together?" He said quietly.
 “I think so,” Lupine said, holding Scabbers tightly in one hand and his wand in the other. " on
Count three. One — two — THREE!”
 A beam of blue-green light shot out from both of the orifices; For some time, Scabbers was accomplished in
Midair, its little round form spinning wildly — Ron yelped — the hero stumbled, crashing to the ground. there
There was another blinding flash of light and then —
Page 265 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 The likes are a silent forests of the growing forests. A head was shooting up from the
soil; The beds are illegal; Some time later, a man stood where Scabbers was,
He approaches and approachs his hands. Crookshanks was close and approaching the bed; Hair on
His leg was standing.
 He was a very short man, barely taller than Harry and Hermione. Her thin, colorless hair was
It wasn’t painted and there was a big damp hole on top. He had the doors of a liver
The man who has lost a lot of institute in some time. Emas seems to be a manager, almost like the Scabbers
oven, and something of the powder remained on his thin forehead and very small, watery eyes.
He watched them all, his breath heavy and ragged. Harry saw her eyes move towards the door.
and again.
 “Well, hello, Peter,” Lupine said cheerfully, as if rats were frequently floating around in the old school .
Friends surrounded him. "We haven't seen you in a while."
 "S—Sirius… R—Remus…" Pettigrew's voice cracked too. Again, his eyes darted to the
gate. “My friends… my old friends…”
 Black's fist arm rose, but Lupine grabbed his arm, gave him a held warning, and then .
He returned to Pettigrew, voices, vegetable and harsh.
 “We were talking a bit, Peter, about what happened the night Lily and James died. you
You probably haven’t got the best sense of humor while you’re squirming down there on the bed—”
 "Remus," Pettigrew whispered, and Harry could see beads of sweat rolling down his pale face,
“You wouldn’t believe it, would you…? He tried to kill me, Remus…”
 “So we heard,” Lobin said, with a smile. “I want to make one or two little things clear with .
You, Peter, if you’re going to be like that —.”
 “He came to try to kill me again!” Pettigrew yelled at once, pointing at Black, and Harry .
He noticed that he had used his middle finger, because his thumb was missing. “He killed Lily and James and
This will kill me... Ilaa to die, Amos...
 Black’s face seemed even more frozen than usual as he stared at Pettigrew with his shapeless eyes.
 "No one's going to try to kill you until we get a few things sorted," Lupine said.
 “Sorted thats out?” exclaimed Pettigrew, staring at him sternly again, his eyes drooping .
He opened the sheets and, once again, the only door. “I know he’s coming after me! I knew he’d be back.
For me! I've been waiting for this for years!”
Page 266 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Did you know that Sirius was going to get out of Azkaban?” Lupine said, shrugging his shoulders. "when
No one can stand before the everlasting?”
 “He possesses ancient powers that the rest can only dream of!” Pettigrew announced it. “How else .
Did he get out of there? I think He-Who-Must-Be-Named taught her some tricks!”
 Black started laughing, a crooked, joyless laugh filling the entire room.
 “Oh, Voldemort, teach me tricks?” he said.
 Pettigrew winced as if Black had punched him.
 “Ma, may we greet your former guest?” Black said. “I don’t blame you, Peter. His share
I don’t hate you too much, do I?”
 "I don't know what you mean, Sirius —" Pettigrew said, more breathless than before. his
The whole face was glowing with smiles now.
 "You didn't hide from me for twelve years," said Black. “You guys are hiding from
Old Voldemort Compilers. I’ve heard things in Azkaban, Peter… They all think you’re dead, or
To answer them… I’ve heard them shout all sorts of things in their sleep.
Sounds like they think the double-crosser has outdone them. Fuldemort went to Butters'.
On your information… and Voldemort met his guard there. And not all Foldemort
supporters ended up in Azkaban, did they? There are still many here, biding their time,
They say they see the crossing of their roads. If they ever find out you’re still alive,
Peter —”
 "I don't know… what you're talking about…" Pettigrew said again, quieter than before. he
He leaned his face against his hand and looked at Lewin. “Don’t believe this — this crazy, .
Remus —.”
 “I must admit, Peter, I have trouble understanding why an innocent man would want
Compare twelve years to a wall,” Lubin often said.
 "Yes, but he's afraid!" said Pythigru. “If Voldemort’s minions are after me, it’s .
because I put one of their best men in Azkaban—a spy, Sirius Black!”
 Black’s face was painted.
 “How dare you,” he snapped, as fast as the bear-eared dog he used to be. “Me, a guard i
Fuldmort? When did I ever sneak around people who were stronger and more powerful than
ego? But you, Peter — I don’t understand why I didn’t see you as a victim from the beginning.
Page 267 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
You always liked big friends who looked after you, didn't you? It used to be us… I was
Remus… and James…”
 Pettigrew wiped his face again; It was almost breathtaking.
 “I, a spy… I must be out of your mind… I never… I don’t know how you can say such a thing —”
 "Lily and James only made you a boss because I suggested it," Black snapped, so .
poisoned that Pettigrew took a step back. “I think that’s a brilliant plan… a bluff….
Voldemort would have been coming after me, he wouldn’t dream of them hiring someone so weak, untalented
Something like you… Probably the best moment of your miserable life, you told Voldemort .
You can give him ears.”
 Pettigrew was looking confused; Harry took words like “feathers” and “relationship”, but he
Can’t help but appreciate more the beauty of Pettigrew’s face and the way his eyes look
He continued to the back and the door.
 “Master Lupine?” Hermione said with a chuckle. “Can I — can I say something?”
 “Sure, Hermiun,” Lubin said intently.
 “Well — Scabbers — I mean, this one — this guy — has been sleeping in Harry’s mansion for 1990 years.
Three years. If he’s working for YouKnow-Who, how come he didn’t try to hurt Harry before
now?"
 "there!" Pettigrew said, gesturing to Ron with his dominant hand. "Thanks! You see,
Remus? I've never hurt a hair of Harry's head! Why should I stay?”
 "I'll tell you why," said Black. “Because you don’t do anything for anybody if you can’t see .
What’s in it for you. Voldemort has been in hiding for fifteen years, supposedly half dead. you
They weren’t about to go extinct under Albus Dumbledore’s nose, because of an insult
The one who lost all his power, are you? You’ll want to make sure he’s the biggest villain in
pause the game before getting back to it, isn’t it? Why don't you find a government
The family that will let you in? You keep an ear for news, don’t you, Peter? If your ex
The defendant has regained his strength, and it is safe to do so…”
 Pettigrew opened and closed his mouth several times. He seems to have lost his ability to
talk.
 “Er—Mr. Black — Sirius?” Hermione said.
 Black jumped at being called that, and stared at Hermione as if he had never seen her.
Someone did like him.
Page 268 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “If you don’t mind me asking, how — how did you get out of Azkaban, if you didn’t use Dark .
Magic?”
 "thank you!" exclaimed Pettigrew, looking excited. "Exactly! Except I —”
 But Lupine silenced him with a glance. Black was slightly smirking at Hermione, but not like
He was teasing her. He seemed to contemplate his answer.
 He said, “Ur see how I’ve done how I worked.” “I think the only reason I didn’t lose my mind was that I
I knew I was innocent. That’s not a comforting thought, so the Dementors can’t free him from
I am… but he kept me safe and I knew who I was… he helped me keep my abilities… so when it all happened
It became… more and more… I could transform in my living room… become a dog. Dementors can’t see, you
They know…” He swallowed. “They feel their way to people by feeding on their emotions…
They might say that I feel small — less of a human, less of a lizard when I was a dog… but .
They thought, of course, that I was just as mindful as everyone else there, so it didn’t bother me
them. But I was weak, too weak, and had no hope of bearing them for me without
A stick...
 “But then I saw Peter in the picture… I realized he was at Hogwarts with Harry… by the way .
He was primed to act, if a whisper reached his ears that the Dark Side was gathering strength again…”
 Pettigrew was shaking his head, looking toneless, but looking all the while at Black as if
Although he was suspended.
 “… prepared to strike at the moment when he could be sure of the allies… and send the last blow to .
them. If he gave Harry to them, who would dare say he was betraying Lord Voldemort? to be encouraged
Come back with a reminder…
 “So you see, I had to do something. I’m the only one who knows that Peter is still alive…”
 Harry remembered what Mr. Weasley had said to Mrs. Weasley. “Guardians say he was talking
In his sleep… it’s always the same words… 'He’s at Hogwarts.'”
 “It’s like someone lit a fire In my head, and Dementors can’t destroy it… It’s gone .
A feeling of happiness… a feeling… but it gave me energy, it cleared my mind. So, one
The night when they opened my door to bring food, I passed them like a dog… It was a lot
It’s hard for them to feel the animals’ emotions that they’re welcome… I was thin, too thin… thin
got to run through the streets… I swam like a dog to the mainland… I headed north and
He ran around Hogwarts grounds like a puppy. I’ve been living in the jungle ever since, except when
I came to watch Quidditch, of course. You’re as bright as your father, Harry…”
Page 269 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 He looked at Harry and didn't look away.
 “Trust me,” Black said. “Trust me, Harry. I didn't choose James and Lily. I will have
He died before I could make them.”
 And finally, Harry believed him. Voiced too loud to speak, he nodded.
 "No!"
 Pettigrew fell to his knees as if it were his own death sentence. he
He reached forward on his knees, kneeling, his hands clasped in front of him as if in prayer.
 “Sirius — it’s me… it’s Peter… it’s your friend… you won’t —”
 Black leaves and Pettigrew recovers.
 "There's enough filth on my boards without you touching it," said Black.
 "Remus!" Pettigrew chuckled, turning to Lupine instead, kneeling playfully in front of him.
“You wouldn’t believe that — didn’t Sirius tell you they changed plans?”
 "Not if he thought I was the spy, Peter," Lupine said. “I thought that was why you never told me,
Sirius?” He said gently over Pettigrew's head.
 "I'm sorry, Remus," said the Redhead.
 “It’s not all about, Padfoot, a former friend,” said Lobin, who now puts his hand. “And you will,
With my opinions, and organized me with my mouth and you are the guard?”
 “Of course,” said Black, and the ghost of a smile appeared on his grim face. He, too, started
He looks around with his eyebrows. “We’re going to do everything?”
 “Yes, I think it’s all,” Lupin said with hurt.
 "You're not… you're not…" Pettigrew whispered. And ran over to Ron.
 “Ron… I’m not a good friend… a good pet? Don't let them kill me, Ron, they'll.
You’re on my side, aren’t you?”
 But Ron was looking at Pettigrew with a big smile.
 “I let you sleep in my bed!” he said.
Page 270 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Good boy... good Mr. Petgrew went to Ron “Ur let them work… Nick I .
Your mouse… I was a good mouse…”
 "Making a better horse than man is not something to be very proud of, Peter," Black said sternly.
Ron, still continues to grow with smoothly, the text-related text from Pettigrew. Bittigrew
He's visited his legs and landing to the future, maintains the historic Committee of Hempeon.
 “The good girl… Fry girl… you’re not — you don’t let them… help me…”
 Hermione slipped her clothes out of Pettigrew's grasping hands and leaned against the wall,
They looked terrified.
 Pettigrew sat up on his knees, trembling uncontrollably, and turned his head sharply to Harry.
 “Harry… Harry… you look just like your father… just like him…”
 “HOW DO YOU COMMUNICATE WITH HARRY?” Ibi Black. “How dar fac him?
HOW DARE YOU TALK ABOUT JAMES IN FRONT OF?”
 “Harry,” Pettigrew smirked, staring at him, arms outstretched. "Harry, James wouldn't
They wanted to kill me… James would understand, Harry… he would show me
mercy…"
 Both Black and Loupin, D.C. grabbed the legs on the legs of Pettigrew, snapped back .
On the ground. He sat there, twitching with terror, staring up at them.
 “You sold Lily and James to Voldemort,” said Black, who was shaking too. “You deny it?”
 Pettigrew burst into tears. It was interesting to watch, as a big, skinny, anxious kid.
floor.
 "Sirius, Sirius, what can I do?" The dark lord... you have no idea... he has weapons
You can’t be careful… I was a Sirius, I’m not as a guard like you and the Rmos and James. I
He didn’t want it to happen… He-Who-Must-Not-Forget-Name warned me —”
 “DON’T LIE!” said Black. “YOU’RE GIVE HIM INFORMATION ABOUT SOMEONE .
THE YEAR BEFORE LILY AND JAMES DIED! YOU WERE HIS SPY!”
 “He — he was taking over everywhere!” Pettigrew sighed. “What is there to be consumed by .
You rejected it?”
Page 271 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “What was there to be gained by fighting the most evil wizard who has ever existed?” Black said,
With a big smile on his face. “Only innocent people live, Peter!”
 “You don’t understand!” cried Pythigru. “He’s going to kill me, Sirius!”
 “THEN YOU HAVE TO DIE!” ” for the blessing. “WAL DIED TO DO .
YOUR FRIENDS, AS WE DO!”
 Black and Lupine stood with their shoulders raised.
 'You have to understand,' Lupine snapped, 'if Voldemort hadn't killed you, we would have.
Goodbye, Peter.”
 Hermione took a face with sanctuary, traveling to the palace.
 "No!" Harry shouted. He came forward, laying himself in ahead of Pittiger, fighting against the snakes. "you
Can’t kill him,” he insisted. “You can’t.”
 Black and Lupine both looked confused.
 "Harry, this stupid move is the reason you don't have parents," Black joked. “This annoying part
of goods to see that you’re even dead, without you want a horror. She’s heard. The smell itself
Leather costs him more than your entire family.”
 “I know,” he said. “We will drive him to the station. Let's give it to
Dementors… He could have gone to Azkaban… but don’t kill him.”
 “Harry!” Beatty came out, putting his hands on Harry's. “You — your thank you — .
It’s more than I deserve — thank you —.”
 “You’re out of me,” says Harry with the ears, and snapped Pettigrew arms with the pilgrimage of the knowledge. "I'm not doing this for
you. I do it because — I don’t think my father would want them to become slaves — .
Just for you.”
 No one moves or makes a sound without Bitijro, whose breath is in him and walks in the streets in which he is.
He clutched at his chest. Black and Lupine were staring at each other. Then, with one movement, they
They slowed their flights.
 « ⴽⴻⵏⵏⵉⵡ ⴷ ⴰⴼⴳⴰⵏ ⴽⴰⵏ ⴰⵢ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⴰⵏ ⴰⵣⵔⴻⴼ ⴰⴷ ⵜ-ⵜⵇⴻⴱⵍⴻⵎ, ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ », ⵖⴻⴼ ⵡⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⵢ ⴷ-ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ ⴱⵍⴰⴽ. “But you think... I think what .
He did….”
 “It would be able to go back to Azkaban,” he ran at Harry. “If someone deserves the position, he deserves…”
Page 272 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Pettigrew was still hovering behind him.
 "Good," Lubin said. “Stand aside, Harry.”
 Harry hesitated.
 "I'll close it," Lupine said. “That’s all, unfortunately.”
 Harry left the road. Passages from Lubin's novel are being made this time, and another time,
Pettigrew lay on the floor, bound and gagged.
 “But if you change, Petter,” Black said, in the ears with memads even as Pettigrew, “To .
I'll kill you. Do you agree, Harry?”
 Harry looked down at the novelist on the floor waiting for Pettigrew to look at him.
 “North,” Lubin said, indeed in terms of the restaurant. “Ron, I can’t chew bones nearly as well as Mrs.
Bumfrey, so I think it's a good idea to do just a little bit of your foot while we're in the hospital.
Wings.”
 He ran to Ron, knelt down, held Ron's feet with his hands, and begged, "Ferula."
ⴱⴰⵏⴷⴰⴳⴻⵙ ⵙⴼⴻⴹⴹⴻⵏⴷ ⴰⴹⴰⵔ ⵏ Ron, ⵇⵇⵏⴻⵏⵜ ⵙ ⵍⴵⴻⵀⴷ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵙⵖⴰⵔ. Lubin brought him to his feet; ⵢⴻⵔⵔⴰ Run
His focus was wisely on the foot and he didn't win.
 “That’s better,” he said. "thank you."
 “What about Professor Snape?” Hermione said in a small voice, looking at him for a copy of Snape's novel.
figure.
 "There's nothing wrong with it," Lobin said, adding that it was on the snap and inspected
Ills. “You’re just alone — it’s so important. It’s still cold. er — maybe it would be better to
We won’t resurrect him until we’re safely in the castle. We can take it like this…”
 He mutters, “Mobilicorpus.” It seemed that invisible bones were connected to Snape’s hands, neck, and
In his neighbors, which was initiated by a concert site, the birthday remains not building up, as one palm
Puppet. He hung a few inches above the ground, his limp legs dangling. Lupin picked up the
He carries it safely in his hand.
 "And two of us should be attached to this," Black said, pushing Pettigrew lightly. “Just
Do really well.”
Page 273 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "I will," Lupine said.
 “It’s me,” Ron said innocently, looking up.
 Black conjured heavy manacles from thin air; Don’t worry, Pettigrew was principally, the left hand sliced ​​by Sonsel
To Lupine's right, right hand to Ron's left. Ron's face was set. He seemed to capture the truth of Scabbers .
Identity as personal colonialism. Crookshanks jumped lightly off the bed and led the way out of the room, his
the top of the bottle held high.



Page 274 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Chapter Twenty
The Dementor's Kiss

 Harry wasn't part of the alien team. Crookshanks led the way up the stairs; Lubin,
Pettigrew, and Ron walked ahead, looking like they were entering a six foot race. Back came the teacher.
Snap, smoothly, smoothly, and his hands are looking for every year when they were sick, and snapped and snapped it .
The wand, Sirius reminds him. Harry and Hermione called after.
 Returning to the field has been difficult. Lupine, Pettigrew, and Run had to run aside to the
manage it; Lupine still had Pettigrew wrapped around his neck. Harry could see them teasing
Awkwardly around the corner in single file. Crookshanks was still in the lead. Harry walked to the right.
Behind Black, who was still making Snape crawl in front of them; He kept pinching his nose.
Head onto the lower platform. Harry had the impression that Black wasn't making any effort to stop this.
 “Do you know what that means?” Black said quietly to Harry as they slowly walked away.
along the line. “The Pettigrew G Proposal?”
 “You’re free,” Harry said.
 “Yess…” said Black. “But I also — I don’t know if anyone ever told you — I’m yours .
God’s Father.”
 “Yeah, I know that,” Harry said.
 “But... Parents start with a milk,” Black said with a free. “If something happens to .
them…"
 Harry waited. Did Blake do what he thought he was saying?
 “I’ll be happy, really, if you want to sit down to the uncle and uncle,” Black said. "but…
Well… I thought about it. Just my name… if you want a… different house…”
ⴰⵙⴻⴱⵜⴻⵔ 275 ⵙⴻⴳ 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Some sort of fluttering ran through the pit of Harry's stomach.
 “And what — they live?” He said, by cocaine, the answer to a stone riding out of
Seh “Do you remember the Dursleys?”
 "Of course, I thought you wouldn't want to," Black said quietly. « ⴼⴻⵀⵎⴻⵖ, ⵖⵉⵍⴻⵖ ⴽⴰⵏ ⴰⴷ .
—”
 “Are you okay?” Harry said, his voice eerily similar to Black's. « ⴷ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ ⴱⵖⵉⵖ ⴰⴷ ⴼⴼⵖⴻⵖ .
The Dursli’s! Have you got a house? When can I move in?”
 Blessed is a memorial to you to you; Snape's mind was piercing the roof but Black wasn't doing it.
ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⴰⵔⴰⴱ.
 “ⵜⴻⴱⵖⵉⴹ?” he said. “You mean?”
 “ⵉⵀ, ⴱⵖⵉⵖ ⴰⴷ ⴷⵉⵏⵉⵖ!” Harry said.
 Blake's face in the first real ear is Harry on it. ⴰⵎⴳⴰⵔⴰⴷ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵅⴷⴻⵎ
was tartling, as thoughgh a person ten yars younger were shining through the starved mask; for one
The season, he was considered to be the singer at the wedding of Harry’s parents.
 They did not speak at the brother who arrived at the end of the ship. Croxhnx was out with the top.
first; he had evidently pressed his paw to the knot on the trunk, because Lupine, Pettigrew, and
Ron nodded without making any sound of the wings.
 Black glared at Snape and then stood back so Harry and Hermione could pass. Finally, the
All were gone.
 ⵍⵇⴰⵄⴰ ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵜⵃⴻⵔⵔⴻⴽ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⵜⵓⵔⴰ; The only light came from the windows of distant castles.
ⵎⴻⴱⵍⴰ ⴰⵡⴰⵍ, ⴱⴷⴰⵏ ⴰⴱⵔⵉⴷ. Pettigrew ⵎⴰⵣⴰⵍⵉⵜ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⴻⵡⵡⵉⵙ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵜⵉⴽⵡⴰⵍ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⴻⵡⵡⵉⵙ. Harry’s
mind was buzzing. He goes to leave Durley. He walks to Sirius Black,
A friend of his parents… He felt sorry… what would happen when he told the Dursleys that he was
To live with the fighter they saw on TV...!
 “One wrong move, Peter,” Lupine said cautiously before him. ⵜⴰⵄⴻⴽⴽⴰⵣⵜⵉⵙ ⵎⴰⵣⴰⵍⵉⵜⵜ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵢⵉⴷⵉⵙ.
in Pettigrew's chest.
 Silently they wandered through the castle, the castle lights slowly dimming. Snape ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ
He was still trembling nervously in front of Black, his head bobbing on his chest. ⵓ ⵙⵙⵉⵏ ⴰⴽⵉⵏ -
Page 276 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Based silence. There were sddenly dim shadows on the gorund. Their party was buried in 2017.
Moonlight.
 Snape ⵢⴻⵎⵍⴰⵍ ⴷ Lupin, Pettigrew ⴷ Ron, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ. Black is frozen. dignition
A hand shot out to stop Harry and Hermione.
 ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⵣⵎⴻⵔ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵡⴰⵍⵉ ⵍⵃⵉⵔⴼⴰ ⵏ Lupin. ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⴷⴷⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵃⴻⵔⴼⵉ. ⵙⵢⵉⵏ ⴱⴷⴰⵏ ⵢⵉⴹⴰⵔⵔⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⵜⵜⵃⴻⵣⵣⵉⴱⴻⵏ.
 “Ah, my A —” Hermione said with a demonstrator. “It didn’t get the lawyer! ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵍⴰⵎⴰⵏ!”
 “ⴰⵔⵡⴻⵍ,” ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Black ⵙ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ. "She's. Now she's."
 But Harry could not escape. Ron is chained to Pettigrew and Lupine. Jumps forward but Black
He caught him in the chest and threw him back.
 “Leave it to me— BOARD!”
 There is a very famous Snarling novel. Lubin's head is bobbing. So was her body. his
Shoulders were hunching. Hair was visibly sprouting on his face and hands, which shivered
In exposed feet. There is a certain amount of Crookchanks at the end sometimes; He was going back —
 As the wolf stood up, biting his long jaws, Sirius moved out of Harry's side. have
has been changed. The enormous, bearlike dog bounded forward. As the werewolf wrenched itself free
of the manacle he tied, the dog seizing him by the neck, and drawing him back, away from the
Ron and Pettigrew. They were adapted, to the birds, which were closed among them.
 Harry stood, turned on by the sight, too eager for a fight to notice anything else. compliance
Hermione’s taunting plea —
 Pettigrew had landed on Lupin’s broken nose. Ron, no longer on his bandaged leg, collapsed. there
He was a wall, a wall of light—and Ron sat motionless on the ground. Another voice —
Crookshanks flew into the air and back to earth in a flash.
 “Expelliarmus.” cried Harry, pointing to his own sword at Pettigrew; Lupine’s wand came out high to
air and out of sight. “Stay where you are!” Harry shouted, running forward.
 It's too late. Pettigrew was changing. Harry saw his river Bill flowing in the woods over Ron.
He reached out and heard a rustle in the grass.
 There was festivity and excitement; Harry turned to see the wolf flying away; compliance
Quickly into the forest —
Page 277 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Sirius, he’s out, Pettigrew has been replaced!” Harry shouted.
 The black was bleeding; There were bruises on his head and leg, but on Harry’s words, he
He reached again, and in an instant the sound of his footsteps faded to silence as he sighed
about the country.
 Harry and Hermione went out to Ron.
 “What did he do to her?” Hermione whispered. Run's eyes were only half closed, his mouth
hung open; He was actually alive, I could hear him breathing, but he didn't seem
Know them.
 "I don't know. . ."
 Harry looked around nervously. Black and Lupine both went… they had no one but Snape for
The company, is still done, is unaware, in the air.
 "We'd better get them to the castle and tell someone," Harry said, pulling his hair out of
Eyes, trying to think straight. "come -"
 But then, from outside the field of their imagination, they heard a soul, a flesh: a flesh in the soul...
“Sirius,” Harry mumbled, peering into the darkness.
 He had been unconscious for a while, but there was nothing they could do for Ron in the meantime, and .
By the sounds of it, Black was in trouble —
 Harry stood up at once, Hermione right behind him. The yelping seemed to be coming from the
ground near the edge of the lake. They pulled up to him, and Harry, running fast, felt cold
Regardless of what it's supposed to mean -
 The yelping stopped abruptly. As the the reached the lakeshore, the saw wyw — Sirius has turned
They returned to a man. He was kneeling on all fours with his hands on his head.
 “Nooo,” ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ. “No… please….”
 And then Harry saw them. Dementors, at least a hundred of them, are falling in a black heat around
The sea is on their side. Studied, the cold, like ice cream in the inside, started the ship
to clear his vision; ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵜⵜⴱⴰⵏⴻⵏⴷ ⵓⴳⴰⵔ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵟⵟⵍⴰⵎ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵢⴰⵍ ⵜⴰⵎⴰ; are
She turned on them…
 “Hirmione, think about something!” cried Harry, raising his wand, spinning furiously to try
And averting his gaze, he shook his head to get rid of the nauseous feeling that had started inside him—
Page 278 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 I'm going to live with my dad. ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⴼⴼⵖⵖ ⵙⴳ ⴷⵓⵔⵙⵍⵉ.
 He forced himself to think in black, and without black, he began to shout: “Expectto patronum!
Wait for the guard!”
 The black blinked and collapsed, lying motionless on the ground, black as death.
 All will be right. ⴰⴷ ⴷⴷⵓⵖ ⴰⴷ ⴷⴷⵔⴻⵖ ⵢⵉⴷⵙ.
 “Wait guard! Hermione, please help! Wait for the guard!”
 “Wait —” Hermione whispered, “Wait — wait —”
 But she couldn't do it. There are guards, not ten legs. They made a
A village garden about Harry and Hermione, approaching.
 “RAJU ASELWAY!” Harry shouted, trying to clear the noise from his ears.
“RAJU ASELWAY!”
 A faint silver orb shot out of his forehead and hovered like a lightning bolt in front of him. suddenly,
Harry felt Hermione sink to his side. There was only one... everyone but him...
 “Wait — wait guard —”
 Harry was guaranteed by the legs were arrested in the milk. Fog was clouding his eyes. With great strength, he fought
Just to remember — Sirius isn't a jerk — he's not a jerk — we'll be fine — we'll live with it
—
 “Wait for the guard!” He's silent.
 By the dim light of the Patronus' formless body, he saw a Dementor had stopped, very close to him. it
ⵓⵔ ⵉⵣⵎⵉⵔ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵣⵔⵉ ⴳ ⵓⵙⵉⴳⵏⵡ ⵏ ⵓⵏⴳⴰⵙ ⵏ ⵓⵥⵕⴼ ⵍⵍⵉ ⵉⵙⴽⵔ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ. The dead hand, and smoothly.
from under the stairs. She made a spell as if to sweep the Patronus aside.
 “No — no —” Harry whispered. “ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵎⴻⵍⵙⵉ... ⵜⵜⵕⴰⴵⵓⵖ ⴰⵄⴻⵙⵙⴰⵙ —”
 He could their footsteps he could see, he could hear their shuddering breaths like an evil wind blowing around him. the
The nearby Dementor seemed to contemplate it. Then she raised both her broken hands — and .
straightening his flesh.
Page 279 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Where eyes should be, there’s only thin, pale skin, painted crudely
About fake guns. ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ-ⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵎⵉ... ⴷ ⴰⴼⴻⵔⵟⴻⵟⵟⵓ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵙⵙⵏⴻⵏ ⴰⵔⴰ, ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⵉⵏ ⵚⵚⵉⴼⴰ, ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵔⵙ-ⴷ ⴰⵣⵡⵓ ⵙ
A description of a hearse.
 A dreadful dread filled Harry so he couldn't move or speak. ⴱⴰⵜⵔⵓⵏⵓⵙ ⵏⵏⵙ ⵉⴼⴼⵖ ⴷ
dead.
 The white light commands it. He has to fight… expecto patronum… he can’t see… and in
In the distance, he heard the familiar cry… expecto patronum… Engulfed in mist around Sirius,
And he got his arm... they won't...
 But some strong hands, Klammmy send themselves back on Harry’s back of Harry. they
They were forced to be forced by the story… Yizmer to feel sensitive… Ad take the first…
It can certainly to feel that... Yemmas is accused in the ears... Tella will be
The last thing he heard —
 And then, out of the sinking fog, he thought he saw a silver light moving .
They were flying high… he felt himself fall forward onto the grass… face down, too weak to
Glancing, sick and shaking, Harry opened his eyes. The Dementor had to free him. the
The blinding light was illuminating the grass around it… Hunting stopped, the cold was
Improved...
 Something was dragging the Dementors back… He was attacking him and Black and .
Hermione… They were leaving…
 The air is also hot…
 With every ounce of strength he could muster, Harry lifted his head a few inches and saw a
The liver between the light, smoking quickly on the ocean... Tiṭṭawwin shut down by Tydy, Harry tried to
Remove what is.
You watched her unable to stop as she reached the other shore. For a moment, Harry saw, by its
A flash, someone’s tapping him… he raises his hand to block it… someone’s looking
It sounds terribly familiar… but it can’t be…
 Harry didn't understand. He couldn't think anymore. He felt the last of his strength leave him,
And his head hit the ground as he realized.


Page 280 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com


Chapter Twenty-First
Hermione Sicrett
 “Goding thing… She was silenced... Mothers and one in them didn’t die... doesn’t like that… by
honor, it’s good to have you there, Snape…”
Chapter 281 out of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Thank you, Minister.”
 “The Merlin Scroll, second grade, I’d say. First, if I can be ganged up on!”
 “Thank you very much indeed, Minister.”
 “Nasty cut you got there… Black’s work, I presume?”
 “As a matter of fact, it’s Potter, Weasley, and Granger, the minister…”
 "No!"
 “Blok threw them away, and I saw that bad. Confundus’s keeping up, let’s judge with the opponent
trip. They seem to think there’s a chance he’s innocent. They weren’t
They are responsible for their actions. On the other hand, their intervention may have allowed Black to
Rev... Iban were thinking Aberkaan with one hand. They have
Too far ahead of now… I’m afraid he’ll give them a rather high opinion of
Themselves… and of course, Potter was always granted an unusual amount of permission
By the principal —”
 “Oh, well, Snape… Harry Potter, you know… We all have a bit of a curiosity as to where he is .
concerned."
 "And yet — is it better to be given so much special treatment?" Personally, I try to treat
him meke a tuther student. And every other student will be suspended — at the very least — for
leading his friends into such danger. Take note, the minister — against all school rules — after all
Help has been set for Ohio — outside the border, night, speaks and food
and an assassin—and I have reason to believe he’s been going to Hogsmeade on a regular basis, too—”
 “Well, well… let’s see, Snape, let’s see… The boy was undoubtedly naughty…”
 Harry listened with his eyes tight shut. ⵉⵃⵓⵍⴼⴰ ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ. ⴰⵡⴰⵍⴻⵏ ⵉ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵍⴰ
It sounds like it’s traveling so loudly from his ears to his brain that it’s hard to
Tim morning.... young Hilane like calves; His tits were too heavy to lift… He wanted to stay here, on
This emotional silence, forever...
 “What surprised me the most was the behavior of the Dementors… you really have no idea what they
ⵜⵜⴽⴻⵎⵎⵉⵍⴻⵏ, ⴰ Snape ?”
 "No, Minister... by the time I came 'round they were heading back to their seats in
The doors…”
ⴰⵙⴻⴱⵜⴻⵔ 282 ⵙⴻⴳ 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "ⵉⴼⴰⵣⴻⵏ. ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ Black, ⴷ Harry, ⴷ ⵜⴻⵇⵛⵉⵛⵜⵏⵏⵉ —”
 “All not themselves keep themselves in the time I reached out. ⵇⵇⵏⴻⵖ ⵓ ⵙⵇⴻⴷⵛⴻⵖ Aberkan, ⵙ ⵜⴱⴰⵖⵓⵔⵜ, ⵙ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ
ducks, and brought them all straight to the castle.”
 There was a pause. Harry’s head of bananas like a little bit more sensitive, and as it is, a series of rest.
The feeling in the pit of his stomach grew.
 He opened his eyes.
 Everything was a little distorted. Someone took off his glasses. ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵥⵥⴻⵍ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵟⵟⵍⴰⵎ.
hospital wing. At the end of the district, could get to understand Mad Putin with the village of
ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵇⴻⵔⵔⵉⴱ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵙⵓ. Harry blushed. ⴰⵛⴻⴱⴱⵓⴱ ⴰⵣⴻⴳⴳⴰⵖ ⵏ Ron ⵉⴱⴰⵏⴷ ⴷⴷⴰⵡ ⵡⵉⵏ ⵏ Massa Pomfrey.
arm.
 Aarry to the Sh theesis on the script. In Oussa to the right side there was Hermione. Moon light is
She collapsed on her bed. His eyes were open too. ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⴷ ⴰⵎ ⵓⵥⵔⵓ, ⵓ ⵎⵉ ⵜⵡⴰⵍⴰ ⴰⵢⴰ
Harry had gotten up, pressed a finger to her lips, and then pointed to the hospital wing door. He was rich,
And the sounds of Cornelius Fudge and Snape were coming from her from the hallway outside.
 Madam Pomfrey now came walking briskly up the stairs to Harry's bed. noting
In it. She was taking a large part of the chocolate which was not in life. ⵉⵜⵜⴱⵉⵏⴷ ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ
ⴰⵥⵔⵓ ⴰⵎⴻⵥⵢⴰⵏ.
 “ⴰⵀ, ⵜⴼⴻⵀⵎⴻⴹ!” ⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ. She placed the chocolate on Harry's bedside table and
He started poking her with a small brush.
 “How’s Ron?” exclaimed Harry and Hermione together.
 "He'll live," Madame Pomfrey said calmly. “As for you two, you will stay here until I .
Agree — Potter, what do you think you’re doing?”
 Harry had remained, and made l'écaranis and made the mother tongue.
 ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ: “Ilaq ⴰⴷ ⵡⴰⵍⵉⵖ ⴰⵏⴻⵎⵀⴰⵍ ⵏ ⵜⴻⵙⵏⴰⵡⵉⵜ.”
 “Putter,” said Massa Pomfrey by the pride, “there’s no. They have Aberkaan. suspended
Briefly. Dementors will make that kiss any time now —”
 "what?"
Chapter 283 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry rolled off the bed; Hermione was doing the same thing. But his voice was heard in the
ⴰⴱⵔⵉⴷ ⵏ ⴱⴻⵔⵔⴰ; The next second, Cornelius Fudge and Snape entered the classroom.
 “Harry, Harry, what’s that?” Fudge said, looking at her with concern. “You should be in bed — he has .
Some chocolate?” ” calls Massa Pomfrey in Lherrill.
 “Minister, listen!” Harry said. “Black Sirius is innocent! Peter Pettigrew designed his own death! we
I saw him tonight! You can’t allow Dementors to work this for Sirius, it’s —”
 But Fudge was shaking his head with a small smile on his face.
 'Harry, Harry, you're so sorry, you've endured a terrible ordeal, lie down, now, .
We have everything under control…”
 “YOU DON’T HAVE!” Harry shouted. “SHE HAD THE WRONG MAN!”
 “Minister, listen, please,” said Hermione; She ran to Harry's side and was smiling.
with a smile on Fudge's face. “I saw him too. He’s a rune rat, he’s an animagus, Bittigro, I
I mean, it’s —.”
 “See, minister?” Snap said. “Confused, both of them… Black's done a pretty good job in
them…"
 “WE'RE not confudddd!” Harry passed.
 “Minister! Teacher!” said Miss Pomfrey angrily. “I must force you to leave. Butter is my
patience, and he must not despair!”
 "Not long, I'm struggling to tell him what happened!" Harry said excitedly. “If only I .
listen -"
 But Madam Pomfrey suddenly stuffed a large chunk of chocolate into Harry”s mouth; It works,
And she took the opportunity to force him back into bed.
 “Now, the minister is concerned, these children need protection. Please let go.”
 The door opened again. and Dumbldur. Harry ate his mouthful of chocolate with
Big problem and it pops up again.
 “Headmaster Dumbledore, Sirius the Black—”
 “For heaven’s sake!” Mrs. Pomfrey said sympathetically. “Is it a hospital farm or not?
Professor, I have to keep —”
Page 284 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "I'm sorry, Poppy, but I need a word with Mr. Potter and Mrs. Granger," Dumbledore said .
With rest. “I’m talking to Sirius Black —”
 “Did I tell you it was a story about Peter?” He pulled out the Snap.
“Something about a lizard, and Bittijro lives —”
 "That's really Black's story," Dumbledore said, looking at Snape intently through his half moon .
Forests.
 “And not the boss is not considered a pool?” snapped Snape. “Piter Petegrew was not in 2019 .
Criking you and I didn’t see any sign of it around.”
 “That was because you were knocked out, Professor!” Hermione said anxiously. “No
It arrived in time for you to hear.”
 “Miss Granger, HOLD YOUR TONGUE!”
 “Now, Snap,” said Vodge, he started, “this woman woman was stopped in her office, we had to do
Certificate —.”
 "You would like to speak to Harry and Hermione alone," said Dumbledore abruptly. “Cornelius,
Sephirus, Bobby — please find us.”
 “Heydmaster!” Madame Bumphrey sighed. “They need treatment, they need rest —”
 "This cannot wait," Dumbledore said. “I have to hack.”
 Madam Pomfrey crashed insulins, and quickly go to the bureaucrat at the end of the store, keeping .
The door is behind him. Fudge looked at the large gold pocket watch that hung around his desk.
 “The Dementors should have arrived by now,” he said. “I’m going to meet them. Dumbledore, rad
I’ll see you upstairs.”
 He went to the door to open it for Snape, but Snape didn't answer.
 "Don't you believe a word of Black's story?" Snape hissed, his eyes scanning the
The face of Dumbledore.
 "I want to speak with Harry and Hermione alone," Dumbledore replied.
 Snape took a step towards Dumbledur.
Page 285 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Sirius Black showed he was capable of murder at the age of sixteen,” he breathed. “You don’t have
Have you forgotten that, Headmaster? Haven’t you forgotten that he once tried to kill me?”
 "My memory is as good as ever, Severus," Dumbledore said softly.
 Snape spun on his heel and pushed through the door Fudge still held. stay behind .
they were, and Dumbledore turned to Harry and Hermione. They both burst into speech at the same time
time.
 “Professor, Black is telling the truth — we saw Pettigrew — he ran away when Professor Lupine said .
He became a wolf —”
 “— he’s a mouse —”
 “—— The in front of Pettigrew, I want to say, snow, smother —”
 “— Pettigrew is attacking Ron, not Sirius —”
 But Dumbledore raised his hand to stop the flood of explanations.
 "It is your turn to listen, and I beg you not to interrupt me, for there is very little time," he said .
He said quietly. “There is not a single piece of evidence to support Black’s story, except your word — it’s .
The word of two-thirds of harassments haven’t lost no one. A street full of eyewitnesses
They seriously saw Sirius kill Pettigrew. I personally provided evidence to the Ministry that Sirius had
He was a keeper of the mystery of the stones.”
 “The Lupin professor can with me —” Harry said, he can’t stop himself .
 “Professor Lupine is now deep in the forest, unable to say anything to anyone. While there is
Another person, will be a little bit more, Serus will be a very satisfactory against the dead. I might add that werewolves are
She is not trusted by most of our species, so her help will be valued by very few and it means that
and Sirius are old friends—”
 "but -"
 “Listen to me, Harry. It’s been a while, you understand me? Please note that Professor Snape
version of events is far more convincing than yours.”
 "He hates Sirius," Hermione insisted. “All because of some stupid trick Sirius played on
he -"
Page 286 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Sirius doesn’t act like an innocent man. Attack on the old lady — she joined Gryffindor .
The tower with the bell — without Pettigrew, alive or dead, we wouldn’t have had a chance to overcome
Sirius’s phrase.”
 “But you believed us.”
 "Yes, I do," said Dumbledore quietly. “But I haven’t got the power to make other men see the truth, or
The Minister of Magic will be disappointed…”
 Harry looked at the face of the tomb and felt like the ground beneath him was collapsing.
quickly. He thought that Dumbledore might solve something. have
Dumbledore tries to blow some happy air out of the air. But only... their final hope was
gone.
 "Whatever we need," Dumbledore said in a pleased manner, his light blue eyes moving from Harry to
Hermion, “and more time.”
 “But —” Hermione started. and they have become very green and green. "Oh!"
 “Now, pay attention,” Dumbledore said, sounding very soft, and very clear. “Siros was locked in .
Professor Flitwick's office on the seventh floor. The thirteenth screen from the West
The tower. If all goes well, you’ll be able to save more than one desperate life tonight. but
Remember this, both of you: you don't have to see. Ms. Granger, you know the law — you know
Whatever is at stake… you — must — not — see.”
 Harry had no idea what was going on. Dumbledore turned on his heel and looked back.
As it arrives at the door.
 “I’ll lock you in. It’s —” he bit his lip, “five minutes to midnight. miss
Granger, three shots should do it. good luck."
 "good luck?" Harry passed as the door falls after Dumbledore. “Three turns? What's he
talking about? What should we do?”
 But Hermione was simultaneously simultaneously simultaneously buried a long,
Very nice gold chains.
 “Harry, come here,” she whispered. "quickly!"
 Harry turned to her, completely shocked. She was holding the chain. He saw a small,
l'hourglass floats are trapped over.
Chapter 287 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "here -"
 She put the chain around his neck too.
 "ready?" he said breathlessly.
 “And what do we work?” Harry said, fell all.
 Hermiee has been sold with three times.
 The upper ward melted. Harry had the impression that he was flying very fast, backwards. detention
of colors and shapes passed him, his ears blinked, he tried to shout but he couldn't hear
His own voice —
 And then he felt the solid ground beneath his feet, and everything came back into focus again—
 He was standing next to Hermione in the empty entrance hall and a stream of golden sunlight
He was rolling on the hardwood floor from the open front doors. The simultaneously succeeded
Hermione, the ears of the ear is approaching in the head.
 “Hermione, what —?”
 “In here!” Hermione took Harry's hand and led him across the hall to the bathroom door.
closet; She opened it, pushed him inside among the bottles and blankets, then locked the door
Behind them.
 “What — how — Hermione, what happened?”
 “We’re going back in time,” Hermione whispered, lifting the chain from Harry’s neck in the
Darkness. “Some hours back….”
 Harry found her own foot and gave it a very hard squeeze. It becomes very, which is very likely that it becomes s
It is possible that he feels very effectively.
 "but -"
 “Shh! listen! Someone's coming! I’m thinking — I’m thinking maybe we are!” Hermione had her ear
The sights on the jail door.
 “Footsteps on the hall… yeah, I think we’re the ones going down to Hagrid’s!”
 “You’re telling me,” Harry whispered, “that we’re here in this dungeon and we’re out there .
also?"
Page 288 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Yeah,” Hermione said, her ear still pressed against the closet door. “Sovey, and we are. It doesn't appear.
Like more than three people… and we’re moving slowly because we’re under pressure
cup - "
 She interrupted, still listening carefully.
 “We’ve stopped with the front of the front….”
 Hermione sat on a raised bunk and looked relaxed, but Harry wanted some
Questions answered.
 “Who are that’s the thing of ear?”
 'It's called the Time-Turner,' Hermione whispered, 'and I got it from Professor McGonagall in
Our first day back. I’ve been using it all year to access all my lessons. Professor McGunagall
I worked for me not to say to someone. You must play all kinds of characters for the department of
Magic so I could have one. They should be told that I am a student of example, and that I am not, never have been,
I don’t use it for anything but my studies… I look back on it so I can work longer hours
Also, that’s how I was doing multiple lessons at once, see? but…
 “Harry, I don’t understand what Dumbledor wants. Why did he tell us to go back to three
hours? How do that do Sirius?”
 Harry stared at her middle face.
 "There must be something going on around now that wants us to change," he whispered.
"Why happen? We're going to be up to three hours this..."
 “That’s three hours ago, and we’re going to Hagrid,” Hermione said. “We just heard
Our self....”
 Harry right; He feels like he was singing his whole mind in the sight.
 “Dumbledore just said — just said we could save more than one innocent life…” And then he faltered .
he. “Hermione, let’s save Buckbeak!”
 “But — how will that help Sirius?”
 “He Dumbledore — just called where the ship is — the Fliitwick ship ship !
Where they manage to keep Sirius! We need to get Buckbeak to the Takat to save.
ⵙⵉⵔⵢⵓⵙ! If Sirius runs away from Buckbeak — they can all run away!”
Page 289 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 From what Harry could see of Hermione's face, she could see a smirk on it.
 “If we’ve done that if they are seen, it’ll be magic!”
 “Wow, we gotta try, don’t we?” Harry said. He stood up and pressed his ear against the
gate. “They don’t sound like anyone there… get in, let’s go.”
 Harry pushed open the closet door. The cake room was thoroughly. Girls as a silent silence.
ⵣⴻⵎⵔⴻⵏ, ⴼⴼⵖⴻⵏⴷ ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵜⵃⴰⵏⵓⵜⵏⵏⵉ, ⵃⴻⴹⵔⴻⵏⴷ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⵃⴰⵏⵓⵜ ⵏ ⵡⴻⵥⵔⵓ. ⵜⵉⵍⵉⵡⵉⵏ ⵍⵍⴰⵏⵜ ⵢⴰⴽⴰⵏ
ⵙ ⵜⵖⵓⵔⵉ, ⵜⵇⴰⵛⵓⵛⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵙⴻⴽⵍⴰ ⵏ ⵜⴻⵥⴳⵉ ⵜⴰⵃⴻⵔⴼⵉⵜ ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵣⴻⴷⵖⴻⵏⵜ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⴻⵍⵜ ⵏⵏⵉⴹⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵡⵓⵔⴻⵖ.
 “ⵎⴽ ⴷⴰ ⵉⵜⵜⵥⵕⴰ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵢⴰⵏ ⴱⵕⵕⴰ ⵏ ⵜⴼⵍⵓⵜ —” ⵀⵉⵔⵎⵉⵓⵏ ⵜⵙⵙⵔⵇⴱ, ⴰⵔ ⵜⵥⵕⵕⴰ ⵖⵔ ⵜⵖⵔⵎⵜ ⴷⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⵏ .
them.
 “ⴰⴷ ⵏⵔⵓⵃ ⴼⴻⵍⵍⴰⵙ”, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Harry ⵙ ⵍⵇⴻⴷⴷ. « ⵙⵔⵉⴷ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⴻⵥⴳⵉ, ⵙ ⵍⵅⵉⵔ? We should be following
ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⵏ ⵜⵜⴻⴵⵔⴰ ⵏⴻⵖ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏⵏⵉⴹⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵃⴰⴷⵔⴻⵜ ⵉⵎⴰⵏⵏⵡⴻⵏ —”
 “No, but let’s go to the house of the house!' » ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ Hermione ⵙ ⵜⴼⴻⴽⴽⴰⵙ. « ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⴼⴽ ⴰⴷ ⵏⴻⵃⵔⴻⵣ
Through Hagrid's front door, or we'll be seen! We should be near Hagrid’s by now!”
 Still working out what she meant, Harry set off at a sprint, Hermione behind him. notate
ⵖⴻⴼ ⵣⴷⴰⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵥⴻⴳⵡⴰ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵢⵉⵅⵅⴰⵎⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵜⵥⴻⴳⵡⴰ, ⵃⴻⴱⵙⴻⵏ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵍⵡⴻⵇⵜ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔⵙⴻⵏ, ⵙⵢⵉⵏ ⴼⴼⵖⴻⵏ
ⵜⵉⴽⴽⵍⵜ ⵢⴰⴹⵏ, ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⴰⵣⵣⴰⵍⵏ, ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⵏⵇⴰⵙⵏ ⵅⴼ Whamping Willow, ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⵏⴼⴰⵍⵏ ⵙ ⵜⵙⴳⴰ ⵏ ⵓⵏⵔⴰⵔ ⵏ .
forest…
 ⵙ ⵍⴰⵎⴰⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⵍⴻⵎⵎⴰⵙⵜ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵙⴻⴽⵍⴰ, Harry ⵢⴻⵣⵣⵉⴷ ; Twenty seconds later, Hermione arrived at his side
He, feels like.
 “Yow,” she said. “ⵉⵍⴰⵇ ⴰⴷ ⵏⵔⵓⵃ ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵡⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵀⴰⴳⵔⵉⴷ... ⵃⴰⴷⵔⴻⵜ ⵉⵎⴰⵏⵏⵡⴻⵏ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵡⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏ, ⴰ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ...”
 ⵜⵜⴳⴻⵏ ⴰⴱⵔⵉⴷⵏⵙⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵜⵙⵓⵙⵎⵉ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵙⴻⴽⵍⴰ, ⵜⵜⴽⴻⵎⵎⵉⵍⴻⵏ ⴰⵔⵎⵉ ⴷ ⵜⵍⴻⵎⵎⴰⵙⵜ ⵏ ⵜⴻⵥⴳⵉ. Two
They saw the front of Hagrid's house and heard the knock on his door. mutual
ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵍⴱⴰⵟⴰⵟⴰ ⵏ ⵍⴱⴰⵟⴰⵟⴰ ⵜⴰⵎⴻⵇⵇⵔⴰⵏⵜ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵜⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍⴷ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵢⴰⵍ ⵜⴰⵎⴰ. Hagrand You've been on
ⵜⴰⵡⵡⵓⵔⵜ, ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵃⴻⵣⵣⵉⴱ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⴷ ⵜⴰⵎⴻⵍⵍⴰⵍⵜ, ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⵍⴻⵎⵎⴰⵙⵜ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵡⴰⵍⵉ ⴰⵏⵡⴰ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⴱⴻⴷⴷⴻⵏ. And Hari calls himself
sound.
 “It’s me. ⵏⴻⵍⵙⴰ ⵜⴰⵇⴱⵓⵛⵜ ⵏ ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵥⴻⵔ. ⴻⴵⴵⴰⵖ ⴰⴷ ⵏⴻⴽⵛⴻⵎ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵏⴻⴽⴽⴻⵙ.”
 “Yeh needs to come!” Hagrid whispered. ⵉⴱⴻⴷⴷ ⵖⴻⵔ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ, ⵙⵢⵉⵏ ⵢⴻⵇⵇⴻⵏ ⵜⴰⵡⵡⵓⵔⵜ ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ.
 « ⴷ ⴰⵢⴰ ⴰⵢ ⴷ ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵉⴳⴻⵔⵔⵣⴻⵏ ⴰⴽⴽ ⴰⵢ ⵏⴻⵅⴷⴻⵎ », ⴰⵢ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Harry ⵙ ⵍⵇⴻⵔⴱ.
 “ⴰⴷ ⵏⵔⵓⵃ ⵛⵡⵉⵟ”, ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ Hermione ⵙ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ. “ⵉⵍⴰⵇ ⴰⴷ ⵏⴻⵇⵔⴻⴱ ⵖⴻⵔ Buckbeak!”
Chapter 290 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 ⵜⵜⴽⴻⵕⵕⵓⵃⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵙⴻⴽⵍⴰ ⴰⵔⵎⵉ ⵡⴰⵍⴰⵏ Hippogriff ⵉⵃⴻⵎⵎⵍⴻⵏ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵇⵇⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵍⵃⵉⴹ ⵏ ⵜⵖⵉⵡⴰⵏⵜ .
Hagrid's Pumpkin Box.
 "now?" Harry whispered.
 "No!" Hermione said. « ⵎⴰ ⵏⴻⴽⴽⴻⵔⵉⵜ ⵜⵓⵔⴰ, ⵉⵎⴷⴰⵏⴻⵏⵏⵏⵉ ⵏ Useqqamu ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜⵅⴻⵎⵎⵉⵎⴻⵏ ⴷ Hagrid ⴰⵢ ⵜⵉⴷⵢⴻⵙⴱⴻⴷⴷⴻⵏ .
free! ⵉⵍⴰⵇ ⴰⴷ ⵏⵕⴰⴵⵓ ⴰⵍⴰⵎⵎⴰ ⵡⴰⵍⴰⵏⵜ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵇⵇⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⴱⴻⵔⵔⴰ!”
 “ⴷ ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⵖⴷ-ⵢⴻⴼⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⵣⴰⵍ ⵏ ⵙⴹⵉⵙ ⵏ ⵜⴻⵙⴷⵉⴷⵉⵏ”, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Harry. ⴰⵢⴰ ⵢⴻⴱⴷⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴱⴰⵏⴷ ⴷ ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵣⵎⵉⵔ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵏⴻⵅⴷⴻⵎ.
 At the time, you were the Chinese farmer from the inside of the Hagrid company.
 “ⴷ Hagrid ⵉ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵇⴻⵔⵔⵉⴱⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⴱⴻⵔⵜ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵍⴻⴼ,” ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ Hermione ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ. “I’ll find Scabbers in a
moment -"
 Honestly, a few minutes varying, they heard Hermione’s fall by the punch.
 « Hermione », ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Harry ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ, « ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷⵏⵉⵏⵉ ⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵏⴻⴽⵏⵉ — ⴰⴷ ⵏⵔⵓⵃ ⴽⴰⵏ ⴷⵉⵏⵏⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵏⴻⵟⵟⴻⴼ Pettigrew — »
 "No!" » ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ Hermione ⵙ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵟⵟⵓⵜ. “ⵓⵔ ⵜⴻⴼⵀⵉⵎⴻⴹ ⴰⵔⴰ? We were one of
ⵉⵣⴻⵔⴼⴰⵏ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⴷⵢⴰⵣⵜ ⵉⴳⴻⵔⵔⵣⴻⵏ ⴰⴽⴽ! ⵓⵍⴰⵛ ⵡⵉⵏ ⵉⵍⴰⵇⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵉⴱⴻⴷⴷⴻⵍ ⴰⴽⵓⴷ, ⵓⵍⴰⵛ ! accordance with rivals
ⴷⵓⵎⴱⵍⴷⵓⵔ, ⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵏⵡⴰⵍⴰ —”
 “Let’s just see ourselves and Hagrid!”
 “Harry, what do you think you’d do if you saw yourself waking up in Hagrid’s house?” said
Hermione.
 “I’ll — I’ll think I’m mad,” Harry said, “or I’ll think there’s some Dark Magic going on .
—”
 "Exactly! You don't understand, you might even get yourself killed! Don't you think? Professor
McGonagall told me what awful things happened when witches meddled with time...
Many of them end up mistakenly killing their past or future selves!”
 "okay!" Harry said. “It’s just idea, I just think —”
 But Hermine came after, you remembered the slavery. Harry renewed the character some Chinese to
Give the clear view of the doors of the front. Dombdore, Fodgee, former Usqamu, and
The custody were threatened from investigating.
 “We’re almost out!” The harmiyun’s disposal.
Page 291 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 And sure enough, moments later, Hagrid's back door opened, and Harry saw himself, Ron, and .
Hermione out of it and Hagrid. She was, we’d be absorbed, and the best feeling
Life, standing behind a tree, watches himself in the gloom of the storm.
 “It’s Okay, Beaky, it’s okay…” Hagrid said to Buckbeak. Sizen connected to Hari, Run, and
Hermione. "carry on. Get goin’.”
 “Hagred, we can —”
 “Let’s tell them what really happened —”
 “They can’t kill —”
 "go away! it's bad enough without so much trouble an' all!”
 Harry sees Hermione in the dressing room throwing on an invisibility cloak and
run.
 “Go faster. Don’t listen…”
 The ear was at the door of the front of Hagrid. The assassination party arrived. Hagrid turned around,
ARound and Headed back in to his cabin, leaving the back door ajar. He saw Harry Leah boy.
flatten in patches all the caps and Herard three pairs of feet retreating. He, Ron, and
Hermione walked away… but Harry and Hermione hiding in the trees could now hear what was
Located inside the cabin through the back door.
 “Where there’s a monster?” Machaniir’s name was taken.
 “Out — out,” Hagrid whispered.
 Harry pulled his head away from view as Macnair's face moved to Hagrid's window, staring out at the .
The mouth of the animal. Then they heard Fudge.
 “We — er — have to read you the official notice of execution, Hagrid. I will do it soon. and
Then you and Macnair should thank him. Macnair, You’re supposed to listen too, that’s procedure--”
 Machiner's face was chosen from the room. It’s now or never.
 “Do I’m just here,” Harry said quickly for Hermione. “I’ll do it.”
Page 292 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 When Fudge's speech began again, Harry came out from behind his desk and came out with a smile on his face.
Butch butch, approach Bookbick.
 “It is the decision of the Senior Management Committee that Hippogriff .
Bokbiak, who called him an everlasting word, will speak forever, and he will burn it on the sixth of June because of the sun.”
 Without warning, Harry blinked into Buckbeak's very familiar orange eyes once again and blinked.
Buckbick looks for his illegal hands and snacks. Harry bean to fumble with the knot
which connects Buckbeak to the wall.
 “
Author, Walden McNair…”
 “Come on, Buckbeak,” Harry murmured, “come on, we're going to help you. In a way…
By silenced….”
 “… as witnessed below. Hagrid, you sign here…”
 Harry rolled all the wiss on the corner, but Buckbeak was cleaned in the front legs.
 “Well, we’ll get that,” says the commission of the commission of the commission from the inside .
Hagrid's Room. “Hagrid, maybe it’ll be better if you stay inside —”
 “No, I — I don’t want to be with him… I don’t want him to be his wife —”
 The seats are elevated from inside the cabin.
 “Buckbeak, release!” Harry sighed.
 Harry went way over the railing on Buckbeak's side. The Hippogriff began to walk, rustling
Its leaves wisely. They were still ten feet away from the forest, in plain view of Hagrid's back
gate.
"One moment, please, Macnair," came Dumbledore's voice. “You have to sign, too.” the
they went to stop. Harry heaved on the rope. Buckbeak snapped his beak and walked a little
quickly.
 Hermione's white face was visible from behind the tree.
 "Harry, hul!" She said her mouth.
 Harry still hears the Dumbledore brand that speaks from inside the company. He gave the bowl.
Another window. Buckbeak broke into a violent crawl. They reached the trees…
Page 293 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "Quickly! Quickly!" Hermione was buried, and she ran out with a sharp from behind the backs, and even took a ship and.
Its weight was increased to make Buckbeak fly faster. ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵉⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍ ⵙ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⴱⴻⵔⵜⵉⵙ; are
ⵜⵓⵔⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵃⴱⴻⵙ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵡⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏ; They couldn't see Hagrid's room at all.
 "stop!" he muttered to Hermione's surprise. “It’s going to hear.”
 Hagrid's back door opened with a crack. Harry, Hermione, and Buckbeak stood erect;
Even the Hippogriff seemed to be listening intently. Silence… Then —
 “Where is he?” the Board member's booming voice said. “Where’s the animal?”
 “She was tied up here!” The guard said excitedly. “Withy! just now!”
 “How unusual,” Dumbledore said. There was a hint of sadness in his voice.
 “Bicking! Hagrid said quietly.
 There was a hissing noise, and a hissing noise. The guard seems to have lost his temper.
On the wall with anger. And then came the shock, this time they could hear Hagrid's words .
with his sacrifices.
 "The spirit! Parrowy! P Parks his younger, passed! Mosa has joy to his Circle and freeness! Pacucky, eating
boy!"
 Bushbak started to slip into ear, trying to return to Hagrid. Harry and Hermione
They used the jails and they found their feet at the part of the river to stop.
 “ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵡⵉⵏ ⵉ ⵜⵢⴻⵙⴼⴻⴹⴻⵏ!” The guard was asking. “We have to search deep, l
forest."
 “MacNair, if Buckbeak really was stolen, do you really think the thief would have saved him .
On foot?” Dumbledore said, still sounding angry. “Search the sky, if you will… Hagrid, .
I could do with a cup of tea. Or big brandy.”
 "O' — o' sure, Professor," said Hagrid, who sounded amused. “Come in, come in .
in…"
 Harry and Hermione listened intently. Sln feet, upper excretory diffusion,
With a knock on the door, then silence again.
 “Now what?” said Harry, looking around.
Page 294 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "We should hide here," said Hermione, who looked very worried. “We have to wait until 2020.
They returned to the castle. Then we wait until it’s safe to fly Buckbeak to Sirius’ lair.
He won’t be there for another couple of hours… Oh, that’s going to be hard…”
 She looked apprehensively over her shoulder at the forest floor. The sun was setting now.
 “Let’s get moving,” Harry said, thinking hard. “We need to be able to see
Whomping Willow, or we don’t know what’s going on.”
 “Okay,” Hermione said, gripping Buckbeak’s shoulder tightly. “But we have to be careful of
look, Harry, remember…”
 They moved across the forest, the darkness sinking deeper and deeper around them, until they were
They hid behind a stand of trees through which they were able to identify Willow.
 “There’s Ron!” Harry said quietly.
 A dark figure lounged on the grass and its breath echoed through the still night air.
 “Away from it—away from it—Scabbers, come here—”
 And then they saw two more figures materialize out of nowhere. Harry saw himself as
Hermione follows behind Ron. Then he saw Ron drowning.
 "quite! Get off, you stinking cat —”
 “There’s Sirius!” Harry said. The dominant form of the dog originates from the
Willow. They saw him walk past Harry and then hit him…
 “Looks even worse from here, doesn’t it?” Harry said, watching the dog pull Ron to
The roots. “Ouch — look, I’m just covered in roses — you too — that’s awesome —”
 The Whomping Willow was creaking and lashing out with its lower branches; They can see
themselves darting here and there, trying to reach the trunk. And then the tree rumbled.
 "It was Crookshanks who dressed up," Hermione said.
 “And there we go…” Harry mumbled. “Let go.”
Page 295 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 The moment they were gone, the tree began to move again. Seconds later, footsteps were heard
Very close to. Dumbledore, McNair, Fudge, and the former member of the Council were doing their jobs .
Road to the castle.
 “Right after we’d gone down into the passage!” Hermione said. "If only Dumbledore would come
with us…”
 "Macnair and Fudge are coming too," Harry whispered. “I bet you something Fudge .
He’d tell Macnair to kill Sirius on the spot…”
 They watch the four men ascend the castle crest and disappear from sight. For a few minutes
There was a building. so -
 “Here comes Lupine!” Harry said as they saw another figure running down the stone stairs and
Stop by Willoughby. Harry looked up at the sky. Doctors don't care about the moon.
completely.
 ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵍⵉⵏ Lupin ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴹⴻⴳⴳⵉⵄ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⴼⴻⵔⴷⵉⵙ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵇⵇⵏⴻⵏ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵡⴰⴽⴰⵍ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴹⴻⴳⴳⵉⵔⴷ ⵍⵇⴻⵛⵛ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⴼⴻⴽⴽⴰ. the
The tree stopped protesting, and so did Lupine, disappearing into the chaos in his roots.
 "If he'd only caught that button," Harry said. “ⵢⴻⵣⴳⴰⴷ ⴽⴰⵏ ⴷⵉⵏⵏⴰ...”
 He turned to Hermione.
 “If I just rushed out now and grabbed him, Snape wouldn’t be able to get him and —”
 “Harry, we shouldn’t see!”
 “How can you stand like this?” Hermione asked curiously. “He just stands here and I watch him .
Happened?" he hesitated. “I'm going to grab the cloak!”
 “Harry, so!”
 Hermione seized the back of Harry's robes not a moment too soon. Now only, they heard for the bucket
ⵏ ⵜⴻⵣⵍⵉⵜ. It was Hagrid, maxing ys will up to the castle, singing at the top of his voce, and
He goes a little while going. A great twist and slips out of her hands.
 "see?" Hermione whispered. "See what happens?" We have to stay ahead of the curve!
No, Buckbeak!”
Chapter 296 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 The hippogriff was frantically trying to get to Hagrid again; Harry had also gotten up.
She forced to take Buckbeak Drivers. They watched Hagrid sneak up to the castle. was
gone. Bookbeck stopped violence to get out. ⴰⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢⵉⵙ ⵢⴻⵖⵍⵉⴷ ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⴼ.
 As soon as two minutes passed, the Lind Girls again again, and Snape came from
They were, running towards Willow.
 Harry's cheeks twitched as they watched Snape crouch next to the tree, looking around. he
He grabbed the knife and held it.
 “It’s removed sanitizer,” Harry said with ears under the body.
 “Chh!”
 Snape holds the element that Lupin used to cut the tree, drained the harvest, and out of
watched as he dropped the candle.
 “So that’s it,” Hermione said quietly. “We’ve all been down there… and now we just have to wait .
only is falling again with us once...”
 She lasted the end of the Buck ambib, she chosen by presidency on the forest, Wisin remaining .
On the dry ground, his feet on his knees.
 "Harry, there's something I don't understand… Why didn't the Dementors take Sirius?" I
Chodesed the sand, Sin I think I’m happy... There are so much of them…”
 Hari also stayed. He understood what Dywala; How, as we are minimizing Dementor
Mouth to Harry's, some large foil came rushing across the sea and forced
The dementors will respond.
 The Hirmiee squad is a little time at a time when Harry's word is found.
 “But what is it?”
 "There's only one possible thing to do, and that's to make the Dementors go away," Harry said. “It’s true .
executive. One strong.”
 “But who made it?”
 Harry didn't say anything. He was thinking about the person he saw on the other end of the
lake. He knew who he thought he was… but how could he be?
Page 297 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “Don’t you know what they look like?” Hermione said excitedly. “Is he one of the teachers?”
 “No,” Harry said. “He wasn’t a teacher.”
 “But he must have been a really strong wizard, to blow away all those Dementors… If .
The Patronus was so bright, wasn’t it flattering? Can’t you see —?”
 “Yeah, I saw it,” Harry said quietly. “But… maybe I’m imagining it… I’m not thinking straight…
I flipped out right after that…”
 “Who do you think?”
 “I think —” Harry smiled, knowing how weird that was going to sound. “I thought it was mine
father."
 Harry looked back at Hermione and saw that her mouth was fully open now. She was looking at
with a rounded corner and a round.
 “Harry, your father is — well — dead,” she whispered.
 “I know that,” Harry whispered.
 “Do you think you’ve seen the ghost of him?”
 “I don’t know… no… he seems strong…”
 “But then —”
 “I wish I was seeing things,” Harry said. “But… from what I can see… he looks like him….
I’ve got the keys…”
 Hermione was still staring at him as if shocked at his sanity.
“I know it sounds silly,” Harry whispered. He turned to grab Buckbeak, who was digging his own
bats on the ground, apparently looking for insects. But he wasn't really sure about Buckbeak.
 He was thinking about his father and his father's three best friends… Moony, Wormtail, .
Padfoot, and Prongs… Did all four of them go out in the open tonight? The tail of the wolf has
He came back this afternoon when everyone thought he was dead... Unless that's impossible
Did my dad do the same? Was he taking things too literally? The face was so far away.
Too far to see clearly… but he felt right, for a moment, before losing consciousness…
Page 298 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 The leaves above their head rustled rapidly in the wind. The moon disappears into view behind the
He turns the clouds. Hermione sat with her face facing Willow and waited.
 And then, finally, after more than an hour…
 “Here we come!” Hermione whispered.
 She and Harry got to their knees. Buckbeak raised an eyebrow. They saw Lupine, Rune, and Pittigrew
They gently peel through holes in the roots. Then came Hermione… then she didn't realize
Snape, stalking nervously upstairs. Then it was Harry and Black. They all started walking towards the
castle.
 Harry's heart began to beat faster. He looked up at the sky. Any moment now, that
The cloud will move to the side to reveal the moon.
 “Harry,” Hermione murmured as if she knew exactly what he was thinking, “we should .
Stay put. We don’t have to see. There’s nothing we can do…”
 "So let's just let Pettigrew escape all over again…" Harry trailed off.
 “How do you expect to find an animal in the dark?” said Hermione. “No what to do!
We came back to help Sirius; We don’t have to do anything else!”
 "you're welcome!"
 The moon emerged from behind her cloud. They saw the little figures on the horizon stopped. so
They watched the movement —
 “There next comes Lupine,” Hermione whispered. “It changes.”
 “Hermione!” Harry said quietly. “We need to move!”
 “Don’t you don’t, I remember saying —”
 “What you need to participate! Lupin will return to the beach, directly to us!”
 Hermione sighed.
 "quickly!" She smiled, trying to untie Buckbeak. "Quick! Where are we going? Where are
Shall we hide? Dementors will come every time —”
 “To go back to the Hagrid!” Harry said. “It’s chaos now—come on!”
Page 299 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 They ran as fast as they could, Buckbeak cantering along behind them. They can listen to
and shewed after them.
 The cabin is on view; Harry rushed to the door and opened it, with Hermione and
Buckbeak flashed past him; Harry ducked behind them and closed the door. Vanging
the boarhound yelled loudly.
 “Shh, Fang, it’s us!” Hermione said, running over and licking his ears to shush him. "that
He was really close!” she told Harry.
 "Yes…"
 Harry was buried from the point. It was very difficult to condemn a lab from the Dagi.
ⴱⵓⵛⴽⴱⴻⴰⴽ ⵉⴱⴰⵏⴷ ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ ⵢⴻⴼⵔⴻⵃ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⵎⵉ ⴷⵢⵓⴼⴰ ⵉⵎⴰⵏⵉⵙ ⵢⵓⵖⴰⵍⴷ ⴷⴰⵅⴻⵍ ⵏ ⵡⴻⵅⵅⴰⵎ ⵏ Hagrid. He put himself in front.
of fire, flapped his wings proudly, and seemed ready for a good flight.
 "I think I'd better go outside again, you know," Harry shrugged. "I can't see what's going on
— We don’t see if Lawan’s —”
 Hermione looked up. Her expression was suspicious.
 “I’m not trying to interfere,” Harry said quietly. “But if we don’t see what’s going on,
How do we know when it’s time to save Sirius?”
 “Well… okay, then… I’ll wait here with Buckbeak… but Harry, be careful — there’s a wolf .
There outside — and Dementors.”
 Harry went outside and went over the company. He could hear the ear in night.
ⴷⵖⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵢⴰ ⴰⵢ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⵙⴽⴰⵏⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⴷⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ Dementors ⵜⵜⵇⴻⵔⵔⵉⴱⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ Sirius... Netta ⴷ Hermione ⴰⴷ ⵔⴻⵡⵍⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ
In it every moment…
 Harry looked out at the lake, his heart doing a sort of thump in his chest… Whoever had
He sent that the Patronus would appear at any moment…
 For a fraction of a second he stood, impassive, in front of Hagrid's door. They shouldn’t believe you.
But he didn’t want them to see it. He wanted to do a look... He needed to know...
 And the Dementors were there. They emerge from the darkness on all sides,
ⵜⵜⴼⴻⴳⴳⵉⴹⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵢⵉⵖⴻⵣⵔⴰⵏ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵍⴻⵍ... Ttbeɛden ⵙⴻⴳ ⵡⴰⵏⴷⴰ ⵉⴱⴻⴷⴷ Harry, ⵖⴻⵔ
Consent of the bank... Ur should be closer to...
 Harry started running. ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⵅⴻⵎⵎⴻⵎ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢⵉⵙ ⴰⵏⴰⴳⴰⵔ ⴱⴰⴱⴰⵙ... Ma ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ... ⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ
It was him… he had to know, he had to find out…
Page 300 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 The creek was draining closer and closer, but there was no sign of anyone. In another bank,
He could see little flashes of silver — his own attempts at a Patronus —
 There was a tree in the middle of the water. Harry ducked behind him, looking
carefully with leaves. On the opposite end, there are simultaneously silver linings
It's turned off. A sense of panic shot through him—any moment now—
 "series!" he said, looking around. "Where are you? Father, come —”
 But no one came. Harry lifted his head to look at the circle of Dementors across the lake. One of the
Them was hurting his head. It’s time for a savior to appear — but no one is coming to .
Help this time —
 And then it hit him — he understood. He didn't see his father he saw himself —
 Harry pushed himself out from behind the bushes and pulled out his wand.
 “WAIT FOR DELIVERY! ” he shouted.
 From the end of his thunder, not a shapeless gray cloud emerged, but a blinding, blinding cloud.
The silver lizard. He rubbed his eyes, trying to see what it was. It looks like a horse. compliance
Slowly silently away from her, across the beach. He saw her lower her head
And charge at the swarming Dementors… Now she was drifting around and going for black .
waves on the ground, and the Dementors were rolling back, dispersing, retreating into the
The darkness… they were gone.
 The Patron turned. Harry was looking down at the still water surface. it
He is not a horse. Not an intrusion, either. It's a meat. It looks and feels like the moon.
Upstairs... it was coming back to him...
 She stopped on the bank. His bones are not a sign on the ground because he returns to Harry with him.
Large, silver eyes. Slowly, she lowered her last head. And Harry knew…“brungs,” he
cold.
 But when his high-speed package appeared alongside the model, this was challenged.
 Harry stood there, arm outstretched. Then, with a garment of his heart, he heard the mediums .
After him. He turns around and sees Hermione fighting him, carrying Bookback
After him.
 “What did you do?” she said further. "You said you didn't want to touch a squirrel!"
Page 301 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “I just saved all of our lives…” Harry said. “Back here behind this car — I’ll explain.”
 Hermione listened to what just happened with her mouth open again.
 “Didn’t he see you?”
 “Yeah, weren’t you listening? I saw me but I thought I was Dad! It's okay!"
 “Harry, I can’t recognize her… She created a Patronus that destroyed everything in existence!
It’s very, very cool magic.”
 "I knew I could do it this time," Harry said, "because I've been through it before... If that allows
mean?"
 “I don’t know—Harry, look at Snape!”
 All are thinking about housing in another bank. Snape regained consciousness. he
ⵉⴳⴰ ⴰⵙⵎⵔⴽⵙ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⴰⵍⵙ ⵜⴰⵍⵖⵉⵡⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵜⴼⵔⴽⵉⵜ ⵏ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ, ⵀⵉⵔⵎⵉⵓⵏ, ⴷ ⴱⵍⴰⴽ ⵅⴼⵙⵏ. a
The fourth actor, no doubt that Ron, was already hiding on his side. They were later arrested in 2015.
before him, moving them towards the castle.
 “Actually, it’s almost time,” Hermione said honestly, checking her watch. “We have xf
Fifteen minutes later Dumbledore returned to the hospital wing. We need to strengthen .
Sirius and they’re going back to the house before anyone knows what we’re doing…”
 They waited, watching the swirling clouds move across the ocean, while the cliff in front of them
It changed in the hand. Buckbick, Bud, it's getting worse and worse.
 “Do you expect him to be there yet?” Harry said, going to check his watch. He looked out over the city.
And he started counting the windows to the right of the West Town.
 "look!" Hermione whispered. “ⴰⵏⵡⴰ ⵉ ⴷ ⵡⵉⵏⵏⴰ? Someone come back from the castle!”
 Harry stared into the darkness. The man is leaning against the pillars, towards one of the
Introduction. Something things are shared in the magazine.
 “McNair!” Harry said. “Development! He went to get Dementors! This is, Hermione.
—”
 Hermione wrapped her arms around Buckbeak's shoulders and Harry gave her a leg up. Then he put his
Always on one of the hills below the hunger and slips in front of him. ⵉⵊⵊⴰ .
Buckbika looks on his head and leads him to another side of his color as farmers.
Page 302 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "ready?" he muttered to Hermione's surprise. “So you caught me —”
 He created the sides of the book with his own ideas.
 Buckbeak flew straight into the dark sky. Harry took the legs with legs, Iowa s
Large wings grow strong underneath. Hermione was holding Harry very tightly around the
waist; It can be heard, “Ah, Ah — I don’t like this ah, really I don’t like that —”
 Harry urged Buckbeak forward. They were slowly repairing to the upper floor of the
ⵍⴻⵇⵚⴻⵔ... Harry ⵉⵊⴻⴱⴱⴻⴷ ⵙ ⵍⴵⴻⵀⴷ ⵜⴰⵎⴰ ⵜⴰⵣⴻⵍⵎⴰⴹⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ, Buckbeak ⵢⴻⵣⵣⵉⴷ. There was Harry
I’m trying to count the flying rounds past —
 “ⴰⵡⵓ!” He said, he told after the false.
 Bookbek stopped their careers and found in a feeling, if you don’t feel that
They continue to rise up and down several feet as the Hippogriff flaps its wings to stay in the air.
 “It was there!” Harry said, spotting Sirius as they stood up next to the window. He put out his hand, and
As Buckbeak’s wings fell, he could push harder against the glass.
 Black looked up. Harrey who became a money him. He grew up from his vehicles, and was wandered to an area
I tried to hear, but it was close.
 “Stand back!” Hermione called out to him, removing her wand, still holding onto the shoulder of
Harry's controls with his left hand.
 “The Hohura!”
 The window opened.
 “How — how —?” Black said sadly, looking at the Hippogriff.
 “Get on — there’s not much time,” Harry said, gripping Buckbeak tightly on each side of his ankle .
Slick my neck to hold him tight. “You have to get out of here — the Dementors are coming — .
MacNair went to get them.”
 Black put his hand on either side of the window frame and pushed his head and shoulders out of the
it. He was very lucky because he was so sweet. Within seconds, he managed to slam a leg over Buckbeak 's.
backwards and pulled himself onto the Hippogriff behind Hermione.
 “Okay, Buckbeak, wake up!” Harry said, shaking a boulder. “Up to the tower — come on.”
Page 303 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 The hippogriff flapped a beat of its powerful wings and they were soaring upwards again, as high as
the top of the West Tower. Buckbeak landed with a thud on the walls, and Harry and
Hermione snapped out of it suddenly.
 “Sirius, you better go, quickly,” Harry growled. “They'll arrive at Flitwick's office anytime, .
They’ll find out you’re not.”
 Buckbeak stomped on the ground, bobbing his sharp head.
 “What happened to the other boy? Run?” exclaimed Sirius.
 “It’s going to be great. He’s still out of it, but Madam Pomfrey says she’ll be able to do it
rather. Quick — go —”
 But Black was still staring Harry down.
 “How could I ever be grateful —”
 "go!" Harry and Hermione shouted together.
 Black trotted past Buckbeak, looking into the open sky.
 “We’ll see each other again,” he said. “You — you really are your father’s son, Harry…”
 He brushed Buckbeak's knees with his fingers. Harry and Hermione jumped back as adults
They grew wings again… The hippogriff took to the sky… He and his breeder grew smaller
And small as Harry looked behind them… and then a cloud burst over the moon… and they were gone.




Page 304 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
Installation of Twenty-Two
Earl Bust to Wight
 “Harry!”
 Hermione was drooling over her shoulder and glancing at her watch. “We have exactly ten minutes to get
We're led back by the doctor without anyone watching us—before Dumbledore kicks the door open.
—”
 “Okay,” Harry said, looking up from the sky, “let’s go…”
 They slipped through the door behind them and down a steep stone staircase. as
They got under it and heard a voice. They humbled themselves with shame,
They heard him. It looks like fudge and snap. They travel in a straight line over the length of the path in .
Foot of stairs.
 "... Just hope Dumbledore has no right to make trouble," Snape said. “That kiss
Are you doing it now?”
 “As soon as McNair rejoins the doctors. All this black is very tight.
embarrassing. I can’t tell you how much I look forward to talking about the Daily Prophet novel that
We finally have him… I think they’ll want to take you on, Snape… and once Harry’s young
He’s back in his right mind, I expect he’ll want to tell Christmas how you really saved him…”
 Harry stood on his own. He took a swing at Snap's ass when he crossed with Fudge Harry
It was Hermione's hiding place. Their feet are dead. Harry and Hermione made some n
Time to make sure they actually go out, they start going in the opposite direction. below one
Stirkas, then another, along a new road — then they heard a crash ahead.
 “Peves!” Harry muttered, grabbing Hermione's wrist. “It’s here!”
 They are made of a room that has views to their left only during times. Peeves seemed to be bouncing along
The road went well, and his head was laughing.
 “Oh, he’s horrible,” whispered Hermione, her ear to the door. “I bet he was all thrilled that
The managers will end up...” She explained her watch. “Come hours, Harry!”
 They wait until the voice of Peves comes through the house, and then 100 years have passed.
The house was demolished at another time.
Page 305 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 "Hermione — what happens — if we don't get back inside before Dumbledore locks the door?"
Harry sighed.
 “I don’t want to think about it!” Hermione blinks, glancing at her watch again. “The story of the minutes!”
They arrived at the end of the store with a hospital body door. “Oh — I can hear
Dumbledur,” Hermione said sternly. “So, A Hari!”
 They crept along the corridor. opened the door. The Dumbldur’s demonstrations are evident.
 “I’ll pass you,” he was heard saying to her. “It’s five minutes to midnight. miss
Granger, three shots should do it. good luck."
 Dumbledore left the room, closed the door, and removed his hand to stop it socially.
With slavery, Hari and Hermie is ahead of the front. Dumbledore looked up, and a wide smile apted
Under the long wind of silver. "Well?" He said silently.
 “Me!” Harry said breathlessly. “Sirius is gone, in your book…”
 Dumbledore frowned at them.
 "It's like. I think —" it's listening to some soot that inside the body of the hospital. “Yeah, I think
You too are gone—come in—I will crush you—”
 Harry and Hermione wandered inside the bathroom. It was empty except for Run, who was
He was still lying motionless on the end bed. As the curtain removed behind them, Harry and Hermione broke
They went back to their beds, and Hermione shoved the TimeTurner back under her covers. picture
later, Madam Pomfrey came running in from her office.
 “Did I hear the headmaster leave? Am I supposed to be taking care of my patients now?”
 It was in very bad shape. Harry and Hermione thought it best to accept their chocolate.
s silence. Madam Pomfrey stood over them, insisting that they eat her. But Hari cannot
swallow. He and Hermione were waiting, listening, their nerves tingling… And then, together they were .
The two were removed a fourth century from Massa Pomfrey, who were heard for a smooth slot vessel
he shouts from somewhere above them…
 “What’s that?” Miss Pomfrey said in shock.
 Now angry voices were heard, growing louder. Madame Bumfrey was looking at
gate.
 "Sure — they'll wake everyone up!" What do they think they’re doing?”
Chapter 306 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Harry was trying to hear what the voices were saying. They approach —
 “It must be Lost, Severus. We should have left someone in the room with him.
When that’s done —”
 “NOT DONE!” Snape shouted, now much closer to hand. “You can’t
APPARATE OR NOT VISIBLE INSIDE THIS CASTLE! THIS — HAS — SOMETHING —
TO — WORK — WITH — THE HUMAN!”
 “Severus—be serious—Harry is trapped—”
 BAM.
 The door to the hospital wing opened.
 Fudge, Snape, and Dumbledore came running through the inn. Dumbledore alone looked shocked.
In fact, he seemed to be having too much fun. Fudge looked angry. But Snap
He was beside himself.
 "OUTSIDE, POTTER!" he shouted. “What are YOU doing?”
 “Professor Snap!” said Mrs. Pumfrey. “Brace yourself!”
 "See here, Snape, be serious," Fudge said. “This door’s locked, we just saw —”
 “HELP HIM ESCAPE, I KNOW IT!” Snape shouted, pointing at Harry and Hermione.
His face was painted; The sweat was dripping from his mouth.
 “Relax, man!” Fudge shouted. “You’re talking nonsense!”
 “YOU DON’T KNOW POTTER!” Snap shouted. “HE DID, I KNOW HE DID —”
 "That will do, Severus," Dumbledore said quietly. “Think about what you’re saying. This door
It has been closed since I left the hospital ten minutes ago. Ms. Pumfrey, these students left.
Their bed?”
 “Of course not!” said Mrs. Pomfrey, with a chuckle. “I’ll listen to them!”
 "Well, there you have it, Severus," Dumbledore snapped. “Unless you suggest that .
Harry and Hermione can be in two places at once, I’m afraid I don’t see any point in
It hurts them more.”
Page 307 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Snape stood there, steaming, staring at Fudge, who looked absolutely shocked at his departure,
For Dumbledore, his eyes widened behind his glasses. Snape turned around, frowning
With a glance behind him, and stormed out of the bathroom.
 "Fellow seems to be out of balance," Fudge said, glancing behind him. “I would take care of it if I were
You, Dumbledore.”
 "Oh, he's not unbalanced," Dumbledore said quietly. “He just needed one serious injury
Disappointment.”
 “He’s not the only one!” exclaimed Fudge. “Every Christmas to have a field day! We have
Black cornered and ran through our fingers still! All that is needed now is the story of this
Flee the Hippogriff to emerge, and I will be a laughingstock! So… I better go and inform the
The ministry…”
 “Are they Dementors?” Dumbledore said. “They’re going to take them out of school, I trust?”
 "Oh yeah, they have to go," Fudge said, running his fingers through his hair. "never
Dreaming of trying to give a kiss on an innocent child... Completely irresponsible...
No, I’ll commit them to Azkaban tonight… Maybe we should consider dragons
At the entrance of the school…”
 "Hagrid would love that," Dumbledore said, looking at Harry and Hermione. As he and Fudge
Leaving the inn, Madam Pomfrey ran to the door and closed it again. He looks angrily at
On her own, she went back to her office.
 There was a low moan from the other side of the class. Ron stood up. They can see it.
He sat down, shaking his head and looking around.
 “What — what happened?” The last. “Harry? Why are we here? Where was Sirius? Where is
Lubin? What’s going on?”
 Harry and Hermione looked at each other.
 “You explained,” Harry said, helping himself to some more chocolate.
 When Harry, Ron and Hermione left the hospital wing at dawn the next morning, it was to find a
The castle was almost empty. The body, Human and the end of the examinations have found that each one
with the benefit of another visit to Hogsmeade. Neither Run nor Hermione felt like going.
However, so they and Harry are walking around the castle, still talking about the odd .
last night's events and wondered where Sirius and Buckbeak were now. Stay close.
Page 308 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
The ocean, watching a giant squid wiggle its legs with a sting above the water, Harry fell for it
wire sounding as he peered across the bank. The animal ran quickly.
to him from there just yesterday...
 The voice of them and they went toward to read Hagd with a very treasured, keeping the Allis .
His sweaty face through one of his apron-sized blankets and he’s flipping over them.
 “I know I’m supposed to feel happy, after what happened last night,” he said. “I mean, Black runs away '
Once again, an, everything — but guess what?”
 "what?" they said, pretending to look foolish.
 “Bick! flee! He is free! Bin fucked all night!”
 “That’s great!” Hermione said, giving Ron a warning look because he looked the same .
He almost laughed.
 "Yeah... he couldn't close it properly," Hagrid said, looking angrily out at the palace. "I
He was supposed to be supposed to be the morning, a tradition… he thought he could meet the professor Lupin in the ground, but
Lupine said he didn’t eat anything last night…”
 "what?" Harry said quietly.
 “Blimey, haven’t you heard?” Hagrid said, his brow furrowed slightly. He raised his voice, though
Yet no one seems to. “Er — Snape told all of the Slytherins this morning… Thought .
Everyone would know by now… Professor Lupine is a fucking monster, see. An' was free in the land
Las' night... It's packing now, o' course.”
 "anxious?" Harry said, confused. "why?"
 “Leavin', ain't he?” Hagrid said, looking surprised that Harry had to ask. “He admitted firs' thing
This morning. He said he couldn’t risk it happening again.”
 Harry bounced to his feet.
 “I’ll see,” he said to Ron and Hermione.
 “But if he resigns —”
 “ — doesn’t sound like there’s anything we can do —”
 “I didn’t like it. I still want to watch it. I’ll meet you here.”
Page 309 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 The door to Lupine's office was open. He had already packed most of his things. Grindilow is empty
Tanki stood next to his battered old suitcase, which was open and nearly full. Lupine was growling.
on something on his desk and looked up only when Harry knocked on the door.
 “I saw you leaving,” Lupine said, smiling. He pointed to the parchment he was looking at.
It is the card of Maradr.
 “I just saw Hagrid,” Harry said. “And he said you were late. That’s not true, is it?”
 "I'm afraid it is," Lupine said. He started opening the drawers of his desk and taking out their contents.
 "why?" Harry said. “The Department of Magic don’t think you’ve been helping Sirius, do they?”
 Lupine moved to the door and closed it behind Harry.
 "No. Professor Dumbledore managed to convince Fudge that I was trying to save your lives.” he
He's silent. “That was the last straw for Severus. I think the loss of the Order of Merlin hit him hard.
So he — er — accidentally let slip that I’m a fucking kid this morning in the morning.”
 "Don't even leave because of that!" Harry said.
 Lupine smiled warmly.
 “This time tomorrow, calves will start arriving from owners… They don’t want a pet .
They teach their son, Harry. And after last night, I believe they are right. I can buy some of
You… This must never happen again.”
 “You’re the best dark arts defense master we have!” Harry said. "don't
go!"
 Lupine shook his head and didn't speak. He keeps emptying his bottles. Then, while Harry
Trying to think of a good argument to make him stay, Lupine said, "From what the headmaster said .
He said to me this morning, you saved so many lives last night, Harry. If I’m proud of something I have
It worked this year, and how much have you learned… Tell me about your Patronus.”
 “How did you know about this?” Harry said, offended.
 “What else could bring Dementors back?”
 Harry told Lupine what happened. When he was done, Lupine was smiling again.
 "Yeah, your dad was always a hero when he changed," he said. “Well said… that
Why do we call it Prussia?”
Page 310 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Lubin stuffed his last few books into his case, tied up the office papers, and returned it for her to see
Harry.
 “Here — I got this from the Shrieking Shack yesterday,” he said, handing it back to Harry .
The Invisible Cup. "And…" He paused, then pulled out the Marauder's Card as well. “I’m not in .
Your teacher, so I don't feel guilty answering this for you either. There is no use, and I
It’s up to you, Ron, and Hermione to find his interests.”
 Harry took the map and turned.
 “You said Moony, Worldmtail, Padfoot, and Prongs want to get me from .
The school… said they would think it was a nice job.”
 “And all we will work,” Lupin said, written the right below to connect with the illegal. “I have no idea .
In speaking that James would stop a lot if a son finds neither of
The lights of the torque are out of the punch.”
 There are some points on the door. Harry quickly filled the Marader’s card and we’re not seen
Cloak in Eghres.
 It was Professor Dumbledore. He doesn’t seem to see Harry there.
 “The car is in the door, A Remus,” he said.
 “Thank you, the president,.”
 Lupin hides the hallucinant slot and the Ginndylow slot that is a young man.
 “Hae — you find, A Harry,” he said, with a woman’s view. “It’s a real joy because I’ve heard of you. ⵜⵃⵓⵍⴼⵓⵖ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ
We’ll talk again for a while. Headmaster, you don’t have to see me to the gates, I can manage…”
 Harry has a hunch that Lubyn is going to leave in a clean way.
 "Well, then, Remus," Dumbledore said cautiously. Lupine slightly modified Grindylow’s ship
To be able to smell the hands. Seen, with the only head for Hari and the vegetation with a salt,
Lubin left the lab.
 Harri remained in his krhamed,ul is wholed of his ground on the ground. He heard the door close and
She saw. Dumbledore ⵎⴰⵣⴰⵍⵉⵜ ⴷⵉⵏ.
 “That is a long time, Aray?” He said quietly. “You have to get a lot of faith after late 2019.
night."
ⵜⴰⵙⵏⴰ 311 ⵏ 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “There’s no difference,” Harry said in mind. “Pettigrew is out.”
 “Don’t give any difference?” Dumbledore told silence, “It’s all the difference in the world,
Harry. You helped the real explanation. She saved an unfavorable man from a big stage.”
 terrible. Anything in Harry’s memory. Great and more richer than ever...
The Word of Trelawney!
 “The professor Dumbledore — yesterday, when I do knowledge of knowledge, teacher .
Slewood went so much — very brightly.”
 "She is?" Dumbledore said. “R — and the past Arabs, you want to come down?”
 “Yes… Her voice went all the way to the ground and her eyes rolled and she said… she said Voldemort’s servant .
The night of night will return... Tennad to bring the food
Come back to power.” Harry looked at Dumbledore. “Later, she became a Muslim .
Again, she can’t remember anything she said. Is it — it’s a real
ⵏ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ?”
 Dumbledore is the best of the woman’s attitude.
 “Do you know, Harry, I tank shave have been.” He said smoothly. “Who will be thought.
it? It’s something that succeeds with a total of real views up to two. I should offer her a pay raise…”
 “But —” Harry Improved, with good. How can Doumbledore would take this to all this ?
 "But — I stopped Sirius and Professor Lupine from killing Pettigrew!" This makes it my uncle mk
Fuldimor is turning!”
 "It won't be," Dumbledore said quietly. “Your experience will not come while you train them-turner
Do you have any, Harry? The results of our actions are always very, very different.
that predicting the future is a very difficult matter indeed… Professor Trelawney, thankfully, is
Living proof of that… you did a very noble thing, in saving Pettigrew’s life.”
 “But if he helped Voldemort get back into power…”
 “Pittiegre had a life of his own. Fuldimor created an administrator who was in your group... when
One wizard saves another wizard's life, creating some sort of bond between them... and I'm very
It’s wrong if Voldemort wants his servant in Harry Potter’s abyss.”
 “I don’t want no connection with Pettigrew!” Harry said. “He betrayed my parents!”
Page 312 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 “This is an insult in his,-his potentially rare century, Harri. But trust me… the time may come
When you’re so glad you saved Pettigrew’s life.”
 Harry couldn't imagine when that would happen. Dumbledore thinks he knows what Harry is.
He was thinking.
 “I knew your father very well, both at Hogwarts and later, Harry,” he said gently. “You’re going to g
They also saved Bitigro, too, I know.”
 Harry looked at him. Dumbledore wouldn't laugh — Dumbledore might say...
 “I think my Patronus was invented by my father. I mean, when I saw myself across the
Lake… I think I see it.”
 "An easy mistake to make," Dumbledore said softly. "I expect you're tired of hearing it, but you
See in a happy way like James. Except for the eyes… You have your mother’s eyes.”
 Harry shook his head.
 “That’s crazy, thought he was,” he muttered. “I mean, I knew he was dead.”
 “Think the mortals we love some eternity won’t really leave us? I think we don't remember them anymore.
It seems to be a few times longer than the big guy ? Your Father lives in you, Harry, and expresses himself
Precisely when you need it. How else can you cast that particular Patronus?
Things turned up again that night”.
 It took a moment for Harry to process what Dumblefore had said.
 "Yesterday Sirius told me all about how they became this Anima," Dumbledore said, smiling. "is
The level isn't low — it's not like nobody, it keeps it from me. And then I remembered the
the most unusual form your Patronus ever took, when he pinned Mr. Malfoy on your Quidditch
A match against Ravenclaw. You know, Harry, you somehow saw your father yesterday… You
You found it within yourself.”
 And Dumbledore left the office, leaving Harry to his very confused thoughts.
 No one at Hogwarts currently knows the truth of what happened on the night Sirius, Buckbeak,
And Pettigrew left except for Harry, Ron, Hermione, and Professor Dumbledore. as
As the season finale approaches, Harry hears many different theories about what really happened,
But none of that is close to the truth.
Page 313 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 Malfoy was furious at Buckbeak. He was convinced that Hagrid had found a way to
sniffing the Hippogriff to safety, and seeming angry that he and his father were
Maintained by a game enthusiast. As for Percy Weasley, he had a lot to say on the subject of
Sirius' escape.
 “If I get into the ministry, I’ll have a lot of proposals to make about the Magical Act .
Success!” He told the only person who would listen — his girlfriend, Penelope.
 Despite the beautiful weather, despite the gloomy conditions, despite the fact that he knew they were
He had achieved the near impossible in helping Sirius to freedom, Harry had never come close to
The end of the school year is in bad spirits.
 He wasn't the only one who was shocked to see Professor Lupine go. All of Harry’s
The Defense Against the Dark Arts discipline was devastated by his suicide.
 “Are you asking what they’re going to give us next year?” Seamus Finnigan said solemnly.
 “Maybe it’s a vampire,” Dean Thomas suggested hopefully.
 It wasn't just Professor Lupine's appearance that crossed Harry's mind. He couldn't help it.
They were very concerned about Professor Trelawney’s approach. He kept wondering where Pettigrew was .
Now, did he still seek shelter with Voldemort. But that thing is rare.
Harry's spirit more than anything was the need to become part of the Dursleys. Maybe for half an hour,
Half an hour later, he believed he would live with Sirius from now on... of his parents.
His best friend… It would be the next best thing if his own father came back. And while no
Sirius's news was actually good news, because it meant he was successfully hiding,
Harry couldn't help but smile at the thought of the home he could have had, and
The truth that now is impossible.
 The exam results were released on the last day of term. Harry, Ron, and Hermione passed every
subject. Harry was surprised to go through with the Potions. He had a strong suspicion that
Maybe Dumbledore stepped in to stop Snape from fucking him too hard. Snape’s journey
Compared to Harry in the last week it was pretty amazing. Harry doesn’t think
It might increase Snape's interest in him, but he definitely had. The body grows
He didn't care at the corner of Snape's thin mouth whenever he looked at Harry, and he was
He constantly flexed his fingers, as if scrambling to place them on Harry's shoulders.
 Percy had gotten his top NEWT; Fred and George rolled up a handful of OWLs each.
As for Gryffindor House, thanks to their extensive involvement in Quidditch .
Cup, had won the House trophy for the third year in a row. This meant that the end of the
Term feast takes place between the purple and gold holidays, and that the Gryffindor table is the
noisiest of the bunch, as everyone celebrated. Even Hari managed to forget the trip.
He returned to the Dursleys the next day as he ate, drank, joked, and laughed with the rest.
Page 314 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 As the Hogwarts Express pulled out of the station the next morning, Hermione handed Harry and .
Ron some interesting news.
 “I went to see Professor McGonagall this morning, just before breakfast. I decided to sign up.
Muggle Studies.”
 “But you passed your exam with three hundred and one!” Run said.
 “I know,” Hermione said, “but I can’t put up with another year like this. That one distorts time, it
It takes us to a house. I made it. Without muggle studies and magic, I would be able to
They have a floor plan as well.”
 "I still can't believe you didn't tell us about it," Ron whispered. “We're supposed to be your
friends."
 "I promised I wouldn't tell anyone," Hermione insisted. She turned to Harry, who
He could see Hogwarts fading out of sight behind the mountain. Two whole months before the
Watch it again…
 “Oh, shut up, Harry!” Hermione said sadly.
 “I’m okay,” Harry whispered. “I’ll just be thinking about the holidays.”
 “Yeah, I think about them too,” Ron said. “Harry, you need to come sit with
we. I’ll fix it with Mom and Dad, and then I’ll call you. I’d rather use a violin now —”
 "Telephone, Ron," Hermione barked. “Honestly, you should take Muggle Studies next year…”
 Ron ignored her.
“It’s the Quidditch World Cup this summer! How about that, Harry? Come take a seat, let’s go
And look at him! My dad can usually get ideas from work.”
 This proposal had the effect of boosting Harry considerably.
 “Yeah… I think the Dursleys would be happy to let me come… especially after what I did to my aunt .
Marge…”
 Feeling even more excited, Harry joined Ron and Hermione in several games in
The snap exploded, and when the magician arrived with the tea bag, he had himself a very large lunch,
Though nothing with chocolate in it.
Page 315 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 But it came down to the evening before delivery that really got him excited…
 “Harry,” Hermione whispered, looking over his shoulder. “What is that thing outside the
window?"
 Harry turned to look outside. Something very small and dark was growing in sight.
above the glass. He stood up to take a closer look and saw that it was a small envelope, holding a letter
It was too big for him. The platform was so small, in fact, that it kept drifting through the air.
Buffet this way and that in the wake of the train. Harry pulled open the window slowly.
He reached out and grabbed it. It feels like a very fun Snitch. He took it easy.
inside.
 The owl placed her letter on Harry's seat and began looking around their wardrobe.
She seemed very pleased with herself for accomplishing her task. Hedwig pulled off her hat with a
A kind of polite disagreement. Crookshanks stayed put and chased the fox with his great
Yellow eyes. Ron, seeing this, took the dragon safely out of harm's way.
 Harry picked up the letter. It was written for him. He opened the letter, and exclaimed, “It’s .
From Sirius!”
 "what?" Ron and Hermione said excitedly. “ⵖⴻⵔ- ⵜ ⵙ ⵚⵚⵓⵜ ⵄⵍⴰⵢⴻⵏ!”
 Hi Harry,
 I hope that finds you before you get to your aunts and uncles. I don’t know if they spent
The secret of the potato.
 Buckbeak and I were in hiding. I won’t tell you where, if this coin fell into the wrong hands.
I have some doubts about his credibility, but he’s the best I can find, and he seems interested in
The work.
 I think the Dementors are still looking for me, but they have no hope of finding me here. I
I was thinking of letting some Muggles visit me privately, a long way from Hogwarts, to
The castle will be lifted.
 There’s something I didn’t get to tell you during our brief meeting. It was I who sent
You are the Spring of Fire —
 “Ha!” Hermione said triumphantly. "Zer! I told you from it!”
“Yeah, but he didn’t jinx it, did he?” Run said. "Oh!" The little owl is now happily swimming around in the
His hand, he had rubbed one of his fingers in what appeared to be an affectionate manner.
Page 316 of 317
Get free e-books and video tutorials at www.passuneb.com
 – Crookshanks took the order to the Veterinary Department for me. I used your name but I told them to take
ⵓⵔⴻⵖⵏⵏⵉ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵜⵃⴰⵏⵓⵜⵉⵡ ⵏ Gringotts. Please consider it gifts worth thirteenth birthdays.
From your biological father.
 I also want to apologize for the fright I thought I gave you last night when you left.
Your uncle’s house. I just hope to see you before I start my journey north.
But I think my perspective piqued your interest.
 I’m offering you something else, which I think will make your next year at Hogwarts more
happy.
 If you ever need me, get in touch. Your pet will find me.
 I will write again soon.
 Sirius
 Harry looked curiously inside the box. There’s another piece of paper there. he
I quickly read it and felt simultaneously as hot and satisfied as eating someone
bottles of frozen beer in a jar.
 I, Sirius Black, the father of Harry Potter, hereby give him permission to visit Hogsmeade on
The weekend.
 “That would be nice of Dumbledore!” Harry said excitedly. He glanced at Sirius' letter.
“Hold on, there’s a PS…”
 I thought your friend Ron might like to keep this mouse, since it’s my fault he doesn’t have a mouse.
 Ron's eyes widened. She was still howling with excitement. “Keep it?” He said
Without a contract. He looked closely at the sculpture for a moment; Next, on to Harry and Hermione’s magnificent
With a smile, he held it out for Crookshanks to sniff.
 “What do you reckon?” Run asked the cat. “ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜⵜ ⴷ ⴰⵖⴻⵔⵙⵉⵡ?”
 Crookshanks shouted.
 “That’s what I like,” Ron said enthusiastically. “He’s mine.”
 Harry read and re-read the letter from Sirius all the way back to the King's Cross station. Still
He held it tightly in his hand as he, Ron, and Hermione exited the
platform nine and three quarters. Harry noticed Uncle Vernon suddenly. He was standing gracefully.
Below about Mass and Massa Wesley, they were grateful and when Massa Wesley .
Harry at the wedding, Dery’s complaint about the banks was thankful.
 “I’m going to talk about the World Cup!” Run shouted behind Harry as Harry said goodbye to him and Hermione.
He then carried the cart and Hedwig's cage back towards Uncle Vernon, who greeted
to him in his usual manner.
 “What’s that?” He said with Meeting, he grows on the photo that still guarantee Harry on hand. “If it’s
Another silver I signed for me, you have another —”
 “It’s not,” Harry said excitedly. “It’s a letter from my stepfather.”
 “Rbbi’s father?” said Uncle Vernon. “You don’t have a biological father!”
 “Yes, I have,” Harry whispered. « ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵎⴻⴷⴷⴰⴽⴻⵍ ⵏ ⵢⴻⵎⵎⴰ ⴷ ⴱⴰⴱⴰ. He is being condemned.
Last, but he was out of the wizards prison and was on the run. He likes to keep in touch.
Yee, even if... Continue with speakers… see if I’m happy…”.
 And, looking with a panicked look on Uncle Vernon's face, Harry walked up next to the
Exiting the station, Hedwig stretched out in front of him, for what seemed to be a very good summer .
than the last one.
 


Harry Potter
And the FIRE BOWL

CHAPTER ONE
MISSION HOUSE
The villagers of Little Hangleton still called it “the haunted field .
House,” even though the Riddle family had lived there for many years. It stands on a hill overlooking the village.
Some of its windows are boarded up, boards are missing from its ceiling, and grass
It fluttered uncontrollably across his face. Once a beautiful home, and
Easily the biggest and tallest building for miles, the Riddle House was now empty, secluded, and unoccupied.
Little Hangleton residents all agree that the old house is “creepy.”
Half a century ago, something amazing and amazing happened
There, some still love the elderly villagers
To appreciate when topics of conversation were scarce. The story was
They have been nominated multiple times, and honored on multiple occasions
Places, that no one is left quite sure what the truth is.
Every storyline, however, begins in the same place: Fifty .
Years before, at night on a fine summer evening, when
Riddle House is still well maintained and impressive, one maid had
He enters the living room to find the Riddles all dead.
The maid ran screaming down the hill to the village and
She recruited as many people as she could.
“They sit there with their eyes open! Cold as ice! Still in them
Dinner stuff!”
The police were called, and all little Hangleton
Had seethed with curiosity and inexplicable joy.
Nobody wastes their breath pretending to be so upset about
Riddles, being very unpopular. Great Mr. and Mrs.
Riddle was rich, violent, and violent, and their eldest son,
Tom, it was, if anything, the opposite. All the villagers love is
The identity of the killer — because obviously, three obviously
Healthy people don’t all fall dead of natural causes on the same
night.
The hanged man, the village jail, made an emotional commercial to
night; The whole village seemed to come out to discuss about
The crimes. They suffered for abandoning their firehouses when
The Riddles cook comes up playfully in their midst and says
to the randomly silent shop owned by a man named Frank Bryce
He was arrested.
“Frank!” shouted many people. "never!"
Frank Brice was the caretaker of the Riddles garden. He lives alone in a dilapidated shack in the basement of Riddle House. He has Frank
Came back from the war with a very sore shoulder and very uncomfortable
The crowd is loud, and he’s been working for Riddles for a long time
since.
There was a rush to buy cooking recipes and listen to other things.
“I always thought he was weird,” she told the vil-
lagers, after his fourth cherry.” he wasn’t friendly, like. I’m sure if I’ve made her a cuppa once, I’ve made it a hundred times. never
He wanted to mix, and he didn’t.”
“Oh, now,” said a woman at the bar, “he’s had a tough fight, Frank.
He loved the wild life. That’s no reason to —”
“Who else has a key to the back door, then?” said the cook.
“There was a commercial film hanging in the greenhouse far back .
As long as I can remember! No one forced the door last night! No broken
Doors! All Frank had to do was head to the mansion while
We were all asleep. . . .”
The villagers talked about the bleak prospects.
“I think he always had a negative attitude about it, unfortunately,”
said a man at the bar.
“The war made it funny, if you ask me,” the landlord said.
“I told you I didn’t want to get on the wrong side of Frank, .
Aren’t I, Dot?” said an excited woman in the background.
“Depression,” Dot said, smiling. “I remember,
When he was a kid. . .”
By the next morning, there was almost no one in Little Hangleton
suspicion that Frank Bryce murdered the Riddles.
But next in the neighboring town of Great Hangleton, in
The police station is dark and dirty, Frank was nodding,
Time and time again, that he was innocent, and the only person who
She saw the front of the house on the day of Riddles death was
A teenage boy, poor, thin and handsome. No one else in
The village knew of some such boy, and the police were quite sure that
Frank had invented it.
Then, just when things were looking too bleak for Frank,
The report on Riddles body came back and changed everything.
Police have not read a statement of additional charges. A team of doctors
had examined the bodies and concluded that none of the Riddles had been poisoned, stabbed, shot, imprisoned, dismembered, or (e.g.
as far as they can tell) is all wrapped up. In fact (the report continues,
in a tone of indescribable sarcasm), all the signs appear
May he be in perfect health — depending on what they all are .
dead. The investigators note (as if eager to find something wrong with the bodies) that each of the Riddles has a vision of
terror on his face — but as panicked police say,
Anyone ever heard of three people being scared to death?
As there is no proof that the Riddles were killed at all,
The police force them to let Frank go. Buried the Riddles in
the church of Little Hangleton, and their tombs remain as objects
of knowledge for a while. to everyone's surprise, and amid the cloud of
suspicion, Frank Bryce returns home to the palace of
The Riddle Village.
“ 'As far as I'm concerned, he killed them, and I don't care what .
the police are saying,” Dot says of the imprisoned man. “And if he has any .
right, he’s going to get out of here, he knows as we know he did.”
But Frank didn’t leave. He was left to tend to the garden for
The next family that lived in the Riddle House, and then the next —
Because no family lasts long. Maybe it’s partly because
Frank that the new owners said there was a mixed feeling about
place, which, in depopulation, began to fall into
Destruction.
The rich guy who owns Riddle House these days too
He lived there and didn’t fail; It was said in the village that he had
It for “financial reasons,” although no one is quite clear what they might entail .
be. The wealthy owner continued to pay Frank to do carpentry work, however. Frank is approaching his seventeenth birthday now.
Very deaf, his bad leg is harder than usual, but can be seen fidgeting
in front of the flower beds in good weather, although the grass was
He started rubbing against her, trying as hard as he could to get them off.
Nor was Frank the only fault he had to deal with. The village boys have a habit of throwing stones
through the windows of the Riddle House. They got on their bikes.
On the grass Frank works hard to stay cool. Once or
Twice, they broke into the old house for fun. Know that the old
Frank’s support for the house and grounds amounted to almost a
obsession, and it surprised them to see him prancing through the woods, brandishing his fist and shouting arrows at them. Frank, the
Next to him, he believes the boys punish him because they, like their
Parents and grandparents, thinking it’s the last. So when Frank
I woke up one night in August and saw something odd in the
Old house, he just assumed that the boys had gone one step further in their attempt to torture him.
It was Frank’s bad leg sprain; It was irritating him more.
than ever before in his lifetime. He got up and went downstairs to the
The kitchen with the idea of ​​filling its hot water bottle to cool
height in his leg. Standing in front of the stomach, crowding the circle, he
She looked at the Riddle Room and saw the lights flickering in her upper windows. Frank knew at once what was going on. children
He entered the house again, and with the right of the
floor of light, they started a fire.
Frank didn’t have a phone, and anyway, he didn’t trust the police much since they took him in for questioning .
about the death of Riddles. He dropped the bowl at once, struggled
He climbed back up as fast as his bad knee would allow, and soon became
In his kitchen, he wears all his clothes and takes out a dirty old purse from his
The hook is in front of the door. He picked up his walking stick, which was
They leaned against the wall and went out into the night.
The front door of the Riddle House bore no sign of
They forced, none of the dishes. Frank turned to
At the back of the house until he reached a door almost hidden by the screen, he took out the old key, put it in the lock, and opened it .
door without noise.
He let himself into the cavernous cabin. Frank had not entered it for many years; However, even though it was very dark, he
He remembered where the cell door was, and tapped his hand
way to it, his nostrils filled with the smell of faeces, his ears pinned to
Any sound of footsteps or voices from the chief. has reached
hall, which is slightly exposed due to the large glass windows on either side of the front door, and begins to curve over
wall, blesses the dust which is finer on the stone, because
He made out the sound of her footsteps and his thud.
On the landing, Frank turned to the right, and saw at once where
The entrants were: At the end of the corridor, there was an open door, and
A flickering light shone from the prison, sending out a long strand of
gold on black ground. Frank moved closer, holding
His walking stick is solid. Several feet from the door, he could
You'll see a narrow stairway to the room above.
A fire, he saw now, was burning in the window. This is amazing.
he. Then he stopped walking and heard a scream, a man .
A voice spoke within the room; She looked timid and frightened.
“There is a little more in the bottle, my Lord, if you still have .
hungry."
“Then,” said a second voice. This one too belonged to the same man — but .
It was surprisingly loud, and ice-cold
wind. Something about that voice made darker hairs on
The back of Frank’s head stood up. “Bring me closer to the fire,
The voice of the fox.”
Frank put his right ear to the door, as he needed to hear.
There came the sound of bottles being placed on some hard surfaces
experience, and then the sensation of using a heavy chair that was
dragged across the ground. Frank catches sight of a younger man, whose
He returns to the doorway and pushes the chair into place. He was wearing a
a long black coat, and there was a round hole in the middle of his head.
Then he disappeared from sight again.
“Where’s Nagini?” The cold voice said.
“I — I don’t know, my Lord,” said the first voice nervously. "she
They’re set to inspect the house, I think. . . .”
"You'll hear it before we retire, Wormtail," said the second .
sound. “I will need food by night. I'm tired of traveling.
often."
Nodding, Frank put his good ear still closer to the
door, very slippery. There was a pause, and then the guy
called out Wormtail spoke again.
“Lord, may I ask how long we will be here?”
“A week,” said the cold voice. “Maybe more. The place is gorgeous, and the plan can’t go ahead yet. to be
It’s stupid to do before the Quidditch World Cup is over.”
Frank stuck a delicate finger in his ear and turned away. Owing, no doubt, to the earworm, he heard the word .
“Quidditch,” wasn’t a word at all.
“A — Quidditch World Cup, Sir?” said the Boy.
(Frank digs his finger still harder into her ear.) “I’m sorry .
I am, though — I don’t understand — why wait until
The World Cup is over?”
“Because, fool, at this very moment, witches are bursting into .
country from all over the world, and every official from the Ministry of Meteorology would be on duty, on alert for signs of unusual activity, checking and double-checking identities. They will be
She liked security, so that the Muggles wouldn't notice anything. So we
wait."
Frank pauses to clear his ear. He had clearly heard.
The words “Ministry of Magic,” “Wizards,” and “Muggles.” Clearly,
Each of these terms has a mysterious meaning, and Frank can
Just think of two types of people who would normally speak: judges
and criminals. Frank put his hand in his ass once.
More, and they sounded more harsh still.
“Still sure of your Lordship, then?” Wormtail said quietly.
“Of course I’m down, Wormtail.” There is a letter of
Menace in a cold voice now.
A small pause followed — and then Wormtail said, words .
He fell out of it quickly, as if forcing himself to
Say that before he loses his temper.
“Could this have been done without Harry Potter, my Lord.”
Another, more continuous pause, and then —
“Without Harry Potter?” said the second voice calmly. "I
see . . .”
“Lord, I don’t say that out of pity for the boy!” said
Wormtail, his voice getting louder and louder. “That boy is nothing to me,
Nothing at all! It’s only if we use another witch or
A magician — any magician — that thing could be done a lot better
quickly! If you let me leave you for a moment — you
Know that I can transform myself quickly — I can become
Here in just two days with the right person —”
“I could use another wizard,” the cold voice said softly, “that is .
true. . . .”
“Lord, it makes sense,” Wormtail said, his voice determined .
He's awake now. “Laying hands on Harry Potter would be so hard,
He’s well taken care of —”
“And so you volunteered to go get me change? I asked. . . Maybe the task of tolerating me became difficult for
You, “Wolf cub? It is possible that this proposal to abandon the plan
Nothing but trying to leave me?”
“Oh my lord! I — I have no intention of leaving you, ever —”
“Don’t lie to me!” said the second voice. “I can always say,
The voice of the wolf! You regret not getting back to me. I'm getting up.
you. I see you get aroused when you look at me, I feel you aroused ma
You protected me. . . .”
"No! My bow to your Lordship —”
“Your friendship is nothing more than a trap. You don’t wan
Be here if you have somewhere else to go. How can I live without you, when I need food every few hours? Which is milk
Nagini?”
“But you look so strong, my Lord —”
“Liar,” said the second voice. “I’m not strong, and some .
Only days will rob me of the little health I’ve regained under your stinging spell. silence!"
Wormtail, who was snoring fast, grinned at the
one. For a few seconds, Frank heard nothing but fire.
They’re getting closer. Then the second man called again, in a whisper .
It’s almost a calculation.
“I have my reasons for using the boy, as I explained earlier .
to you, and I don't use anyone else. I waited thirteen years. some
More months won’t make a difference. As for the care surrounding the dog, I think my plan will be effective. All that is
I need a little courage from you, Wormtail — courage you’ll have
Find out, if you’re willing to feel Lord Voldemort’s speed
wrath -"
“Lord, I must speak!” Wormtail said, confusion in his voice now.
“All along our journey I went over the plan in my head — .
Sir, the death of Bertha Jorkins will not go unnoticed i
long, and if we continue, if I kill —”
"whether?" said the second voice. "Is it? If you follow the plan,
Wormtail, the Ministry doesn’t need to know that someone else is dead.
You will do it quickly and without fuss; I just wish I could do
Personally, but in my current situation . . . Come on, monster, one
More death and our path to Harry Potter is clear. I didn’t ask.
You’ll have to do it alone. At that time my faithful servant will return to us—”
“I’m a loyal servant,” Wormtail said, just a trace of bitterness in his voice.
“Wormtail, I need someone with brains, someone who doesn’t waver in his judgment, and you, unfortunately, fulfill none of them .
right.”
“I found you,” Wormtail says, and there’s suddenly a sulky .
Edge to his voice now. “I am the one who found you. I brought
You’re Bertha jurkins.”
“Of course,” said the second man, sounding proud. “Mental illness
of magic I didn’t think possible from you, Wormtail — although, truth be told, you don’t know how useful it is .
It will be when you catch it, won’t it?”
“I—I thought she might be useful, my Lord—”
“Liar,” said the second voice again, fake pride higher .
It was written much earlier. “However, we do not deny that his information is without merit. Never mind, I can't do
plan, and for that, you'll lose your reward, Wormtail. I’ll let you do an important thing for me, one that a lot of them
His followers would offer their best hands to work. . . .”
“Really, my Lord? What -?" Wormtail looked scared.
again.
"Oh, Wormtail, don't you want me to ruin the surprise?" your
The part will come at the end . . . But I promise you, you will have
the need for a woman as useful as Bertha Jorkins.”
"You . . . you . . ." Wormtail's voice suddenly sounded harsh, like
although his mouth is very dry. "You . . . they're leaving. . . . We're going to kill
me too?"
“The monster, the monster,” said the cold voice plaintively, “why would .
Shall I kill you? I killed Bertha because I had to. She was good for nothing after my questioning, she was useless. In any case, awkward questions
She will be asked if she returned to the department with
News that she met you on her vacation. Magicians who were
He should be dead and it would be best if he didn't run for the department of
Magic in the houses across the street. . . .”
Wormtail looked something so subtle that Frank couldn’t
He heard him, but he made fun of the second man — a thoroughly unhappy man .
A laugh, cold as his words.
“Can we change his memory? But memory strips can
A powerful wizard would break her, as I had shown when I asked her.
It would be foolish for his memory not to use the information I got from him, Wormtail.”
On the way, Frank suddenly became aware that the hand
Holding his walking stick he was smeared with sweat. The man s
The cold voice killed the woman. He was talking about her without
All kinds of excitement — with a bang. It was dangerous — a
Athlete. And he was planning more crimes — this boy, Harry .
Potter, however — he was in danger —
Frank knew what he had to do. Now, if ever, it’s time to head to
The police. He would storm out of the house and go straight to
Phone keyboard in the house . . . But that cold voice was speaking
Another time, and Frank stayed where he was, frozen to the spot, listening with all his might.
“One more crime . . . My loyal servant at Hogwarts . . .
Harry Potter is as good as mine, the hero. It was accepted. to be
Don't be a judge. But they were silent . . . I thought I heard Nagini. . . .”
And the second man’s voice changed. He started making noises.
Such as Frank had never heard before; He was calculating and forgiving.
Without breathing. Frank thought he must have some
a type of light or darkness.
And then Frank heard footsteps behind him on the dark street. He turned to look and found himself shocked by
horror.
Something was moving towards him down the dark path.
ground, and as he approached the beam of fiery light, he realized the s
Scared because it was a huge snake, at least twelve feet
long. Reached, stunned, Frank stares at his cut
A dim path, curved in the gray dust on the ground, goes
Closer and closer — What was he supposed to do? The only means of escape
He was in the room where two men were sitting planning a murder, but if
He stayed where the snake was and would surely kill him —
But before he made up his mind, the snake was at the level of
He, then, unbelievably, miraculously, was recovering; She was following the crackling, crackling noises made by the cold voice above
door, and within seconds, the diamond-tipped tip of his cock had
He got out of jail.
There was sweat on Frank's brow now, and a hand in
A walking stick was loosening up. Inside the room, that cold voice was
She continued to calculate, and Frank visited a strange idea, an impossible idea. . . . This guy can talk to snakes.
Frank doesn’t understand what’s going on. He wants more
Above all else he would be back in his bed with his bottle of hot water. the
The problem was that his legs didn’t seem to want to move. As it stands
There he was shaking and trying to protect himself, the cold voice changed
Fast forward to English again.
"Nagini has exciting news, Wormtail," she said.
“Is that true, my Lord?” said the Boy.
“Sure, yes,” said the voice. “According to Nagini, there is a
The old muggle stood outside this room and listened to every
Early we say.”
Frank didn't have a chance to hide himself. There are feet,
and then the door of the room opened wide.
A tall, thin man with blond hair, a sharp nose, a
Small, watery eyes stood in front of Frank, a mixture of fear and admiration.
In his face.
“Try it inside, Rabbit. Where are your obligations?”
The cold voice was coming from the old chair before
fire, but Frank can’t see who’s talking. Snake, on the other hand
hand, was hanging off the fire truck, like some accidental
travesty of a domestic dog.
Wormtail motioned for Frank to enter the room. Although still deeply
Shaken, Frank gripped his stick tightly and grunted
above the threshold.
The fire was the only light in the room; He throws long,
Spider shadows on the walls. Frank looked at the back of the
chair; The man inside was obviously smaller than even his boss, as Frank couldn't even see his cock.
“Did you hear everything, Muggle?” The cold voice said.
“What’s that you’re calling me?” Frank said sarcastically, now
that he was inside the room, now that it was time for some
a kind of action, he felt more courageous; He was always like that in the war.
“I’m calling you a Muggle,” the voice whispered. “It means that
You’re not a magician.”
“I don’t know what you mean by flirting,” Frank said, his voice .
It grows slowly. “All I know is that I heard enough to justify the
The police tonight, I have. You commit murder and you think
further! And I’ll tell you this, too,” he added, with a note of caution,
“My wife knows I’m up here, and if I don’t come back—”
“You don’t have a girlfriend,” the cold, sharp voice said. "anything
He knows you’re here. You didn’t tell anyone you were coming. do
Never lie to Lord Voldemort, the Muggle, because he knows . . . He always
He knows. . . .”
“Is that true?” Frank said determinedly. “Lord, is that true? Well, I don’t know
Think long and hard about your decision, my Lord. Turn around and face me.
As a man, why wouldn’t you?”
"But I'm no man, Muggle," said the cold voice, barely audible now over the smoky haze. “I am much, much more
than a man. however . . . why not? I'll face you. . . . The voice of the wolf,
Come take my chair back.”
The interviewer gave a sigh.
“You heard me, Rabbit.”
Slowly, with a confused face, he seemed to want to have
He did anything but approach his master and the fireplace where
The snake stopped and the little guy walked forward and started looking
chair. The snake raised its clean triangular head and smiled a little like
The armrests of the chair were crossed over his shoulder.
And then the chair was moving Frank, and he saw what was left of it. His walking stick fell to the floor with a thud. he
He opened his mouth and gasped. He was screaming like that.
so loud that he could not hear the words spoken by the thing in the chair
He picked up a stick. There was a pulse of green light, a screaming voice,
and the inventive Frank Brice. He was dead before he hit the ground.
A couple of miles away, the boy called Harry Potter woke up with
initial.

CHAPTER TWO '
SCA R

Harry sat stiffly on his back, breathing heavily as if he had
She was running. He wakes up from a vivid dream with
Her hands caressed his face. The old voice in the corner, i
It was like lightning, it was sparkling under his fingers.
It looked like someone had just wrapped a white hot wire around his body.
He sat down, one hand still on his forehead, and the other reached out to
Darkness for his balance, which was on the bedside table. he
Put them on and her bedroom is out of clear attention, decorated with a nude,
Orange light shining through the curtains from
the streetlight outside the window.
Harry ran his fingers over the blade again. It still hurts. he
He put the lamp beside him, got out of bed and ran
room, he opened his case and looked in the mirror inside the door. A blond boy of fourteen looked up at him, his
Beautiful blue eyes peered out from beneath his unruly black hair. He discussed
h
BATTLE
' '
the lightning bolt of his sight even closer. He looks
normal, but still annoying.
Harry tried to remember what he had been dreaming about before he
He got up. It looked real. . . . There are two people.
He knows and one he doesn't. . . . He defended himself vigorously, tilted his head,
I'm trying to remember. . . .
A blurred image of a collapsed room came to him. . . . there
He was a snake on a hotplate. . . A little guy named Peter.
Her name is girl . . . and a cold, high voice . . . The voice of
Lord Bulldemort. Harry felt like ice had broken.
down into her stomach at the same thought. . . .
He shut his eyes tightly, trying to remember what Voldemort was like, but he couldn't. . . . All Harry Knows
He was present at the moment when Voldemort’s chair lit up
front, and he, Harry, saw what was left of it and felt
spasm of panic, which he experienced . . . Or if that
The pain in his cheek?
And who was the old man? Because there really is a
old man; Harry watched him fall to the ground. It was all getting worse. Harry put his face in his hands and sighed
His bedroom, trying to cling to a picture of someone with no lights
room, but he seemed to be trying to hold water in his cupped hands; the
sentences were now flying rapidly as he tried to hold
them. . . . Voldemort and Wormtail were discussing a murder, though Harry couldn't remember the
name . . . And they were planning to kill each other . . . he!
Harry took his face out of his hands, opened his eyes, and stared
In his bedroom he seemed to expect to see something unusual.

' '
there. As it happens, there are unusual things in this room. A large wooden box stood open in the
at the foot of his bed, displaying a mattress, cane, black clothes, and
Different spelling books. Paper clips wrapped around that part of her body
The desk didn’t fit the big, empty cage that contained
The snowy owl, Hedwig, usually sleeps. On the floor by his bed a
The book was open; Harry used to say it before bed last
night. The pictures in this book were all moving. Men in bright orange uniforms were looking around on the bright lights.
They throw the red ball to each other.
Harry walked over to the book, picked it up, and saw a
The 3 magicians scored a brilliant goal by scoring the ball
a rope fifty feet long. Then he closed the book. also
Quidditch — in Harry’s opinion, the best sport in the world —
He couldn't avoid it at the moment. Installs Flying and
cannon on his bedside table, rush to the window, and pull
back of the curtains to explore the path below.
Privet Drive looks like a respectable downtown street.
He will be expected to look into the early hours of Saturday afternoon.
All the curtains are closed. As Harry could see through
Darkness, not a living creature in sight, not even a cat.
And still . . . And still . . . Harry went back to bed unmoving.
And he sat on it, running a finger across her clit again. There is no
debilitating suffering; Harry was no stranger to pain and injury. He lost all the bones in his right hand once and had
painfully twisted around at night. One arm is crossed.
With a pair of dark brown hair it wasn’t long ago. Only last year
Harry fell fifty feet through a spider web in the air. was
used for complex accidents and injuries; They cannot be stopped if you

' '
He studied at Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry and had
Knack because he attracts a lot of trouble.
No, the thing that was confusing Harry was that the last time his
He suffered an injury, as Voldemort approached
by. . . . But Voldemort couldn't be here, now. . . . The view of
Voldemort lurking in Privet Drive was too absurd, it couldn't possibly be. . . .
Harry listened closely to the silence that surrounded him. Did he half expect to hear a roof rattle or a whistle? and
Then he jumped a little when he heard his cousin Dudley give a
loud snores from the room next door.
Harry shook himself sensibly; He was being selfish. was
No one was home with him except Uncle Vernon, Aunt Petunia,
and Dudley, and apparently still sleeping, their dreams intact and unshattered.
Sleeping was Harry's favorite way to deal with the Dursleys; It’s not like
although they are every bit a welcome help. Uncle Vernon, uncle.
Petunia, and Dudley were Harry's only living relatives. are
Muggles who hate and despise magic in any form, which means
that Harry was about as welcome in their home as a litter box. they
explains away Harry's absence from Hogwarts in the last few days
Three years in a row everyone knew he went to St. Louis.
Center for Children of Incurable Crime. They know very well
that, being an underaged wizard, Harry wasn't allowed to use magic outside of Hogwarts, but they were still allowed to blame him for anything .
That’s not good enough for the house. Harry could never
describing them or telling them something about her life in the wizarding world. The very idea of ​​going to them when they’re awake, is
He told them of his devastating wounds, and of his troubles
For Voldemort, he was laughing.

' '
And yet, it was because of Voldemort that Harry had come to live .
With the Dursleys in the first place. If it weren't for Voldemort,
Harry wasn't going to have the lightning bolt on his forehead. whether
If it wasn't for Voldemort, Harry would still have parents. . . .
Harry was a year older the night Voldemort — the most
A powerful gray wizard for centuries, a fast-flowing power wizard for eleven years—he had reached his home and .
He killed his father and mother. Voldemort then put his wand back on.
about Harry; He did that curse which produced a lot of
embryonic and female reproduction throughout its reproductive development — and,
It doesn’t look like it, it doesn’t work. Instead of killing the little boy,
The mystery was getting the better of Voldemort. Harry lived s
Nothing but a lightning bolt shaped crack in his throat, and Voldemort had been reduced to something barely alive. capacity achieved,
His life barely forfeited, Voldemort fled; Terror in
on which the secret society of witches and wizards lived
It’s been a long time coming, Voldemort’s followers have left, and Harry
Potter became famous.
It was devastating for Harry to find out, about his wife
eleventh birthday, that he was a magician; It was even more interesting to find out that everyone in the Hidden Wizarding World
He knew her name. Harry arrives at Hogwarts to find the skulls
He turned and the hammers followed him wherever he went. But there was
Used now: Later this summer, he’ll begin work
Fourth year at Hogwarts, and Harry was already counting down the days
Until he returns to the castle again.
But it was still two months before he returned to .
school. He looked hopelessly around his room again, and his eyes

' '
He stopped at the birthday cards his two best friends sent him for
End of July. What would they say if Harry wrote to them and
Did he tell them about his sore throat?
Suddenly, Hermione Granger's voice seemed to fill his head, piercing .
It's horror.
“Is your throat hurt? Harry, this is really awesome. . . . Write to the teacher.
Dumbledore! And I'm going to see the famous magical diseases and
vibes. . . . Maybe there’s something in there about snacks. . . .”
Yes, that would be Hermione's advice: go straight to the Headmaster of Hogwarts, and meanwhile, crack a book. Harry
Looking out the window at the bright blue sky. doubt
Plenty if a book could help now. As far as he knew,
He was the only living person to survive a destruction like Voldemort's; It was unlikely, then, that he would find his own
established symptoms in common magical diseases and disorders. as
Having informed the headmaster, Harry had no idea where Dumbledore had gone on summer break. He flaunted himself to a
For a moment, he sees Dumbledore, with his long silver beard, dark brown trousers, and dark cloak, washed up on a beach .
Somewhere, he's rubbing beard lotion on his long curly beard.
However, wherever Dumbledore went, Harry was sure that Hedwig
He will be able to find it; Harry's wife couldn't send a letter to anyone, even if she didn't have an address. But what would
Does he write?
Dear Professor Dumbledore, Sorry to bother you, but my throat hurts
This morning. With all due respect, Harry Potter.
Even inside his head the words sounded foolish.
And so he tried to reason with his other friend, Ron Weasley's, .

' '
method, and at the same time, Ron's red hair and long, spiked nose
His face seemed to swim in front of Harry, wearing an expression of concern.
“Is your throat hurt? but . . . But you know who can’t be near you
Now, can it? I mean . . . You’d know, wouldn’t you? He would be trying to
You’re going to do it again, aren’t you? I don’t know, Harry, maybe I’m always cursing the assholes
Twinge a little. . . . I'll ask my dad. . . .”
Mr. Weasley was a fully qualified wizard who worked in the
Misuse of muggle things in the Ministry of Magic, but he
He didn’t have any particular expertise in the matter of immigration, as far as
He looked at Harry. Either way, Harry didn't like the idea of ​​it all
The Weasley family knew that he, Harry, had been jumping on
Some sad moments. Mrs. Weasley would be yelling more than
Hermione, and Fred and George, Run's sixteen year old twin
Brothers, they might think Harry is shy. The Wezli Ancestors
they were Harry's favorite family in the world; He was hoping they
He could invite him to sit any time now (Ron mentioned something about the Quidditch World Cup), and he somehow didn't .
They wanted his visit to be peppered with hard questions about his innocence.
Harry tapped his forehead with his fingers. What exactly is
He wanted (and felt almost ashamed to admit it to himself) he was
Something like — something like a parent: a great wizard whose advice he could ask for without feeling stupid, something he cared about .
He, who has experience in Dark Magic. . . .
And then the solution came to him. It was simple, and obviously, he couldn't believe it had taken so long—Sirius.
Harry jumped off the bed, hurried across the room, and sat
under his desk; He pulled a piece of paper towards her,
He filled his eagle feather cap with ink, wrote dear Sirius, and then
He pauses, wondering how to describe his problem, still puzzled

' '
Of which Sirius wasn't directly concerned. But then again,
Maybe it wasn’t much of a surprise — after all, he just got .
that Sirius had been his biological father for two months.
There’s a simple reason for Sirius’s complete absence from
Harry’s life up to that point — Sirius was in Azkaban, the scary one .
The wizarding prison is guarded by people called witches, unpredictable, wizards who came looking for Sirius at Hogwarts
When he ran away. But Sirius was innocent — those murders .
Judging by the fact that Wormtail, Voldemort’s henchman, did it, pretty much everyone now believes .
dead. Harry, Ron, and Hermione knew otherwise, however; they
He came face to face with Wormtail only last year,
though only Professor Dumbledore believed their story.
For a wonderful hour, Harry believed he was going
The end of the Dursley's, because Sirius had given him a home once it was his .
His name was erased. But the opportunity was squandered
From him — Wormtail escapes before they can take him to the .
The Ministry of Magic, and Sirius had had to flee for his life. Harry
They helped him escape on the back of a beast called Buckbeak,
And ever since then, Sirius had been getting worse. Home Harry can
If Wormtail hadn't run away he would have been risking it all
summer. It was doubly hard to return to the Dursleys knowing that he was about to flee them forever.
Still, Sirius was some help to Harry, even if he
He couldn’t be with her. It was because of Sirius that Harry now had all
His school stuff in his room with him. The Dursleys never hav
He left this before; Their collective desire to keep Harry as safe as possible, coupled with their fear of his abilities, is what drives them
He would pack his school bag in the safe under the sink every

' '
The summer before that. But their attitude has changed since I
He found out that Harry had a missing assassin for his stepfather — because Harry conveniently forgot to tell them that .
Sirius was innocent.
Harry had received two letters from Sirius since he was
Return to Privet Drive. Both are delivered, not by monsters (as it was
usually with pilots), but by large exotic birds with bright colours.
Hedwig did not accept these submissive rulers; She was
She doesn’t want to let them drink from her water bottle first
He flashes again. Harry, on the other hand, had loved them; They put
In his mind pine needles are white sand, and he hopes that,
Wherever Sirius was (Sirius never said, if letters were trusted), he was having fun. Somehow, Harry found it difficult to
imagine dementors living too long in bright sunlight; might
This is why Sirius went south. The Sirius Letters, available now
Hiding under the very usefully messy floorboard under Harry
bed, they sounded excited, and both of them pointed
Harry would call him if Harry ever needed him. So, he had to
Now, all right. . . .
Harry's lantern seemed to dissipate like that cold gray light
Ahead of the sunset he slowly climbed into the room. Finally, when the sun rose
He woke up, when the walls of his bedroom turned to gold, and when
Movement sounds can be heard by Uncle Vernon and Uncle
Petunia's room, Harry cleaned his desk of crumpled pieces of paper and read her letter out.
Hey Sirius,
Thank you for your last letter. The bird was huge; it
He can’t reach through my window.

' '
Things as usual here. Dudley's food isn't going
Very well. My uncle found him smoking holes in his apartment.
The room last night. They told him they had to cut his pocket.
Money if he keeps making it, then he’s really angry and lost
His playstation out the window. This is a type of computer
Thing you can play games on. A bit stupid really, now he doesn’t
Even it took MegaMutilation part three to get rid of his mind
things.
I’m so bad, especially because the Dursleys spoiled you
He can come out and turn them all into mushrooms if I ask you.
However, a strange thing happened this morning. My voice
He was wound up again. The last time it happened was because Voldemort
He was at Hogwarts. But I didn’t think it could be anywhere near
I am now, okay? Do you know if neela's nipples hurt sometimes?
Years later?
I will send this with Hedwig when she returns; She is on the hunt for now. Say hello to Buckbeak for me.
Yeah, Harry thought, that sounded about right. There was no point.
put in a dream; He didn’t want to seem like either
worried. He dropped the paper and set it aside on his desk.
Ready for when Hedwig returns. Then he rose to his feet and stretched,
And he opened his mouth again. Without looking back, he began jogging before descending into the early hours of the morning.

Chapter Three
HOW N

By the time Harry reached the mansion, the three Dursleys
They were already seated at the table. None of them looked
As he entered or sat down. Uncle Vernon's big red face was hidden
After the morning Daily Mail, and Aunt Petunia was opening a
grass-fed in quarters, its horns pressed against its horns like a lamb.
Dudley looked angry and agitated, and somehow seemed to
It even takes up more space than before. This was saying something,
As he always took one side of the table completely by himself.
When Aunt Petunia puts a quarter of unsweetened walnuts on
Dudley’s cover with a whispered “There you are, Diddy dear,”
Dudley glared at her. His life takes a very bad turn.
Since he came home for the summer at the end of his year
write.
Uncle Vernon and Aunt Petunia had found an excuse.
About his bad grades as usual : Aunt Petunia always insisted that Dudley was a very bright boy who was misunderstood by his teachers,
B
ANCHRAGH
' '
While Uncle Vernon maintains that he “wouldn’t want any swotty
Little Nancy to her son anyway.” They also skated on charges of bullying in the report — “He’s a rowdy little boy, but .
He can’t hurt a mouse!” Aunt Petunia said tearfully.
However, in the middle of the report were some well-chosen quotes from the school nurse that not even Uncle Vernon and Aunt Petunia could remotely explain. anyway
Aunt Petunia shouted that Dudley was a big bone, and that it was his .
poundage was definitely a fat dog, and that he was a growing boy
They need a lot of food, the fact remains that school nurses
I’ve never had knickerbockers big enough. the
the headmistress knew what Aunt Petunia's eyes saw — literally when she
He came to see fingerprints on its shiny walls, and in observing the looks and smiles of the neighbors — she simply refused .
Note: that far from needing extra food, Dudley has
It’s about the size and weight of a young bumblebee.
Well — after many pranks, after the quarrel that rocked Harry's .
The bedroom floor, and Aunt Petunia’s many tears—new
The regime had begun. The diet tray ordered by Smeltings’ school nurse was stashed in the fridge, which was
she had run out of everything Dudley loved — soft drinks and canned goods,
Chocolate chip cookies and burgers — and stuffed instead with fruit and nuts and the kind of stuff Uncle Vernon calls “rabbit
food." To make Dudley feel better about all this, Aunt Petunia had
She says the whole family follows the food too. It’s too late now.
A quarter of a bouquet for Harry. He knew it was too small.
of Dudley. Aunt Petunia seemed to feel that it was the best way to
Keep up Dudley's spell to make sure he does, otherwise he'll get
More food than Harry.

' '
But Aunt Petunia never knew what was hidden under the hood .
Floorboard on top. She had no idea that Harry wasn't following him.
All that food. When he got wind of the fact that he was
expected to survive the winter with carrot sticks, Harry sent
Hedwig to his companions with pleas for comfort, and they rose to the
occasion with the utmost respect. Hedwig returned from Hermione's quarters
Home with a big box full of sugar-free dessert. (of Hermione
His parents were dentists.) Hagrid, the Hogwarts Gamekeeper, had
obliged with a sack full of coffee from his homemade rock. (Harry
It does not affect these; He had far more experience than Hagrid had.
Cooking.) Mrs. Weasley, however, had prepared the family vase, Errol, .
with a great vegetable and a variety of meat dishes. Poor Errol, who
He was tall and lean, needing five days to recover from
The journey. And then on Harry's birthday (which the Dursleys had
doesn't count at all) won four fabulous birthday cakes,
One each from Run, Hermione, Hagrid, and Sirius. Harry still has
Two of them left, and so on, looking forward to a real lunch when
He went back upstairs and ate his food without complaining.
Uncle Vernon threw aside his paper with a disappointed sigh and looked down at his quarters of trees.
“Is that it?” He said sternly to Aunt Petunia.
Aunt Petunia gave him a hard look, then nodded slowly
In Dudley, which has already harvested a quarter of its hay crop and
He was staring into Harry's with a special look in his little piggy eyes.
Uncle Vernon gave a huge sigh, which shook his big, blond head
Mustache, and picked up his spoon.
The doorbell fell. Uncle Vernon jumped out of his chair.
And he went out into the hall. Swift as a flash, while her mother was

' '
Clinging to the trunk, Dudley steals Uncle Vernon's leftovers
the crop of grass.
Harry heard a conversation at the door, and someone laughing, and
Uncle Vernon replied curtly. Then the front door closed, and
The sound of tearing paper came from the hall.
Aunt Petunia placed the teapot on the table and looked up curiously to see where Uncle Vernon had arrived. She doesn’t have
You’ll have to wait a long time to find out; after about a minute, he came back. he
He looked sweet.
“You,” he growled at Harry. “In the living room. now."
Surprised, he wonders what he should have on earth
It worked this time, and Harry got up and followed Uncle Vernon from
kitchen and side room. Uncle Vernon locked the door.
Quickly behind them both.
“Okay,” he said, stepping to the fireplace and turning to face .
Harry looked like he was about to be placed under arrest.
"so."
Harry would much rather say, “So what?” But he
I didn’t feel like Uncle Vernon’s patience needed to be tested this early in
Morning, especially when she was already under so much strain
from lack of food. He consented therefore to looking with disgusted dignity.
“That’s just over,” Uncle Vernon said. He recalled an episode of
Crisp writing paper in Harry. " letter. About you.”
Harry's anger grew. Who will write to Auntie?
Vernon on it? Who knows who sent the letters to
The Postal Guardian?
Uncle Vernon looked at Harry, then at the letter
And he began to read aloud:

' '
Mr. and Mrs. Dursley
We’ve never been tested, but I’m sure you have
I had heard a lot from Harry about my son Ron.
As Harry told you, the end of Quidditch .
The World Cup was on Sunday night, and my husband,
Arthur, just managed to get special tickets through his connections in the Department of Magical Games and Sports.
I was hoping you’d let us take Harry to the meeting, because
This really is a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity; Britain has no
They’ve been hosting the cup for thirty years, and prizes are pretty sweet
He's coming. We certainly would have been happy if Harry stayed for
The rest of the summer holidays, and I'll see him safely
On the train back to school.
It would be kind of Harry to send us your reply as soon as possible.
As much as possible in a normal way, because a Muggle traveler has
He never visits our village, and I don't think he even knows
Where he is.
I hope to see Harry again soon.
Yours sincerely,
PS I hope we put up a lot of signage.
Uncle Vernon finished reading and put his hand to his chest
pocket, and pulled out something else.
“Look at this,” he growled.
He picked up the envelope containing Mrs. Weasley's letter.
They did, and Harry had to fight laughter. Every part of it was
covered in markings except for one square inch on the front, in the

' '
which Mrs. Weasley had sent out the Dursley's address in a minute
composition.
“She did cast a lot of spells, then,” Harry said, trying to .
Sounds like a Mrs. Weasley mistake anyone could have made.
His uncle's eyes twinkled.
“The postmaster noticed,” he said through gritted teeth. “He is very interested to know where this letter came from, he is. That’s why it
The doorbell rang. It looks like fun.”
Harry didn't say anything. Other people may not understand
Why did Uncle Vernon make a fuss about so many watches, but
Harry had lived with the Dursleys for so long he didn't know how .
touchy are about something even a little unusual.
Their biggest fear is that someone will find out they’re
connected (whatever it may seem) to people like Mrs. Weasley.
Uncle Vernon was still glaring at Harry, who was trying to keep an eye on him. If he didn’t do or say something stupid, he cou
Just be in the adventure of life. Expect Uncle Vernon to
He said something, but just kept staring. Harry decided to
Break the silence.
“Okay — can I go then?” he asked.
A small smile crossed Uncle Vernon's big, pale face. the
a mustache with a smile. Harry thought he knew what was going on behind that magic: a furious fight like two of Uncle Vernon's
Basic instincts came into conflict. They let Harry go
Making Harry happy is what Uncle Vernon fought for
versus thirteen years. On the other hand, it allowed Harry to
She went down to the Weasleys for the rest of the summer to remove
in a couple of weeks earlier than one might expect, and
Uncle Vernon hated having Harry home. to give himself .

' '
time to think, he obviously looked down at Mrs. Weasley 's letter.
again.
“Who is this woman?” he said, looking at the signature with
He doesn't like it.
“You see her,” Harry said. “She is the mother of my friend Ron, she
He used to meet him in front of the Hog — off the school bus in late 1990.
Final term.”
It almost says “Hogwarts Express,” and that’s a really specific direction .
To appease his uncle. No one mentioned the name of
Harry's loud schooling in the Dursley's house.
Uncle Vernon contorted his big face like he was trying to
Remember something very unpleasant.
“Dumpy kind of fuck?” he said at last. “Child abuse .
With red hair?”
Harry shook his head. He thought he was a little better than Uncle Vernon i
They called everyone a “fool”, when his own son, Dudley, had final
He has achieved what he has been pushing to do since he was three years old.
And he became taller than his size.
Uncle Vernon was examining the letter again.
“Quidditch,” he muttered under his breath. “Quiditc — what .
Is this injustice?”
Harry felt a second surge of pain.
"It's a sport," he said matter-of-factly. “He played on the horn —”
“All right, all right!” Uncle Vernon said aloud. Harry observed, s
Some convinced, that his uncle looked vaguely confused. Apparently, his nerves couldn’t bear the sound of the word “loop holes” in his living room. He took a reading of the letter.
again. Harry watched her lips form the words “Send us your answer . . .
On the way back.” He smirked.

' '
“What does she mean, 'back way'?” He's silent.
“Normal for us,” Harry said, and before he could stop his uncle .
To him, he added, “you know, owl post. That was normal
Magicians.”
Uncle Vernon looked as angry as if Harry had just said a
Disgusting strong words. Shaking from anger, he looked back in shock.
Physically, he seemed to expect to see some neighbors with their ears pressed against the glass.
“How many times do I have to tell you not to say that crap under my hat?” He grinned, his face now a rich cake
say. “Standing there, in the clothes Petunia and I wore .
Your uncouth bottom —”
"Only after Dudley had finished with them," Harry said coldly, and .
In fact, he was wearing a belt so big on him that he had
He had to restore his feet five times to be able to use his
hands, and that fell in front of the legs of his heavily buttoned jeans.
“Don’t talk to me like that!” Uncle Vernon said, growing
With worry.
But Harry wasn't going to stand for that. Days passed.
When he was forced to attack each of the Dursley's.
Stupid rules. He doesn’t follow Dudley’s food, and he doesn’t go
She’ll let Uncle Vernon stop him from going to the Quidditch world
A cup, not if it can be helped. Harry took a deep breath and concentrated.
and then he said, “Well, I can’t watch the World Cup. I can leave now,
so? No I have a letter to Sirius I want to finish. You know -
My stepfather.”
He had done it. He had said the magic words. Now he sees
The crimson quickly drained from Uncle Vernon’s face, making him
Looks like black paper ice mixed badly.

' '
“You — you write to him, don’t you?” Uncle Vernon said,
In a voice that would have been calm — but Harry saw his pupils .
The small eyes widened with sudden fear.
“Well — yes,” Harry said, calmly. “It’s been a while since I
She heard me, and, you know, if she didn’t, he might start to think that something was wrong.”
He stopped there to experience the validity of these words. He could almost see those dicks working under Uncle Vernon’s dark, rough, lust .
Split hair. If he tried to stop Harry from writing to Sirius, Sirius would
She thinks Harry is being unfairly ignored. If he tells Harry he can’t go
At the Quidditch World Cup, Harry would write and tell Sirius,
Who would have known that Harry was obsessed. There is only one.
Something for Uncle Vernon to do. Harry could finally see.
He formed in his uncle's mind as a large hairy face.
they were tough. Harry tried not to smile, to hold his face as
It’s as flat as possible. And then —
“Well, alright then. You can go to this ruddy . . . This is bullshit. . .
This World Cup thing. You write and read these — these Weasleys .
They’ll get you back, mind. I don’t have time to go drop you off.
off across the country. And you can spend the rest of the summer
there. And you can say — your stepfather . . . Tell him . . . tell
He you go.”
“Alright then,” Harry said with a grin.
He turned and walked towards the cell door, wrestling with
Urge to jump in the air and whoop. He was walking. . . was
Going to the Weasleys, he was going to see the world of Quidditch
cup!
Out in the hall he was about to bump into Dudley, who was
He lurks behind the door, obviously hoping to hear Harry

' '
he said. He looks shocked when he sees the big smile on Harry's.
face.
“It’s good coffee, isn’t it?” Harry said. “I feel
It’s really full, isn’t it?”
Laughing at the surprised look on Dudley's face, Harry took
Cum three at once, and he thrust himself inside her
bedroom.
The first thing he saw was that Hedwig had returned. She was sitting
In her cage, she stares at Harry with her big amber eyes, and
She turned her back in a way that meant she was shocked
some. Exactly what was bothering her became apparent almost at once.
“ME!” Harry said as a seemingly small, grey,
a feather tennis ball hit the side of his head. Harry licked the spot in surprise, looked up to see what was holding him, and
He saw a minute insect, small enough to fit in his hand.
They roamed frantically around the room like burst fireworks. Harry
Then he realized the monkey had dropped a letter at his feet. Harry
she knelt down, recognized Ron's handwriting, and then tore up the envelope. Inside was a hastily folded note.
Harry — DAD BOUGHS TICKETS — Ireland vs
Bulgaria, Sunday night. Mum’s writing to Muggles to ask
You will stay. They may already have the letter, I don’t know
What a wonderful Muggle post. I think I'll send this to Pig
anyway.
Harry looked at the word “pig”, then at the small
Now they’re looking at the light bulb in the ceiling. There was no

' '
He saw something that didn’t look like a pig. He may not be able to read.
Writing Run. Back to the letter:
We care about whether Muggles like it or not, you
I can’t miss the World Cup, only mum and dad say it’s better
If we pretend to ask their permission first. If they say yes, send
Elephant with your reply pronto, we'll come get you
At five o’clock on Sunday morning. If they say no, send Pig immediately
And we’ll come get you at five o’clock on Sunday anyway.
Hermione arrived this afternoon. Percy’s work begins —
the Directorate of International Intelligence Cooperation. don't
Mention something about being outside while you’re here except you
I want the pants to cum for you.
see you soon -
“Relax!” Harry said as the fairy bounced down on his.
head, screaming frantically with what Harry could only assume was
the satisfaction of reaching the letter to the right person. "come here,
I need you to take back my answer!”
The blanket floated down on top of Hedwig. She looked at Hedwig.
With the coldness in front of him, it seemed to beg him to try to get even closer.
Harry grabbed his ostrich feather necklace again and grabbed a new one
piece of paper, and wrote:
Ron, it's okay, the Muggles say I can come. See you five
12 o'clock tomorrow. I can't wait.

' '
He fell this letter very small, and with great difficulty,
They attached it to the leg of the little turtle as it hopped around the place happily. While the light was on, the lightning flashed again; it
zoomed out of the window and out of sight.
Harry turned to Hedwig.
“Do you feel like a long walk?” he asked her.
Hedwig smiled in a kind of reverence.
“Can you take this to Sirius for me?” he said, picking up his letter. "stop . . . I just want to get on with it.”
He unfolded the paper and quickly added a line of judgment.
If you want a ride, I’ll be at my friend Ron Weasley’s for
The rest of the summer. His dad got us tickets to the Quidditch World Cup!
The letter ended, and he fastened it to Hedwig's leg; It remains unusual.
Still, he seems determined to show her what a real mystery vase should look like
behave.
“I’ll be with Ron when you get back, okay?” Harry said.
She licked his finger affectionately, then, with a soft kiss
noise, she spread her massive wings and flew off the ground
window.
Harry watched without expression and then disappeared under his bed.
He tore off the missing floorboard, and pulled out a large piece of
Birthday cake. He sat there on the floor eating it, feeling the pleasure radiating from it. He had cake, and Dudley
It has nothing but wild grass; It was a beautiful summer day, to

' '
I'm leaving Privet Drive tomorrow, its trouble feels so good
Also, and he was going to watch the Quidditch World Cup. compliance
It’s hard, right now, to feel comfortable with anything — even the Lord
Voldemort.

CHAPTER FOUR '
BACK TO BURRO W

By twelve o'clock the next morning, Hari's school bathroom was full
With his educational qualifications and all his rich possessions —
The cloak of invisibility he got from his father, the wand of magic he got from Sirius, the Hogwarts map he earned
it had been donated by Fred and George Weasley the previous year. He emptied his hiding place under the floorboard that had been detached from whatever he was going to eat, checking every corner of his bedroom in case he had been forgotten .
coloring or painting books, and he pulled out the chart on the wall counting down the days to the first of September, on which he liked to .
embracing the remaining days until her return to Hogwarts.
The atmosphere inside number 4, Privet Drive was quite
stress. The sudden arrival at their house of a wizard of sorts was making the Dursleys nervous and anxious. Uncle Vernon
She looked shocked when Harry told her that
The Weasleys would arrive at five in the morning the very next day.
“I hope you told them to dress appropriately, these people,” he said .
B
Chapter Four
' '
he exclaimed at once. “I saw the kind of things your aunt wore. will
Better get used to wearing normal clothes, that’s all.”
Harry felt a pang of guilt. He rarely saw Mr. or
Mrs. Weasley wore something the Dursleys would call “normal.” Their children might wear Muggle robes during the holidays, but Mr. and Mrs. Weasley usually wore long gowns of varying sizes .
cases of chaos. Harry wasn't worried about what the neighbors would think, but he was annoyed at how awful the Dursleys were .
Could be for the Weasleys if they looked like the bad guys
The idea of ​​witches.
Uncle Vernon was dressed in his best clothes. For some people, this
It may seem like a thank you note, but Harry knew it
It exists because Uncle Vernon wants it to be fun and exciting. Dudley, on the other hand, looked suitably cool.
This wasn’t because the food was getting worse, but because of the
horror. Dudley emerged from his last encounter with a fully grown wizard with a displaced pig tail .
trousers, and Aunt Petunia and Uncle Vernon had to pay for
Removal to a private hospital in London. It wasn't surprising at all, then, that Dudley kept clenching his fist nervously .
on his back, and walked sideways from room to room, as
It does not present a single target to the enemy.
Lunch was an almost silent dinner. Dudley didn’t even make a fuss in
The food (oatmeal and oatmeal). Aunt Petunia is not
She eats anything at all. His arms are outstretched, his lips are outstretched,
And she kind of licked her tongue, like licked back
The angry diatribe she loved to hurl at Harry.
“They’re going to, right?” Uncle Vernon yelled at the
table.

' '
“Er,” Harry said.
He hadn't thought about that. How the Weasleys get chosen
had? They don’t have a car; Old Ford Anglia they
He once had was currently lurking in the Forbidden Forest at Hogwarts. But Mr. Weasley had borrowed a ministry of
The Magic Car last year; Might he do the same today?
“I think so,” Harry said.
Uncle Vernon shrugged his shoulders. Normally, Uncle Vernon would ask what kind of car Mr. Weasley drove; He kept
They judge other men by how big and expensive their cars are. but
Harry doubted Uncle Vernon would take to the Master.
Weasley even though he drove a Ferrari.
Harry spent most of the evening in his bedroom; unable
Stand and watch Aunt Petunia peeking through the net curtains.
Every few seconds, there seems to be a warning of an escaped wild animal. Finally, at a quarter to five, Harry returned
Downstairs is the living room.
Aunt Petunia was compulsively washing the floors. not
Vernon was pretending to read the paper, but his little eyes were not
He smirked, and Harry was sure he had indeed heard everything he had
It can to the sound of approaching traffic. Dudley was careful.
In a chair, his pig hands beneath him, gripped tightly
On the edge of it. Harry couldn't take the tension anymore; He lets
room, he went and sat on the couch, his eyes in hers
emotion and his heart beating rapidly from excitement and anxiety.
But five o’clock arrived, and then she was gone. Uncle Vernon, lingering
A little in his pants, he opened the front door and looked up and down
path, then pulled back his coat abruptly.
“They’re late!” he growled at Harry.

' '
“I know,” Harry said. “Maybe — er — driving is bad, or .
some."
Fifteen and fifteen. . . then quarter five . . . Was Harry starting
He would feel sorry for himself now. At half past six he heard Uncle Vernon
and Aunt Petunia talked in sly gestures in the living room.
“No regrets at all.”
“Maybe we have vegetables.”
“Maybe they’re thinking about inviting them to dinner if they’re late.”
“Well, they certainly won’t,” said Uncle Vernon, and .
Harry heard her stand up and began to walk around the living room.
“They will take the kid and go, there will be no punishment. This
If they come at all. Maybe you were wrong that day. I can say that
They kind of didn’t set up much shop necessarily. Either that or they suck
Some broken tin car and — AAAAAAAARRRRRGH!”
Harry jumped. From the other side of the cell door
came the sounds of the three Dursleys screaming, paralyzed with shock,
On the other side of the room. The next moment, Dudley came bursting into the hall.
They looked scared.
"what happened?" Harry said. “What’s wrong?”
But Dudley seemed unable to speak. Hands still held
his clothes on, and he runs as fast as he can to the kitchen. Harry
He hurried into the living room.
Loud screams and screams were coming from behind
The Dursleys' fireplace was lit up, with a fake coal fire attached
in front of him.
“What is it?” said Aunt Petunia, who turned back to the wall .
And he was staring, terrified, at the fire. “What is it, Vernon?”
But they remained in doubt for barely a second longer. Readings can
You'll hear from inside the closed fireplace.

' '
"Oh! Fred, no — go back, go back, there’s some sort of
Error — tell George not to — OUCH! George, no, no
room, go back quickly and tell Ron —”
“Maybe Harry can hear us, Father — maybe he’ll be able to ignore us .
out -"
There was a loud banging of fists on the tables behind the
Electric fires.
“Harry? Harry, can you hear us?”
The Dursleys had welcomed Harry in like a pair of happy pet elves.
"what is this?" said Uncle Vernon. “What’s going on?”
“They — tried to get here with Floo powder,” Harry said, .
They struggle with the urge to laugh. “They can fly—no .
You hold the lamp — hold —”
He approached the fireplace and called out the plates.
" Sir. Weather? Can you hear me?”
The shaking stopped. Someone inside the meat part
“Chh!” he said.
" Sir. Wesley, and Harry . . . The fire was lit.
You can’t go through there.”
"damn!" » said Mr. Wesley. “What on earth have they done .
You want to stop shooting for?”
“They’ve got electric fire,” Harry explained.
"really?" Mr. Weasley said excitedly. “Eclectic, you say?
With a remote? Gracious, I had to see that. . . . Let's think. . . Uh,
Run!”
Ron's voice now joined the others.
“What are we doing here? Is something wrong?”
“Oh no, Ron,” said Fred, very sarcastically. “No, this is
Exactly where we want to end up.”

' '
“Yeah, we had the time of our lives here,” said George,
His voice sounded strained, as if pressed against
The wall.
“Boys, boys . . .” Mr. Wesley said vaguely. “I’m trying to think
What will he do. . . . Yes . . . The only way . . . Stand back, Harry.”
Harry moved to the sofa. Uncle Vernon, however, passed
forward.
“Wait a minute!” Shouted into the fire. “What exactly are you
going to -"
bang.
The electric fire flickered across the room like a bonfire
He goes outside and drags Mr. Weasley, Fred, George, and Run into a
A cloud of dust and a thick fog. Aunt Petunia screamed and fell.
after a cup of coffee; Uncle Vernon caught her before she was
He collapsed on the floor, and yelled, speechless, at the Weasleys, all of them .
He has bright red hair, including Fred and George, similar
to the last note.
“That’s better,” Mr. Weasley said, brushing dust from his long beard .
green clothes and fixes his balance. “Oh — you must be .
Harry’s uncle and aunt!”
Tall, dark, and bald, he leaned toward Uncle Vernon, his
He reached out, but Uncle Vernon stepped back several feet,
dragged Aunt Petunia. Word completely enraged Uncle Vernon. his
Her best clothes were covered with white dust, which stuck to her hair
It was a mouthful and he made it look like he had just turned thirty.
years.
“Er — yes — sorry about that,” Mr. Weasley said, sighing .
hand and looks over his shoulder towards the raging fire. "It's all

' '
My fault. It just never occurred to me that we couldn't get
out in the other chapter. I have your fireplace connected to the Floo
network, you see — just for an evening, you know, so we can
Get Harry. Muggle fireworks are not supposed to connect,
Definitely — but I had a useful contact on the Floo Steering Committee and he recruited me. I can tell it right at once.
But, don't worry. I'd light a fire to drive the boys back, and then
I can fix your fire before I Disappear.”
Harry was prepared to bet that the Dursleys didn't understand a
Word one of this. Still staring at Mr. Weasley, they were stunned. Aunt Petunia tensed again and hid behind him.
Uncle Vernon.
“Hi, Harry!” Mr. Weasley said excitedly. “You got your baggage
ready?"
“It’s the basement,” Harry said, grinning back.
“We’ll get it,” Fred said suddenly. Looking at Harry, he and
George left the room. They knew where Harry's bedroom was, having once rescued him from it in the dead of night. Harry suspected
that Fred and George were hoping to see Dudley; they
He'd heard it a lot from Harry.
“Well,” said Mr. Weasley, shrugging his shoulders a little, while he .
They tried to find the words to break the very awkward silence. “Very — erm — .
Very good place you have here.”
Just as the spotless dining room had once been, it was now dusty and
Bits of a brick, this idea didn't go down well with the Dursleys. Uncle Vernon's face went serious again, and Aunt Petunia
She started licking her tongue again. However, they also appear
I was afraid to say anything really.

' '
Mr. Weasley was looking around. Loves everything to do.
With Muggles. Harry could see him getting ready to go see
Television and video recording.
“They’re running from Eckeltricit, aren’t they?” he said knowingly. "Oh
Yes, I can see the lines. I collect notes,” he added to Uncle Vernon.
“It’s batteries. It brought a very large set of batteries. My wife
He thinks I’m mad, but there you are.”
Uncle Vernon was clear that Mr. Weasley was a jerk too. he
Moving slightly to the right, she drew Aunt Petunia from
Looking, he seemed to think Mr. Weasley could easily escape on
Theirs is murder.
Dudley quickly walked back into the room. Harry could hear the
The clunk of his wand on the ceiling, and he knew that the noise had
They scared Dudley out of the house. Dudley leaned against the wall,
She looked at Mr. Weasley with frightened eyes, and tried to hide
Himself after his mother and father. Unfortunately, most of Uncle Vernon, despite his ability to hide Aunt Petunia with hair, was
Nowhere near enough to hide Dudley.
“Oh, he’s your cousin, is he, Harry?” Mr. Weasley said, holding
another stroke of courage in sound work.
“Yeah,” Harry said, “that’s Dudley.”
He and Run exchanged glances, then quickly looked away.
from another; The temptation to laugh almost disappeared.
overwhelming. Dudley was still holding his bottom as if
He was afraid of falling. Mr. Weasley, however, seemed genuine
She admired Dudley's own behavior. Indeed, from the volume of
his voice when he spoke again, Harry was pretty sure that Master.
Weasley thought Dudley was as mad as the Dursleys did
He had, except Mr. Weasley felt more pity than fear.

' '
“Did you have a good Christmas, Dudley?” He said kindly.
Dudley yelled. Harry noticed his hands were getting even tighter.
On his great forehead.
Fred and George returned to the room and took Harry's
school taxes. They watched their look when they walked in and saw
Dudley. Their faces twisted into identical evil grins.
“Oh, yes,” said Mr. Wesley. “Better get it then.”
He pulled down the sleeve of his apron and pulled out his wallet.
Harry watched the Dursleys pull up to the wall as one.
“Insendio!” Mr. Weasley said, pointing his wand at the window in the
The wall behind him.
The flames suddenly rose in flames, crackling furiously as if
They had been drinking for hours. Mr. Weasley took a small bottle of magic from his pocket, unwrapped it, took a handful of powder
inside, and put it on the fire, which turned emerald green
And he fell harder than ever.
“Off you go then, Fred,” Mr. Weasley said.
“He’s coming,” Fred said. “Oh no — stop —”
A bag of metal emerged from Fred's pocket and its contents.
they were now moving in all directions — big, red bodies in the fog .
colored shades.
Fred turned and pocketed them,
Then he gave the Dursleys an angry smile, stepped forward, and walked
Straight into the fire, he says “wreck!” Aunt Petunia gave a little
With deep breathing. There was a whisper, and Fred
He fell.
“Quite so, George,” Mr. Weasley said, “you’re potatoes.”
Harry helped George carry the tray back to the fireplace.
And bring it back to his end so he can hold it better. Then, with

' '
By the second bell, George had yelled “wreck!” and lost
also.
“Ron, you next,” Mr. Weasley announced.
“See you,” Ron greeted the Dursleys. He looked
up at Harry, then into the flames, yelling “the Burrow!”
And he fell.
Now only Harry and Mr. Weasley remained.
"That's . . . 'bye then,' Harry said to the Dursleys.
They didn’t say anything at all. Harry looked at the fire, but
As soon as he reached the center of the fire, Mr. Weasley pulled out a
his hand and held it. He was looking after the Dursleys in
Shame.
“Harry said goodbye to you,” he said. “You didn’t hear him?”
“It doesn’t matter,” Harry murmured to Mr. Weasley. “Honestly, I
You don’t care.”
Mr. Weasley didn't remove his hand from Harry's cock.
“You won’t see your nephew until next summer,” he said.
to Uncle Vernon with little amusement. “Surely you’d say .
goodbye?"
Uncle Vernon's face worked with anger. Teaching Perspective
A perspective from a man who just blew up half his life
The wall of the room seemed to be causing him the most pain. But sir.
The Weasley wand was still in his hand, and Uncle Vernon 's young eyes.
I darted towards him once, before saying, very calmly, “Hi, then.”
“See you,” Harry said, putting one foot forward in the grass .
warmth, which felt as pleasant as warm breath. Meanwhile,
However, a horrible screeching sound came from behind him, and Uncle
Petunia started to whimper.
Harry wheeled around. Dudley didn't stand back

' '
His parents. He was leaning over towards the coffee table, and was
by pinching and pressing on a foot-long, flat object that is
that came out of his mouth. One hour later, Harry
You realize that the foot-long thing is Dudley’s tongue — and that a
A cup of brightly colored toffee lay on the floor in front of her.
Aunt Petunia laid down on the floor next to Dudley,
He held the swollen end of his tongue and tried to lick it.
from his mouth; Not surprisingly, Dudley screams and pushes
good old fashioned, trying to warn her. Uncle Vernon was snoring and wringing his hands, and Mr. Weasley had to yell to
He made himself hear.
“Don’t worry, I can fix it!” He shouted, stepping forward.
Dudley with his wand drawn, but Aunt Petunia yelled
worse than ever and she laid herself on top of Dudley, protecting him
From Mr. Wesley.
“No, really!” Mr. Weasley said nervously. “It’s a simple process —
It’s toffee — my son Fred — a real cracker — but it’s
Only a belly rub — at least, I think it is — please, can I
Fix it —”
But far from being reassured, the Dursley's became even more anxious; Aunt Petunia was crying hysterically, kicking Dudley's
The tongue seemed determined to destroy it; Dudley appears to be a
He gasps for breath under the strain of his mother and his own.
wear; and Uncle Vernon, completely lost, took .
a Chinese figure from across the back table and kicked him very hard.
in Mr. Weasley, who merged, causing the network to break in
the explosive fire.
“Now really!” Mr. Weasley exclaimed, waving his wand.
“I’m trying to help!”

' '
Bellowing like a wounded buffalo, Uncle Vernon took another swig.
“Harry, go away! Just go!” Mr. Weasley shouted, his wand at Uncle
Vernon. “I’ll sort this out!”
Harry didn't want to miss the fun, but Uncle Vernon's second pressure quickly tested his left ear, and in line, he thought it
Best to leave the situation to Mr. Weasley. He went into the fire.
He looks over his shoulder as he says “the Burrow!” His latest performance
the living room view was of Mr. Weasley plucking the third jewel from Uncle Vernon's hand with his wand, Aunt Petunia .
She screams and kicks at Dudley, and Dudley's tongue lo
front like a giant slimy python. But the next moment Harry started moving faster and faster, and the Dursleys were being destroyed .
they disappeared from view in a burst of emerald green fire.

CHAPTER FIVE
THE WEASLEYS' REVELATIONS

Harry moves slowly faster and faster, fingers wrapped tightly around his
Parts, fuzzy flames flew past him, until he started
He will feel sick and close his eyes. Then, when he felt himself
Gently, he reached out his hands and stopped in time to
They stopped themselves from falling face forward from the Weasleys'.
The kitchen fire.
“Did he eat it?” Fred said excitedly, offering to pull
Harry to his feet.
“Yeah,” Harry said, brushing himself off. “What’s that?”
“Tuna tongue toffee,” Fred exclaimed. “George and I created them, and we were looking for someone to try them on
All summer. . . .”
The little kitchen burst into laughter; Harry looked over.
And he saw that Run and George were sitting in the enchanted wood.
A table with two red haired people Harry had never seen before.
Although he knew immediately who they were supposed to be: Bill and Charlie,
The two older Weasley brothers.
“How are you, Harry?” said someone closer to the couple, looking
at him and holding out a large fist, which Harry shook, feeling
coffee and bottles under his feet. This must be Charlie, who
Working with dragons in Romania. Charlie is built like a twin.
Short and taller than Percy and Ron, they were both tall and
Lanky. He had a broad, fine face, so weather-worn and gloomy that he looked almost sad; His hands were
Muscular, and one of them had a big, shiny lump on it.
Bill rose to his feet, smiling, and also shook Harry's hand. bill
It came as something of a surprise. Harry knew he was working for
The wizarding bank, Gringotts, and that Bill was the Head Boy in
Hogwarts; Harry always thought that Bill was an older version of
Percy: Prone to breaking laws and likes to control everyone
around. But, Bill was — there’s no other word for it — .
cool. He was tall, with long hair tied back in a ponytail.
He was wearing an earpiece with what looked like a stuffed animal.
from him. Bill’s clothes don’t look out of place at the rock
The concert, unless Harry knew his fingers would be worked, not n
leather, but of snow leather.
Before either of them could say anything else, there was an explosion
a loud noise, and Mr. Weasley appeared out of thin air about
George's shoulders. He was looking angrier than Harry.
He saw it.
“It wasn’t funny, Fred!” he shouted. “What on earth are you doing .
Give up the Muggle boy?”
“I didn’t give him anything,” Fred said, with another evil grin. "I
It just fell. . . . It’s his fault he went and ate it, I didn’t say
He is.”
“You dropped it on purpose!” said Mr. Weasley. “You know
He’ll eat it, you know he’s on a diet —”
“How far is his tongue?” George asked curiously.
“It was four feet long before her parents let me cut it!”
Harry and the Weasleys roared with laughter again.
“Isn’t that funny!” Mr. Weasley shouted. “That kind of behavior seriously strains relations between wizards and Muggles! I spent half my life.
Campaign against Muggles’ wickedness, and mine
Children —”
“We didn’t give it to him because he’s a Muggle!” Fred said
With anger.
“No, we gave it to him because he’s a giant abusive git,” he said .
George. “Isn’t he, Harry?”
“Yes, he is, Mr. Weasley,” Harry insisted.
“That’s not the point!” said Mr. Wesley. “You wait until I say .
Your mother —”
“Say what?” said a voice behind them.
Mrs. Weasley had just entered the living room. It was short,
A very pretty blond woman, although her eyes were
view this with suspicion.
“Oh hello, Harry, dear,” she said, looking at him and smiling.
Then her eyes returned to her husband. “Tell you what,
Arthur?”
Mr. Weasley paused. Harry could tell that, no matter how angry he was
He was with Fred and George, he didn't really intend to tell Mrs.
Weasley what happened. There was silence, but MR.
Weasley looked at his wife in shock. Then two girls appeared in
The kitchen door behind Mrs. Weasley. One, with lots of roses
Brown hair and slightly larger front teeth belonged to Harry and Ron
friend, Hermione Granger. The other, younger and redder, was Ron's younger sister, Ginny. They both smiled at
Harry, who smiled back, caused Ginny to go green — she had
He was very smitten with Harry since his first visit to the Burrow.
“Say what, Arthur?” Mrs. Weasley tried, with an ominous expression
Type of voice.
“Not at all, Molly,” Mr. Wesley smirked, “Fred and George .
Just — but I have a word with them —”
“What did they do this time?” said Mrs. Weasley. “If he has
Something to do with the Weasleys—”
“Why don’t you show Harry where he sleeps, Ron?” said
Hermione from the doorway.
“He knows where he sleeps,” Ron said, “In my room, he sleeps .
There last —”
“We can all go,” Hermione said quietly.
“Oh,” Ron said, chuckling. "right."
“Yeah, we’re coming too,” George said.
“Stay where you are!” said Mrs. Weasley.
Harry and Ron walked out of the bathroom, and they, Hermione,
And Ginny went out into the narrow hallway and up to the car
lines that zigzag through the house to the corridors.
“What are the Weasleys’ Wizard Rats?” Harry asked as they
July.
Ron and Ginny both laughed, though Hermione didn't.
“My mom found this box of junk files while cleaning
Fred and George’s room,” Ron said quietly. “Great long price tags
For the things they invented. Funny stuff, you know. False functions are
Trick sweets, loads of stuff. It was wonderful, I didn’t know they existed
Copy all of that . . .”
“We’ve been hearing rumblings from their rooms for ages, but .
We didn’t think they were actually doing things,” Ginny said.
“We thought they just liked the noise.”
“No, most of the stuff—well, all of it, really—was a bit ridiculous,” Ron said, “and, you know, they were planning to sell it for 100 bucks.
Hogwarts to make some money, and my mother loved them. told
It didn’t allow them to cook any longer, and burned all
Commandments. . . . She gets furious at them anyway. They didn't find
Very OWL as she expected.”
OWLs were standards of care, tests
Hogwarts students took over the age of fifteen.
“And then there’s this big argument,” Ginny said, “because my mom .
He wanted them to join the Ministry of Magic like my father, and
He told her all they wanted to do was open a comedy store.”
Just then a door opens on the second ship, and a face bursts through .
they came out wearing glasses with a nose and a very dry eye.
“Hi, Percy,” Harry said.
“Oh hello, Harry,” Percy said. “I was wondering who was making
All the noise. I’m trying to work here, you know — I have a
report to finish for the office — and it’s very hard to concentrate when people keep going up and down the stairs.”
“We’re not fucking,” Ron insisted. “We are moving. Sorry
If we disrupt the top secret activities of the Ministry of Magic.”
“What are you doing?” Harry said.
"A report to the Department of International Cooperation's defense," Percy said quietly. “We’re trying to right the ship
length. Some of these imports are just a shadow too
thin — temperatures were increasing at a rate of nearly three percent per year —”
"That would change the world, that announcement would change," Ron said. "front
A regular Christmas page, I’m waiting, the candle is pouring.”
Percy went a little blue.
“You might be sarcastic, Ron,” he growled, “but if there’s any sort of .
of natural law is required, we can find a market.
It’s full of low-fat, intensely absorbent nutrients
Forcefully —”
“Yeah, yeah, okay,” Ron said, and started upstairs .
again. Percy closed his bedroom door. As Harry, Hermione and Ginny followed Ron down another three flights of stairs, they yelled .
from the kitchen below pointing towards them. It looks like
Mr. Weasley told Mrs. Weasley about the flights.
The room at the top of the village where Run slept was very visible.
It was the same as the last time Harry came to stay: a flash
Ron’s 3 favorite Quidditch team, the Chudley Cannons, were
Looking and peering at crumbling walls and ceilings, and fish
The tank in the window, which previously held the frog,
Now it contained a very large head. The old Run mouse, Scabers,
He’s not here, but instead there’s that little brown beast that has
He received a letter from Ron to Harry in Privet Drive. He was jumping.
and down in a small cage and tweeting wildly.
“Shut up, Piglet,” Ron said, weaving his way between two
Four beds are included in the room. “Fred and George
They’re here with us, because Bill and Charlie are in their room,” he said .
Harry said. “Percy gets to keep his room all to himself because he is .
He got to work.”
“Er — why do you call that pig a squirrel?” Harry Ron asked.
“Because he’s being boring,” Ginny said. “His very name is .
The pig animal.”
“Yeah, and that’s not a nickname at all,” Ron chuckled.
“Ginny named her,” he explained to Harry. “She reckons it’s
sweet. And I tried to change it, but it was too late, it didn't respond
Read something else. So now it’s Pig. I have to keep him here because he's getting closer to Errol and Hermes. It annoyed me too, come to
that."
Pigwidgeon peered excitedly into his cage, pacing back and forth.
Harry knew Ron too well to take him seriously. He was screaming.
Completely about his old rat, Scabbers, but he was so sad
When Hermione's cat Crookshanks showed up and ate him.
“Where’s Cruikshanks?” Harry asked Hermione now.
“Out in the garden, I’m waiting,” she said. “He likes to follow
Gnomes. He’d never seen one before.”
“Percy’s work is fun, then?” Harry said, sitting down on a
beds and watching the Chudley Cannons grow in and
From the figures at the top.
“Are you enjoying it?” Ron said with a grin. “I didn’t count on him coming home
If my father didn’t make it. suspended. They just don’t make it to
the subject of its president. According to Mr. Crouch . . . As I was telling Mr.
Crutch . . . Mr. Crouch is opinionated . . . Mr. Crouch was saying
we . . . They’ll pick their paydays any day now.”
“Did you have a good summer, Harry?” Hermione said. "did
Are you getting our food portions and everything?”
“Yeah, thanks a lot,” Harry said. “They saved my life, those animals.”
“And did you hear — ?” Run started, but with a look from
Hermione sighed. Harry knew that Run was about to ask
About Sirius. Ron and Hermione were regularly involved in the
They help Sirius escape the Ministry of Magic they
He almost looked like Harry's godfather like him. however,
By discussing it in front of Ginny was a bad idea. No one but
They themselves and Professor Dumbledore knew how Sirius had
He fled, or believed his own instincts.
"I thought they stopped arguing," Hermione said, to follow up .
An awkward moment, because Ginny was looking awkward from Ron
For Harry. “Shall we go down and help your mother with dinner?”
“Yeah, okay,” Ron said. The four left Run's room and
He came back downstairs to find Mrs. Weasley alone in the kitchen.
She looked in a very bad way.
“We were eating outside in the garden,” she said as they entered.
“There just isn’t room for eleven people here. You can take
The paintings outside, girls? Bill and Charlie make the introductions.
Straws and towels, please, you two,” she said to Ron and Harry, .
She pointed her wand a little more forcefully than she intended
In a mouthful of lobster in the salon, which promptly came out of their mouths
that they ricochet off the walls and ceiling.
“Oh for heaven’s sake,” she whispered, now aiming her wand at .
A ball of dust, which loosened from the dashboard and began to roll
On the floor, he chops potatoes. “Both!” She shared
In vain, he now pulls dishes and towels from a cupboard, and
Harry knew she meant Fred and George. “I don’t know what’s going to happen to them, I really don’t. No desire, except you
They figured they were making as much trouble as they could. . . .”
Mrs. Weasley placed a large copper bowl on the
the kitchen sink and started twirling his cock inside her. a
The cream flavor oozed out of the frosting as it squeezed.
"It's not like they don't have a brain," she continued carefully, bringing the pan to the stove and lighting it with another flick of her knife, "but they hurt them, and if they don't
Pull away fast, they're going to be in real trouble. I have
More Hogwarts potions on them than anything else combined. whether
They continue on the road they are going, and they will end up near the
Improper use of the Department of Magic.”
Mrs. Weasley slammed her wand into the dish drawer, which shot
open. Harry and Ron both jumped out of the way like so many spears.
He snapped out of it, flew across the kitchen, and started chopping at the
potatoes, which have just been returned to the kitchen by
A ball of dust.
"I don't know where we went wrong with them," Mrs. said.
Weasley, she dropped her wand and started pouring more
balls. “For several years this has been the case, one after another, and .
They didn’t hear — OH NOT AGAIN!”
She picked up her wand from the table, and drew a
Squeeze loudly and it turns into a giant paper monster.
“One of their damn legs again!” she screamed. "how often .
Did I tell them not to drop them off?”
Grabbing her wand of truth, she turned to find that
The salt on the stove was steaming.
“C'mon,” Ron snapped at Harry, grabbing a handful of nails from the open drawer, “let’s go help Bill and Charlie.”
They left Mrs. Weasley and went out the back door to the
yard.
It took only a few steps when Hermione stepped out in her bare feet
The ginger cat, Crookshanks, came flying out of the garden, tail of the button held high in the air, chasing what looked like mud
potatoes on the feet. Harry instantly recognized him as a gnome. Only ten
Inches long, his sturdy little legs beat rapidly as he ran
across the yard and landed headfirst into one of the Wellington
existing bottles were stacked against the door. Harry could hear the
the gnome chuckles softly as Crookshanks inserts his tail into the
boot, trying to reach it. At that moment, there was a very loud crash noise
coming from the other side of the house. The source of the confusion became apparent when they entered the garden, and saw that Bill
and Charlie had both put out their legs, and they were doing two battered old desks flying high above the grass, close to each other,
Everyone is trying to knock each other out of the sky. Fred and
George was cheering, Ginny was laughing, and Hermione was
Staggering past the wall, he seemed torn between resting and
anxiety.
Bill’s table hit Charlie’s with a huge crash and it dropped one
of his legs are out. There was a thud from the ceiling, and they were all
She looked up to see Percy's head sticking out of a window on the second floor.
“Take it down?!” he shouted.
“Sorry, Perce,” Bill said, smiling. “How do cookie cutters come in?”
“Too bad,” Percy whispered, lowering the window .
shut. Jokingly, Bill and Charlie got the keys safely to
grass, end to end, and then, with a flick of his wrist, Bill reconnected
Table back and tablecloths from scratch.
By seven in the morning, both tables were burrowing under desks and
Mrs. Weasley's goodbye dishes, and the Weasley nine,
Harry, and Hermione were getting ready to eat down
Clear sky, deep blue. For anyone who has been living on food
of yogurt that got bigger and bigger throughout the summer, this was hell, and at first,
Harry listened rather than spoke as he helped himself to the chicken
and soup, baked potatoes, and salad.
At the end of the table, Percy was telling his father all about
his report on deck caps.
"I told Mr. Crouch that I'd have it ready by Tuesday," Percy said .
He was joking around. “It was a little sooner than he expected, but .
I like to stay on top of things. I think he’ll thank me for doing it.
At the best of times, I mean, there’s a lot of work in our domain alone
Now, what with all the World Cup paraphernalia. We just
We don’t get the help we need from the Department of Magic
Games and sports. Play Bagman —”
“I love Ludo,” Mr. Weasley whispered. “He was the one who brought
us such good gifts for the Cup. I did him a little favor: It’s his
My brother, Otto, got into a trouble spot — a gravel pit with abnormal strength — I saved the whole thing.”
“Oh Bagman, yeah, that’s cool,” Percy grinned, “but how did he get to be the head of the Department . . . When the
Check it out with Mr. Crouch! I can’t see Mr. Crouch losing a member of our department and not trying to find out what happened
to them. Do you realize that Bertha Jorkins is missing more than one
A month now? She went on holiday to Albania and you never came back?”
"Yeah, I was asking Ludo about that," Mr. Weasley said, smirking.
“He says Bertha has gone missing many times before now—though .
I have to say, if anyone had been in my department, I would have been worried. . . .”
“Oh Bertha it’s hopeless, okay,” Percy said. “I heard she was
It’s been moved from part to part for many years, much more
More trouble than it’s worth . . . But all the same, Bagman should be
I'm trying to find it. Mr. Crouch was running a private interest,
She worked in our department at one point, you know, and I think
Mr. Crouch was very grateful — but Bagman just keeps laughing and says that maybe she misread the map and ended up in Australia instead of Albania. But” — Percy threw in an interesting twist .
I smiled and he took a deep swig of elderflower wine — “we’ve had plenty .
Shop on our shelves at the Office of International Magic
Cooperation without the ability to find members of other members
also. As you know, we have another big event planned right after the World Cup.”
Percy cleared his throat significantly and looked down towards the
The end of the table where Harry, Ron and Hermione sat.
“You know the one I’m talking about, Dad.” He raised his voice.
little. “The one with the big secret.”
Ron rolled his eyes and gestured to Harry and Hermione, “He .
He’s been trying to get us to wonder what the scene was about since he started
work. Maybe a car exhibition with a flat roof.”
Across the table, Mrs. Weasley was talking to Bill
On his necklace, which appeared to be a recent acquisition.
“. . . With a big tooth missing on it. Sure, Bill, what are they doing
Say at the bank?”
“Mom, no one at the bank gives a damn how I dress as long as I’m
Bring home a lot of goodies,” Bill said patiently.
“And your hair is growing, dear,” Mrs. Weasley said, straining .
His staff with love. “I was hoping you would let me give it a trim. . . .”
“I love her,” Ginny said, standing next to Bill. “You are very old-fashioned, mother. Anyway, nowhere close as long as the teacher
of Dumbledore. . . .”
Next to Mrs. Weasley, Fred, George, and Charlie were all talking
spiritually about the World Cup.
"It must be Ireland," said Charlie quietly, monomouthed .
of potatoes. "They dismantled Peru in the semifinals."
"Bulgaria has Viktor Krum, though," Fred said.
"One good Krum player, Ireland have seven," said Charlie .
s duration. “I hope England gets through. weird,
That’s what it is.”
"what happened?" Harry said angrily, feeling more remorseful than ever
His isolation from the Wizarding World while held in Privet
drive.
“Down to Transylvania, three hundred and ninety to ten,”
Charlie said calmly. “Amazing performance. And Wales lost s
Uganda, and Scotland was annexed by Luxembourg.”
Harry had been on the Gryffindor House Quidditch team in the past.
Since his first year at Hogwarts and has one of the best competitions
explosions around the world, and the Firebolt. Flying came more naturally to
Harry thanks to everything in the magical world, and played in
The position of Seeker on the Gryffindor House team.
Mr Weasley invents a candle to light up a burning garden.
Before they had their homemade strawberry ice cream, and by
By the time they finished, the mushrooms were floating down on the table,
And the warm air was fragrant with the smell of grass and moss. Harry was feeling well fed and at peace with
The world as he watches many gnomes wander through the lush woods, laughing hysterically and being closely chased by Crookshanks.
Ron looked anxiously at the table to see if the rest of the
The family was talking together, and then he said aloud to Harry,
“So — have you heard from Sirius lately?”
Hermione looked up and listened closely.
“Yeah,” Harry said quietly, “twice. It looks good. I wrote to him.
yesterday. Maybe he’ll write back while I’m here.”
Suddenly, he remembered the reason he had written to Sirius,
And for a moment he was on the verge of telling Ron and Hermione .
About his hair breaking again, and about that dream he woke up
he . . . But he really didn’t want to worry about them right now, not
While he himself was enjoying joy and peace.
“Look at the time,” Mrs. Weasley whispered, looking at her .
Wrist watch. “You really should be in bed, all of you—
You’ll wake up at the crack of dawn to get to the Cup. Harry, if you
Leave your school report, I will pick up your things tomorrow at
Diagon Street. I take everyone else's. Maybe there isn’t time
After the World Cup, the match lasted five days last time.”
“Wow — I hope she does this time!” Harry said excitedly.
“Well, I really don’t,” Percy said sheepishly. “I’m trembling
I’ll think about how my photography would look if I stayed away from
They work five days.”
“Yeah, can someone shove the piss in him again, eh, Perce?”
Fred said.
“That was a typical Norwegian bean!” Pierce said, walking
Very red in the face. “It’s nothing personal!”
“It is,” Fred whispered to Harry as they rose from the table.
“We got through it.”

Chapter Six
YEAR Y

Harry felt like he was about to fall asleep in
Ron's room when Mrs. shook him.
Wesley.
“Time to go, Harry, dear,” she whispered, standing up to get up .
run.
Harry felt for his wand, put it down, and sat up. compliance
It was still dark outside. Ron looked blankly as his mother woke up
he. At the foot of Harry's desk, he saw two adults, paired
The forms that emerge from the intersections of the waves.
“ 'S' time already?” Fred said with a grin.
They dress quietly, too sleepy to talk, and then, they creep and
They climbed up, and the four of them made their way downstairs to the kitchen.
Mrs. Weasley was stirring the contents of a large pot over
ball, while Mr. Weasley was sitting at the table, watching a
Four large parchment tickets. He looked down as the boys walked in and
He lowered his arms so they could see his dick more clearly. he
h

' '
He was wearing what appeared to be a golf shirt and a very old one.
A pair of jeans, slightly larger than him and carried by a pair of jeans
Leather boots.
“What do you think?” he asked softly. “We should go
incognito — do I look like a Muggle, Harry?”
“Yeah,” Harry said, smiling, “very good.”
“Where’s Bill and Charlie and Pir-Percy?” George said, unable to suppress a broad grin.
“Well, it’s Apparating, isn’t it?” Mrs. Weasley said, pushing a large pot to the table and beginning to pour the concoction into it.
balls. “So they might have a little bit of a bite.”
Harry realizes that Apparating is falling out of the same place
And it shows up almost instantly in the other, but he doesn’t know
Every student at Hogwarts would do it, and he realized it was pretty cool
difficult.
“So are they still in bed?” Fred said irritably, pulling his bag of
potatoes next to it. “Why can’t we Apparate too?”
“Because you’re underage and you haven’t passed your test,”
said Mrs. Weasley. “And where did the girls get to?”
She storms out of the kitchen and can be heard swearing at
stairs.
“Do you have to take a test for Apparate?” Harry asked.
“Oh yes,” Mr. Weasley said, placing the gifts safely in the trash .
the back pocket of his jeans. “The Ministry of Safe Transportation had to prosecute two people the other day for Apparating
Without permission. It’s not easy, Apparition, and when it’s not done
Well it can lead to negative side effects. These two I’m talking about
They pretty much went and fucked themselves.”
Everyone at the table except Harry frowned.

' '
“Er — with a knife?” Harry said.
“They left half of themselves behind,” said Mr. Weasley, now .
with large bruises on his cheeks. “So, really,
They were stuck. It can’t go both ways. I have to wait.
A slow-motion deployment squad to deal with them. It means good old
Quite a bit of paper, I can tell you, what with the Muggles picking at the body parts they left behind. . . .”
Harry had the sharp vision of two legs and one droopy eyeball.
It was abandoned on Privet Drive.
“Are they okay?” he asked, surprised.
“Oh yes,” Mr. Weasley nodded. “But they got a
a harsh punishment, and I don’t think they’ll try it again anytime soon.
You're not talking to the Apparition. There are a lot of adults.
The Wizards don’t care. They prefer bodies - slowly, but
More safely.”
“But Bill and Charlie and Percy can all do it?”
“Charlie had to take the test twice,” Fred said with a smile. "he
Failing the first time, he ended up five miles south of where he wanted to tell
Read, right about some poor old lady doing her shopping.
remember?"
“Yeah, well, he passed a second time,” said Mrs. Weasley,
I marched back to the bathroom between hearty sniggers.
“Percy just passed two weeks ago,” George said. "was
Apparating down every morning since, just to prove he could.”
There were footsteps in the driveway and Hermione and
Ginny entered the kitchen, both looking small and nervous.
“Why do we have to get up so early?” Ginny said, straddling him
Eyes and sitting at the table.
“We’ve had a bit of a trip,” Mr. Weasley said.

' '
"walk?" Harry said. “What, we’re going to the World Cup?”
“No, no, that’s miles away,” Mr. Weasley said, frowning. “We only
We must go the short way. It’s just too hard for an adult
The number of wizards to gather without attracting Muggle attention. We have to be very careful about how we proceed with the loss of
times, and on a major occasion like the Quidditch World Cup —”
“George!” said Mrs. Weasley suddenly, and they all jumped up.
"what?" George said, in a low voice that wouldn’t offend anyone.
“What’s that in your pocket?”
"nothing!"
“Don’t lie to me!”
Mrs. Weasley pointed her wand at George's pocket and said,
“Action!”
Lots of small, brightly colored details, expanded from George's
pocket; He made a strike at them but missed, and they retreated properly
In Mrs. Weasley's outstretched hand.
“They told you to destroy them!” Mrs. Weasley said angrily,
They hold what is undoubtedly more Tuna Tongued Toffees.
“We told you to take off! Empty your pockets, go on, both
You!”
It’s an uncomfortable scene; Obviously the twins were trying
They will take a lot of substance out of the house, and there is
Only by using her magic wand did Mrs. Weasley manage to
To find them all.
“Akiyu! What! Action!” She screamed, and papers went up from everyone
kind of unlikely places, including George’s jacket sleeve and
looks at Fred’s jeans.
“It took us six months to narrow those down!” Fred shouted for his.
My mother as she threw arrows.

' '
“Oh a great way to spend six months!” she screamed. “No wonder
You didn’t get more than OWL!”
Overall, the atmosphere was not very friendly because they brought
departure. Mrs. Weasley was still beaming when she kissed the Master.
Weasley on a pedestal, though not as close as the twins, i
Everyone picked up their bags on their back and left.
He was speechless.
“Well, have a good time,” said Mrs. Weasley, “and treat yourselves,” she said from behind the back window of the kitchen, but it wasn’t boarded up .
Look back or wait. “I’m going to take Bill, Charlie and Percy with them .
About midday,” said Mrs. Weasley to Mr. Weasley, for he, Harry,
Run, Hermione, and Ginny started walking across the dark courtyard behind Fred
and George.
It was cold and the moon was still up. Only one is green, green
The tinge along the skyline to their right showed that the dawn was
approach. Harry, having been thinking of thousands of
The Wizards are sprinting towards the Quidditch World Cup, quickly reaching 100.
You went with Mr. Weasley.
“Then how is everyone going to get there without all the Muggles noticing?” he asked.
"It's a huge organizational problem," Mr. said.
Wesley. “The problem is, about ten thousand wizards are staring .
Forward at the World Cup, and of course, we just didn’t have a wizard
Site is big enough to accommodate them all. There are places that Muggles can’t get into, but imagine trying to infiltrate a hundred thousand .
Wizards in Diagon Alley or at the Nine-Three-Quarters platform. so
We had to find a nice patch of grass, and set up several anti-Muggle defenses. The entire department has been working on it for months. First, of course, we need to move

' '
The doors. People with cheaper tickets should arrive two weeks later.
before. A small number use Muggle transport, but we cannot
There are a lot of people picking their buses and trains — remember,
Magicians come from all over the world. Some methods, n
True, but we need to set the confidence points to be visible, okay
Away from the Muggles. I believe there is a manual screwdriver used as a
point of Uban. For those who don’t want to Apparate, or
It’s not possible, we use Portkeys. are objects used to transport
Wizards from place to place at a predetermined time. You can do
multiple groups at once if you need to. There are two hundred
Portkeys are installed at strategic points around Britain, and these are the nearest
One we had was up at the top of Mount Stoatshead, so that’s where we were
upside down.”
Mr. Weasley pointed in front of them, where there was a large red box .
arrived above Ottery St. Village.
“What kind of things are Portkeys?” Harry said with a curious smile.
"Well, they could be anything," Mr. Weasley said. “Unpredictable
Things, obviously, so Muggles don’t go pick them up and play with them . . . The only thing they will think about is the food. . . .”
They go down the narrow, dark road to the village,
The silence was broken only by their footsteps. The sky is very clear.
Slowly as they make their way through the village, its low-pitched humming rises to a low hum. Harry's hands and feet were freezing.
Mr. Weasley kept checking his watch.
They didn’t have the breath to talk as they started
Climb Mount Stoatshead, occasionally slipping into the Hidden Rabbit
The corners, slipping over the black tuffets of the tree. Every breath Harry
He grabbed he was rigid in his chest and his legs started to swell
When, at last, his feet found solid ground.

' '
“Whew,” Mr. Weasley said, removing his glasses and wiping .
in them on his pants. “Well, we made good time — we had ten .
minutes. . . .”
Hermione came last on top of the hill, holding onto a branch.
On his side.
“Now we just need the Portkey,” Mr. Weasley said, instead .
glasses and staring at the floor. “It’s not going to be big. . . .
series . . .”
They’re scattered, they’re running. They were only a couple of minutes into it, however, when a scream ripped through the shaky air.
“Here, Arthur! Here baby, we have it!”
Two towering figures are portrayed against the starry sky over
the other side of the mountaintop.
“Amos!” Mr. Weasley said, smiling as he turned to the man
who cried out. The others followed.
Mr. Weasley was shaking hands with a red-faced wizard with
Brown woman, holding an old childish looking bag
In his other hand.
"This is Amos Diggory, everybody," Mr. Wesley said. “It works
For Magic Management and Monitoring
creators. And I suppose you know his son, Cedric?”
Cedric Diggory was a very handsome boy, about seventeen years old. He was the captain and researcher of the Hufflepuff house quidditch team at Hogwarts.
“Hello,” Cedric said, smiling at them all.
Everyone said hi to me except Fred and George, the only
He ran his head. They didn’t quite forgive Cedric for losing to them
team, Gryffindor, in the first Quidditch match of last year.
“Long walk, Arthur?” Cedric's father asked.
“It’s not too bad,” Mr. Weasley said. “We lived just across the street .
of the village there. you?"
“We have to get up for two, don’t we, Ced? I'm telling you, I'd be happy.
When he gets his Apparition test. still . . . Don’t complain . . .
The Quidditch World Cup, don’t miss it for a bag of Galleons — and tickets cost about the same. Beware, it looks like I have
easily. . . .” Amos Diggory looked good around the
The three Weasley children, Harry, Hermione, and Ginny. “All these things are yours,
Arthur?”
“Oh no, only black,” Mr. Weasley said, pointing to his
children. “This is Hermione, Ron’s friend—and Harry, another friend—”
"Merlin's hat," Amos Diggory said, his eyes brightening. “Harry?
Harry Potter?”
“Er — yes,” said Harry.
Harry was used to people looking at him strangely when
They meet and are charmed by how their eyes suddenly turn to the lightning
pain in his head, but it always makes him uncomfortable.
"Ced's called for you, of course," Amos Diggory said. "told
We were all about playing against you last year. . . . I said, I
He said — Ced, is what you tell your children, that
will. . . . You defeated Harry Potter!”
Harry couldn't think of any answer to that, so he remained silent.
Fred and George were both grinning. Cedric looked a little.
embarrassed.
“Harry’s lost his magic, Dad,” he mumbled. “I told you . . . it
It was an accident. . . .”
“Yeah, but you didn’t fall, did you?” Amos yelled sadly, throwing his son on his shoulder. “Always smart, our Ced, always the guy . . . But the nice guy won, I’m sure Harry would say the same,
You're not, are you? One falls off its keyboard, the other stays, and you don't
You’d have to be a genius to say who’s the best bodybuilder!”
“It should be almost time,” Mr. Weasley whispered, releasing .
Look again. “You know if we wait any longer,
Amos?”
“No, Lovegoods have been there for a week already and
Fawcetts couldn’t get tickets,” Mr Diggory said. “There are nothing
More of us in this area, are there?”
“Not that I know of,” Mr. Weasley said. “Yeah, a minute
off. . . . We better be prepared. . . .”
He turned to Harry and Hermione.
“You just need to touch the Portkey, that’s all, a finger will do —”
Unfortunately, because of their huge hulls, the nine
They gathered around the old bulldozer held by Amos Diggory.
They all stood there, in a tight circle, as a cold wind blew
the top of the mountain. No one spoke. Suddenly it occurred to Harry how confused he was
This would be if a Muggle walked in here now . . . nine
People, two of them grown men, holding onto this manky old tub in
Halfway up, he waits. . . .
"three . . ." said Mr. Weasley, one eye still on his watch,
"Two . . . one . . .”
It happened immediately: Harry felt as if a needle just behind his back had suddenly snapped forward. his
The feet left the floor; He could feel Run and Hermione all around him.
From her, their shoulders press against hers; they were all rushing forward in a whirlwind of wind and moving glory; His first finger is sticky.
to the tube as being magnetically pulled forward and
so -
His feet hit the ground; Ron turned around and
He fell to the ground; Hit Portkey on the floor in front of his head with a root
A stop.
Harry looked away. Mr. Wesley, Mr. Digury, and Cedric were
He was still standing, though looking very windward; Everyone else was
on the ground.
“Seven and five from Mount Stoatshead,” said a voice.

Chapter Seven
BAGMAN AND CROOK H

Harry untangled himself from Ron and got to his feet.
They reached what appeared to be a deserted road.
Stretch of the hot moor. In front of them was two members and
Weird looking magicians, one of them holding a large gold
See, the other is a paper and glue board. Both were
Dressed like Muggles, though less sophisticated: The guy s
The clock wore a tweed coat with round galoshes; His friend
One kilt and one poncho.
“Lightning, Basil,” Mr. Weasley said, raising the wand and .
He gives it to the Kilted Wizard, who puts it in a large box of
They use Portkeys next to it; Harry could see an old journal, and
Fake drinks can, and chopped balls.
“Hello there, Arthur,” said Basil sadly. “Not in practice, eh? It’s everything
right to someone. . . . We’ve been here all night. . . . Better get
Out of the way, we had a big party coming in from the Black Forest at five-thirty. Wait, I'll find your cabin location. . . . Wezli . . .
h

' '
Wezli . . .” He scrutinized his card list. “About a quarter of
Hike a mile there, first field you come to. He called the site manager
Mr. Roberts. Digory . . . The second field . . . Ask Mr. Payne.”
“Thank you, Basil,” Mr. Weasley said, urging everyone to .
Follow him.
They continued on along the edge of the cliff, unable to make out much
With a smile. After about twenty minutes, a small stone house near the entrance came into view. Furthermore, Harry can only
Make one hundred and one hundred rectangular ghost shapes.
Climbing across a large field towards a dark wood about
agency. They said goodbye to the Diggorys, approaching the
The door of the house.
A man was standing in the doorway, facing the tents.
Harry knew at a glance that this was the only true Muggle for many acres. Hearing their footsteps, he turned his head to
Look at them.
"morning!" Mr. Weasley said excitedly.
“Lightning,” said the Muggle.
“Will you be Mr. Roberts?”
"Yes, I will," Mr. Roberts said. “And who are you?”
“Weasley — two tents, they’ve been abandoned for two days?”
“Aye,” said Mr. Roberts, pointing to a note pinned to the door.
“You have a place up by the tree there. Just that night?”
“That’s all,” said Mr. Wesley.
“You’ll pay now, then?” Mr. Roberts said.
“Oh — of course — of course —” said Mr. Weasley. goes back a
He approached the couch and motioned Harry towards him.
“Help me, Harry,” he murmured, pulling out a vial of Muggle money .
from his pocket and started tearing up the envelopes. “This is

' '
A — a — a ten? Oh yes, I see the small size on it now. . . . so
Is this five?”
"Twenty," Harry explained in a lower voice, ignoring Mr. Roberts trying to catch every word.
“Oh yes, that’s right. . . . I don’t know, these little slips of paper . . .”
“Are you a foreigner?” Mr. Ruberts said when Mr. Wesley returned with .
Appropriate notes.
"foreign?" replied Mr. Weasley, confused.
“You’re not the first one to have problems with money,” he said .
Mr. Roberts, stared at Mr. Weasley closely. “I have two obstacles and
Pay me in big gold coins the size of hubcaps ten minutes ago.”
“You really know?” Mr. Weasley said nervously.
Mr. Roberts wandered into a kitchen for some change.
“It wasn’t that crowded,” he sighed, looking out .
The field of vulnerability as well. “Hundreds of pranks before. People in general
Just break. . . .”
“Is that true?” Mr. Weasley said, extending his hand towards hers .
change, but Mr. Roberts wouldn't give it to her.
“Aye,” he muttered. “People from all over. prison for aliens. And it’s not just foreigners. Fools, you know? There is a
bloke goes 'round in a kilt and a poncho.”
“Isn’t it necessary?” Mr. Weasley said solemnly.
“It’s like some kind of . . . I don't know. . . Like some kind of demonstration,”
Mr. Roberts said. “They all seem to know each other. It’s like a big
party."
At that moment, a magician in plus-fours appeared out of thin air
near Mr. Roberts' front door.
"miss!" He said quietly, pointing his wand at Mr. Roberts.
Instantly, Mr. Roberts’s eyes popped out of focus, his eyelids

' '
It was unfastened, and a look of dreamless disbelief fell upon his face.
Harry knew the symptoms of someone whose memory had just been shaped.
“The shopping cart for you,” Mr. Roberts quipped to .
Mr. Weasley. “It’s your change.”
“Thank you very much,” Mr. Weasley said.
The magician in plus-fours accompanied them to the door to the
camp. He looks exhausted: his chin is red with stubble.
There were deep dark circles under his eyes. Once from
Interrupting Mr. Roberts, he muttered to Mr. Weasley, “He had .
Lots of problems with it. He needs refresher therapy ten times a day
To make him happy. And Ludo Bagman isn't helping. By car
of the district talks about Bludgers and Quaffles at the top of his voice,
Not worrying about anti-Muggle defenses. Blimey, I’ll be happy when
This is over. I’ll see you later, Arthur.”
He left.
“I thought Mr. Bagman was the Hero of the Magic Games and
Sports,” Ginny said, smiling proudly. “He should know better .
Rather than talking about Bludgers short of Muggles, isn’t it?”
“It should,” Mr. Weasley said, smiling, and directed them .
through the kitchen doors, “but Ludo was always a .
little . . . Well . . . Lax on safety. You couldn’t have believed it more
Head of athletic department though. played
Quidditch for England itself, you know. And he was wonderful
Beater the United States of Wimbourne never had before.”
They squatted in the field of mushrooms between long rows of tents.
Most look almost normal; Obviously the owners tried to
Make them as Muggle-like as possible, but they’ve lost s
They added greenery, or greenery, or weathervanes. However, here the

' '
There was a tent that seemed so magical that Harry couldn’t possibly be
He was surprised that Mr. Roberts was becoming increasingly suspicious. Half way
The field stands as a bed of silk with branches like a small field.
floor, with several live animals attached to the door. seldom
At a distance they passed a tent with three legs and several windows ; And a short way beyond that is a hut with a front garden
closed, complete with birdbath, sunbed, and wreath.
“Always the same,” Mr. Weasley said, smirking. “We can’t resist
It’s obvious when we meet. Oh, here we are, look, that’s us.”
They reached the middle of the wood at the top of the
field, and here is an empty space, with a small arrow shaded in the
Earth that says weezly.
“Couldn’t have a better location!” Mr. Weasley said excitedly. "the
The field was just on the other side of the wood there, we were as close as we
It can be.” He lifted his purse from his shoulders. “Of course,” he
He said angrily, “no magic allowed, after all, not when we’re
out in these numbers in Muggle territory. Let’s put these tables
manual! It shouldn’t be too difficult. . . . Muggles do it all
time. . . . Here, Harry, where do you think we should start?”
Harry wasn't making progress in his life; The Dursleys had
I never took him on any kind of vacation, I preferred to leave him
and Mrs. Figg, an old neighbor. However, he and Hermione
It works where most knobs and bolts should go, and
Though Mr. Weasley was more of a nuisance than a help, because
I found a lot of fun when it came to using the pumpkin,
They finally managed to pick up two empty two-person tents.
They all stood back to admire their handiwork. anything
Looking at these tents, you'd think they belonged to wizards, Harry
Think, but the problem is that once Bill, Charlie, and Percy

' '
arrived, they would be a party of ten. Hermione seemed to have
identified this problem as well; She gave Harry a curious look like Master.
Weasley got down on his hands and knees and went into the first tent.
“We’ll be a little rough,” he called out, “but I think we’ll all hang out .
In. Come and see.”
Harry stumbled, ducked under the tent pillow, and felt his gut
fall. He went through the same old thing,
Three bedrooms, complete with bath and shower. terribly
obtained, framed by the style of Mrs.'s style.
Figg House: There are carpets on not matching
Cockroaches are a strong smell of cats.
“Well, not for long,” said Mr. Weasley, rubbing his temple .
A closet with a walk-in closet and overlooks four beds
This one stands in the bedroom. “I borrowed that from Perkins at the office. He doesn’t go very far, poor thing, he’s got lumbago.”
He picked up the trash can and looked inside. “We will need
water. . . .”
"There's a lake marked on this map that Muggle gave us," he said .
Ron, who followed Harry inside the tent and seemed completely unconcerned about his unusual inner dimensions. “It was about
the other side of the fence.”
“Well, why don’t you, Harry, and Hermione go get us something .
water then.” — Mr. Weasley handed over the kettle and a couple of
saucepans — “is it another thing to get some wood for the fire?”
“But we’ve got a stove,” Ron said. “Why can’t we just—”
“Ron, security against muggles!” Mr. Wezley said, his face beaming
With waiting. “When real Muggles stay, they cook over a fire .
Outside. I saw them in it!”
After a quick tour of the girls tent, which was slightly smaller

' '
In addition to the kids, though without the scent of cats, Harry, Ron, and
Hermione made her way across the camp with the trunk and kegs.
Now, with the sun out strong and the fog lifting, they can
See the tent city sprawling all around. They did
Their way slowly through the ruins, they moved happily around. compliance
It only just dawned on Harry how many witches and wizards there were
It must be in the world; He never thought much about it.
Those in other countries.
Their fellow passengers began to wake up. The first to shake were
families with young children; Harry had never seen witches and
Wizards this young before. One small child no older than two
He knelt outside a large tent in the shape of a pyramid, grabbed a stick and
He gazed curiously at a rat in the grass, which was breathing slowly until
the size of a salami. As soon as they talked to her, her mother came
He quickly left the tent.
“How many times, Kevin? Don’t — touch — my father’s —
Potatoes — eat!”
She stepped on the large, exposed spider. His warning
Caught behind them in the hot air, it resembles that of a young child
He screams — “You bust slug! You’re a fucking hero!”
A long way, they saw two little girls, almost grown
of Kevin, who were riding with toy toys that ran only very
It’s enough for girls’ feet to absorb the sweat. A department detective had already spotted them; As he quickly passed Harry, Run, and
Hermione muttered in disbelief, “In broad daylight! parents
He’s got a hobby, I think —”
Here and there they were emerging from the
their tents and started cooking breakfast. Some, with prying eyes
before them, brandishing fire with their trumpets; There are others who hit

' '
Meetings with dubious looks on their faces, as if this were real
It can't work. Three African magicians sit in a serious conversation, all
of them wearing long white robes and sporting what looks like
A rabbit on a glowing green fire, while a group of middle-aged
American witches sat chatting happily under a shiny bench.
They are listed among their tents that read: Witches of Salem'.
Institute. Harry took notes of voices in foreign languages ​​from inside the tents they passed through, and though he couldn't
You understood the words, the tone of every single voice was stirring.
“Er — is it my eyes, or is everything gone red?” Run said.
It wasn't just Ron's eyes. They went through a section of tents.
They were all covered with a thick layer of grass, so that
It looked like a small, oddly shaped mountain rising out of
floor. Smirking faces are perceived lower than those with
windows opened. Then, from behind them, they heard their names.
“Harry! Run! Hermione!”
It was Seamus Finnigan, their fellow Gryffindor year 4. He
He was sitting in front of his thatched tent, with a
The navy haired woman who was supposed to be his mother, his best friend,
Dean Thomas, also from Gryffindor.
“Like a toilet?” Seamus said, smiling. “The Ministry of
He wasn’t very happy.”
“Oh, why don’t we show our colors?” said Mrs. Finigan.
“You should see what the Bulgarians have lying around all over
Their tents. You’re going to help Ireland, right?” She added, looking at Harry, Ron and Hermione pointedly. When they were confirmed
that they were quite content with Ireland, and set out again,
Although, as Ron says, “As well as anything else around .
The food.”

' '
“I wonder what the Bulgarians have lying around all over them
Tents?” Hermione said.
“Let’s go take a look,” Harry said, pointing to a large mansion .
of standing tents, where the Bulgarian flag — white, green, and
Red — was blowing in the wind.
The tents here are not decorated with animal life, but each
And each one of them has a document associated with it, the button
of a very surly face with heavy black eyebrows. The image was, n
Sure, he moved, but all he did was wave and squeeze.
“Chrome,” Ron said quietly.
"what?" Hermione said.
“Chrum!” Run said. “Viktor Krum, the Bulgarian Explorer!”
“He looks really stupid,” Hermione said, looking up at the woman .
Several Krums smiled and snapped at them.
“ 'Really stupid'?” Ron raised his eyes to the sky. “Who cares
How does it look? Unbelievable. He’s really young too. except
Only eighteen or something. He’s an engineer, you wait till tonight,
You’ll see.”
There’s already a small mill for the boat in the middle of the
field. Harry, Ron, and Hermione join him, after a couple of
The men who were fighting furiously. One of them was very
The old wizard who was wearing a long flowery nightgown. another
He appeared to be a secretary of the department; He was sporting a pair of dark-colored trousers and was about to cry hysterically.
“Just put them on, Archie, there’s a nice chap. You can't walk away.
so far, the Muggle at the door is already suspicious —”
“I bought this in a Muggle shop,” the old wizard whispered.
“Muggles make them.”

' '
“Muggle women wear them, Archie, not men, they wear them .
These,” the Ministry Wizard said, waving the pinstriped .
shoes.
"I'm not putting them away," said old Archie angrily. "I
Like a healthy wind 'round my tail, thanks.”
Hermione was taken aback by such a powerful spell of magic in the
This point where it had to go off balance and just became
After Archie gathers his water, he leaves.
You are moving slower now, because of the weight of the water,
They made their way back to camp. Here and there,
Saw More Familiar Faces: Other Hogwarts Students With Their Faces
families. Oliver Wood, former Harry’s House Quidditch champion
The team, who had just graduated from Hogwarts, dragged Harry into his parents tent to check in, excitedly telling him that he had just moved .
He has been signed for loan club Puddlemere United. forward
They were greeted by Ernie Macmillan, a fourth year Hufflepuff, and a little further on they saw Cho Chang, a very pretty girl playing
Researcher in the Ravenclaw group. She nodded and smiled at Harry.
which splashed a lot of water forward as it splashed back.
More to stop Ron staring than anything, Harry definitely
He recalled the largest group of young men he had ever seen
before.
“Who do you think they are?” he said. “They don’t go to Hogwarts, do they?”
“ 'Spect they're going to some exotic school,' Ron said. “I know there
and others. Never met anyone who went to one, though. Bill has
Photo friend at a school in Brazil . . . This was years and years ago . . .
U wants to go on an exchange trip but mom and dad can’t

' '
Make it. His pen pal was angry when he said he wasn't going.
And he sent her a hanging shirt. It made his ears burn.”
Harry laughed but didn't say the relief he felt when he heard.
About other medieval schools. He thought, now that he saw the representatives of many countries in the camp, that he had
I was foolish enough not to realize that Hogwarts could never be the only one.
one. He glanced at Hermione, who looked completely unsurprised by the
The information. No doubt she passed on the news about
Other schools of magic in some book or other.
“You’re getting old,” George said when they finally returned to
Wesley tents.
“Meet some people,” Ron said, turning on the water. “You’re not
Has the fire started yet?”
“My dad misses the shows,” Fred said.
Mr. Weasley had never had any success lighting fires, but
It’s not for lack of trying. Broken bottles littered the floor.
ahead of him, but he seemed to have his time
life.
"Oh!" He said as he fired up the car and quickly.
He waved it off in surprise.
“Come here, Mr. Weasley,” Hermione said kindly, taking a
box from him, and shows him how to do it right.
Eventually they lit the fire, although at least there was another hour
before it gets hot enough to cook anything. There’s a lot to
Watch while they wait, however. Their tent seems to be built
rather than a sort of highway to the field, and the department
The members kept hurrying around him, greeting Mr. Weasley cheerfully as they walked by. Mr. Weasley kept talking,

' '
Especially for Harry and Hermione's benefit; His children know
So much for the ministry to make it very easy.
“That’s Cuthbert Mockridge, Head of the Boat Club .
office. . . . Here comes Gilbert Wimple; He was a board
on Charms of Experience; He’s had those animals for a while now. . . .
Hi, Arnie . . . Arnold Pisgood, Disabled Member
the Accidental Magic Change Squad, you know. . . . And that's
Bode and Crocker . . . They are the ones who don’t speak. . . .”
"what is?"
“From the Mysteries Bureau, top secret, no idea what .
They wake up to. . . .”
Finally, the fire was ready, and they just started cooking the eggs
and the cookies when Bill, Charlie, and Percy came staggering down from the
grass next to them.
“Just an apparatus, Dad,” Percy said quietly. “Oh, great, lunch!”
They were halfway through their boxes of eggs and cupcakes
When Mr. Weasley got to his feet, smirking and glaring at a
The man who was jogging towards them. "go ahead!" he said. “The man of
that time! Fuck!”
Ludo Bagman was easily the most memorable person Harry had
He can be seen to this day, even with old Archie in his floral nightgown.
He was wearing long Quidditch shorts in the curved lines of
Bright yellow and black. A large picture of an animal was
fluttered on his chest. He had the look of a powerfully built man.
Man went a little to seed; The clothes were pressed tightly against a
The big ass is gone for the days when he used to play.
Quidditch for England. Her nose is chipped (probably broken
by an ugly Bludger, Harry thought), but his blue eyes were brilliant, short .

' '
ⵛⵛⴹⴻⵃⵉⵙ ⴷ ⴰⵥⵉⴹⴰⵏ, ⴷ ⵜⴼⴻⴽⴽⴰⵙ ⵜⴰⵣⴻⴳⵣⴰⵡⵜ ⵔⵔⴰⵏⵜ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴱⴰⵏⴷ ⴰⵎ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵏⴻⵍⵎⴰⴷ ⵏ ⵓⵖⴻⵔⴱⴰⵣ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⴼⵔⵓⵔⵅⴻⵏ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ.
“Ahoy there!” Bagman called out angrily. It was going like
He had sprains attached to the balls of his feet and appeared in a
a state of overwhelm.
“Arthur, old man,” he whispered as he reached for the fire, “what .
A day, eh? What a day! We can ask for more perfection
weather? A cloudless night is coming . . . And with the lack of risk in
The equipment. . . . Not much to do!”
Behind him, a group of odd looking Ministry wizards
ⵢⴻⵣⵔⵉ ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⵜⴱⵓⵜ ⵉⴱⴻⵄⴷⴻⵏ ⵏ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵚⵚⴻⵏⴼ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵙ ⵏ ⵙⵃⵓⵔ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵜⵜⴰⵣⴻⵏ ⵜⵉⴼⴻⴽⴽⵉⵡⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⵄⴻⵛⵔⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵢⵉⴹⴰⵔⵔⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⴳⴻⵏⵏⵉ.
Percy lunged forward with his arm outstretched. apparently
He disagreed with the way Ludo Bagman ran his ministry
It doesn’t make him want to give a good impression.
'Ah—yes,' said Mr. Weasley, smiling, 'that's my son Percy.
He’s just started in the ministry — and it’s Fred — no, George,
I’m sorry—and Fred—Bill, Cali, run—my daughter, Jean—
and Run’s friends Hermione Granger and Harry Potter.”
Bagman did the least of two when he heard Harry
name, and his eyes made a familiar trail upwards towards the nose
In Harry's head.
"Everyone," Mr. Weasley continued, "it's Ludo Bagman, you . . ."
They know who he is, thanks to him we have such good memories—”
Bagman grinned and waved his hand as if to say he was
nothing.
“Would you like a massage, Arthur?” he said cheerfully, ringing
What seems to be a lot of gold in his pockets

' '
Yellow-and-black dress. “I’ve already got Roddy Pontner .
Me Bulgaria will score first — I give it good chances, considering
Ireland’s front three are the strongest I’ve seen in years — and few .
Agatha Timms puts half of the stocks in her eel farm in a week-long match.”
"Oh . . . go on then," said Mr. Weasley. "let's see . . . the galleon
About Ireland to win?”
“A galleon?” Ludo Bagman looked a little disappointed, but bounced back. “Very, very . . . Any more takers?”
"They're a bit young to be gamblers," Mr. Weasley said. “Molly
You don’t like —”
“We bet thirty-seven Galleons, fifteen Sickles, three Knuts,”
Fred said when he and George practically combined all their money, “that .
Ireland won — but Viktor Krum got the Snitch. Oh and yeah.
Throw away the false bait.”
“You don’t want to go showing Mr. Bagman such crap—”
Percy smirked, but Bagman didn’t think the shield was fake
In all; On the contrary, his boyish face lit up with joy when he
He got it from Fred, and when the raccoon gave a loud squeeze and
Turning into a rubber bull, Bagman howled with laughter.
"Beautiful! I haven't seen anyone so satisfactory in years! I'll pay
Five Gallons for that!”
Percy froze in a state of shocked disapproval.
“Boys,” Mr. Wesley muttered under his breath, “I don’t want you .
increase. . . . It’s all you’ve earned. . . . Your mother —”
“Don’t be a fool, Arthur!” shouted Ludo Bagman, shaking his head
His answer was furious. “They are old enough to know what they are .
want! reckon Ireland would win but Krum would get the Snitch? not
Opportunity, guys, is not opportunity. . . . I’ll give you superpowers on

' '
that one. . . . Let’s add five Gallons to that funny stick, then,
Let's work. . . .”
Mr. Weasley looked helpless as Ludo knocked Bagman out .
A notebook and a pencil and he started writing down the names of the company.
“Cheers,” George said, taking Bagman’s orange box .
He handed it to her and put it down gently. Bagman moves around a lot
Angrily he turned to Mr. Weasley.
“You can’t make me a beer, I suppose? I’m keeping an eye out for
Barty Crouch. My Bulgarian reference number is causing problems, and I can’t understand a word he’s saying. Barty can
Sort it out. He speaks about one hundred and fifty languages.”
" Sir. Cruiser?” Percy said, suddenly dropping his gaze of
pokerstiff are incredible and pretty fun looking.
“Talks more than two hundred! Mermich and Gobledeguk and
Troll . . .”
"Anybody can talk to a Troll," Fred muttered. “All you have
To work is to activate and relax.”
Percy shot Fred a very annoyed look and lit the fire hard enough to bring the car back to steam.
"Still any news of Berta Jorkins, Ludo?" asked Mr. Wesley as
Bagman sat on the grass next to them all.
“It’s not a baby bird,” Bagman said kindly. "But it will turn
up. Poor old Berta . . . Taste is like foaming coffee and no sense.
of view. He lost, you take my word for it. She would crawl back to
office sometime in October, thinking it’s still July.”
“Don’t you think maybe it’s time to send someone to look .
free?" Mr. Weasley suggested suddenly as he handed Percy to Bagman
His tea.
"Barty Crouch always said that," Bagman said, his eyes wide .

' '
she adds sarcastically, “but we really can’t care for anyone at this point. Ah — the words of the devil! Barty!”
A wizard had just appeared by their fire, and could not
They made more of a difference with Ludo Bagman, picked up on
Grout in his old Wasp boards. Barty Crouch was a short, erect, tall man who wore an impeccable suit and tie. distribution
In his short blonde hair it was almost unnatural, and his blonde mustache looked like he cut it using
The rule of listening. His shoes were too neat. Harry could see into the
Once why did Percy. Percy was a firm big believer
follow the rules, and Mr. Crouch had followed the rules on
A muggle dressed so tightly that he could pass for a
Treasurer; Harry doubted even Uncle Vernon would have
spotted for what it really is.
“Pull a little weed, Barty,” Ludo whispered, tugging at the blade .
ground to his side.
"No thank you, Ludo," Crouch said, and there was a hint of bitterness in his voice. “I look for you everywhere. the
The Bulgarians insist that we add twelve more seats to the Top .
box."
“Oh is that what they’re looking for?” Bagman said. “I think that
chap was asking to borrow a pair of soundboards. A bit of a strong one
accent."
" Sir. Everyone!” Percy said sarcastically, falling into a sort of half-grin that made him look ridiculous. “You want a cup
of tea?”
“Oh,” said Mr. Crouch, looking at Percy with a curious expression.
“Yeah — thank you, Weatherby”

' '
Fred and George were engulfed in their cups. Percy, very generous
before the ears, wrapped himself in a cup.
“Oh and I’ve wanted a word with you too, Arthur,” he said .
Mr. Crouch's brown eyes fell on Mr. Weasley. « by Ali Bachir
On the way to war. He wants a word with you about your punishment for
Flying paintings.”
Mr. Weasley heaved a deep sigh.
“I sent him a package about it just last week. If I told him once
I’ve said it a hundred times: The carpets are classified as a muggle thing by the Register of Forbidden Things, but they will .
listen?"
“I doubt it,” said Mr. Crouch, accepting Percy’s cup. "he
desperate to release here.”
“Well, they don’t explode in Britain, do they?” said
Bagman.
“Ali thinks there’s a niche in the family car market,”
Mr. Kruch said. “I remember my grandfather owned Axminster .
He could seat twelve — but that was before tables were banned,
sure."
He spoke as if he wanted to leave no one in doubt.
that all his ancestors faithfully kept the Law.
“So, have you been having sex, Barty?” Bagman said sarcastically.
“For sure,” Mr. Crouch said quietly. “Arranging Portkeys into five
Continents aren’t that bad, Ludo.”
“I expect you’re both happy when this is over?” Mr. said.
Wesley.
Ludo Bagman looked at her in shock.
"He's excited! I don't know when I've had more fun. . . . Still, not as

' '
Although we’ve got nothing to see, eh, Barty? Yes?
Plenty left to organize, eh?”
Mr. Crouch raised an eyebrow at Bagman.
“We agreed not to make this announcement until all
details -"
“Oh, butterflies!” Bagman said, swirling the words like a cloud .
of animals. "They signed, didn't they?" Agreed, disagreed
they? I bet you something these kids will know sooner or later anyway. I
I mean, it happened at Hogwarts—”
“Ludo, we have to meet the Bulgarians, you know,” Master said.
Crouch abruptly interrupted Bagman. “Thanks for
Coffee, Weatherby.”
He handed his undrinkable tea back to Percy, and waited for Ludo to
rise; Bagman struggled to his feet and drained the last of his tea,
The gold in his pockets sparkled with pride.
“See you all later!” he said. “To be up front in the Top Box with
I — I’m done!” Reaching out his hand, Barty Kruch shook his head
Curtly, and the two were divorced.
“What’s going on at Hogwarts, Dad?” Fred said suddenly.
“What were they talking about?”
“You’ll find out soon enough,” Mr.Weasley said, smiling.
"It's confidential information, until the Ministry decides to release it," Percy insisted. " Sir. Crouch was right
He didn’t show it.”
"Shut up, Weatherby," Fred said.
A sense of excitement rose like a predictable cloud on a deck as the afternoon rolled on. By late afternoon, the very air of summer
It seemed to grow with anticipation, and as the darkness grew
Like a wall around thousands of witches waiting, the last

' '
Numbers of anxiety increase: The department seems to have
Adding to the inevitable and they stopped fighting the trends of blant
Magic is now flowing everywhere.
Vendors were stopping every few feet, carrying signs and
pushing carts full of extraordinary goods. There are glowing rosettes — green for Ireland, red for Bulgaria — available .
They scrawl player names, red caps are decorated
With dancing lions, Bulgarian dances decorated with symbols i
Really shout, the projects from both countries who played their national
Songs as popular; There are smaller models of Firebolts
That’s the real deal, and the reunion movies of famous players, the
strolled across the palm of your hand, rubbing themselves.
“I’ve been saving my pocket money all summer for this,” Ron said .
Harry as he and Hermione walked through the vendors, buying
Notes. Although Ron has a dancing shamrock ball and
large blue rosette, it also features a small Viktor Krum figure,
the Bulgarian researcher. Little Krum walked back and
Front on Ron's arm, staring at the blue ring in front of him
he.
“Wow, look at these!” Harry said, hurtling towards a used car
They are expensive relative to copper signs, except they are
They are covered with all kinds of germs and germs.
“Omnioculars,” the salesman said enthusiastically. “You can react with action . . . Master everything. . . And they’re shipping a play by play
Scarcity if you need it. Bargain — ten Galleons each.”
“I wish I wasn’t buying that now,” Ron said, gesturing to his hand .
They dance in a cheesecloth and stare longingly into Omnioculars.
“Three percent,” Harry said seriously to the wizard.
“No — don’t worry,” said Ron, going black. There’s always

' '
touchy about the fact that Harry, who inherited a small fortune from his parents, has a lot more money than she does.
“You didn’t get anything for Christmas,” Harry told him,
holding the Omniocular in his hands and Hermione's. “For about .
Ten years, mind.”
“That’s fine,” Ron said, smirking.
“Oooh, thanks, Harry,” Hermione said. “And get us some
programs, see —”
Their money bag was so light, they went back to
Tents. Bill, Charlie, and Ginny were all growing red roses as well,
And Mr. Weasley was carrying an Irish flag. Fred and George have
No confession as they gave Bagman all their gold.
And then a deep, booming gong is heard somewhere above the
trees, and suddenly the red and green blooms burst to life in the
Trees, lighting the way to the field.
“It’s time!” Mr. Weasley said, looking as excited as any of them.
“Come on, let’s go!”

CHAPTER EIGHT
QUIDDITCH WORLD CUP

They held their candles, Mr. Weasley at the top, all
Run into the woods and follow the path lit by the lantern. they
I can hear the sound of thousands of people moving.
There were, with humor and laughter, snatches of singing. The atmosphere of
the severity of the fever was highly contagious; Harry couldn't stop grinning. They walked through the woods for twenty minutes, talking
And they talk louder and louder, until at last they come out the other side and
They found themselves in the middle of a large arena. though
Harry could only see a small fraction of the massive golden walls surrounding the field, he could tell that ten academies would fit comfortably inside it.
“A hundred thousand seats,” said Mr. Weasley, seeing .
a panicked look on Harry's face. “A ministry task force of five hundred has been working on it all year. Muggle spells
About every inch of it. Every now and then Muggles get anywhere
Here all year round, suddenly remembered meetings briefly
And he had to run away again . . . Bless them,” he added cheerfully, leading the way to the nearest door, already surrounded by a mob of screaming witches and wizards.
“First impressions!” The Ministry sorceress said in the doorway as she
discuss their ideas. “Upper table! Straight up, Arthur, it’s like
It’s as high as you can go.”
The curtains of the ball were dyed purple. they
He reached up with the rest of the crowd, who quickly applauded
through doorways to hallways to their left and right. Sir.
The Weasley party kept growing and eventually reached the top of the
of the park and found themselves in a small car, located in the most remote part of the stadium and located exactly halfway between
Golden goal circles. About twenty purple and gold chairs stood in the
Two clicks here, and Harry, filing in the front seats with
The Weasleys, looked down at a scene like someone who might
I never thought.
One hundred thousand witches and wizards were getting their
Locations in the seats, which increase in the mid-levels of the long line field.
Everything was filled with a mysterious golden light, which
It sounds like it’s coming from the research itself. The field looks empty.
as a judge from their high position. At each end of the field stands
three goalposts, fifty feet high; In front of them, closer to
Harry's eye level, was a large painting. Gold writing is preserved
It passes over him like the waving hand of an invisible giant
on the blackboard and then turns it off again; Check it out,
Harry thought that was making a record in the field.
Bluebottle: A gun for the whole family — safely,
reliable, and with a Built-in Anti-Burgler Buzzer . . . madam.
All-Purpose Skower Magic Curse Remover: No
Pain, no pain! . . . Gladrags Wizardwear — London,
Paris, Hogsmeade . . .
Harry took his eyes off the distance and looked over hers.
queue to see who else is sharing the key with them. so far
It was empty, except for a small person sitting in the second from last
Stay at the end of the line behind them. The creature, whose legs
They were so short, they passed out in front of him on the chair, he was wearing
The tea towel is wrapped like a toga, and has her face hidden in it
sleeve. But those long lobster-like ears were terribly familiar. . . .
“Bear?” Harry said in disbelief.
The little creature looked up and stretched out her fingers, pointing
Large brown eyes and a nose the size and shape of a large
tomato. It wasn’t Dobby — though, it was unquestionably home, as was Harry’s best friend, Dobby. Harry set Dubby free.
From his previous owners, the Malfoy family.
“Did Master just call me Dobby?” The jackal cried out suspiciously from
Between his fingers. His voice was even louder than Dobby's.
Been, a teenage, quivering voice, and Harry suspected —
Although it is very hard to tell with a house rabbit — that this one
It can only be a woman. Run and Hermione slept in their apartment
Legs to look at. Although I’ve heard a lot about Dobby from
Harry, they've never actually met. Even Mr. Weasley looked
district in interest.
“I’m sorry,” Harry told the boss, “I just thought he was
recognize."
“But I know Dobby too, sir!” shrieked the rabbit. She was shielding her face, seemingly blinded by the light, though Top Box was
It doesn't glow. “My name is Winky, Sir — and you, Sir —” Her .
Dark brown eyes dropped to the size of the side windows as they relaxed.
On Harry's cheek. “You really are Harry Potter!”
“Yeah, I am,” Harry said.
“But Dobby talks about you all the time, sir!” She said, shaking it.
Hands a little too much and looking awkward.
“How was he?” Harry said. “How does freedom fit her?”
“Oh, sir,” Winky said, shaking her head, “oh sir, that means no disrespect, sir, but I don’t think you did Dobby any favors, sir, when you did .
That’s what saves him.”
"why?" Harry said, taken aback. “What happened to him?”
"Freedom go to Dobby's head, sir," Winky said sadly.
“Thoughts above his station, sir. Can’t get anywhere else, sir.”
"why not?" Harry said.
Winky lowered her voice to a half-whisper and whispered, “He is .
He wants to pay for his work, sir.”
“You pay?” Harry said with a shrug. “Well — why shouldn’t it be .
paid?"
Winky looked confused at the idea and closed her fingers.
A little so that his face became half hidden again.
“Household obstacles aren’t paid, sir!” She said with a shrug of the shoulders. "No,
No, no. I told Dobby, I said, go find yourself a good family and
Step up, Dubby. He gets up to all sorts of high jinks, sir,
Which is not appropriate for a housewife. You walk around like
This, Dobby, I said, and the next thing I hear you’re around the
Health Persons Regulatory and Monitoring Agency,
Like some slut.”
“Well, it’s time he had a little fun,” Harry said.
"It's not right for house elves to suffer, Harry Potter," he said .
Winky hard, from behind his hands. “House elves do what .
They are judged. I don’t like height at all, Harry Potter” — she
She looked around the van and rolled her eyes—“but my lord .
He’s sending me to the Top Box to come, sir.”
“Why did he send you in here, if he knew you didn’t like heights?”
Harry said, frowning.
“Sir — sir wants me to save him a place, Harry Potter.
He’s too busy,” Winky said, nodding her head towards the edge of the void .
place next to it. “Winky wishes to return to the master’s tent,
Harry Potter, but Winky did what she was told. Winky is a good guy.
The secret of the house.”
She gave another scared look to the back of the box and hid it.
The eyes are all over again. Harry turned to the others.
“So you’re the housekeeper?” He looked at Run. “Strange things, not
they?"
“Dobby was worse,” Harry said proudly.
Ron pulled out his Omniocular and began trying them on, looking down at the crowd on the other side of the stadium.
"understand!" He said, pointing at the replay button on the side. "I can
Give that old guy down there to pick his nose again . . . and
again . . . And also . . .”
Hermione, meanwhile, was staring with interest at her black-and-white, black-and-white plan.
“ 'The show from the team mascots will outlive the match,' ” she said .
Read aloud.
“Oh that’s always worth seeing,” Mr. Weasley said. "national
Teams get creators from their birth country, you know, to put
A little bit of fun.”
The board gradually filled up around them over the next half hour.
Mr. Weasley kept staring at the hand of people who seemed
The most important magicians. Percy jumped on his feet so many times that
It looked like he was trying to sit on a fly. When Cornelius Fudge, the minister of magic himself, arrived, Percy collapsed .
So much so that his glasses fell and broke. Very aware, he
He scrubbed them with his thumb, then took his seat,
He shoots jealous eyes at Harry, who has Cornelius Fudge
Greet like an old friend. They’ve met before, and Fudge stopped
Harry's hand reached out to his father, asked how he was doing, and brought it up to the ears on either side of him.
"Harry Potter, you know," he addressed the Bulgarian minister quietly,
who wore a beautiful black velvet gown trimmed with gold
And he didn’t seem to understand a word of English. “Harry Putter . . .
oh come on now, you know who he is . . . The Boy Who Lived
You knowWho . . . You know who he is—”
The Bulgarian wizard suddenly noticed Harry's voice and started
They gabbled loudly and excitedly, staring at her.
"I knew we'd get there eventually," Fudge said sadly to Harry.
“I’m not great at languages; I need Barty Kruch for this genre
n thing. Oh, I think the privacy of his house saved him space. . . . good job
Even so, these Bulgarians were trying to put up the best
places . . . Oh, and here’s Lucius!”
Harry, Run, and Hermione immediately recoiled. Dging along the
second row to three seats still vacant after Mr. Weasley
They were none other than Dobby and the old masters of the Housewives : Lucius .
Malfoy; son, Draco; She’s the woman Harry says she should be
Draco's mother.
Harry and Draco Malfoy have been rivals since
First trip to Hogwarts. A sweet boy with a small face and
With white hair, Draco looked a lot like his father. His mother
It was green too; Tall and thin, she would have been beautiful if
She didn’t wear a look that suggested there was a danger.
Smell under his nose.
“Oh, Fudge,” Mr. Malfoy said, holding out his hand as .
He reaches out to the Minister of Magic. "How are you doing? I don't think you have
Have you met my wife, Narcissa? Or our son, Draco?”
“How did you do it, how did you do it?” Fudge said, smirking and
she pointed at Mrs. Malfoy. “And let me show you Sir.
Ublansk — Obalonsk — Sir — Sincerely, Bulgarian Minister
of Magic, and he couldn’t understand a word I was saying anyway, so
You don't see it. And let’s see who else — you know Arthur Wesley, me .
Shall we say?”
It was a somber moment. Mr. Weasley and Mr. Malfoy looked at
Each other and Harry reminisced about the last time they came
Face to Face: Available at Flourish and Blotts bookstore, and
They were fighting. Mr. Malfoy's cold blue eyes swept over the Master.
Weasley, then up and down.
“Good Lord, Arthur,” he said softly. “What do you have to sell .
To get seats in the Top Box? Surely your house has no
Got that much?”
Fudge, who had never heard, said, “Lucius just gave away too much .
generous donation to St. John's Hospital. Mungo for the sick and wounded of the sting, Arthur. He’s here as my guest.”
“How—how lovely,” said Mr. Weasley, with a gentle smile .
smile.
Mr. Malfoy's eyes returned to Hermione, who had backed away slightly .
pink, but looking up at him. He knew Harry perfectly well
What was making Mr. Malfoy so close. The Malfoys
They prided themselves on being purebloods; In other words, they treated everyone of Muggle descent, like Hermione, as second class.
However, under the Minister's shadowy gaze, Mr. Malfoy couldn't say anything. He bowed his head shrugging at Mr. Weasley and
He continued to line up to his seats. Draco shoots at Harry, Run, and
Hermione one shocked glance, then positioned himself between
His mother and father.
“Slimy gits,” Ron muttered as he, Harry and Hermione looked around .
He will face the field again. In the next moment, Ludo Bagman taps on the
The bag.
“Everyone ready?” he said, his round face beaming like an adult,
exclaimed Edam. “The minister — are you ready to go?”
"Ready when you are, Ludo," Fudge said kindly.
Ludo drew his wand, lowered it to his back, and
He said “Sonorus!” He then referred to the current volume of sound
fill a stadium full of people; Her voice wavered over them, shrieking
on every corner of the stairs.
“Man and man . . . welcome! Welcome to the end of
Quidditch World Cup Fourteenth!”
Viewers whooped and applauded. Thousands of flagged topics,
They added their own discordant national titles to the racket. Great
The black tablet in front of them was torn from his last message.
(Bertie Bott of every flavor of vegetable — a loser with
every mouthful!) and now shows BULGARIA: 0, IRELAND: 0.
“And now, without further ado, let me prove . . . the
Bulgarian national team mascots!”
The right side of the barrier, which is the cross-section of the
Scarlet, nodded her approval.
"I wonder what they got," Mr. Weasley said, leaning forward in his seat. “Aaaah!” At one point he drew his sword and
He quickly wiped them on his clothes. “Billa!”
“What’s the veel — ?”
But a hundred veela were now pouring out onto the field, and
Harry's question was answered for him. Veela were women . . . the
The most beautiful women Harry had ever seen . . . Except that they
They are not — they cannot be — human. This shocked Harry for one
moment while he was trying to figure out what exactly they might be; what
It could cause their eyes to shine like the moon like that, or their white-gold hair to flap behind them without a breath . . . But then the music started, and Harry ignored their concerns that they weren’t
Man — in fact, he stopped caring about anything at all.
The veela began to dance, and Harry's mind went completely and utterly blown. All that matters in the world is that
He kept watching the veela, because if they stopped dancing, terrible things would happen. . . .
And as you dance the veela slowly, softly, half-step
Thoughts began to follow through Harry's dazed mind. He wants to
pick something much better, right now. Jumping from the ball to
The stadium seemed like a good idea . . . But will it be okay?
“Harry, what are you doing?” Hermione's voice said from a long
The road to the country.
The music stopped. Harry widened his eyes. was standing, and
One of his feet was leaning against the wall of the kitchen. Next to her, Run
He was frozen in a state that seemed to be about to
Kill through a window.
Angry shouts filled the stadium. People don't wan
veela will go. Harry was with them; He would, of course, be supporting Bulgaria, and briefly wondered why he had a large
a green shamrock was strapped to his chest. Ron, meanwhile, was nodding awkwardly, tugging at his pants. Mr. Weasley, smiling slightly, walked over to Ron and yanked the bottle out of his hand .
sleeve.
“You’ll want that,” he said, “when Ireland has
say.
“Uh?” Ron said, staring open-mouthed at the veela, who had
Now they’re spread across one side of the field.
Hermione made a loud tutton noise. She reached out and pulled.
Harry returned to his seat. "honestly!" She said.
“And now,” Ludo Bagman’s voice boomed, “please put .
Circles in the sky . . . For the Irish National Team Mascots!”
The next moment, what appeared to be a large green and gold beetle
He came zooming into the stadium. He did a research run.
They then split into two smaller tanks, each of which steers towards the target
Texts. The snow line simultaneously moves across the field, connecting
Two curtains of light. The crowd screamed and hollered, as if in
Fireworks show. Now the fog is gone and the balls of light have merged and merged; a large glittering kite had been erected, which flew into the sky and began to fly over the waves.
Something like golden rain seemed to fall from it —
"excellent!" yelled Ron as the grass flew over them, and
Thin golden orbs shot out of it and jumped from their heads and seats.
Looking down at the tree, Harry realized that it was indeed
There were thousands of little bearded men in black pockets.
Each one carried a minute piece of gold or rose.
"animal!" Mr. Weasley said over the surprise.
of the crowd, many of whom are still fighting and searching
They turned under their chairs to pick up the gold.
“There you go,” Ron yelled excitedly, filling a golden fist .
guns in Harry’s hand, “for the Omniocular! Now you have to
Buy me a Christmas present, ha!”
The big bucket melted, the animals drifted to the bottom
Across the field on the other side of the veela, and position themselves
Themselves craned their necks to see the match.
“And now, ladies and gentlemen, well, welcome — the Bulgarian National Quidditch Championship! I give you — Dimitrov!”
A red-clad figure on a stick, moving so slowly that it was
Blurr, shot in the field from an entry far below, into the woods
joy from the Bulgarian fighters.
“Ivanova!”
The second player in black rushed over.
“Zograph! Levsky! Fulcanoff! Fulkoff! Aaaaaah and — Krum!”
“It’s him, it’s him!” Ron shouted, chasing Krum with his
Omniocular. Harry quickly made up his mind to himself.
Viktor Krum was thin, lean, and handsome, with a .
Curved nose and thick black cheeks. He looks like an overgrown bird of prey. It’s hard to believe he’s only eighteen.
“And now, please — the Irish National Quidditch Championship!”
shouted Bagman. “It’s going to hurt — Connolly! Ryan! Troy! beast!
Moran! Kugle! Aaaaaah that’s — Lynch!”
Seven blue bombs blasted across the field; Harry put on a small dish.
in the direction of his Omniocularis and shrinks the players
Enough to read the word “Firebolt” on every one of their guns and know
Their names, recognizable in silver, on their shoulders.
“And here, all the way from Egypt, our government, is affirmed .
International Quidditch Association President Hassan
Mustafa!”
Small and thin wizard, totally handsome but with a knife
to match that of Uncle Vernon, dressed in pure gold armor to meet the
stadium, strode out onto the field. The silver spring was gone.
from underneath the kid, and he was holding a big wooden box
under one arm, his gun under the other. Harry invented
With a quick swipe in his Omniocular he returned to normal, watching closely as
Mostafa got on his knife and opened the lock —
Four curtains float in the sky: Red quaffle, both black
Bludgers, and (Harry watched him for a brief moment, before running
coincidentally) a tiny, winged golden snitch. With a hard
Bomb on his shoulder, Mostafa fired into the air behind the ball.
“Ieeeeeeey they’re dirty!” shouted Bagman. “And it’s a Mullet!
Troy! Moran! Dimitrobe! Back to the Mullet! Troy! Levsky! Moran!”
It was Quidditch like Harry had never seen played before. he
He was pressing his Omniocular so hard against his nose that they were
A cut in the middle of his nose. The energy of the players was incredible — the Chasers were throwing the Quaffle at each other .
So quickly that Bagman barely has time to say their names. Harry turned around.
The sharp edge on the right of the Omniocularis again, holds in the
Play-by-play ball at the top, and he was immediately sure
in the middle section, while glowing red letters glow in the
Lenses and crowd noise pierced his memory.
HAWKSHEAD PRESSES THE CYCLE, reading as he watches
Three Irish drums huddle together, Troy in the middle,
slightly ahead of Mullet and Moran, attacking the Bulgarians. The PORSKOFF PLOY that unfolded next, as Troy did it as a
Dart up with a quaffle, attracting a Bulgarian pursuit
Ivanova and the Quaffle Challenge to Moran. One of the Bulgarian
The victims, Volkov, slammed hard on a passing Bludger with his small blade .
Club, disappeared on Moran Street; Moran ducked to avoid
Bludger and dropped the Quaffle; and Levski, floating below,
He caught it -
“TROY LIED!” yelled Bagman, and the system clicked
With gratitude and appreciation. “Ten zeros for Ireland!”
"what?" Harry shouted, glancing around with his Omnioculars. “But Levsky had the Quaffle!”
“Harry, if you weren’t moving at normal speed, you’d have things!” cried Hermione, who was dancing and
Below, she's waving her hands in the air while Troy does a trial motion
In the field. Harry quickly looked over the top of his Omniocularis and saw that the monster was watching from the side .
They all rose into the air again and formed the great, shining
Shamrock. Across the field, the veela were watching them in disguise.
Frustrated with himself, Harry quickly reset his computer to normal
As the game begins.
Harry knew enough about Quidditch to see that the Irish
The chasers were wonderful. They worked as a seamless ensemble, their movements so well synchronized that they sounded like they were reading someone .
each other's minds as they established themselves, and the interaction
On Harry's chest they kept carving their names: 'Truy — Mullet — .
Moran!” And within ten minutes Ireland scored twice more,
brought their rank to thirty-zero and delivered a blistering blow of
with cheers and applause from the green-clad supporters.
The meeting became still tense, but more intense. Bulkov d
Vulchanov, the Bulgarians of the same, were sneering at bludgers like
as early as possible in the Irish Chasers, and they began to stop
Ten from using some of their best tips; They were threatened twice
to break up, and then, finally, Ivanova managed to cross
their size; take precaution, Ryan; He also scored Bulgaria’s first goal.
“Fingers in your ears!” Mr. Weasley shouted as the veela began
I will dance in celebration. Harry raised an eyebrow too; want
To keep his mind in the game. After a few seconds, he got a chance
A look at the field. Veela stopped dancing, and Bulgaria
Also available at Quaffle’s disposal.
“Dimitrov! Levsky! Dimitrobe! Ivanova — oh I mean!” bought
Bagman.
One hundred thousand wizards feel like two Seekers,
Krum and Lynch, covering the center of the chasers, .
So slowly that it looks like we just jumped out of a plane.
Without parachutes. Harry followed their descent with his Omniocular, looking to see where the Snitch was —
“They will be terrified!” Hermione said beside Harry.
She was half right — at the very last moment, Viktor Krum .
I pulled through the hole and it spiraled out. Lynch, however, lost the
floor with a loud thud that could be heard throughout the stadium. A great protest arose from the Irish seats.
"fool!" said Mr. Wesley. “Chrome was glowing!”
“It’s party time!” yelled Bagman's voice, "like trained pilots . . ."
Rush to the field to check on Aidan Lynch!”
“He’ll be fine, he’s just moved!” Charlie said soothingly.
To Ginny, who was leaning against the side of the car, looking
He struck panic. “Which is something Krum is after, right. . . .”
Harry quickly pushed the replay buttons with the toy in his hand
Omnioculars, he nodded, and put them back in his case .
eyes.
He watched as Krum and Lynch swam back and forth again.
WRONSKI FEINT FEINT — FIGHTING FIELD PRACTICE Reads
shiny blue glow on the lenses. He saw Krum's face.
He suffered a concussion when he left the ship only
In time, while Lynch was fired up, and he understood — Krum .
He didn’t see the Snitch at all, he was just making Lynch act it out.
Harry had never seen anyone so angry; Chrome doesn’t look like
although he was using weapons at all; Moves easily.
Through the air it moves unsupported and weightless. Harry
He put his Omniocular back on and put them on
Chrome. He was now towering high above Lynch, who was elevated by the astronauts with cubes of magic. Harry, still smirking
Even closer to Krum's face, he noticed his blue eyes were all moving
ground a hundred feet below. He was using that time while
Lynch is resurrected to look for the Snitch without a fight.
Lynch gets to his feet at last, to loud cheers from those wearing green
supporters, mounted his Firebolt, and rode back into the air.
His development seems to have given Ireland a new heart. When Mustafa released
Sighing once more, the chasers sprang into action knowing it was unlike anything Harry had seen so far.
After another fast and furious five minutes, Ireland pulled
ahead with another ten goals. They were now worth a hundred
and thirty points to ten, and the game began to win.
As Mullet shot towards the goal posts again, he hit the palm of
Quaffle vigorously under his arm, the Bulgarian goalkeeper, Zograf, emerged
They go out to meet her. The whole thing was over too soon Harry
He didn’t take it, but it was an angry outburst from the Irish community, and
Mostafa’s tall, lithe body told him it was a trap.
“And Mostafa is dragging the Bulgarian judge to court for discrimination —
Excessive use of feet!” Bagman informed the spectators roaring.
“And — yes, a curse for Ireland!”
The birds, which angrily flew through the air like a
The 10 sparkly beads that glittered when the Mullet was painted are now twisted together to form the words “HA, HA, HA!” The Veela on the other hand
The side of the field jumped to their feet, ruffled their hair angrily, and
He started dancing again.
As one, the Weasley boys and Harry dipped their fingers in the
Their ears, but Hermione, unperturbed, soon pulls
In Harry's hand. He turned to look at her, and she pulled him by her feet
He was impatient out of his ears.
“Look at the court!” She said, giggling.
Harry looked around. Hassan Mustafa was wrong for sure
in front of the dancing veela, and he was acting very scary indeed. he
He was flexing his muscles and fondling his cock with excitement.
“Now, we can’t have that!” Lodo Bagman said, though
They listened to him with great amazement. “Someone set the guard!”
A paramedic came plowing through the field, his fingers swollen
in his ears, and gripped Mostafa tightly by the shoulders. Mustafa
He seemed to have come into his own; Harry, squinting through the Omnioculars again, noticed that he looked strangely embarrassed and
He starts yelling at Veela, who stops dancing and
They were looking stupid.
“And if I am not too mistaken, Mostafa is really trying
To send the mascots of the Bulgarian team!” said Bagman's voice.
“Now there’s something we’ve never seen before. . . . Oh that can
Turn is dangerous. . . .”
It worked: the infamous Bulgarians, Volkov and Vulchanov, collapsed in
all around Mostafa and started arguing with him angrily,
Looking at the young, who now happily
They substituted the words “HE, HE, HE.” Mustafa did not like it.
By the Bulgarian reforms, however; He was tapping his finger.
In mid-air, he apparently told them to fly again, and when they
He refused, flashing a couple of old kisses on his forehead.
“Two points for Ireland!” shouted Bagman, a Bulgarian
The crowd shouted angrily. “And Volkov and Vulchanov had the best .
Go back to those pillows. . . Yes . . . There they go . . . and Troy
He brings the Quaffle . . .”
The game has now reached a level of stupidity beyond anything they have
still visible. The beaters on both sides acted mercilessly:
Volkov and Vulchanov in particular did not seem to care whether .
Their societies become Bludger or human as they look
Because of their strength with air. Dimitrov shoots straight at Moran,
Whoever had the Quaffle was about to knock it out of her grip.
“A fool!” shouted the Irish fans as one, standing together in a
the great wave of green.
“A fool!” exclaimed Ludo Bagman's magically amplified voice.
“Dimitrov hits Moran — flies high to match there —
And there should be another punishment — yes, there is a punishment!”
The birds flew back into the air, and this time, they
He made a big hand, which was making a very uncomfortable gesture indeed in the
veela in the middle of the field. In this, the veela missed the mark. instead of
dance, launch themselves onto the field and start
They throw what appears to be hands of fire at the pigs.
Checking through his Omnioculars, Harry noticed that they didn't
See in the distance it's beautiful now. Similarly, their faces were
tapering to the heads of birds with dark, long, feathered
The wings were flying off their shoulders —
“That’s it, boys,” Mr. Weasley yelled over the protest of
crowd below, “that’s why you shouldn’t go on missions alone!”
The department’s inspectors were flying over the field to distribute
veela are young, but successfully few; Meanwhile,
The war waged below is nothing to the one happening above.
Harry turned around like this and the other, staring at the Omnioculars,
As the Quaffle changed hands at blazing speed.
“Levsky — Dimitrov — Moran — Troya — Mullet — Ivanova —
Moran also — Moran — MURAN LIED!”
But happily Irish fighters have almost never heard of the
the howls of the veela, the arrows now flying from the necks of the ministry members, and the angry roars of the Bulgarians. play
It stood up immediately; Now Levski has the Quaffle, now
Dimitrov —
Irish guard Quigley rushed hard in a previous Bludger,
And he hit it right next to Krum, it didn’t match
quickly. She hit him full in the face.
There was a cheer from the crowd; Chrome nose
She looked broken, there was blood everywhere, but Hassan Mostafa
He didn't release his keyboard. He becomes angry, and Harry
He couldn't blame him; One of the Veela threw up a firearm.
And he lowered his bell ring.
Harry wanted someone to realize that Krum was hurt; also
Despite his support for Ireland, Krum was the most
player on the field. Ron obviously felt the same way.
“The time! Oh, come on, he can’t play like that, look at him —”
“Look at Lynch!” Harry shouted.
Because the Irish Seeker suddenly went into a breath, and Harry
He was pretty sure this was no Wronski Feint; This is a real
purchase. . . .
“He saw the Snitch!” Harry shouted. “He saw it! Look at the
travel!"
Half the crowd seemed to realize what was going on; the
Irish supporters rise up in another massive green wave, chanting
Their search for . . . But Krum was on his back. How can he see
Where he went, Harry had no idea; There were stains of blood.
He was flying through the air behind him, but he was covering the level and
Lynch now as the two sprint to the ground again —
“They will be terrified!” said Hermione.
“They’re not!” yelled Run.
“Lynch is it!” Harry shouted.
And he was right — for a second, Lynch hit the ground running .
with great force and was immediately surrounded by a team
of the disappearing veela.
“Snitch, where’s Snitch?” Charlie shouted, along the
row.
“He’s got it—Krum has it—it’s all gone!” Harry shouted.
Krum, his black cloak glistening with blood from his neck, was rising wildly in the air, his hand held high, a golden orb in his hand.
The scoreboard was exploding BULGARIA: 160, IRELAND: 170
in front of the crowd, they didn’t seem to understand what was going on. Then slowly, like a giant jumbo balloon expanding,
The roar of Ireland’s supporters grew louder
And it ended with cheers of joy.
“IRELAND WINS!” Bagman yelled, who like the Irish,
He seemed taken aback by the quick end to the match.
“KROM CALLED THE SNITCH — BUT IRELAND WINNED —
Good lord, I don’t think any of us were expecting that!”
“What’s he catching Snitch?” Run shouted, too
He jumped up and down, clapping his hands on his head.
“He ended it when Ireland were a hundred and six points ahead,
That idiot!”
“He knew they wouldn’t!” shouted Harry.
He's back on full volume, also loudly clapping. “Irish authorities .
They were very good. . . . He wanted to end it on his own terms, that’s all. . . .”
“He was very brave, wasn’t he?” Hermione said, leaning forward.
To watch Krum collapse while a convoy of paramedics cleared the street
With the girls fighting the veela to get to him. "he
It seems astonishingly chaotic. . . .”
Harry brought his Omniocular up to his eyes again. It was hard to watch.
What was going on downstairs, because the leprechauns were frantically moving all over the field, but he could just make out Krum, surrounded by medwizards. He looked worse than usual and refused
To let him slow down. His team members were around him.
They shake their heads and moan sadly; The shortest way,
The Irish players were happily dancing in a falling golden rain.
from their mascots. Flags were strewn all over the stadium,
The Irish national anthem waved on all sides; The Veela were evolving into their former, beautiful selves now, though they looked
Soulless and depressed.
“Vell, ve fought bravely,” said a sad voice behind Harry. he
He looked around; He is the Bulgarian Minister of Magic.
“You can speak English!” Fudge said, sounding excited. "and
You let me mime everything all day!”
"Vell, it vos very interesting," said the Bulgarian minister, shrugging.
“And as the Irish team made a series of charges, they were surrounded by
mascots, the Quidditch World Cup itself is delivered in the Top .
Housing!" Bagman yelled.
Harry's eyes were suddenly lit up with a blinding white light, as
The Top Box was magically lit up as everyone in the
He stood able to see inside. He looks at the door and sees
Two agitating magicians carry a large golden cup in the basket, which
They handed it over to Cornelius Fudge, who was still looking very disgruntled as he had been using sign language incorrectly all day.
“Let’s have a really strong hand for the seriously disadvantaged — Bulgaria!”
Bagman shouted.
And up the ladder to the screen came seven defeated Bulgarians .
players. The crowd below was roaring with excitement; Harry
He could see thousands and thousands of Omniocular lenses sparkling
and looking in their direction.
One by one, the Bulgarians filed between the rows of cars in the
box, and Bagman called out everyone's name when they shook hands .
With their minister and then with Fudge. Chrome, which was the last
On balance, looks are the real opposite. Two black eyes shone angrily on his bloodshot face. He’s still holding the Snitch. Harry
She noticed that it looked very uncoordinated on the ground. he
He was slightly butterfly-legged and seemed to have chubby cheeks. but
When Krum’s name was announced, the entire stadium cheered for him
With a snarling, scratching throat.
And then the Irish team came. Aidan Lynch was assisted by Moran and Kunoli; The second ship appears to have
Dazed him and his eyes widened in unexpected horror. But it's funny.
cheered as Troy and Quigley lifted the Cup in the air and
The crowd below broke his acceptance. Harry's hands were rough.
with a smile.
Finally, when the Irish band left the pitch to perform another
lap of honor on their buttons (Aidan Lynch on Connolly’s shoulder, holding tightly to his shoulder and still grinning in kind of a smile), Bagman pointed to his shoulder and
he muttered, “Shut up.”
“They’ll be talking about that one for years,” he said quietly,
“It’s really unexpected, that. . . . Too bad he couldn't stay
long. . . . Ah yes. . . . Yes, I owe you . . . how much?"
Because Fred and George were just squatting on their car seats .
They sat down and were standing in front of Ludo Bagman with huge smiles
on their faces, their arms outstretched.

CHAPTER NINE
MAR K GENERAL

Don’t tell your mother you’ve been gambling,” Mr. Weasley .
shouted Fred and George as they all slowly walked their way.
Down the sidewalk of a snowmobile.
“Don’t worry, Dad,” Fred said excitedly, “We’ve got big plans for 2019.
This money. We don’t want him to get caught.”
Mr. Wesley looked for a moment as if to ask
What are these grand plans, but they seem to decide, upon reflection,
That he didn't want to know.
They were soon caught up in the crowd now emerging from
Stadium and back to their campsites. Singing is encouraged
Beside them in the night air as they retraced their steps along the
The street is illuminated with light, and the animals keep shooting overhead,
They scramble and wave with their lanterns. When they finally reached the
Tents, no one feels like sleeping at all, and depending on the noise level
In their midst, Mr. Weasley decided that they could all have one last
Cup cocoa together before they return. Soon they were fighting
is

' '
excited about the meeting; Mr. Weasley was dragged into an argument over magic with Charlie, and only when Ginny disappeared .
He slept in front of the little table and spilled hot chocolate all over.
The floor was called by Mr. Weasley for a stop to the verbal banter and he pushed everyone to bed. Hermione and Ginny entered the
the tent closed, and Harry and the rest of the Weasleys changed into their pajamas and got to their beds. On the other hand the
They can still hear a lot of singing and noise
bang.
“Oh I’m glad I’m not at work,” Mr. Weasley said sleepily.
“I don’t feel like going around telling the Irish they need to quit .
Celebrate.”
Harry, who was in a row above Ron, kept looking up at the
The canvas roof of the tent, he could see the occasional silver light of the leprechaun flashing above, and he looked again at some
Chrome more dramatic views. He was itching to return home.
equipped with Firebolt and attempted Wronski's Feint. . . . Somehow Oliver
Wood fails to convey with all of his twisted plots what the journey should be like. . . . He saw Harry
Himself in clothes with his name on the back, and reflecting on
The feeling of listening to a crowd a hundred thousand strong, like
Ludo Bagman’s voice echoes throughout the stadium, “I’m given .
you . . . plate!"
Harry didn't know if he had actually sunk to
Sleep — his thoughts of flying like Krum may destroy
In actual dreams — all he knew was that, after all, Mr.
Wesley was screaming.
"Get up! Ron — Harry — come on now, get up, this is necessary!"

' '
Harry sat up abruptly and the top of his head hit the canvas.
“ 'With' the issue?” he said.
With an allergic reaction, he could tell that something was wrong. The noise in
The crew has changed. The singing stopped. He can hear
Screaming, the sound of people running. falls from
The bunk went back to his clothes, but Mr. Weasley, who had
Pulling his jeans over his shoulder, he said, "No time, Harry—
Just grab a jacket and go outside—quick!”
Harry did as he was told and stormed out of the tent, Ron in his
peaks.
By the light of a few flames that were still burning, he could see
People run into the forest, running away from anything that
Looking across the field towards them, something was emitting
flashes of light and sounds like firecrackers. Ridiculing out loud, the obstacles of
The laughter, and shouts of the riders burst out to them; Then came
powerful explosions of blue light, illuminating the place.
A group of wizards, heavily armored and looking all d
A stick pointing straight up was traveling fast on
field. Harry glared at them. . . . It’s like they don’t have
faces. . . . Then he noticed that their heads were lowered and .
Painted faces. Above them, floating in the air, four
the fighting characters were deformed to grotesque proportions. it
It’s like the masked witches in space are Americans,
And the people above them were puppets made by the invisible
lines shooting out of the windows into the sky. Two of the characters
They were too small.
More witches were joining the marching band, laughing and
staring up at the flying lips. The tents shriveled and fell like

' '
The marching crowd fumed. Once or twice Harry saw one of the
Travelers flip the tent out of its way with its rope. Many arrested
hell. The screaming grew louder.
The flying creatures blacked out in an instant as they passed.
over a burning tent and Harry recognized one of them: Mr.
Roberts, company manager. The other three looked like
Probably his wife and children. One of the riders below
He flicked Mrs. Roberts by the hair with his handkerchief; Her nightgown
It dropped to reveal big balls and struggled to keep up.
Himself up as the crowd below clapped and roared with excitement.
“That’s sick,” Ron muttered, watching the youngest Muggle .
The boy, who started looking like a top, six feet above the
ground, his head rocking wildly from side to side. " true .
sick. . . .”
Hermione and Ginny came running over to them, pulling blankets
on their nightstands, Mr. Weasley right behind them. in
At the same moment, Bill, Charlie, and Percy walked out of the boys' room.
A tent, fully clothed, with their coats hanging down and their towels off.
“Let’s help the Ministry!” Mr. Weasley yelled at everyone
noise, throwing off his bow. “You are very — getting into .
of grass, and they continue. I’ll come get you when we break up.
This is gone!”
Bill, Charlie, and Percy were already speeding towards the
The next passenger; Mr. Weasley approached behind them. Ministry Magicians
they were running on all sides to the source of trouble.
The crowd under the Roberts family was often appealing.
“C'mon,” Fred said, grabbing Ginny's arm and starting to pull .
Her to the side of the tree. Harry, Ron, Hermione and George followed. They all looked back when they reached the trees. crowd

' '
Under Roberts the family was larger than ever; They can see
Department legislators are trying to make it to legislators through a ceiling in 2019.
grade, but they were having serious problems. It looks like
Although they were afraid to perform any spell that might cause him to
The Roberts family collapsed.
The colored lights that illuminate the path to the stadium have
It's lost. Dark werewolves were cowering in the trees;
The children were crying; terrible screams and noises could be heard in the cold night air. Harry felt sorry for himself.
He was pushed here and there by people whom he could
I don't see it. Then he heard Ron scream in pain.
"what happened?" Hermione said calmly, stopping so
simply that Harry walked into it. “Ron, where are you? Oh yeah.
It’s crazy — lumos!”
She straightened her wand and directed her heavy voice in the opposite direction.
way. Ron was lying sprawled on the floor.
“It fell on a tree root,” he growled angrily, rising to his feet .
again.
“Well, with legs that size, it’s hard not to,” said a drawling voice .
from behind them.
Harry, Run, and Hermione shrugged their shoulders. Draco Malfoy was
He stood alone nearby, leaning against a tree, looking most pitiful. His arms were crossed, as if he were witnessing the scene.
In the camp through a hole in the trees.
Ron told Malfoy to do something he knew Harry would do
I dare not say in front of Mrs. Weasley
"Language, Weasley," Malfoy said, blue eyes twinkling. "Won't you better hurry, now?" You don’t want to be seen, do you?”

' '
He turned his back to Hermione, and at the same time, a blast like
A bomb rang out from the campsite, and a flash of blue light momentarily lit up the trees around them.
“What’s that supposed to mean?” Hermione said with a chuckle.
"Granger, they're after the Dead," Malfoy said. “You want to be
Do you point your clothes in the air? Because if you do, stop
around . . . They looked like that, and it would give us all a laugh.”
“Hermione’s a witch,” Harry said quietly.
"Make of it what you will, Potter," Malfoy said, looking mischievous. “If you think a Mudblood cannot be seen, stay where you are .
are."
“You watch your mouth!” shouted Run. Everyone was
They knew that “Mudblood” was a very derogatory term for a mudblood or
A Muggle witch's wizard.
“No need, Ron,” Hermione whispered, grabbing Ron’s hand .
To stop him as he made his way to Malfoy.
A groan came from the other side of the trees.
louder than anything I’ve ever heard. Many people approx
he screams. Malfoy laughed quietly.
“They scare easily, don’t they?” He said with a grin. “I think your father
Did he tell you all to hide? What’s he doing — trying to save
Muggles?”
“Where are your parents?” Harry said, his excitement rising. "out
There they wear masks, right?”
Malfoy turned his face to Harry, still smirking.
"That is . . . if they had been, I should not have been able to tell you, or not,
plate?"
“Oh come on,” Hermione said, with a curious glance at Malfoy,
“Let’s go find the others.”

' '
“Keep that big steaming dick away, Granger,” Malfoy snapped.
“Come on,” Hermione said, and pulled Harry and Ron .
Up the road again.
“I’ll pick something for you dad’s one of those masked assholes!” said
Ron hotly.
“Well, with any luck, the Ministry will catch him!” Hermione said excitedly. “Oh I cannot believe this. Where are the other
got to?”
Fred, George, and Ginny were nowhere to be seen, though
The street was filled with lots of other people, all looking confused
on their backs to the challenge of returning to camp. a
A group of teenagers in pajamas was fighting a little louder.
On the road. When Harry, Ron, and Hermione saw a girl
With dark hair spreading out, he said softly, “Where is Madame .
Maxim? We lost her —”
“Er — what?” Run said.
"Oh . . ." The girl who had spoken turned her back, and
As they walked away they heard her faintly say “ 'Ogwarts.”
“The turkeys,” Hermione muttered.
"Sorry?" Harry said.
"They have to go to Beuxbaton," Hermione said. "You know . . .
Beauxbaton Academy of Performing Arts . . . I read about it in a review
of Magical Education in Europe.”
"Oh . . . yes . . . right," Harry said.
"Fred and George can't go that far," Ron said, releasing .
her wand, as light as Hermione's, and she moved down the street.
Harry dug into his coat pockets for his wand—but
It wasn’t there. The only thing he could find were Omnioculars.
“Oh, no, I don’t believe it . . . I lost my stick!”

' '
“You’re kidding!”
Ron and Hermione shrugged their shoulders to sort
light rays are heavier on the ground; Harry looked around.
in front of him, but his trunk is nowhere to be seen.
“I guess he’s back in the tent,” Ron said.
“Maybe he fell out of your car while we were running?”
Hermione said anxiously.
“Yeah,” Harry said, “well . . .”
He usually keeps his wand with him at all times in Wizardry.
world, and finds himself without her in the middle of a scene as
This made him feel very vulnerable.
A loud noise nearby made all three of them jump. Winkie
house-elf was fighting her way out of a nearby cluster of trees. she
He was moving in a strange way, apparently with great difficulty; It was as if someone invisible was trying to grab her.
back.
“There’s a bad witch about!” She screamed in panic as she
pushing forward and working to keep running. “Tall people — tall .
In the sky! Winky is getting out of the way!”
It landed among the trees on the other side of the road.
She trembled and squirmed as she struggled with the force that constrained her.
her.
“What happened to him?” Ron said, looking curiously at Winky.
“Why can’t she walk properly?”
"Bet she didn't ask permission to hide," Harry said. was
Thinking of Dobby: Every time he tries to do something
Malfoys didn't like it, the housebred was bound to start behaving himself.

' '
“You know, house elves get very dangerous!” Hermione said excitedly. "It's slavery, that's what it is!" That Mr. Crouch did it
I got to the top of the stadium, and it was ready, and he had
She’s hypnotized so she can’t even walk and they start kicking
Tents! Why is no one doing anything about it?”
“Well, pigs are happy, aren’t they?” Run said. “You’ve heard the old
Winky returns to the meeting . . . 'Homebodies shouldn't have
fun' . . . That’s what she likes, to be attacked. . . .”
“It’s people like you, Ron,” Hermione began desperately, “who are responsible for .
crooked and unfair systems, simply because they are too stupid to —”
Another loud roar came from across the woods.
“Let’s just keep walking, shall we?” Ron said, and Harry looked at him
She looked up at Hermione. Maybe there was truth to what Malfoy said .
He said; Hermione was probably in more pain than they were.
They started walking again, Harry still searching his pockets, though
He knew his wallet wasn’t there.
Following the dark path through the depths of the forest, still they continued
One eye for Fred, George, and Ginny. passed a group of
goblins pouncing on a golden tree they’ve undoubtedly won by scoring a match, and looking very
He is unperturbed by the problems in the camp. It’s still far from the limits of
Street, they went through a flash of silver light, and when they
They looked through the trees and saw three tall and beautiful Veela.
Standing in a courtyard, surrounded by a group of young wizards, all
Six of them were very loud.
“I pull around ten Galleons a year!” One of the
they shouted. “I’m the dragon killer for the Dangerous Beast Control Service.”

' '
“No, you’re not!” shouted his friend. “You’re a dishwasher in
A flying saucer. . . . But I’m an amateur hunter, I’ve killed about
Ninety so far —”
The third young wizard, whose lips are visible even by
The dim, silver light of the veela, now cut in, “I’m almost there .
That’s the youngest minister of magic, that’s me.”
Harry roared with laughter. He knew the magic wizard:
His name was Stan Shunpike, and he was actually a lead actor in
Knight's three-decker bus. He turns to tell Ron this, but
Ron's face had gone completely red, and the next Ron was
exclaimed, “If I told you I invented a slingshot that would reach .
Jupiter?”
"honestly!" Hermione said, and she and Harry grabbed Run
Strong with arms, saddle, and bike.
By the time the Veela screams and their lovers disappeared
Totally, they’re right in the heart of the jungle itself. They appear
He would be alone now; Everything was very quiet.
Harry looked to his side. “I think we can just wait here, you
know. We’re going to hear everybody coming a mile away.”
The words were barely out of his mouth, when Ludo Bagman .
they came out from behind a tree just in front of them.
Even with the dim light of the two objects, Harry could see that
The biggest change came for Bagman. He no longer looked awkward and stone-faced; There was no spring in his leg. Look
It’s very white and forced.
“Who is this?” he said, looking at them, trying to make
They had their faces out. “What are you doing here, alone?”
They looked at each other, surprised.
“Well — there’s kind of a conflict going on,” Ron said.

' '
Bagman looks at him.
"what?"
“In the camp . . . Some people take a family of
Muggles. . . .”
Bagman tried hard.
“Curse them!” he said, looking confused, and without
Other words, he Disappeared with a tiny pop!
“Not exactly on the lines, Mr. Bagman, are you?” said
Hermione, smiling.
“He was a great Beater, though,” Ron says, and he led the way .
They walked to a small park, and sat down on a dry bench.
Grass under the tree. “The Wimbourne team won the championship .
Three times in a row when he was with them.”
He took his little Krum figure out of his pocket and threw it on .
on the floor, and he watched her go. Like true Chrome,
The pattern was a bit with eagle back and pointy shoulders, very little
impressive for her tanned shoulders rather than her smile. There was Harry
You hear noises from the camp. Everything looks very
They were silent; Maybe the shooting is over.
“I hope the others are okay,” Hermione said after a while.
“They’ll be fine,” Ron said.
"Imagine if your father kidnapped Lucius Malfoy," Harry said, sitting up .
down to Ron's side and watched Krum's tiny figure pick at the fallen leaves. “He always said he wanted to get something from her.”
"That'll wipe the grin off old Draco's face, okay," Ron said.
“Those poor muggles, though,” Hermione said nervously.
“What if they can’t take them down?”
“They will,” Ron growled. “They’ll find a way.”

' '
“Mad, though, would do something like that when the entire Ministry of Magic is here tonight!” Hermione said. “I mean, how do you
Are they going to get away with it? Do you think they’ve been drinking, or have they just —”
But she broke off abruptly and looked over her shoulder. Harry
And Ron looked quickly too. It sounded like someone was picking at their body. They waited and listened to
The sound of incredible whispers behind the dark trees. But the footsteps suddenly stopped.
"Hello?" Harry called.
There was silence. Harry rose to his feet and glared at the
tree. It was too dark to see far, but he could sense someone.
It stood just beyond the periphery of his vision.
“Who’s there?” he said.
And then, without warning, the silence was broken by a voice unlike any they had ever heard in the woods; And he said, he’s not the worst
Screaming, but what sounded like a scream.
“MURSMURD!”
And something big, green, and shiny came out of the
the darkness powder Harry's eyes were struggling to penetrate; it
out over the treetops into the sky.
“What the — ?” exclaimed Ron as he got to his feet again, glaring at the protruding object.
For a split second, Harry thought it was another gay orchestra. Then he realized it was a giant penis, made of
Emerald star-like thing, with a snake coming out of
The mouth is like a tongue. As they note, it is getting worse,
floating in a plume of green smoke, engulfed in the black sky
Like a new toothbrush.

' '
Suddenly, the grasslands all around them erupted in screams.
Harry didn't understand why, but the only possible reason was
manifested as brain acceleration, which is now significantly
It would light up the entire ring like some horrible neon sign. he
scan the darkness to the person who created the mask,
But he couldn’t see anyone.
“Who’s there?” He called out again.
“Harry, come on, move!” Hermione held her head
jacket and was pulling it back.
“What’s wrong?” Harry said, surprised to see her face was very white.
And terrified.
“It’s a black mark, Harry!” Hermione smiles, pulling him as
as hard as she could. “You knowWho’s the weasel!”
"Voldemort's — ?"
“Harry, come on!”
Harry turned around — Ron was slowly slicing through his wand .
Krum — the three of them started walking along the grass — but before they could take a few swings, they delivered a series of strange noises .
He announced the appearances of twenty witches, appearing out of thin air,
surrounding them.
Harry turned around and at one point registered the same thing:
Each of these wizards drew his wand, and each blade pointed directly at himself, Ron, and Hermione.
Without pausing to think, he shouted, “DUCK!”
He grabbed the other two and dragged them to the floor.
“FALL!” Twenty voices scream — there’s a movie going
pillows and Harry felt the hairs on his head stand on end as he
A strong wind blows the cabin. He lifted his head in parallel.
of a mile saw jets of fiery red light streaming at them from

' '
flocks of witches, grappling with each other, leaping from tree trunks, diving in the dark —
"stop!" yelled a familiar voice. "Stop! This is my son!"
Harry's hair stopped thinning. He raised his head slightly .
exceed. The wizard in front of him lowered his wand. has fallen
up and saw Mr. Weasley looking confused.
"Ron—Harry"—his voice was shaking—"Hermione—.
Are you okay?”
“Get out of the way, Arthur,” said a cold and piercing voice.
It was Mr. Crouch. He and the other department inspectors were worried about them. Harry sprang to his feet to face them. Mr. Crutch
His face was tense with anger.
“Which one of you did?” he exclaimed, his brown eyes glancing between them. “Which one of you is the dark mark?”
“We don’t do that!” Harry said, gesturing to the couch.
“We did nothing!” Run said, who was rubbing his forehead.
And he looks proudly at his father. “What are you trying to charge us with?”
“Don’t lie, sir!” cried Mr. Crouch. His crown was still pointed directly at Ron, and his eyes widened — he looked .
A little jumble. “Found at the crime scene!”
“Barty,” said a nurse in a long linen dress,
“They’re children, Barty, they can’t —”
“Where did Mark come from, you three?” Mr. Weasley said
quickly.
“There,” Hermione stammered, pointing to the spot .
Where they heard that sound. “There is someone behind the
Trees . . . They shout out words — a fool —”

' '
“Oh, I’m standing there, aren’t I?” said Mr. Crouch, and turned round .
Her eyes fixed on Hermione now, disbelief plastered all over her face.
“Said a tree, really? You seem to have a lot of information about
What’s that Mark called, lady—”
But neither did any of the Ministry wizards except Mr. Crouch .
They seemed to remotely think that Harry, Ron, or Hermione
He had shocked the chief; On the contrary, on Hermione's word, they
They all lift their shirt again and move in that direction.
She pointed out, looking at the dark trees.
“We’re too late,” said the iron-clad nurse,
She shook her head. “They’re going to have Disparate.”
“I don’t think so,” said a dark-haired wizard.
It was Amos DiGouri, Cedric's father. “Our stunners went well .
With those trees. . . . There’s a good chance we’ll catch them. . . .”
“Amos, be careful!” said some observers honestly like Mr.
Diggory shrugged his shoulders, picked up his wand, and walked across the
it faded, and he disappeared into darkness. She saw Hermione.
Him vanish with his hands over his mouth.
A few seconds later, Mr. Diggory was heard yelling.
"Yeah! We got 'em! There's someone here! He's awake! It's -
But — blimey . . .”
“Do you have one?” cried Mr. Crouch, aloud
He didn't believe it. "Who? Who is he?”
They hear the rustling of twigs, the rustling of leaves, and then
Hesitant steps as Mr. Diggory emerged from behind the
Trees. He was carrying a small, bald figure in his arms. Harry recognized the tea towel at once. It was Winky.
Mr. Crouch did not move or speak as Mr. Diggory placed his

' '
The elf on the ground at his feet. The other inspectors in the department were all
She looked at Mr. Crouch. For a few seconds Crouch sat transfixed, his eyes piercing his white face as he stared down at Winky.
Then he appeared to come back to life.
“That — it can’t — be,” he stammered. "No -"
He quickly turned away from Mr. Diggory and strode off towards the
The place where he found Winky.
"No use, Mr. Crouch," Mr. Diggory called after him. " was
There’s no one else there.”
But Mr. Crouch seemed unprepared to take his word for it.
I heard it moving and rustling leaves as
He pushed the glasses aside and searched.
“A bit of a shame,” sighed Mr. Diggory, looking down at the .
The inevitable form of Winky. “Barty Kruch’s housekeeper . . . I mean
He will say . .”
“Come out of it, Amos,” Mr. Weasley snapped, “you won’t .
You seriously thought he was an elf? A Dark Mark is the mark of a Wizard. it
It requires a stick.”
“Yes,” said Mr. Diggory, “and she has a coat.”
"what?" Mr. Weasley said.
“Here, look.” Mr. Diggory picked up an umbrella and showed it to Mr.
Wesley. “It was in his hand. So this is the third paragraph of the rule of
Wand Use is broken, for starters. No person is ever created
He will carry or use a whip.”
Immediately there’s another pop hit, and Ludo Bagman Is Done .
In front of Mr. Weasley. She looked breathless and unable to move.
He twirled around on the spot, looking up at the emerald green
The head.

' '
“Average growth!” He sighed, almost kicking Winky as he
He turned questioningly to his companions. “Who did it? You found
them? Barty! What’s going on?”
Mr. Crouch returned empty-handed. His face is still
He was white as hell, and his hands and toothbrush mouth were
They both shivered.
“Where are you, Barty?” Bagman said. “Why don’t you be
In a meeting? Your elf was saving you a seat, too — rolling gargoyles!” Bagman had just seen Winky kneeling at his feet. "what
Happened to him?”
"I've been busy, Ludo," said Mr. Crouch, still speaking in
As if for a moment of disbelief, he almost moved his lips. “And my elf was .
They were surprised.”
“Are you surprised? With a lot of you, you mean? But why — ?”
Understanding quickly crept over Bagman’s forehead, glowering
face; He looked up at the ceiling, down at Winky, then at the Master.
Close up.
"No!" he said. “Winky? Create a hard brand? She can’t
Know how! She’ll need a coat, forever!”
"And she had one," said Mr. Diggory. “I found her holding one, .
Play. If that’s all right with you, Mr. Crouch, I think we should hear
What she has to say for herself.”
Crouch gave no indication that he had heard Mr. Diggory, but Mr.
Diggory seemed to take his silence as acceptance. He picked himself up.
the bat, pointing it at Winky, said, “Rennervate!”
Winky whimpered in pain. Her big brown eyes opened and she
I blinked several times in a confused sort of way. Viewed by
The wizards smiled, and she lifted herself up in a sitting position.

' '
 She kept her eyes on Mr. Diggory's thin, slightly rounded,
She lifted her eyes to look at his face; Then, all of a sudden, she
She looked up at the sky. Harry could see the glowing head coming into view.
Twice into his big, glassy eyes. She gave a sigh and looked confused.
in front of a crowded bridge, and erupted in terrified screams.
“Elephant !” Mr. Diggory said solemnly. “Do you know who I am? I am a
Member of the Office of Management and Supervision of
Magical creatures!”
Winky started rocking back and forth on the floor, he
The breath comes through sniffles. Harry was forcibly reminded
Dobby in his moments of stupid shit.
“As you can see, elf, the Dark Mark has been listed here for a while .
This,” Mr. Diggory said. “And discovered moments later,
Just below it! An explanation, if you please!”
“I — I — don’t do it, sir!” Winky smiled. “I don’t know how, sir!”
“You were found with a knife in your hand!” said Mr. Diggory, shifting in front of him. And as she holds the wand
The blue light that filled the green from overhead, Harry
He knows it.
“Hey — it’s mine!” he said.
Everyone in the division looked at him.
"I'm sorry?" Mr. Diggory said, incredulous.
“That’s my wand!” Harry said. “I destroyed it!”
“Did you drop it?” replied Mr. Diggory incredulously. “This is the
Proximity? Did you toss it aside after sending Mark?”
“Amos, think who you’re talking to!” said Mr. Weasley, much amused. “Could Harry Potter have invoked the Dark Mark?”

' '
“Er — of course not,” said Mr. Diggory with a smile. "Excuse me . . . repeated . . .”
“I didn’t throw up there, anyway,” Harry said, sticking his thumb out .
pointing to the trees below the summit. “I fell in love with her as soon as we arrived .
In the woods.”
“Okay,” said Mr. Diggory, his eyes narrowing as he turned to look .
In Winky again, he’s biting his nails. “You found this wand, eh, elf?
And you picked it up, you thought you were going to have some fun with it, you did
you?"
“I don’t do magic, sir!” cried Winky, tears streaming down the side of her cracked and bulbous cheeks. “I am . . . I
is . . . I'm just picking it up, sir! I don't do hard copy, sir,
I don’t know how!”
“It’s not her!” Hermione said. She looks so nervous, she’s talking in front of all these ministry biologists, but she pushes all
as. “Winky has a squeaky little voice, and that voice we hear .
the needlework was too deep!” She looked in
Harry and Ron, calling for their help. “Doesn’t sound anything like Winky, does it?”
“No,” Harry said, shaking his head. “It didn’t sound sudden .
Like an elf.”
“Yeah, that’s a human voice,” Ron said.
"Well, we'll see soon," said Mr. Diggory, indifferently. “There is a simple way of finding the ultimate magic trick .
It works, elf, you know that?”
Winky trembled and shook her head excitedly, her ears flapping, when Mr. Diggory once again raised his own wand and swung it wildly at .
type with Harry's.

' '
“Incantato before!” said Mr. Diggory.
Harry heard Hermione gasp, startled, as a huge snake-tongued head emerged from the place where the two noses met, but .
It was only the shadow of the green canopy high above them; He looks
It’s like a thick gray smoke: it’s a paradise.
“Delirious!” Mr. Diggory screamed, and the smokestack vanished
In a puff of smoke.
“Okay,” said Mr. Diggory with a sort of modest triumph, smiling .
Under Winky, he was still shaking with excitement.
“I won’t do it!” She squeaked, her eyes wide with fear. "am
No, I’m not, I don’t know how! I’m a good elf, I don’t use
potatoes, I don’t know how!”
“You’ve been caught red-handed, elf !” Mr. Diggory yelled.
“You got caught with a murder weapon in your hand !”
“Amos,” Mr. Weasley said aloud, “think about it . . . precious
Few wizards knew how to perform the spell. . . . where she will have
Did you learn it?”
“Maybe Amos is messing around,” Mr. Crouch said, with cold anger in
Every poem, “which I normally taught my servants to sing .
Dark Mark?”
There was a very uncomfortable silence. Amos Diggory looks
With fear. " Sir. Crutch . . . not . . . not at all . . .”
“You are now very close to accusing those two people of this .
Clearing those less likely to taste that Mark!” said the Master.
Close up. "Harry Potter—and myself!" I thought you knew.
With the boy’s story, Amos?”
"Of course—everybody knows—" said Mr. Diggory, looking very anxious.
“And I think you remember a lot of the proofs I gave, about a .

' '
Longevity, that I despise and despise the fine arts and those
work?” Mr. Crouch groaned, his eyes bulging again.
" Sir. Crouch, I — didn’t I tell you that you had something to do
With him!” Amos Diggory has made a comeback, now pointing behind his own .
Dark brown beard.
“If you accuse my elf, you accuse me, Diggory!” shouted the Master.
Close up. “Where else would she learn to drive?”
“She’s — probably thrown everywhere —”
“Certainly, Amos,” said Mr. Wesley. “Maybe she picked it up .
Everywhere. . . . Winky?” He said goodbye and turned to the dragon, but she
Flinched like he was yelling at her too. “Where he really did
Did you find Harry’s wand?”
Winky was staring at the edge of her tea towel so hard that
It was melting under his feet.
“I — I get it . . . You found it there, sir. . . .” She smiled,
"There . . . in the trees, sir. . . .”
“See, Amos?” Mr. Weasley said. “The one who invented
Mark can leave immediately after they do it, leave
Harry's voice behind him. Smart thing to do, not use their
Wand, which can betray them. And Winky here has
The baby would come upon the rabbit shortly after and pick
up.
“But then she would have been just a few feet away from the truth .
A prisoner!” Mr. Diggory said solemnly. “Elf ? Did you see anyone?”
Winky started growing faster than ever. His wide eyes flickered from Mr. Diggory, to Ludo Bagman, to Mr. Crouch.
Then she smiled and said, “I’ve never seen one, sir . . . There is no one. . .”
'Amos,' said Mr. Crouch briskly, 'I know very well that, in .
Course of events, you’ll want to carry Winky in your

' '
Part of the questionnaire. I beg you, though, to allow me to
Face it.”
Mr. Diggory did not seem to think much of this scheme at all, but it was clear to Harry that Mr. Crouch was so .
An important member of the department cannot refuse
he.
"You can be sure she will be punished," said Mr. Crouch .
He added coldly.
“His mother . . .” Winky looks on, looks at Mr. Crouch,
Her eyes filled with tears. “Teacher, I beg you . . .”
Mr. Crouch looked back, his face suddenly distorted, every trace
efs more depth enlightened. There was no emotion in his expression.
"Winky is behaving tonight in a way I didn't think possible," he whispered. “I told her to stay in the tent. I
He told her to stay there while I went to sort out the problems. And I
Realize that she did not drown me. This is a dress.”
"No!" cried Winky, throwing herself at Mr. Crouch's feet.
“No, sir! Not clothes, not clothes!”
Harry knew that the only way to make a pet free was to show him proper clothes. It was sad to see Winky’s process
She clutched at her teapot as she rubbed Mr. Crouch's shoulders.
“But it was ready!” Hermione burst out angrily, glaring at the
Mr. Crouch. “Your elf is afraid of heights, and those wizards in .
Masks were freaking people out! You can’t blame her for wanting
Get out of their way!”
Mr. Crouch took a step back and released himself from the contact
With that elf, who was looking like something
Filthy and filthy he was rubbing against his frequently shaved legs.
“I have no use for a housefly that has never harmed me,” he said coldly,

' '
She looked at Hermione. “I have no use for a forgetful servant .
The necessity of its owner, is the glory of its owner.”
Winky was crying so hard that his emotions echoed across the pond. There was a very strange silence, Master concluded.
Weasley, who sighed, "Well, I guess I'll make my contribution back to . . ."
tent, unless anyone has any objections. Amos, that shirt tells us all
Could — if Harry could take it back, please —”
Mr. Diggory handed Harry his wallet and Harry pocketed it.
“Come on, you three,” Mr. Weasley snapped. But Hermione
He didn’t seem to want to move; His eyes were still in disbelief.
Elf. “Hermione!” Mr. Weasley said, more quietly. She turned around and
They followed Harry and Ron out of the woodshed and out the
Trees.
“What’s going to happen to Winky?” said Hermione, the moment they left the treehouse.
"I don't know," said Mr. Wesley.
“That’s how they calculate it!” Hermione said excitedly. " Sir.
Diggory, she calls him 'elf ' all the time . . . and Mr. Kruch! he
He knows she didn’t and he’s still going to fuck her! He didn't like it.
How scared she was, or how anxious she was—as if she
He’s not even human!”
“Well, she’s not,” Ron said.
Hermione glanced at him.
“That doesn’t mean she doesn’t have feelings, Ron. weird.
way -"
"Hermione, I agree with you," Mr. Weasley snapped, winking at her, "but now is not the time to discuss elves' rights. I want
To get back to the tent as fast as we can. What happened to
other?"

' '
"We lost them in the dark," Ron said. “Dad, why is everyone so
uptight about that head thing?”
“I’ll explain everything back at the tent,” Mr. Weasley said .
with enthusiasm.
But when they got to the edge of the cliff, their size was .
suspended. A large group of scary looking witches and wizards
He was gathered there, and when they saw Mr. Weasley walking towards them, several of them rushed forward.
“What’s going on there?”
“Who made it?”
“Arthur — isn’t — He?”
“Of course it’s not Him,” Mr. Weasley insisted. "we
I don’t know who it was; It looks like they’re divorced. Now excuse me.
I, please, want to get to bed.”
He took Harry, Run, and Hermione into the crowd and turned
In the camp. All was quiet now; No sign of
masked, although many tents were dilapidated they were still smoking.
Charlie’s head was poking out of the boys’ tent.
“Dad, what’s going on?” he called out of the darkness. “Fred,
George, and Ginny have returned safely, but the others—”
“I got them here,” Mr. Weasley said, rounding the window and entering the tent. Harry, Ron, and Hermione walked in after him.
Bill was sitting at the small kitchen table, holding a bed sheet for
His hand, which was bleeding heavily. Charlie has a serious evil in him
tears in his eyes, and Percy was bleeding his nose. Freed, George, and
Ginny looked unscathed, though frightened.
“Did you get them, Dad?” Bill said quietly. “The person who
did Mark make it?”
“No,” said Mr. Weasley. “We found Barty Crouch’s secret hold .

' '
Harry’s ring, but we’re none the wiser about who actually made Mark.”
"what?" Bill, Charlie and Percy said together.
“Harry’s wand?” Fred said.
" Sir. Crutch Elf?” Percy said, in a low voice.
With some help from Harry, Ron, and Hermione, Master.
Weasley explained what happened in the woods. When they are
They finish their story, and Percy flushes with excitement.
“Well, Mr. Crouch has the manners to get rid of such an elf!” he
said. “She would run away when he flatly told her not to . . . They humiliated him in front of the entire ministry . . . How can that be?
Look, if you are parked in front of the Department
For regulatory and monitoring purposes —”
“She didn’t do anything — she was just in the wrong place in
wrong timing!” Hermione looked over at Percy, who looked very
He was taken by surprise. Hermione had always gotten along so well with Percy —
Better, certainly, than any of the others.
"Hermione, a witch in Mr. Crouch's position couldn't give a
house-elf who will cross amok with a smile!” Birch said
With a sigh, he feels himself.
“She didn’t run amok!” said Hermione. “You just chose it .
Up from the ground!”
“Look, can someone explain just what that skull thing is?” said
Ron was impatient. “He wasn’t hurting anybody. . . . Why is it so great
deal?"
“I told you, it’s a sign of you-know-who, Ron,” Hermione said,
before anyone else could answer. “I read about him in The Rise and
The fall of the dark arts.”
“And he hasn’t been seen in thirteen years,” said Mr. Weasley .

' '
silently. “Of course, people are confused . . . It’s almost like he’s watching
You knowWho’s back again.”
“I don’t get it,” Ron said, shrugging. "I mean . . . it's still only a
A shape in the sky. . . .”
“Ron, you know-who and his followers brought the black mark .
in the air every time they fight,” Mr. Weasley said. “The terrorism it
Observed . . . You have no idea, you’re too young. Just picture coming home to find a black mark crawling on your house,
and knowing what you’ll find inside. . . .” Mr. Weasley
got. “Everyone’s fear . . . The worst thing ever . . .”
There was silence for a moment. Then Bill, removed the board
from his hand to see if it was broken and said, “Well, he didn’t help us
Tonight, who did it. Scared Death Eaters
Time has seen it. They all looked different before we approached
got to unpack some of them. We’ve caught up with Roberts before
They hit the ground running, though. They’re changing their minds right now.”
“Death Eaters?” Harry said. “What are Death Eaters?”
"That's what YouKnowWho supporters call themselves," he said .
bill. “I think we saw the rest of them tonight — the ones that .
They managed to avoid Azkaban, no matter what.”
"We can't prove it's them, Bill," Mr. Weasley said. " though
Maybe there was,” he added hopelessly.
“Yeah, I think it does!” Ron said quietly. “Dad, we met Draco
Malfoy in the forest, and tells us his father is one of
Those women in masks! And we all know that the Malfoys are right in
With you-know-who!”
“But what about Voldemort’s henchmen —” Harry began. every-

' '
his body glowed — like most of the wizarding world, the Weasleys .
Always avoiding saying Voldemort's name. "I'm sorry," Harry said
quickly. “What have the YouKnow-Who members been doing, worrying .
Muggles? So, what’s the point?”
“Point?” Mr. Weasley said with a wry laugh. “Harry,
This is their idea of ​​fun. Half of the Muggle crimes back when YouKnow-Who was in power were committed for fun. I think they have
Few drinks tonight and I cannot assure us all that many of
They are still in custody. Good small gathering for them,” he concluded .
With insult.
“But if they are the death eaters, why did they disagree
When they saw the dark mark?” Run said. “They will be
A pleasure to see, isn’t it?”
Bill said, “Use your brain, Ron. “If it’s truly Death .
The Eaters, worked hard to stay out of Azkaban when YouKnowWho lost power, and told all sorts of lies about him out of spite .
their to kill and torture people. I bet they’d be more afraid than everyone else to see him back. They refuse to
He wasn't involved with her when he lost his powers, and went
They return to their daily lives. . . . I don’t think he would have been very happy.
With them, you?”
"So . . . who invented the Dark Mark . . .” Hermione said
Quite simply, “whether they did it to show support for the Death Eaters, or .
To wake them up?”
"Your guess is as good as ours, Hermione," Mr. Weasley said.
“But I’ll tell you this . . . Only Death Eaters were
He knows how to make it sound. I would be very surprised if the person who did
He wasn't a fan of death once, even if they weren't now. . . .

' '
Listen, it’s too late, and if your mom hears what happened
She will be sick with worry. Let’s get a few more hours of sleep and then try.
And get an early Portkey out of here.”
Harry went back to his desk with his head boiling. He knew he
You must feel tired: it’s nearly three in the morning, but he
I felt overwhelmed — overwhelmed, and worried.
Three days ago — it felt like so much, but it was just .
Three days — he woke up with his throat burning. And tonight,
For the first time in three hundred years, Lord Voldemort's arrow hovered in the sky. What do these things mean?
He thought about the letter he had written to Sirius before he left .
Privet Drive. Was Sirius going to make it yet? When the
reply? Harry kept staring at the screen, but there was no flashing shit
He came to her now to make her sleep easier, and was long after
Charlie's sighs filled the tent Harry had finally disappeared into.

Chapter Ten
Mayhem READ
department

Mr. Weasley woke them up after only a few hours sleep. he
They used magic to unite the tents, and let
commander as quickly as possible, hurried Mr. Roberts to the door of the
his house. Mr. Roberts had a strange, childish look, and
He bid them farewell with a vague “Merry Christmas.”
“He’ll be fine,” Mr. Weasley whispered as they drove off .
about the country. “Sometimes, when a person’s memory is altered,
It made him a little awkward for a while . . . And that was great
They need him to forget it.”
They heard sudden voices as they approached the place where the
Portkeys were left, and when they got to it, they found a lot .
of witches and wizards gathered around Basil, guardian of the
Portkeys, they’re all clamoring to get out of the lease as quickly as
can. Mr. Weasley had a brief conversation with Basil; they
They went into the queue, and were able to get an old rubber
to Mount Stoatshead before the sun really rises. They walk
The catchpole towards Ottery St.
Burrow in the early morning light, they talked less because they were
They were thus refreshed, and thought anxiously of their morning adventure. As they are
He turned the corner and Burrow came into view, uttering a shout
along the road.
“Oh thank you so much, thank you so much!”
Mrs. Weasley, who had obviously been waiting for them at
front yard, she came running up to them, still wearing her bedroom
slippers, his face pale and freckled, a copy of the Daily
The Prophet held his hand.
“Arthur — I’m so sorry — I’m so sorry —”
She put her hands on Mr. Weasley's head, and Daily .
The Prophet fell from his withered hand to the ground. They look down,
Harry saw the headline: QUIDDITCH WORLD CUP CUP VICTORY STATEMENTS, complete with a black and white photo of Dark Mark on tree tops.
“You’re fine,” Mrs. Weasley murmured, releasing .
Mr. Weasley again staring at them all with blue eyes, “you .
leave. . . . Oh boys . . .”
And to everyone’s surprise, she caught Fred and George and
He pulled them both into a tight hug until their heads grabbed
together.
"Oh! Mom — you’re bullying us —”
“I shouted at you before you left!” Mrs. Weasley said, beginning with
Sub. “That’s all I was thinking about! If you know who has
I found you, and the last thing I told you was that you didn’t find
Necessary OWLs? A Fried . . . George . . .”
“Come on, now, Molly, we’re all right,” said Master.
Groaning, Weasley released her from the twin and carried her back
Next to the house. “Bill, pick this up,” he added in a small voice .
paper, I want to see what it says. . . .”
When they were all crammed into the tiny kitchen, u
Hermione poured Mrs. Weasley a cup of very strong tea, in the
instructed Mr. Weasley to shoot Old Ogdens .
Firewhiskey, Bill handed his father the journal. Mr. Weasley
They scanned the first page while Percy looked over his shoulder.
“I got it,” Mr. Weasley said firmly. “The department is cracking down . . . No prisoners were taken . . . Lax lax . . . Dark witches run
Not recorded . . . National shame . . . Who wrote this? Oh . . . of
course . . . Rita Skeeter.”
“That woman sent it to the Ministry of Magic!” Birch said
With anger. “Last week meant we were wasting our time having conversations across the kitchen window, when we should be lounging .
November! A model not specifically mentioned in Article Twelfth of the
Effects of curing non-magical Character creatures —”
“Do us a favor, Perce,” Bill said, grinning, “and shut up.”
“I was mentioned,” Mr. Weasley said, his eyes rolling after .
link to it as it reached the bottom of the Daily Prophet article.
"where?" Mrs. Weasley said, sipping into her tea and
Whiskey. “If I had seen that, I would have known you were alive!”
“Not by name,” Mr. Weasley said. “Listen to this: 'If those who fear
Wizards and witches who waited with bated breath for news in the middle of
tree waiting for a discount from the Ministry of Magic, they are unfortunately
disappointed. A department official came out shortly after the dark mark said no one was injured, but declined to provide any other information. If this statement would be
managed to quell rumors that several bodies had been taken from
woods an hour later, still to be seen.' Oh really,” said Mr. Weasley .
In shock, he handed the paper to Percy. “No one was hurt.
What should I say? Rumors that several bodies were removed from the tree . . . Well, of course there will be news now
She pulled that off.”
He let out a deep sigh. "Molly, I'm going to go into the
office; This is going to take some getting used to.”
“I’m coming with you daddy,” Percy said better. " Sir.
Crouch will need all hands on deck. And I can give him my personal ticket.”
He stormed out of the kitchen. Mrs. Weasley looked very concerned.
"Arthur, you should be on holiday!" This has nothing to do with your office; Surely they can accomplish this without
you?"
"I have to go, Molly," Mr. Wesley said. “I made things up
bad. I’ll just change my clothes and leave. . . .”
"Mrs. Weasley," Harry whispered, unable to contain himself, .
“Hedwig you didn’t get a letter for me, did you?”
“Hedwig, dear?” Mrs. Weasley said with a curious smile. "No . . . no,
There wasn’t any post at all.”
Ron and Hermione looked at Harry in surprise. With a meaningful gesture toward the two he said, “Well if I go and shoot .
stuff in your room, Ron?”
"Yeah . . . think I would too," Ron said suddenly. “Hermione?”
“Yes,” she said quietly, and the three of them left the lobby .
kitchen and over the hallway.
“What happened, Harry?” Run said, at the moment they connected
The door to the back room behind them.
"There's something I didn't tell you," Harry said. “On Saturday morning, I woke up with my sore throat again.”
Ron and Hermione’s reactions were pretty much the same as Harry’s
She pictured them back in her bedroom on Privet Drive. Hermione
He smiled and started making suggestions at once, mentioning a
The collection of reference books, and everyone from Albus Dumbledore to Mrs. Pomfrey, the Headmistress of Hogwarts. Run just looked
He hit.
"But — he wasn't there, was he?" You knowWho? I mean -
Last time your forehead got hurt, it was at Hogwarts, wasn’t it?”
"I'm sure he wasn't in Privet Drive," Harry said. “But I was
Dream about it. . . He’s Peter — you know, Owl. I
I can’t quite remember it now, but they were planning to kill . . .
one."
He hesitated for a while along the lines of saying “I,” but
He couldn't bring himself to make Hermione look even more horrible.
than she had already done.
“It was just a dream,” Ron insisted. “It’s just a night.”
“Yeah, but, what?” Harry said, turning to look from
Window in a radiant sky. “It’s weird, isn’t it? . . . My voice
It hurt, and three days later, the Death Eaters were on the move, and
Voldemort’s power is back in the air.”
“Don’t — say — his name!” Run smiled brightly
teeth.
“And remember what Professor Trelawney said?” Harry continued,
He doesn't blame Ron. “At the end of last year?”
Professor Trelawney was their Magic teacher at Hogwarts.
Hermione's shocked look disappeared as she let out a mock chuckle.
“Harry, you are not ready for anything .
The old coward said?”
“You weren’t there,” Harry said. “You don’t listen to him. This time
It was different. I tell you, you came in for a nap — a real one. and
She said the Dark Lord would rise up . . . It’s bigger and more dangerous than ever . . . and run it because his server was
I’m going to go back to him . . . And that night Wormtail escaped.”
There was a silence in which Ron stared blankly at the
A hole in his Chudley Cannons uniform.
“Why did you ask if Hedwig had come, Harry?” Hermione
asked. “Are you waiting for a letter?”
“I told Sirius about my scar,” Harry said, shrugging. “I’m waiting for his answer.”
“Good thinking!” Ron said, his expression softening. “I bet Sirius knows what to do!”
"I hope he gets back to me soon," Harry said.
“But we don’t know where Sirius is . . . It could be in Africa or
Somewhere, can’t he?” Hermione said reasonably. “Hedwig’s
It doesn’t make that trip in a few days.”
“Yeah, I know,” Harry said, but there was a hint of heat in it .
His stomach as he stared out the window at the Hedwig-free sky.
“Come play Quidditch in the woods, Harry,”
Run said. “Come on — three on three, Bill and Charlie and Fred .
and George to play. . . . You can try the Wronski effect. . . .”
"Ron," Hermione said, in the kind of voice I didn't think you were very polite, "Harry doesn't want to play Quidditch anymore ."
now. . . . He’s worried, and he’s tired. . . . We should all go to
bed. . . .”
“Yeah, I want to play Quidditch,” Harry said quietly. "hang
on, I’ll get my Firebolt.”
Hermione left the room, staring at something that sounded
Like “Boys.”
Neither Mr. Weasley nor Percy would be home much of the next week. The two of them leave the house every morning before the rest
The family was up and back well after dinner each night.
“That was an absolute blast,” Percy seriously told them .
Monday evening before returning to Hogwarts. "I have
They’ve been putting out fires all week. People keep sending Howlers, and
Of course, if you don’t open the Howler right away, it will explode.
The bullet points on my entire desk and my best memory reduced to
campaign.”
“Why do they send all the Howlers?” she asked Ginny, who was
She packed her cast of a thousand magical beasts and plants with
Spellotape on the tablecloth in front of the campfire.
"He's complaining about security at the World Cup," Percy said.
“They want compensation for their destroyed property. Mondungus
Fletcher bids for a twelve-bedroom tent with ensuite
Jacuzzi, but I have his number. I know for a fact he was sleeping.
Under the cloth draped over the pillows.”
Mrs. Weasley glanced at the grandfather clock in the corner.
Harry liked this lecture. It's useless if you want
Know the timing, but at least with a lot of information. She has nine gold
hands, and each one is carved with one of the Weasleys .
Family names. There are no numbers on the character, but descriptions of where each family member might be. "home,"
“School,” and “work” are there, but there’s also “travel,”
“Lost,” “Hospital,” “Prison,” and, in the place where the number
Twelve will be on the earth’s clock, the “death passage.”
Eight of those arms were now pointing towards “home.”
place, but Mr. Weasley’s, the most expensive, still meant “work.” Mrs. Weasley smiled.
“Your father hasn’t had to go into the office on weekends since
the days of You KnowWho,” she said. “They work it away .
It's very difficult. His dinner will spoil if he doesn’t come home.
soon."
“Well, Dad felt he had to repeat his mistake in
Match, isn’t it?” Birch said. “If that’s true, he was a little too polite to make a public statement without clearing it with his Head .
of the First Office —”
“You are not afraid to blame your father for what happened .
Skeeter Woman Wrote!” said Mrs. Weasley, breathing at once.
“If my father hadn’t said anything, old Rita would have just said that
It’s a shame that no one from the ministry has noticed,” he said
Bill, who was playing chess with Ron. “Rita Skiter doesn’t
Everyone looks good. Remember, she summoned all of Gringott's.
Charm Breakers once, and they called me 'a long-haired asshole'?”
"Well, it's a bit long, dear," Mrs. Weasley said quietly. “If you d
Let me just —”
“No, Mom.”
Rain pounded on the living room window. Hermione was tagged in the spell book, fourth grade, her copy Ms.
Weasley had had her, and Harry, and Ron on Diagon Road.
Charlie was wielding a fireproof balaclava. Harry was sending his
Firebolt, the mask activation device that Hermione had given him to
His thirteenth birthday opened at his feet. Fred and George sat in a far corner, smoked cigarettes, whispered, heads bowed
On a piece of paper.
“What are you two planning?” Mrs. Weasley said softly, her eyes
About the twins.
“Homework,” Fred said quietly.
"Don't worry, you're still on holiday," Mrs. Weasley said.
“Yeah, we left it a little late,” George said.
“You’re by no means writing a new order table, it’s .
You?" » said Mrs. Weasley knowingly. “aren't you planning to restart the Weasleys' Wizard Wheezes, by any means?”
“Now, mother,” Fred said, looking at her, a sad look on his
face. "If the Hogwarts train crashes tomorrow, and George is . . ."
I died, how would you feel knowing that was the last thing we did
Hearing from you is an unsubstantiated accusation?”
Everyone laughed, even Mrs. Weasley.
“Your father is coming!” she said suddenly, turning to
Clock too.
Mr. Weasley’s hand had suddenly turned from “work” to “travel”; A second later it stopped all the way to “home” with
others, and heard him speaking from the kitchen.
“Coming, Arthur!” Mrs. Weasley called out to her, storming out of the
room.
Moments later, Mr. Weasley came to bright life .
The room brought his dinner on a tray. It all looks
have.
“Well, the body is really on fire now,” he told Mrs. Weasley as he was .
He sat in an armchair in front of the fireplace, playing absent-mindedly with his somewhat spilled coffee. “Rita Skiter was
Ferreting all week, looking for more ministry supplies for
write. And now she found out about poor poor Bertha going
He lost, so that will be the theme at Christmas tomorrow. I said
Bagman should have sent someone looking for her ages ago.”
" Sir. Crouch has been saying it for weeks and weeks,” Percy said .
quickly.
"Crouch is very lucky that Rita didn't find out about Winky," she said .
Mr. Weasley sighed. “It’s going to be a high-profile week in his coverage .
The house elf is caught holding the wand that creates the Darkness
Mark.”
“I think we all agreed that the elf, though irresponsible,
Didn’t Mark notice?” Percy said casually.
“If you ask me, Mr. Crouch is very lucky no one is in the Daily .
The Prophet knows how cruel he is to the elves!” Hermione said excitedly.
“Now look over here, Hermione!” Birch said. “A departmental official of the stature of Mr Crouch deserves unwavering allegiance from
His servants—”
“A slave, you mean!” said Hermione, her voice growing bitter, "Because Winky didn't pay, did he?"
“I think you all better go upstairs and see if you like .
All right!" " said Mrs. Wesley, nodding in agreement. "Go
Now, all of you. . . .”
Harry tested his dragon saving gadget and put his Firebolt
over his shoulder, and back up with Ron. snow
It sounded even louder on the roof of the house, raising
The splashes and whips from the wind, not to mention the storms
warm from that ghost that lived in the attic. Started Pigwidgeon
She tweets and stares at her cage as they enter. the
The sight of those half-full shelves was like going into a
The joy of surprise.
“Bungas him some Owl Treats,” Ron said, tossing him a box .
in front of Harry. “He can tolerate it.”
Harry unleashes some magic in Pigwidgeon walls
cage, then turned to his pack. Hedwig's cage stood next to it, still
empty.
“It’s been over a week,” Harry said, looking at the gravelly Hedwig .
The platform. “Ron, you don’t think Sirius got caught, do you?”
“Nah, it would have been at Christmas every day,” Ron said. "the
The department would want to prove they caught someone, not so
they?"
“Yeah, I guess. . . .”
“Look, here is the thing my mother brought you in Diagon Alley. and
She has some gold from your vault for you. . . And she was washed
All your socks.”
He picked up a pile of blankets on Harry’s camp bed and threw them
A pile of money and a pillowcase next to it. Harry began to unwrap the crew. In addition to the manual of structural markers,
Level 4, by Miranda Goshawk, features a handful of new colors, and
dozens of sheets of paper, and nails for his lightning bolt —
It was dripping with lionfish skin and belladonna essence. He was just packing underwear in his drawer when Ron
He made a noise of disgust behind him.
“What’s that supposed to be?”
He was holding something that looked to Harry like a hollow,
gray velvet dress. He has an animal-looking lace tail on his head.
and matching lace skirts.
There was a knock at the door, and Mrs. Weasley entered, holding a handful of stained Hogwarts uniforms.
“Here you are,” she said, parting them into two groups. "now,
Mind holding them as tightly as possible so they don’t break.”
“Mom, you gave me Ginny’s new necklace,” Ron said, handing it to me .
brought out to him.
“Of course not,” Mrs. Weasley said. “That’s for you. dress
furniture."
"what?" Ron said, looking confused.
“Wear a skirt!” said Mrs. Weasley. “It says on your school list .
That you should buy a suit this year . . . Dress for national occasions.”
“You should,” Ron said incredulously. “I wouldn’t wear that, no way.”
“Everyone wears them, Ron!” Mrs. Weasley said with a chuckle.
“So they all are! Your father has something for epic parties!”
“I’m going starkers before I put this on,” Ron growled.
“Don’t be so stupid,” said Mrs. Wesley. “You should have a dress
clothes, are on your list! I got some for Harry too . . . Show him,
Harry. . . .”
In some trepidation, Harry opened the last pocket in his robe.
bed. It wasn’t as bad as he’d expected, though; His clothes
They don’t have any charm to them at all — in fact, they’re more or less
They were like the ones at his school, except that they were bottle green instead of black.
“I think they’ll bring out the color in your eyes, dear,” he said
Mrs. Wesley sighed.
“Well, they’re fine!” Ron said proudly, looking at Harry's scars.
“Why can’t I have something like that?”
"Because . . . well, I had to get your second one, and there
Not much of a choice!” said Mrs. Weasley, beaming.
Harry looked away. He will share all the money at will.
In his Gringotts dungeon with the Weasleys, but he knew he would be
You'll never take it.
“I’m not wearing them,” Ron said flatly. "never."
“Good,” Mrs. Weasley said quietly. “Go naked. And, Harry, please
Surely you will get a picture of it. Goodness knows I can work with one
laugh."
She left the room and slammed the door behind her. There is a
Melodious loud noises from behind them. The pigwidgeon was enjoying a very large nail bed.
“Why is everything I have for nothing?” Run said angrily, kicking
across the room to bash Pigwidgeon’s head.

CHAPTER FOURTEEN
ON THE SHIP
HUWARTS REVIEW

There’s an end-of-holiday sadness in the air.
When Harry brought up that morning. A large plea is still surrounded the ship when he sought the women and a woman's singer; They will change their school’s debt in Hogarts.
express.
He, Ron, Fred, and George had just reached the first floor stairs on their way downstairs towards dawn when Mrs. Weasley appeared .
At the back of the stairs, he looks concerned.
"Arthur!" She called down the hallway. “Arthur! verse
Since the Ministry!”
Harry leaned against the wall as Mr. Weasley came
He swung his blade back and forth and stormed out of
sight. When Harry and the others entered the kitchen, they saw
Mrs. Weasley rummaged wistfully through the shelves — “I have a .
Quill here somewhere!” — and Mr. Weasley crouching over the fire, .
You talked to —
Harry closed his eyes tightly and opened them again to yawn.
That they were doing well.
Amos Diggory’s head was lying in the middle of the fireplace as
A large, bearded egg. She was very satisfactory, not all the ears of the ears of you with the stones that keep the ears.
“. . . The Muggle neighbors heard screams and shouting, so they went
And they call those you call — please-men. Arthur,
You have to get there —”
"here!" « Massa Weslayyyya said a child, a library of skirts, and a arrival in the Mass Weasley satellite
sleeve.
“— that’s the truest magic I’ve ever heard of him,” said Mr. Diggory .
head. “I had to come into the office early to deliver two babies,
ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵓⴼⵉⵖ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⵏ ⵓⵙⴻⵇⴷⴻⵛ ⵓⵔ ⵉⵍⴰⵇⴻⵏ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⴰⴽⴽ ⵜⵜⴱⴻⴷⴷⵉⵍⴻⵏ — ⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵔⵉⵜⴰ .
Skeeter took that one, Arthur —”
“What does Mad-Eye say happened?” Mr. Weasley asked, as he flicked on the lightsaber, put on his clothes, and prepared to get
opportunities.
Mr. Diggory's brow furrowed. “He said he heard an intruder in
Yard. He says he was driving home, but got caught
With his sweet tooth.”
“And what’s the fires of the fire?” Mass Wesley, singing
With pleasure.
“It made one hell of a noise and broke trash everywhere, somehow
I can tell,” Mr. Diggory said. “Apparently, one of them is still
They were moving with a rocket when the mob men showed up —”
Mr. Weasley shouted.
“What about the intruder?”
"Arthur, you know Mad-Eye," said Mr. Diggory's head, smirking .
His eyes too. “Someone was hovering in his yard during the death of
night? There may be a cat that affects a lot of feathers passing by.
back somewhere, covered in potato shells. But if you don’t have to
Many Magic users get their hands on MadEye, he has it — think
of his record—we must pull it off with a small charge, something on your part—what’s the price of the split guns?”
“It might be embarrassing,” said Mr. Weasley, still very quickly typing, his
She shook her head. “Madeye didn’t use his wand? He didn’t really do it.
They’re attacking someone?”
“I’m going to guess he jumped out of bed and started scratching everything he owned .
They can reach through the window,” said Mr. Diggory, “but they will .
They have work to prove it, there were no casualties.”
“All right, I’m off,” Mr. Weasley said, shoving the paper with his notes on it into his pocket and storming out of
The kitchen too.
Mr. Diggory's head looked up at Mrs. Weasley.
“I’m sorry about that, Molly,” she says, more quietly, “It hurts so much .
Words are everything . . . But Arthur was the only one who could get
Madeye leaves, and MadEye has to start his new job
today. Why should he have chosen last night . . .”
“Never mind, Amos,” said Mrs. Wesley. “You really don’t have
A little drink or something before you go?”
"Oh go on, then," said Mr. Diggory.
Mrs. Weasley took a loaf of buttered toast from a window on the
The kitchen table, he put it in the flames of fire, and took it to the Master.
Diggory's mouth.
“Funks,” he said in a hushed voice, and then, with a small pop, .
He fell.
Harry could hear Mr. Weasley softly saying goodbye to Bill,
Charlie, Pierce, and the girls. Within five minutes, he was back in
The sale, whose clothes are on the right track now, attracted a discount
With her hair.
"I'd better hurry up — you've had a good term, boys," Master said.
Weasley to Harry, Ron, and the twins, tying a bow over his
clothing and preparations for Disappear. “Molly, you’ll be
OK if you take the kids to King's Cross?”
“Of course I will,” she said. “You just touch MadEye, you will .
Be good.”
As Mr. Weasley left, Bill and Charlie entered the living room.
“Did someone say MadEye?” Bill asked. “What was
now?
"He said someone tried to break into his house last night," he said .
Mrs. Wesley.
“Madaye Moody?” George smirked, spreading the marmalade on his chopsticks. “He’s not the stupid —”
"Your father thinks a lot about Mad-Eye Moody," said Miss.
Wesley insisted.
“Yeah, well, my dad collects notes, doesn’t he?” Fred said quietly
Mrs. Weasley left the room. “Birds of a feather . . .”
“Moody was a great magician in his day,” Bill says.
“He’s an old friend of Dumbledore’s, isn’t he?” Charlie said.
“Dumbledore isn’t exactly what you’d call nice, though, is it?” said
Fred. “I mean, I know he’s an engineer and all that . . .”
“Who the hell is Mad-Eye?” Harry asked.
"He was retired, he was working for the ministry," Charlie said. “I met
Him once when my dad took me to work with him. He was a
Auror — one of the best . . . A Dark magician leader,” he added, seeing Harry’s blank look. “Half the cells in Azkaban are full because .
Nes. He made himself quite the enemy, though . . . Families
of people he arrested, especially . . . And I hear it getting really big
paranoid in his old age. He doesn’t trust anyone. He sees darkness.
Important in every place.”
Bill and Charlie decide to come check on everyone at King's
Cross station, but Percy, apologetic profusely, says that he
Surely he had to get to work.
“I just can’t understand that I was spending more time at the time,” he told .
them. " Sir. Crouch really started to trust me.”
“Yes, you’re watching and what, Percy?” George said firmly. “I thought
He’ll know your name soon.”
Mrs. Weasley borrowed a telephone at the village post office.
She would order three ordinary Muggle trains to take them to London.
“Arthur tried to lend us ministry cars,” Ms. Weasley said .
He said with Harry’s view when they were standing in the pool that the snowfalls, the car snacks were considered six horizons of Hoogarts on the vehicles in their vehicles .
day. “But there weren’t enough beneficiaries. . . . Dear, they don't look
They’re happy, aren’t they?”
Harry didn't mind telling Mrs. Weasley that Muggle taxi drivers
Rarely are animals carried with so much enthusiasm, and Pigwidgeon was doing
A deafening racket. Nor did it help that many a Filibuster of
Good wet-start, misfire went out unexpectedly
While the Fred potatoes, making the way a way to
Screaming in fear and pain as Crookshanks slashed his way up
The man's foot.
The trip wasn’t a smooth one, as they were
They were parked in the back of the taxis with their bags. Crookshanks took a long time to recover from the fire, and by
When they entered London, Harry, Ron, and Hermione were all
They were seriously beaten. They were so relieved to come out to King
ⵚⵚⴰⵍⵉⴱ, ⵖⴰⵙ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷⴼⴻⵍ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⴰⵣ ⵓⴳⴰⵔ ⵏ ⵣⵉⴽ,
and they ran and carried their baskets through the crowded street and
In the illegal.
Harry had been known to enter the Nineteenth and Thirteenth Quarter Stage.
so far. It’s a simple matter of walking straight through the seemingly huge danger that separates the Nineteenth Circles. legend
Tricky part was doing this inconspicuously, so as not to attract Muggle attention. They did it in groups today; Hari, Run,
and Hermione (the most distinguished, for Pigwidgeon and Crookshanks had accompanied them) was first; They leaned calmly against the railing, spoke without hesitation, and slid sideways
By him . . . And as they did so, the Ninth Circle Three Quarter
They were made in front of them.
The Hogwarts Express, a shiny blue steam ship , was already there, billowing clouds of steam, through which the
Several Hogwarts students and parents in the audience left
Like a green jungle. Pigwidgeon became more obnoxious than ever in response
to the taste of many animals with a stick. Harry, Ron, and
Hermione was off to find seats, and it wasn't long before they were putting their luggage
In a house halfway down the freeway. Then we jumped back.
He arrived at the table to say goodbye to Mrs. Weasley, Bill, and
Charlie.
“I guess I see you all sooner than you think,” said Charlie, .
Sighing, as he hugged Ginny comfortably.
"why?" Fred said calmly.
"You'll see," Charlie said. “Just don’t tell Percy I mentioned .
it . . . It's 'private information, until further notice
He saw fit to release him,' by force.”
“Yeah, I wish I could go back to Hogwarts this year,” Bill said,
His hands in his pockets, he moved almost leisurely around the train.
"why?" George said solemnly.
“Have a wonderful year,” Bill said, his eyes .
He preaches. “I might even take time off to come and visit a little
it. . . .”
“A little of what?” Run said.
But at that moment, the bell went off, and Mrs. Weasley .
chivvied them towards the train doors.
“Thank you for having us stay, Mrs. Weasley,” Hermione said am .
They climbed aboard, closed the door, and climbed out of the deck to speak to him.
“Yes, thanks for everything, Mrs. Weasley,” Harry said.
“Oh my pleasure, dear,” Mrs. Weasley said. “I’ll try
You for Christmas, but . . . So, I expect you all would like
Stay at Hogwarts, what with . . . One thing is another.”
"mom!" Ron said calmly. “Do you three know that we .
don't?"
"You'll find out this evening, I expect," said Mrs. Wesley, smiling. “It’s going to be very interesting — mind you, I’m very excited .
They changed the rules —”
“What’s the rule?” Harry said, Run, Fred and George together.
“I am sure Professor Dumbledore will tell you. . . . Now, correct,
Didn't you? Didn't you, Fred? And you, George?”
The pistons sighed loudly and the train began to move.
“Tell me what’s going on at Hogwarts!” Fred graduated from
The sequence as Mrs. Weasley, Bill, and Charlie speed away from the
them. “What rules are they changing?”
But Mrs. Weasley just smiled and nodded. Before the machine has
tucked in the corner, she, Bill, and Charlie disappeared.
Harry, Ron, and Hermione returned to their dorm.
The heavy snow blurring the windows made it very difficult
See from them. Run unzipped his wallet and stuck his head out
clothes, and placed them on Pigwidgeon's cage to suppress his own .
With shame.
"Bagman wants to tell us what's going on at Hogwarts," he said .
he growled, sitting down next to Harry. “At the World Cup,
remember? But my own mother didn’t tell. The question is —”
“Chh!” Hermione said suddenly, pressing her finger against him.
his clothes and moves towards the hallway in front of theirs. Harry
And Ron listened, and he heard a familiar shrill voice drifting into the
with the door open.
“. . . My father thought of sending me to Durmstrang
It’s not Hogwarts, you know. He knows the principal, you
see. Well, you know his opinion of Dumbledore — such a guy .
Mudblood enthusiast — and Durmstrang would never tolerate that kind of
Riffraff. But my mom doesn’t like the idea of ​​me going to school yet.
away. My father says Durmstrang takes a much more serious attitude than
Hogwarts on the Dark Arts. The students of Durmstrang actually learned
There are, it’s not just the criminal offenses we commit. . . .”
Hermione stood up, tiptoed to the closet door and pushed it
you snapped, stopping Malfoy's voice.
“So he thinks Durmstrang will like it, does he?” she
he said angrily. “He will probably go, so we don’t have to put
with him.”
“Is Durmstrang another school of magic?” Harry said.
'Yes,' Hermione shrugged, 'and she has a nasty reputation.
According to a review of magical education in Europe, he placed a
A lot of focus on the dark arts.”
"I think I heard it," Ron said quietly. “Where is he? what
country?"
“Well, no one knows, do they?” Hermione said, introducing her
Eyes.
“Er — why not?” Harry said.
“There has traditionally been a lot of confusion between all magic .
schools. Durmstrang and the Beauxbatons like to hide where they are so no one can steal their secrets,” Hermione said quietly.
“And from him,” Ron said, starting to laugh. “I must
It would be almost like Hogwarts — how do you hide a
Great big castle?”
"But Hogwarts is hidden," Hermione said, smirking. “Everybody knows that . . . So, anyone who has studied Hogwarts, History,
anyway."
“Just you, then,” Ron said. “So go on — how do you hide a place .
Like Hogwarts?”
“That’s magic,” Hermione said. “If one Muggle looked at it, all of them
See it’s a decorated old ruin with a sign on the door saying
trouble, not stealing, unsafe.”
“So Durmstrang would just look like a dungeon even to an outsider?”
'Maybe,' said Hermione, frowning, 'or maybe he's got Muggle-repelling marks on him, like World Cup level. And to prevent foreign spies from finding it, make it Unplottable —”
“Come again?”
“Well, you can disable a building so that it cannot spawn on a
Map, can’t you?”
“er . . . If you say so,” Harry said.
“But I think Durmstrang should be somewhere far north,”
» ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ Hermione ⵙ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ. “The other else is a very cold, because .
They have the body’s boats as part of their home.”
“Oh, think of the possibilities,” Ron said dreamily. " to be
It was easy enough to break Malfoy out of ice and make him look like a
accident. . . . ⵙⵙⴻⵃⵃⴰ ⵢⴻⵎⵎⴰⵙ ⵜⵃⴻⵎⵎⴻⵍⵉⵜ. . . .”
The rain became heavier and heavier as the train gained speed.
north. ⵉⴳⴻⵏⵏⵉ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵥⵉⴹⴰⵏ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵜⵉⵡⵡⵓⵔⴰ ⵜⵜⴼⴻⴳⴳⵉⴹⴻⵏⵜ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⴰⵔⵎⵉ ⴷ
ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵙⵙⴻⵔⵖⴻⵏ ⵢⵉⴼⴻⵏⵜⵉⵍⴻⵏ ⴰⵔⵎⵉ ⴷ ⵜⵏⴰⵚⴼⴰ ⵏ ⵡⴰⵙⵙ. The lunch truck came rolling by.
Along the way, and Harry has a huge stack of Cauldron Cookies for
of them to divide.
Several of their friends were checking in on them as the evening progressed, including Seamus Finnigan, Dean Thomas, and Neville .
Longbottom, a round-faced, very forgetful boy, was
The fact that the woman’s wife’s wife. There was Simus.
He was still wearing his Irish wheels. Some of his magic seemed to be
shopping now; He’s still yelling “Troy — Mullet — Moran!”
But in a very confused and tired kind of way. After half an hour or
So, Hermione, tired of the endless Quidditch talk, buried
Himself once again in the Handbook of Spells, Level 4, and
They start trying to learn a Summoning Charm.
Neville listened jealously to the chatter of the others as they recapped the Cup match.
“Gran doesn’t want to go,” he said sadly. “Don’t get ideas. Still, it looked interesting.”
“That’s what it is,” Ron said. “Look at this, Nevil. . . .”
He ran in his backpack upstairs in the accessory closet and pulled
the younger version of Viktor Krum.
“Oh wow,” Neville said jealously as Ron pointed to Krum on his shoulder .
Pudgy hand.
“We’ve seen it up close, too,” Ron said. “We are in
The upper shelf —”
“For the first and last time in your life, Weasley.”
Draco Malfoy had appeared in the doorway. Behind him stood
Crabbe and Goyle, his elderly, bumbling colleagues, and the two
It appears to have dropped at least a foot over the summer. They had obviously heard the commotion through the kitchen door, which Dean and Seamus had left open.
“I don’t remember asking you to join us, Malfoy,” Harry said .
With the cold.
“Wesley . . . What is that?” Malfoy said, pointing at the Pigwidgeon's body. A thin layer of Ron's clothes was sticking out of it, glowing in the direction of the train, the light blue pattern very obvious.
Ron made to shove the cloth out of sight, but Malfoy neither
quickly about it; He grabbed the blanket and pulled it on.
“Look at this!” Malfoy said excitedly, grabbing Ron's shirt
and pointed to Crabbe and Goyle, “Weasley, you weren’t thinking about .
You’re wearing these, are you? So — they were very fashionable in
About eighteen and ninety. . . .”
“Eat cake, Malfoy!” said Run, in the same color and leather jacket
as he snatched them from Malfoy's grasp. Malfoy shouted with
mocking laughter; Crabbe and Goyle guffaw derisively.
"So . . . will you come in, Weasley? I'll try to get a little
disrespect to the family name? It also involves money, you
know . . . You’ll be able to buy some nice shirts if you win. . . .”
“What are you talking about?” said Run.
“Coming in?” Malfoy repeated. “I think you will,
plate? You won’t miss an opportunity to prove yourself, will you?”
"Either you explain what you're on about or you leave, Malfoy," he said .
Hermione calmly, on top of the spell book, level four.
A smile of pleasure crossed Malfoy's pale face.
“Don’t tell me you didn’t know?” he said proudly. "possess
My father and brother are in ministry and you didn’t even know? my
My God, my dad told me about her long ago . . . Heard from Cornelius Fudge. But then, my dad always interacted with top people in the ministry. . . . Maybe your dad is too young to know.
Therefore, Wesley . . Yes . . . Maybe they don’t talk about important things in front of her. . . .”
Laughing again, Malfoy gestured to Crabbe and Goyle,
And the three of them left.
Rising to his feet, Run knocked on the sliding barn door.
so hard after them that the glass snapped.
“Run!” Hermione said defiantly, and shoved her
potatoes, he murmured “Reparo!” and shards of glass flew up in a flash and went through the door.
"That . . . made it seem like he knew everything and we
don't. . . .” Run shouted. “ 'My father is always in contact with senior people in the ministry.'. . . Dad can get a promotion any time. . .
He just loved it where he was. . . .”
“Of course he has,” Hermione said flatly. “Don’t leave Malfoy .
Got to you, Ron —”
"He! Bring it to me!? Like!” Ron said, picking up one of the remaining Cauldrons, cracking it into an embrace.
Ron's bad mood continued for the rest of the trip. It didn’t work.
They talked a lot as they changed into their school uniforms, and still
They beamed as the Hogwarts Express finally slowed and finally stopped in the shadows around Hogsmeade station.
As the train doors opened, there was a gentle thud over his head. Hermione stuck Crookshanks in her skirt and Run
Leaving his dressing gown on Pigwidgeon as they left the train, the heads
Bent and eyes squeezing against the wind. The snow is now
They shook down so fast and so fast that it was as if buckets of ice cold water were splashed repeatedly over their heads.
“Hello, Hagrid!” Harry yelled, seeing a large silhouette in the distance
The end of the party.
“So, Harry?” Hagrid exclaimed, smirking. “See yeh in
A party if we don't get lost!”
The first years arrived mathematically at Hogwarts castle through the tour.
By the sea with Hagrid.
“Oooh, I don’t feel like crossing the ocean in this weather,” he said
Hermione cheered, giggling as they hurried on into the darkness
platform with the rest of the crowd. One hundred carriages without horses
He stood waiting for them outside the station. Harry, Run, Hermione,
And Neville freaks out in one of them, door closed
with a sneeze, and a few moments later, with a large, long
Bus traffic was dipping and pouring its way up
leading up to Hogwarts Castle.

CHAPTER TWELVE
THE TRIWIZARD COMPETITION

from the gates, flanked by statues of winged elephants, and
Up the parking lot tires clattered, crunching dangerously in what was quickly becoming a ditch. Leaning against the window, Harry could see Hogwarts approaching, much of it illuminated
The windows flickered and glittered behind a curtain of snow.
Lightning crackled in the sky as their car stopped
in front of the main front doors of the fortress, which stands at the top of a flight
of stone summits. People holding cars in front were
Already they were hurrying up the stone steps in the castle. Harry, Run,
Hermione, and Neville jumped out of their car and
He even arrived quickly, only smiling when they were safe.
Inside the cave’s entrance hall, with its beautiful, massive
A marble staircase.
“Belmey,” Ron, reserves a rhythm of water in each place, “If that’s going to continue, the average of the sea. I smiled —
ARGH!”
A great ship, the refugee, which was flying and water, fell from the outside
The roof fell on Ron's head and it exploded. Estate and failing,
Ron turned sideways to Harry, as if a second water cannon
It landed—quickly missing Hermione, flying to Harry’s feet,
A sandwiches of cold water is used on the basketball cars in the summit. People who were invited by and began to stop one another in
their efforts to get out of the line of fire. Harry was Elephan,
Floating twenty feet above them, the Peeves Poltergeist, a little man
In the garden of the knife and Kravat of the watch, great left.ys
contorted in turn as he took aim again.
“WARNING!” He told a flavor of the vegetation. “Peeves, keep up on 10.00.
one!"
Professor McGonagall, the headmistress and head of Gryffindor House, stormed out of the Great Hall; ⵜⴻⵣⴳⴻⵔ
on the wet floor and grabbed Hermione by the collar to stop
Himself from falling.
“Ah — Survey, Massa Graanger —”
“That’s fine, Professor!” Hermione sighed, nuzzling her
throat.
“Peeves, get down here NOW!” Professor McGonagall said,
I missed the pursuit and vary is divided into it.
balance with a square peg.
“He didn’t do anything!” Peeves exclaimed, firing the water bottle into the
Several fifth-year girls, who screamed and fell into the Great
hall. "Already wet, aren't they?" Little girls! Well!” and
He dropped another bomb on a bunch of sophomores who just got
arrived.
“I’ll call the principal!” Professor McGonagall exclaimed.
“I’m warning you, Peeves —”
Peeves stuck out his tongue and shot the last of his water bombs
in the air, and extended up the marble pavement, snapping
With insult.
“Here, it’s still, yes!” Professor McGonagall said firmly to
The imprisoned masses. “To the main hall, come!”
Harry, Run, and Hermione visited and open on the door
ⵜⴰⵣⴻⵇⵇⴰ ⵓ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵜⴻⵡⵡⵓⵔⴰ ⵜⵉⵙ ⵙⵏⴰⵜ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵢⵉⴷⵉⵙ ⴰⵢⴻⴼⴼⵓⵙ, Ron ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ
growled under his breath as he pushed his disheveled hair out of his head
face.
The main hall looks as beautiful as ever, decorated for
The ceremony of the beginning of the season. The golden peppers are filled with light
Men and hundreds of slave, were overlooked on the beds in
In the sky. The four long House tables were filled with conversation.
Students; At the top of the hall, workers sit on one side of five
The table, their students are diagnosed. It was so hot in here. ⵀⴰⵔⵉ, Run,
O'Rmione went in front of Slitherin, Ravenclaws, and
Hufflepuffs, and stayed with the rest of the Gryffindors in the basement .
Aside, in front of the Nickk, Griffindor
ghost. Coral-white and semi-transparent, Nick was wearing tonight
in its usual doublet, but with a particularly large ruff, which boasted
The second purpose of a highly competitive approach is to ensure that his
The head doesn’t care much about his otherwise bent head.
“Good evening,” he says, smiling at them.
“He said who?” Harry said, taking off his sneakers and pulling
Degen of water. “Hopefully they’ll get better with Sorting. am
hungry."
The election of new students into the Houses takes place in
The beginning of every school year, but through a combination of unfortunate circumstances, Harry hadn't been to one since. he
He had been waiting for her for a long time. Just then, a very excited, breathless voice called across the table.
“Hi, Harry!”
It was Colin Creevey, the third year for whom Harry was something of a child.
“Hi, Colin,” Harry said cautiously.
“Harry, guess what? Guess what, Harry? My brother started!
Brother Dennis!”
“Er — okay,” said Harry.
“It’s really exciting!” Colin said, slowly getting better and
down instead. “I just wish he was in Gryffindor! Keep your fingers crossed
Runs, yes, Harry?”
“Er — yeah, okay,” Harry said. He looked back at Hermione, Ron, and the nearly headless Nick. “Brothers and sisters in general .
They go in the same Houses, don’t they?” he said. He was judging by
Weasley, all seven had been placed in Gryffindor.
“Oh no, not necessarily,” Hermione said. “Parvati Patil’s twin .
in Ravenclaw, and they are different. You’d think they’d be the same,
Didn’t you?”
Harry looked at the staff table. Turns out there was
More car seats there than ever before. Hagrid, of course, was still fighting his way across the beach through the first years; Professor McGunagall
He was guarding the floor question of the entrance hall.
But there was also another empty chair, and Harry couldn't think
Who else is missing.
“Where’s the new dark arts defense master?” said
Hermione, too, looked at the teachers.
They have no Defense Against the Dark Arts teacher .
which had lasted for more than three rounds. The one Harry loves the most has
He was Professor Lupine, who resigned last year. He looked up.
and under the employees’ roofs. There wasn’t really a new face there.
“I wish they couldn’t get none!” Hermione said, looking
anxious.
Harry scanned the board more carefully. Little Little Teacher
Flitwick, the Charms teacher, was sitting on a large stack of desks
Next to Professor Sprout, professor of Herbology, with his pants
Askew about his flowing gray hair. She was talking to Professor Sinistra from the Sociology department. On another of Professor Sinistra
Tama was the pale-faced, blue-haired Potions teacher, Snape — the person Harry disliked at Hogwarts. Harry’s
Snape's hatred was matched only by Snape's hatred for him, a hatred that had possibly grown stronger last year, when Harry had
He helped Sirius escape under Snape’s much larger nose — Snape
And Sirius had been rivals since their school days.
Across from Snape was an empty seat, Harry pointed
He was Professor McGonagall. beside it, and in the middle of the
At the table, sat Professor Dumbledore, the headmaster, with his
The silver hair and beard gleamed in the candlelight, her majesty
deep green dress embroidered with many stars and moons. the
The tips of Dumbledore’s long, thin fingers were all together and he was
He rested his chin on them, staring at the ceiling
the half-moon sightings seem lost in thought. Harry looked up.
Even on the ceiling. It was sharpened to look like the sky on the outside, and
He had never seen it look like this bowl. There are black and white clouds
She looked at him, and as another scream sounded outside, a
a fork of lightning tore at him.
“Oh come on,” Ron said, next to Harry, “I can eat a
A wild animal.”
The words never left his mouth through the gates of .
The Great Hall opened and silence fell. Professor McGonagall was
taking a long line of first years up to the top of the House. If Harry,
Ron, and Hermione were wet, it was nothing to how these first
The years rolled by. It looked like they swam across the lake.
above the road. All were trembling with equal coldness.
and roots as they filed past the staff table and stopped at a
fence overlooking the other school — all of them except the smallest
of dirt, the boy with the mouse hair, who got stuck in what Harry thought
It’s identified as Hagrid’s wand of magic. The dress was too big for
It seemed to him as if he had been stumbled into a furry black circus.
tent. His little face popped out of his head, looking almost
With a searing pain. When he was in line with his fearful
His colleagues, catching the eye of Colin Creevey, gave a double thumbs up,
And with the mouth, I fell into the ocean! He looked damn pleased.
therefore.
Headmaster McGonagall now placed a three-legged stool on
floor before the early years and, above it, a much older one,
The filthy, spilled Wizard's Cup. The first years looked at her. So did everyone else. For a while, there was silence. Furthermore, a long tear near the
The brim is wide open like a mouth, and the hat splits with song.
For a thousand years or more,
When I was newly baptized,
There lived four famous magicians,
Their names are still quite familiar:
Old Gryffindor, from the Forest Warehouse,
Ravenclaw, from The Glen,
Sweet Hufflepuff, from the great valley,
The Wise Slytherin, from Fen.
They shared desires, hopes, dreams,
They developed a solid plan.
To train young magicians
Thus began the school of Hogwarts.
Now each of these four founders
They set up their home, for each
He values ​​different virtues
Of those who must teach.
By Gryffindor, the bravest were
Prized high above the rest;
For a Ravenclaw, the smartest
It will always be right;
For Hufflepuff, the dwarfs were
as it deserves to be appreciated;
And a power-hungry Slytherin
He loves those who have great desires.
When they were still alive they split
Their admirers from the crowd,
But how do we select the deserving
When they were dead and gone?
'It was Gryffindor who found the way,
He hit me off his head.
The founders put some brains in me.
So I can choose instead!
Now lead me upon your ears,
I was never wrong,
I’d like to see inside your mind.
And tell me where you are!
The main hall roared with excitement as the sorting stage was completed.
"That's not the song she sang when he broke us up," Harry said, chuckling along with the others.
"He sings a different one every year," Ron said. “It should be a
Life is pretty funny, isn’t it, being a dwarf? I think he will enjoy the whole year.
They’re doing the next one.”
Professor McGonagall was currently unfolding a large volume of .
paper.
“When I call your name, you put on your mask and sit down .
the opposite,” she told the first years. “When your hat recalls .
home, you go and sit at the proper table.
“Cherry, Stewart!”
A boy walks forward and appears to tremble from head to foot,
He picked up the Hiding Bag, put it on, and sat down on the couch.
“STORM!” cried the hawk.
Stewart Akerli removed the hat and hurried back to a seat in the
The Ravenclaw table, where everyone was buzzing about it. Harry
He assumed the identity of Cho, the Ravenclaw Apprentice, admiring Stewart
Ackerley as he sat. For a moment, Harry had a thrill
Desire to join the Ravenclaw table too.
“Come along, Malcolm!”
"SlyTHERIN!"
The table across the hall was brightly lit;
Harry could see Malfoy cringing as Baddock entered Slytherin.
Harry wondered if Baddock knew that Slytherin House had
She looked more feminine and Dark than the others. Fred
And George kissed Malcolm Badduk as he sat down.
“Branston, Elinor!”
“FUCK!”
“Coldwell, Owen!”
“FUCK!”
“Criffy, Dennis!”
Little Dennis Creevey lurched forward and bumped into Hagrid’s
moleskin, just as Hagrid himself stepped into the hall with a
door behind the teachers table. About twice as long as the original.
Manly, and at least three times as tall, Hagrid, with his tall, brutal,
With a dirty black glove and hat, they looked a little creepy — strange, since Harry, Ron and Hermione knew Hagrid .
He will have a very good nature. He winked at them as he sat on
end of the staff table and I saw Dennis Creevey smoking
Distribution box. The lid is wide open —
“GRIFFINDUR!” the cap screamed.
Hagrid held hands together with Gryffindor as Dennis Kreevy,
Glowing brightly, he took off the hat, placed it on a chair, and
He hurried to join his brother.
“Colin, I fell in!” he said sternly, throwing himself into a maze
seat. “It was wonderful! And something in the water grabbed me and
It pushed me back into the boat!”
"cool!" Colin said, equally excited. “Maybe a king .
Squid, Dennis!”
"nice!" Dennis said, as if no one was in their wildest dreams
He could hope for more than being thrown into a hurricane-swept pond, at arm’s length, and having a giant sea monster suck him out of it again.
“His religion! His religion! See that boy down there? who has
Black hair and balance? Do you see it? Do you know who he is, Dennis?”
Harry looked away, staring very hard at the Sorting Hat, now
Portfolio of Emma Dubbs.
The Fragment continues; Boys and girls with different amounts of
Terror on their faces they moved one by one towards the three-wheeled car,
The line quickly thickened as Professor McGonagall passed L's.
“Oh come on,” Ron said, massaging his stomach.
"Now, Ron, that Sorting is worth a lot more than food," he said .
Almost as brainless as “Madley, Laura!” He became a Hufflepuff.
“ 'Of course, if you’re dead,’ said Ron quietly.
“I’m hoping this year’s Gryffindor ball will be up to scratch,”
Nick said Nearly headless, waving his hand like “McDonald, Natalie!”
He walked into the Gryffindor table. “We don’t want to break our success .
Streak, are we?”
Gryffindor wins inter-house championship for the last time
Three years in a row.
“Britcard, Graham!”
"SlyTHERIN!"
“Quirk, Urla!”
“STORM!”
And finally, with “Whitby, Kevin!” (“THE FOOL!”), a
The cluster is over. Headmaster McGonagall picked up the trophy and
stool and brought them back.
“About time,” Ron said, grabbing his knife and fork and smiling .
waiting in his golden box.
Professor Dumbledore had landed on his feet. He was smiling.
in front of the students, his arms open wide in welcome.
“I have only two words to say to you,” he said to them, with his bottom .
voice echoes around the House. “Tuck in.”
“Hear, hear!” Harry and Run said as loud as empty dishes
filled with magic before their eyes.
A nearly headless Nick watched in pain as Harry, Ron and
Hermione loaded their plates.
“Aaah, 'at' be'er,” said Ron, his mouth full of cum .
potato.
“You’re lucky there’s a party at all tonight, you know,” said Nearly .
Headless nick. “There was trouble in kitchens in the past.”
"For what? What happened?” Harry said, with a big chunk of
steak.
“Peeves, of course,” said an almost headless Nick, scratching his head, .
which changes for the better. He pulled his skirt up a little on the
his head. “The usual argument, you know. He wants to attend the
The wedding — well, that’s out of the question, you know what it is
Like, he has no manners, he can’t look at a plate of food without putting
it. We held a Council of Ghosts — the Long Afriar was all for his giving .
right — but most cleverly, in my opinion, a Bloody Baron .
Put his foot down.”
The blood baron was a hell of a Slytherin, shy and quiet
specter covered in silver blood. He was the only person in
A Hogwarts that could actually handle Peeves.
“Yeah, we thought Peeves seemed upset about something,”
Ron said with a grin. “So what did he do in the kitchen?”
“Oh tradition,” the Nearly Headless Nick said, smirking. “Lost
injustice and injustice. Dishes and rubbish everywhere. Swimming pool in
soup. They scared the house fools out of their wits—”
Clang.
Hermione fell on her golden heel. Pumpkin seed
It spread thickly across the table table, disturbing several white man's knees.
brass orange, but Hermione didn't care.
“Are there house elves here?” she said, staring, terrified, at the
Nearly headless Nick. “Here at Hogwarts?”
“Sure,” said the nearly headless Nick, smiling proudly .
reaction. “The highest number in any dwelling in Britain, I think.
Over ten.”
“I’ve never seen one!” Hermione said.
“Well, they hardly leave food out during the day, do they?” said
Nearly headless Nick. “They come out at night to do a little bit of .
Cleaning . . Look to the fire and so on. . . . Well, you don’t have to see them, do you? That is the mark of a good domestic elephant.
Isn’t that, that you didn’t know he was there?”
Hermione glared at him.
“But are they paid?” She said. “They get holidays, don’t they?
And — is it sick leave, pensions, everything?”
Almost headless Nick moaned so hard that his leg gave out and
His head sticks out, trailing over an inch or so of deer skin and
The muscle that was still attached to his head.
“Sick leave and pensions?” he said, turning his head towards hers
his clothes and covering it again with his ruff. “Home Responsibilities
You don’t want sick leave and a pension!”
Hermione looked down at her less affected dining table.
Then she threw her knife and fork at her and dragged her out of
her.
“Oh c'mon, 'Ermicknee,” Ron groaned, accidentally puffing away .
Harry with pieces of Yorkshire spice. “Oh — I’m sorry, 'Arry —”
ate. “You’re not going to give them a sick leave by starving yourself!”
“Slave work,” Hermione said, breathing hard through her nose.
“That’s what this dinner is about. Slave labor.”
And she refused to take another bite.
The snow still pattered heavily on the tall, gray glass.
Another roar of thunder rattled the windows, and bubbles
The ceiling sparkles, illuminating the gold tiles as the rest of the
the first course was gone and was replaced, instantly, with puddings.
“Delicious tart, Hermione!” Run said, looking determined
smell next to him. “A distended belly, look! Chocolate cake!”
But Hermione gave him a look that was very reminiscent of the Headmaster
McGonagall that he frowned.
When the guns were even thrown, it was the last
wiped the napkins off the dishes, leaving them clean and shiny,
Albus Dumbledore was back on his feet. Sound buzz is full
the hall stops almost at once, so that only the howling wind and
The thundering rain can be heard.
"so!" Dumbledore said, looking at them all. “Now that
We’re all fed and watered,” (“Hmph!” Hermione said) “We must .
Once again I ask for your attention, while I offer some details.
" Sir. Filch, the Superintendent, has asked me to inform you that the list of
Prohibited items inside the castle has been extended this year to
They include bouncing Yoyos, Frisbees with strings, and Everbashing
Boomerang. The whole list contains about forty-seven items, I believe, and may be seen in Mr. Filch's office, if
Everyone wants to challenge him.”
The corners of Dumbledore's mouth twitched. continued,
“As always, I want to remind you all that the forest on
grounds was off limits to students, as was Hogsmeade village to all under third year.
“It is also my sad duty to inform you that InterHouse
The Quidditch Cup isn’t going to happen this year.”
"what?" Harry sighed. He looked at Fred and George,
His Quidditch teammates. They were talking
shouted to Dumbledore, who seemed too shocked to speak.
Dumbledore continued, "This is because of an event that is about to begin ."
in October, and continuing throughout the school year, taking
A lot of teachers’ time and energy — but I’m sure you’ll make it all
Love her very much. It is with great pleasure that I announce that this
A year at Hogwarts—”
But at that moment, there was a deafening roar of thunder
And the doors to the Great Hall opened with a bang.
A man stood in front of the door, leaning on a long cane.
wrapped in a black travel suit. Each boss in the main hall
Looking at the stranger, she was suddenly sprayed with a smile by a
a lightning fork that snapped at the top. He lowered his
hood, pulled out a long braid of dark, gray hair, then started walking up to the teachers' table.
A faint noise echoed through the House at every other step of his. he
He reached the end of the upper table, turned right, and landed heavily.
Next to Dumbledore. Another bolt of lightning struck the ceiling.
Hermione sighed.
Lightning sliced ​​the man’s face into sharp relief, and
It was a face unlike any Harry had ever seen. It looks like a
was taken from the previous tree by someone who only had
A completely vague idea of ​​what human faces should look like, and
Nobody cares too much about snoring. Every inch of skin seemed to
He hit. The mouth looks like a medium length, one big chunk
of the nose was missing. But it was the man’s eyes that made it
frightening.
One of them is small, thin, and round. The other was great.
wave-like thickness, and a sudden, electric current. The blue eye was smiling.
ing relentlessly, without moving, and was looking up, down, and
Side by side, roughly parallel to the ground — and
Then she straightened and stared at the back of the man's head,
So that all they can see is white.
The stranger reached for Dumbledore. He put out his hand
He was as badly tanned as his face, and Dumbledore leaned down, mumbling words Harry couldn't hear. He seemed to be putting some question to the stranger, who silently raised his head and replied .
in a low voice. Dumbledore frowned and pointed the man to
the empty neck on his right side.
The stranger sat down and shook his ring of dark gray hair from
His face, he pulled a bag of cookies to his side and raised it to what was
left of his nose, and blew it. He then took out a small knife from her.
pocket, he pushed a cup on his end and began to eat. his
The normal eye was looking at the keys, but the green eye was still
He looks longingly around his suitcase, touching the cell and
Students.
“I can introduce our new defense against the dark arts .
Master?" Dumbledore said whispering into the silence. "Master
moody."
It is customary for new members of staff to be greeted with a warm welcome.
But none of the staff or students clapped except for Dumbledore and
Hagrid, who threw up both of their hands, flinched, but
The sound pierced the silence, and they stopped exactly
quickly. Everyone else seemed very turned on by Moody’s
It seems he will do more than his fair share.
"moody?" Harry said frowning at Ron. “Madey Moody? one
Did your dad go help this morning?”
“It has to be,” Ron said in a low, panicked voice.
“What happened to him?” Hermione whispered. “What happened to his face?”
“Dunno,” Ron replied with a shrug, looking at Moody curiously.
Moody seems completely unfazed by his not-so-warm performance. Ignoring the bowl of pumpkin seeds in front of him, he
another reached to the sculpture technology, a terrorist coffee coffee, and
It received a long book. As he raised his hand to drink, his head
He was dragged a few inches off the ground, and Harry saw, under the
The carpet, several inches of carved wood foot, ends with a round foot.
Dumbledore cleared his throat.
"Like I was saying," he said, looking around at the sea of ​​pre-1990 students.
Needless to say, they were all still staring blankly at Mad-Eye Moody,
“We will be honored to host a very exciting event around the end of 2019.
For the next 12 months, it was an event that hadn’t happened in more than a century.
It is with great pleasure that I inform you that the Triwizard Tournament will be held at Hogwarts this year.”
“You’re talking!” Fred Weasley said aloud.
The tension that has filled the room since Moody’s arrival
Suddenly he broke off. Almost everyone laughed, and Dumbledore chuckled in amusement.
"I'm not joking, Mr. Weasley," he said, "though now that you . . ."
I mentioned it, I heard an interesting one over the summer about a
a troll, a hag, and a monster who all move into a bar . . .”
Headmaster McGonagall cleared her throat loudly.
“Er — but maybe this isn’t the time . . . No . . .” Dumbledore said, “where am I? Oh yeah, the Triwizard Cup . . . Well,
Some of you may not know what this tournament is, so I
I hope those who know will forgive me for giving a detailed explanation, and let their minds wander freely.
“The Triwizard Tournament was first established around seven years .
One hundred years ago as a friendly competition between three
Top schools for wizardry in Europe: Hogwarts, Bouxbatons, and
Durmstrang. A president was elected to represent each school,
And the three teens competed in three magic tasks. the
The schools take it in turns to host a tournament once every five
years old, and it’s generally agreed that it’s the best way to address gay and lesbian relationships — so much so, that is, that the death toll has risen to such an extent that dead .
The race is suspended.”
“The number of deaths?” Hermione gasped, looking confused. But she
It doesn’t seem like most students are involved
hall; Many of them joke with each other, and
Harry himself was far more interested in talking about the tournament than dealing with the hundreds of deaths that had occurred .
It’s been 20 years.
“There have been many attempts over the centuries to restore
that circle," Dumbledore continued, "none of them have
It was a huge success. However, our own Ministries of International Magical Cooperation and Magical Games and Sports have
He decided the time was ripe for another attempt. We worked hard.
during the summer to ensure that this time, no manager would find
himself or herself in mortal danger.
“The heads of Beauxbaton and Durmstrang will arrive .
with their contestants selected in October, and the selection of
All three quarterbacks will take place on Halloween. No one dares
Judges will decide which students are most deserving to compete
The Triwizard Cup, their school’s mascot, is a thousand
Galleons in personal prize money.”
“I’m going for it!” Fred Weasley leaned against the table, his face
Lit was delighted with such a beautiful and rich sight. was
It’s not just a person who seems to identify with
Hugworts. At every table in the House, Harry could see people
Either looking amused at Dumbledore, or whispering solemnly to
their neighbors. But then, Dumbledore spoke again, and the Hall .
He was silent again.
“I like though knowing you all will bring the Triwizard .
ⵜⴰⵇⴱⵓⵛⵜ ⵉ Hogwarts », ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ, « ⵉⵇⴻⴷⴷⴰⵛⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵖⴻⵔⴱⴰⵣⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴻⴽⴽⴰⵏ, .
As a part of the Department of Care, they agreed to have a chance
She was aware of the races this year. Even age students —
That is, seven years or older — would be allowed to put their names down for admission. That’s” — Dumbldur broke .
Confusion a little bit, since a lot of people have raised a tone of discontent about this
words, and the Weasley twins were suddenly looking excited — “and .
a criterion that we feel is appropriate, as tournament business will
ⵎⴰⵣⴰⵍⵉⵜ ⴷ ⴰⵡⴻⵣⵖⵉ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵎⵉⵀⵉ, ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⴱⵖⵓ ⵢⵉⵍⵉ ⵍⵃⴻⵇⵇ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵏⴻⵟⵟⴻⴼ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ
ⴷ ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵙⵄⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⵏ ⵜⴻⵡⵏⵉⵜ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⵉⵏⴻⵍⵎⴰⴷⴻⵏ ⵏ ⴷⴷⴰⵡ ⵏ ⵓⵙⴻⴳⴳⴰⵙ ⵡⵉⵙ ⵙⴻⵜⵜⴰ ⴷ ⵡⵉⵙ ⵙⴻⴱⵄⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵍⵉⵏ
ⵢⴻⵣⵎⴻⵔ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵇⴰⴱⴻⵍ ⵢⵉⴷⵙⴻⵏ. ⵏⴻⴽⴽ ⵙ ⵜⵉⵎⵎⴰⴷⵉⵡ ⴰⴷ ⴹⴻⵎⵏⴻⵖ ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵏⴻⵍⵎⴰⴷ ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵙⵄⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵍⴻⵄⵎⴻⵔ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⴻⵜⵜⵉⵎ ⵍⵇⴰⴹⵉⵏⵏⴻⵖ ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵙⵄⵉ ⵍⵃⴻⵇⵇ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵏⵢⴻⵔⵔ ⴷ ⴰⵙⴻⵍⵡⴰⵢ ⵏ Hogwarts.” ⵜⵉⵟⵟⴰⵡⵉⵏⵉⵙ ⵜⵉⵣⴻⴳⵣⴰⵡⵉⵏ ⵜⵜⵛⴻⵔⵛⵓⵔⴻⵏⵜ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵜⵜⵛⴻⵔⵛⵓⵔⴻⵏⵜ
ⵓⴷⵎⴰⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ Fred ⴷ George ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⵏⵓⵍⴼⴰⵏ ⵛⵛⵡⴰⵍ. “ⵉⵀⵉ ⵜⵜⵃⴻⵍⵍⵉⵍⴻⵖⵡⴻⵏ ⵓⵔ ⵜⴹⴻⴳⴳⵉⵔⴻⵎ ⴰⵔⴰ .
ⵍⴰⵡⴰⵏⵉⴽ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵙⵙⴻⴽⵏⴻⴹ ⵉⵎⴰⵏⵉⴽ ⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷⴷⴰⵡ ⵏ ⵎⵔⴰⵡ ⴷ ⵙⴻⴱⵄⴰ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵙⴻⴳⴳⴰⵙⴻⵏ.
“The Beauxbatons and Durmstrang delegations will be arriving in October and will be staying with us for most of this .
year. ⵏⴻⴽⴽ ⵙⵙⴻⵏⵖ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴽⵓⵏⵡⵉ ⴰⴽⴽ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵙⵙⴻⴽⵏⴻⵎ ⵢⴰⵍ ⵜⴰⵃⴻⵎⵍⴰ ⵉ ⵢⵉⴱⴻⵔⵔⴰⵏⵉⵢⴻⵏⵏⵏⴻⵖ.
ⵉⵏⴻⴱⴳⴰⵡⴻⵏ ⵎⴰ ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵢⵉⴷⵏⴻⵖ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⴰⴷ ⴷⴼⴽⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵡⵓⵍⵉⴽ ⵎⴻⵕⵕⴰ
port to the witch of Hogwarts once selected. and
ⵜⵓⵔⴰ, ⵢⴻⵡⵡⴻⴹⴷ ⵍⴰⵡⴰⵏ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵥⵔⵉⵖ ⴰⵛⵃⴰⵍ ⴷ ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⴰⵏ ⴰⵣⴰⵍ ⵉ ⴽⵓⵏⵡⵉ ⴰⴽⴽ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵉⵍⵉⴹ ⵜⵃⴰⴷⵔⴻⵎ
ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵜⴻⵙⴳⵓⵏⴼⵓⴹ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵜⴽⴻⵛⵎⴻⴹ ⵜⵉⵎⵙⵉⵔⵉⵏⵉⴽ ⴰⵣⴻⴽⴽⴰ ⵙⴱⴻⵃ. ⵍⴰⵡⴰⵏ ⵏ ⵢⵉⴹⴻⵙ!
ⴳⵣⴻⵎ ⴳⵣⴻⵎ!”
Dumbledore sat down again and turned to speak to the eye of the woman.
moody. ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰⴷ ⵓⵙⵇⴻⵔⴷⴻⵛ ⴷ ⵓⵙⵇⴻⵔⴷⴻⵛ ⴰⵎⴻⵇⵇⵔⴰⵏ ⴰⵎ ⵡⴰⴽⴽ ⵉⵏⴻⵍⵎⴰⴷⴻⵏ
ⵢⴻⵡⵡⴻⴹⴷ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵢⵉⴹⴰⵔⵔⴻⵏⵏⵙⴻⵏ, ⵙⵙⴰⵡⴹⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⴻⵡⵡⵓⵔⴰ ⵜⵉⵙ ⵙⵏⴰⵜ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⵣⴻⵇⵇⴰ ⵏ ⵓⴽⵛⴻⵎ.
“ⵓⵔ ⵣⵎⵉⵔⴻⵏ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵅⴻⴷⵎⴻⵏ ⴰⴽⴽⴰ!” said George Wesley, who did not join
The crowd moved towards the door, but they were standing staring at Dumbledore. “We have seventeen in April, why can't we have
shot?"
“ⵓⵔ ⵉⵢⵉⵃⴻⴱⵙⴻⵏ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⴽⴻⵛⵎⴻⵖ,” ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Fred ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ, ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ .
ⵙ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⴱⴻⵔⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵍⴻⵎⵎⴰⵙⵜ. « ⵉⵍⴻⵎⵥⵉⵢⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⴰⵡⴹⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵅⴻⴷⵎⴻⵏ ⴰⴽⴽ ⵚⵚⴻⵏⴼ ⵏ
ⵜⵉⵖⴰⵡⵙⵉⵡⵉⵏ ⵓⵔ ⴽⵢⴻⵜⵜⵓⵏⴻⴼⴽ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵏⵜⵜⵅⴻⴷⵎⴻⴹ ⵙ ⵍⵇⴰⵏⵓⵏ. ⵓ ⴰⵍⴻⴼ
Galeons ⵏ ⵡⴰⵔⵔⴰⵣ ⵏ ⵢⴻⴷⵔⵉⵎⴻⵏ!”
“ⵉⵀ,” ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Ron, ⵙ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ ⵏ ⵍⴱⴻⵄⴷ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵡⵓⴷⴻⵎⵉⵙ. “ⵉⵀ, ⴰⵍⴻⴼ
Greek . . .”
“ⴰⵙⴷ”, ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ Hermione, “ⴰⴷ ⵏⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎ ⴽⴰⵏ ⴷⴰⴳⵉ ⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ .
ⵓⵔ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⴻⴹ ⴰⵔⴰ.”
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ, Ron, Hermione, Fred, ⴷ George ⴱⴷⴰⵏ ⴰⴱⵔⵉⴷ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⵣⴻⵇⵇⴰ ⵏ ⵓⴽⵛⴻⵎ, Fred ⴷ George ⵜⵜⵎⴻⵙⵍⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵡⴰⵎⴻⴽ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵢⴻⵃⴱⴻⵙ Dumbledore ⵡⵉⴷ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⴷⴷⴰⵡ ⵏ ⵙⴻⴱⵄⴰ ⵏ ⵢⵉⵙⴻⴳⴳⴰⵙⴻⵏ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵓⵔ ⴽⴻⵛⵎⴻⵏ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⵖⵉⵡⴰⵏⵜ ⵏ
championship.
« ⴰⵏⵡⴰ ⵉ ⴷ ⵍⵇⴰⴹⵉⴰⴳⵉ ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵙⵄⵉ ⵍⵃⴻⵇⵇ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷⵢⴻⴼⴽⴻⵏ ⵍⵃⴻⵇⵇ ⴰⵏⵡⴰ ⵉ ⴷ
The icons are?” Harry said.
“Dunno,” said Fred, “but they’re the ones we have to blame. ⵃⴻⵙⴱⴻⵖⴷ ⴰ
ⵙⵏⴰⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵇⴻⵊⵊⵉⵔⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵟⵟⵓⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵟⵟⵓⵜ ⵣⴻⵎⵔⴻⵏⵜ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵅⴻⴷⵎⴻⵏⵜ, ⴰ George. . . .”
« Dumbledore ⵢⴻⵥⵔⴰ ⵓⵔ ⵜⴻⵙⵄⵉⴹ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵍⴻⵄⵎⴻⵔ, ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⴽⴰⵏ », ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Ron.
« ⵉⵀ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵎⴰⵞⵞⵉ ⴷ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⴱⴻⴷⴷⴻⵏ ⴰⵏⵡⴰ ⵉ ⴷ ⴰⵙⴻⵍⵡⴰⵢ, ⴷ .
ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ?" ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ Fred ⵙ ⵜⵎⵓⵙⵏⵉ. « ⵉⴱⴰⵏⵉⵢⵉⴷ ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⴻⵍⵜ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵢⵉⵙⵙⵉⵏ ⵍⵇⴰⴹⵉⴰⴳⵉ .
ⵡⵉⵏ ⵢⴻⴱⵖⴰⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⴽⵛⴻⵎ, ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⴼⵔⴻⵏ ⵡⵉⵏ ⵉⴳⴻⵔⵔⵣⴻⵏ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵢⴰⵍ ⴰⵖⴻⵔⴱⴰⵣ ⵓ
ⵓⵔ ⵜⵉⴷⵢⴻⵜⵜⴰⴼ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⵛⵃⴰⵍ ⵏ ⵍⴻⵄⵎⴻⵔ ⵙⵄⴰⵏ. Dumbledore ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵄⴻⵔⵔⵉⴹ ⴰⴷ ⴰⵖⵢⴻⵃⴱⴻⵙ ⴰⴷ ⴷⵏⴻⴼⴽ ⵉⵙⵎⴰⵡⴻⵏⵏⵏⴻⵖ.”
“ⵉⵎⴷⴰⵏⴻⵏ ⵎⵎⵓⵜⴻⵏ, ⵖⴰⵙ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ!” ⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ Hermione ⵙ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵚⵚⵓⵜ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵇⵏⴻⵏ
As they walked through the hidden door behind the screen and
ⵢⴻⴱⴷⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵙⵇⵉⴼ ⵏⵏⵉⴹⴻⵏ, ⴷ ⴰⵥⵉⴹⴰⵏ.
“Yeah,” sighed Fred, “but that was years ago, wasn’t it? After all, where’s the fun without a little danger? Hey, Run, what if we found
out how do you find 'Dumbledore? Care to come in?”
“What do you reckon?” Run Harry asked. “Be cool to move in,
Isn't there? But s'pose maybe they want someone bigger. . . .
Dunno if we learned enough. . . .”
“I really don’t,” Neville’s calm voice said from behind .
Fred and George.
“I expect my grand'd wants me to try, though. She always goes
About how I should be protecting the family honor. I’ll just have
I’ll — uh. . . .”
Neville’s foot slammed right into a ledge halfway up the
hole. There are a lot of these dangerous beds at Hogwarts; compliance
Second nature for most adult students to jump at this particular level, but Neville's memory was notoriously poor. Harry d
Ron grabbed him under his chin and pulled him out, while a piece
of furniture at the top of the stairs clank and clank, laughing
With shame.
“Make it, you,” Ron said, tapping his torch as they passed.
They made their way to the entrance of Gryffindor tower,
He was hiding behind a large picture of a blonde in brown
Silk dress.
"password?" She said when they got closer.
“Balderdash,” George told me, “a prefect downstairs told me.”
The image zooms out to show a corner in the wall with
which they all raised. A roaring fire warmed the dimly lit living room, filled with comfortable chairs and couches. Hermione shot a blue gaze to the dancing fire with excitement, and Harry
She could clearly be heard muttering “Slave work,” before calling out to them .
Good night and he flies out of the lovely girls door.
housing.
Harry, Ron and Neville climbed the final, spiral staircase until they reached their bedroom, located at the top .
of the tower. Five four-poster beds with deep black leather
They stood before the wall, each with his master's badge to the foot.
Dean and Seamus were already getting into bed; Simon has
He puts his Irish rose on his head, and Dean connects
In front of a poster of Viktor Krum on his bedside table. His old text
of the West Ham football team is glued right next to it.
“Mental,” Ron said, shaking his head at the football players who were completely still.
Harry, Ron and Neville got into their robes and crawled into bed.
Someone — a pet, no doubt — put on heating pads .
Between the plates. She was so nice, standing there in the
Bed and listening to the howling thunder outside.
“I wish I could go in for it, you know,” Ron said sleepily .
Darkness, “if Fred and George knew how to . . . Championship . . You don’t know, do you?”
“S'pose not. . . .”
Harry rolled over in bed, a series of bright new images forming in his mind. . . . He defeated the impartial judge.
In view that he is seventeen years old . . . It became Hogwarts.
principal . . . He was standing on the ground, his hands raised in
victory in front of the whole school, who were all cheering
And he screams . . . He had just won the Triwizard Tournament. . . .
Cho’s face stood out especially in the fuzzy crowd, she
The face lights up with excitement. . . .
Harry smiled into his pillow, overjoyed that Ron
He couldn’t see what was possible.

Chapter Thirteen
THE MADAEYE ROOM Y

The storm had let up by the next morning.
although the ceiling of the Great Hall was still bare; heavy
Clouds of pewter gray swirled overhead as Harry, Ron, and Hermione reviewed their new course schedule in the morning. Some places
Coincidentally, Fred, George, and Lee Jordan were discussing magical methods of self-destruction and bluffing their way into the Triwizard .
championship.
“Today wasn’t bad . . . Outside all morning,” said Ron, who was .
He sticks his finger in the Monday schedule of his paycheck. “Animal Art with Hufflepuffs and Taking Care of Magical Animals . . .
right, we're still Slytherins. . . .”
“Double link this evening,” Harry said, smiling .
down. Art was his favorite subject, thanks to Potions.
Professor Trelawney kept predicting Harry’s death, which he found
Very annoying.
“You should be as devoted to her as I am, aren’t you?” said
the

' '
Hermione hurried over, pouring herself a few drinks. “So you would be doing something right like Arithmancy.”
"You're eating again, I think," Ron said, glancing at Hermione .
They have increased the percentage of traffic as well.
“I’ve decided there are better ways to propose a change on elf .
The rights,” Hermione said with a chuckle.
"Yeah . . . and you were hungry," Ron said, smiling.
There was a faint noise above them, a hundred .
Ravens came flying through the open window bringing the dawn.
Letters. Curiously, Harry looked up, but there was nothing white
Between the broth and the coffee. The monsters rummaged through the shelves, looking for the people whose letters and envelopes were addressed to them. A huge white-tailed deer descended towards Neville Longbottom and
He put a bundle around his neck—Neville almost always forgot to
Fix something. Across the hall, Draco Malfoy's vase
A spider landed on his shoulder, taking what seemed like a daily
the supply of tea and coffee from home. You tried to leave a fall
A horrible feeling in his stomach, Harry went back to his wand. Something may have happened to Hedwig, and
that Sirius hadn't even received his letter?
His concern lingered down to the corn-filled vegetables.
patch until they reach the third dungeon, but here he is rescued by Professor Sprout who shows the class the most dangerous monsters .
Harry didn't notice. Indeed, they look no more like plants than
Heavy, black, huge slugs rushed out of the ground. each
He was grinning a little and had a lot of big shiny teeth.
on it, which appears to be full of liquid.
“Bubble-tubers,” Professor Sprout told them bluntly. “They need
measures. You’ll gather the sand —”

' '
“What is that?” Seamus Finnigan said, in a rebellious tone.
“A monster, Finnigan, a monster,” Professor Sprout said, “and it’s very dangerous .
It’s worth it, so don’t waste it. You would pile the dough, I would say, into these
balls. Wear your mountain body gloves; He can do amazing things to
clothes when they’re not polished, they’re a beauty-berth.”
Using the beautybers was fun, but fun.
As each shell disintegrated, a large mass of dark brown liquid, with a strong petroleum smell, emerged. they
He kept it in checkouts as Professor Sprout said, and with
The end of the lesson had collected a lot of pints.
"That would make Miss Pomfrey happy," Professor Sprout said,
You load the last bottle with foam. “The best remedy for hair loss .
More spicy things, better-berth. Students should stop
They come up with ridiculous things to get rid of the rings.”
"She's like poor Eloise Midgen," said Hannah Abbott, a Huffle fan,
in a hushed voice. “She tried to please his.”
“Fucking girl,” Professor Sprout said, shaking her head. "but
Madam Pomfrey set her nose firmly at the end.”
A bell rang out from the castle across the damp ground.
towards the end of the lesson, and the class dispersed; Hufflepuffs climb the stone staircase for the Shift, and
The Gryffindors look in the opposite direction, under the fallen tree
Next to Hagrid’s little wooden cabin, which stands on the edge of the
The Forbidden Forest.
Hagrid was standing outside his hut, his hand on the
His big stuffed animal, Fang. There are plenty open.
wooden balls on the floor at his feet, and Fang was enjoying
And he fumbles around his neck, obviously wanting to investigate the contents more closely. As they got closer, a loud thud

' '
reached their ears, punctuated by what sounded like a small
Eyes.
"morning!" Hagrid said, looking at Harry, Ron and Hermione.
“Beautiful wait for the Slytherins, they don’t want to lose this—Blast-Ended Skrewts!”
“Come again?” Run said.
Hagrid pointed down into the closets.
“I don’t!” exclaimed Lavender Brown, jumping back.
“Eurgh” just about sums up the Skrewts of the Blast hit in 1990.
The rice of Hari. They look like dirty, unpeeled potatoes.
It’s ludicrously soft and thin looking, with its distinctly pointed fingers
places and no obvious peaks. there were about a hundred of them in 2006 .
Each tray, each about six inches high, hovered over one another,
evidence blindly on the sides of cars. They were offering a
Very strong smell of rotting fish. Every once in a while, they fade
to slip off the end of a screw, and by a small ft, it
It will be pushed forward several inches.
“On'y jus' hatched,” Hagrid said excitedly, “so yeh'llll you can ter
Pick yourself up! Thinking we’d do a little project!”
“And why would we want to encourage them?” A cold voice said.
The Slytherins arrived. The speaker was Draco Malfoy.
Crabbe and Goyle were giggling excitedly at his words.
Hagrid looked confused at the question.
“I mean, what do they do?” Malfoy asked. “What is the point of
them?"
Hagrid opened his mouth, seemingly thinking hard; There is a
A few seconds of pause, and then he said determinedly, 'That's the next lesson, Malfoy. Yer jus' fedin' 'em today. Now, you’re going to try them on something
Different things — never had them before, not sure what they would entail

' '
go fer — I have quail eggs and a head liver and a little grass snake — no
Try them with a little of each.”
“At least pus and now this,” Seamus murmured.
Nothing but a deep love for Hagrid could make Harry,
Ron, and Hermione raised the hands of the head cup and
Smash them into vehicles to target the Blast-Ended Skrewts. Harry
He couldn't help wondering if everything was completely right.
It doesn't make sense, because skrewts don't seem to have mouths.
"Oh!" shouted Dean Thomas after about ten minutes. “He got
we!
Hagrid rushed over to him, looking up at him.
“It finally exploded!” Dean said angrily, showing Hagrid the brown
In his hand.
“Oh, yeah, that can happen when they’re black,” Hagrid said,
s head.
“Gold!” Lavender Brown said again. "Urgh, Hagrid, what is it
That blue thing on it?”
“Oh, some of them have voices,” Hagrid said excitedly .
(Lavender quickly pulls her hand out of the bag.) “I think
They're men. . . . Women have certain feminine qualities
Their stomachs. . . . I think they might be ter kissing blood.”
“Well, I can definitely see why we tried to keep them alive,”
Malfoy said sarcastically. “Who doesn’t want affordable pets,
Sting, and they’re all closing at once?”
“Just because they don’t care a lot doesn’t mean they don’t care .
Useful,” Hermione said quietly. “Dragon’s blood is amazing magic,
But you wouldn’t want a dragon for a pet, would you?”
Harry and Run smiled at Hagrid, who gave them a smirk
Smile from behind his thick mask. Hagrid would appreciate it.

' '
Nothing better than a pet, just like Harry, Run, and Hermione
He just knows so much — he had one for a brief period in 1990.
Their first year, a Norwegian Ridgeback named
Norbert. Hagrid just loves dangerous animals, more
Lethal, that’s fine.
“Well, at least the screws are small,” Ron said as they worked .
Way back to the castle for lunch later in the hour.
“They are now,” Hermione said in a tired tone, “but .
When Hagrid finds out what they’re eating, I expect there to be six feet
long."
“Well, that wouldn’t matter if they went out to cure seasickness or
Anything, will it?” Ron said, grinning at her.
“You know damn well I only said that to shut up Malfoy,”
Hermione said. “Like I think he’s right. The best
The thing to do is to put a ring on as many of them as possible before they start
They push us all.”
They sat down at the Gryffindor table and helped themselves to
lamb chops and cheese. Hermione slowly started eating until Harry
And Ron looked at her.
“Er — is that the new stand on elephant deer?” Run said. “Will you make yourself puke instead?”
“No,” Hermione said, as politely as she could muster .
With his mouth hanging open with fangs. “I just want to get to
library."
"what?" Ron said in disbelief. “Hermione—this is the first day .
back! We don’t even have homework!”
Hermione shrugged and continued to choke on her food as
even though she hadn’t eaten in days. Then she jumped to her feet and said:
“See you at dinner!” And it took off in a big way.

' '
when the bell rang to announce the start of afternoon lessons.
Harry and Ron set off for the North Tower where, at the top of a
Through a thin latticework, a silver staircase leads to a pink door at the top, and the room where Professor Trelawney lived.
A familiar sweet bubble rising from the fire met them
The nose as they protruded at the top of the nose. As always,
the clothes were all but closed; The dark room was flooded with bright red light cast by several torches, which were all illuminated by
scarves and hats. Harry and Run walked into the flames of
He kept the chintz chairs and buffs that crowded the room, and sat
Under a small round table.
“Have a nice day,” Professor Trelawney’s low voice said politely .
Behind Harry, he made a jump.
A very thin woman with big nuts framing her eyes.
She looked so much older than her face, Professor Trelawney was looking
Staring at Harry with the pleading look she always wore
She saw him. A large number of pins, chains, and buckles
glistening on his person in the firelight.
“You’re crazy, sweetheart,” she said sadly to Harry.
“My inner eye sees before your face courage towards the repressed spirit within.
And I regret to say that your concerns are not unfounded. I knew it was difficult.
Times ahead of you, alas . . . Very difficult . . . I'm afraid of that thing you.
Fear that it will actually happen . . . And maybe too soon for you
mind. . . .”
His voice fell close to a whisper. Ron rolled his eyes at the
Harry, who looked stonily back. Professor Trelawney passes
She sat in a large winged chair in front of the fire,
Before reading. Lavender Brown and Parvati Patil, who were very fond of Professor Trelawney, sat on the puffs very close to him.

' '
“Honey, it’s time to think about the stars,” she said. "the
Planetary conjunctions and the mysterious signs they reveal
Only for those who understand the dance moves of heaven. The direction of a person can be interpreted by the aspects of the planets, i
They are different . . .”
But Harry's thoughts were hazy. Always beautiful fire
It made him feel sleepy and lethargic, and Professor Trelawney's
faint statements didn't exactly deter him — though he couldn't help but think about what she'd just worn .
he said to her. “ 'I'm afraid that what you fear will actually happen . . .' ”
But Hermione was right, Harry insisted, Professor
Trelawney certainly was a former employee. He is not afraid of anything in
the whole time . . . Well, unless you count his fear that Sirius
He was arrested . . But what does Professor Trelawney know? he
She’s long since come to the conclusion that her brand of beauty is really nothing more than a mix of makeup and makeup .
trip.
Though, of course, for that time at the end of last semester, when she was
He made a prophecy about Voldemort rising again . . . and
Dumbledore himself said that he thought that trance was
Right, when Harry explained. . . .
“Harry!” He looked at Run.
"what?"
Harry looked around; The whole class looked at him. sat
straight up; He almost fell asleep, collapsed into warmth and his
thoughts.
“I mean, my dear, that you were evidently born under .
the judgment of Saturn,” says Professor Trelawney, a glowing note .

' '
of anger in his voice as he obviously had no
She was hanging on his words.
“Born under — what, I’m sorry?” Harry said.
“Saturn, dear, is the planet Saturn!” Professor Trelawney said,
Simply getting irritated because he didn't expect this news. "I
He was saying that Saturn was actually in a position of strength in
The heavens at the time of your birth. . . . Your dark hair. . . your
The meaning of length . . . tragic losses so young in life . . . I thought I was right.
On my word, my dear, that you were born in the middle of winter?”
“No,” Harry said, “I was born in July.”
Ron quickly turned his smile into a menacing grin.
Half an hour later, they were each given a challenge
The blacklist, and he was trying to fill the position of
planets at their time of birth. It was hard work, very demanding
series descriptions and angle calculations.
“I’ve got two Neptunes here,” Harry said after a while, smirking .
Under his papery skin, “it can’t be that, can it?”
“Aaaaah,” Ron said, imitating Professor Trelawney’s signature .
They smiled, “when two Neptunes appear in the sky, it’s a sign of something .
that a little boy on the screen is born, Harry . . .”
Seamus and Dean, who were working nearby, sniffed loudly,
though not loudly enough to distract Lavender Brown’s nervousness—“Professor, look! I think I have an uncountable
Planet! Oooh, who’s that, Professor?”
"It's Uranus, my dear," Professor Trelawney said, looking down .
in the photo.
“Can I look at Uranus too, Lavender?” Run said.
Most disturbing of all, Professor Trelawney overheard, and d

' '
This is probably why she gives them so much homework in
The end of class.
“A thorough analysis of how the models perform in
Next month will affect you, leading your person
Chart,” she said softly, sounding more like Professor McGonagall than her usual airborne self. “I want it to be ready to be donated in advance
Sunday, and for no reason!”
“Sad old fox,” Ron growled as they joined the crowd .
a short descent back to the Main House and dinner.
“That’s going to take all weekend, that’s going to take. . . .”
“Too much homework?” Hermione said excitedly, taking a
them. “Master Vector didn’t give us any!”
“Well, bully for Professor Vector,” Ron growled.
They reached the entrance hall, which was crowded with people
line for dinner. They had just gotten to the end of the line, when
A firm voice rang out behind them.
“Weasley! Hey, Wesley!”
Harry, Ron, and Hermione shrugged. Malfoy, the Crab, and Guyle
They were standing there, everyone looking very excited about
some.
"what?" Ron said quietly.
“Your father is in the paper, Weasley!” Malfoy said, glaring at a
copy of the Daily Prophet and speaking very loudly, so that everyone in the crowded entrance hall could hear. “Listen to this!
OTHER MISTAKES AT THE MINISTRY OF HEALTH
Sounds like Ministry of Magic problems
They're Not in the End Yet, writes Rita Skeeter, Specialist
messenger. Lately under fire for its victims

' '
crowd control at the Quidditch World Cup, and
Still unable to account for the request of a
of its wizards, the Ministry plunged into new trinkets
Good Luck Yesterday by Arnold Campaigns
Weasley, of the Bureau of Muggle Abuse.”
Malfoy looked up.
“Imagine they didn’t even get his name right, Weasley. is
It’s almost like a complete nothing, isn’t it?” he screams.
Everyone in the entrance hall was listening now. Malfoy
The paper was straightened with a brush and it read:
Arnold Wesley, charged with murder
of a car getting two years ago, was in yesterday
In a fight with several Muggle law enforcers
(“the Police”) on a number of very vile individuals .
The boxes of dishes. Mr. Weasley seemed rushed to
Assistance from “MadEye” Moody, former Grand Auror
The one who left the ministry when he couldn’t
It would mean the difference between a handshake and a suicide. No wonder, Mr. Wesley
He found, when he came to Mr. Moody’s very
mobile home, which Mr. Moody once again
He picked up a false alarm. Mr. Wesley was forced to
Change a lot of ideas before he runs away
from police, but refused to put the Daily
The Prophet asks why he joined
The department is in a precarious position and can
An amazing story.

' '
“And there’s a picture, Weasley!” Malfoy said, flipping the paper.
Above and holding it. “A picture of your parents outside of .
A house — if you can call it a house! Your mom could do with losing a little weight, couldn’t she?”
Ron was shaking with excitement. Everyone looks at him.
“Hurry up, Malfoy,” Harry said. “Come on, Run. . . .”
“Oh yes, you’re staying with them this summer, aren’t you,
plate?" Malfoy said. “So tell me, is that really his mother .
porky, or is that just a picture?”
“Do you know your mother, Malfoy?” Harry said — both he and .
Hermione grabbed the back of Ron's shirt to stop him from
she compared herself to Malfoy—“that expression she had, as if she .
Does she have a pimple under her nose? She always looked like this, or was it
Just because you’re with him?”
Malfoy's pale face turned slightly pale.
“You can’t embarrass my mother, Potter.”
“Keep your fat mouth shut, then,” Harry said, turning around.
bang!
Several people screamed — Harry felt something white hot
turning the side of his face — he stuck his hand in his pocket for
His wand, but before he could even touch it, he heard a second loud
BANG, a hiss announced the entrance hall.
“OH NO DON’T, WIFE!”
Harry turned around. Professor Moody was sleeping in
A marble staircase. Her wand is out and she’s looking straight at a
The pure white ferret, who was pooping on the stone-flagged floor,
Exactly where Malfoy was standing.
There was an eerie silence in the entrance hall. No one but
Moody was brandishing a knife. Moody turned to look at Harry —

' '
At least his normal eyes were focused on Harry; Another was
He scratched the back of his head.
“Did he bring you?” Moody growled. Her voice was low and
With a stone.
“No,” Harry said, “he’s fucked.”
“Leave him!” Moody shouted.
“Let — what?” Harry said, confused.
“It’s not you — it’s him!” Moody groaned, pressing his blanket against hers
Crabbe’s shoulder, which had just sprained, was about to regain
White ferret. Turns out Moody’s watchful eye was a witch and
He could see out of the corner of his head.
Moody started walking towards Crabbe, Goyle, and the monster.
who gave a frightened squeal and took off, limping towards the
prison.
“I don’t think so!” shouted Moody, pointing his wand at the ferret.
Also — she flew ten feet in the air and fell with a thud to the ground,
and then headed up again.
“I don’t like people who attack when their opponent’s back is up .
He turned around,” Moody said as the ferret snuggled higher and .
He’s high, wincing in pain. “A terrible, terrible, terrible thing for
do. . . .”
The branch floats in the air, its legs and tail flapping aimlessly.
“Don’t — do — that — again —” Moody said, talking everyone .
A word as the ferret hit stone floor and bounced back up.
“Professor Moody!” A terrified voice said.
Professor McGonagall was coming down from the marble sofa.
with his arms full of books.
"Hello, Professor McGonagall," Moody said softly, bowing .
Ferret still higher.
“What — what are you doing?” Professor McGonagall said,
The eyes followed the scatter’s shifting trajectory across the sky.
“Teaching,” Moody said.
“Teach — Moody, is that a student?” Professor McGonagall said, the books flying out of her hands.
“Yeah,” Moody said.
"No!" Professor McGonagall said, running down the stairs and
She takes out her wand; A moment later, with a loud cry,
Draco Malfoy came back and sat in a heap on the floor with his wand .
Slick blond hair all over his face now dark gray with a smile. He reached his
The legs, twitching.
“Moody, we don’t use change as punishment!” said
Professor Mcgonagall barely nodded. "Certainly," said Professor Dumbledore .
You that?”
“I guess he mentioned it, yeah,” Moody said, rubbing his forehead .
Chin didn’t hesitate, “but I thought it was perfectly fine —”
“We ran out of stops, Moody! Or talk to the criminal boss
house!"
“I’ll do that, then,” Moody said, looking at Malfoy with a big smile .
You don’t care.
Malfoy, his green eyes still bright with hurt and embarrassment, looked kindly at Moody and looked at something that had the words “father” sprinkled through it.
“Oh yeah?” Moody said softly, taking a few steps forward,
The dull clunk of his wooden foot sounds down the hall. “Well, I
Know your old dad, kid. . . . You tell him Moody is keeping a
Close your eyes on the child. . . You told him that from me. . . . Now, you
The Head of House would be Snape, right?”
“Yeah,” Malfoy sighed.
“Another old friend,” Moody said quietly. “I wish I could talk to old Snape. . . . Come on, you. . . .”
And he grabbed Malfoy's upper arm and led him towards the
The prison.
Professor McGonagall looked at them worriedly for a few moments, then swiped her wand at her fallen books, causing them to .
it ended up in the air and back in his arms.
“Don’t talk to me,” Ron whispered to Harry and Hermione .
As they sat down at the Gryffindor table a few minutes later, they were surrounded by excited talk on all sides about what had just happened.
"why not?" Hermione said with a smile.
“Because I want to save that in my memory forever,” Ron said, his
Eyes locked and a welcoming look on his face. “Dracus Malfoy,
The amazing blue ferret . . .”
Harry and Hermione both laughed, Hermione starting to pour the milk sauce on each of their plates.
"He could really hurt Malfoy, though," she said. "compliance
Good thing, really, that Professor McGonagall stopped him—”
“Hermione!” Run said angrily, his eyes opening again,
“You’re ruining the best moment of my life!”
Hermione made an impatient noise and started eating upstairs.
Running again.
“Don’t tell me you’re going back to the library this evening?” said
Harry, watching her.
“It should,” Hermione said quietly. “Parts to do.”
“But you told us Professor Vector —”
“It’s not the school’s job,” she said. Within five minutes, she had
She folded her plate and left. She just didn’t go for it.
His place was taken by Fred Wesley.
"moody!" he said. “How cold is it?”
“Beyond the beard,” George said, sitting down next to Fred.
“Super-cool,” crew friend Lee Jordan said as he slipped in
the chair in front of George. "We had it this afternoon," he said .
Harry and Ron.
“How was it?” Harry said excitedly.
Fred, George, and Lee exchanged looks full of meaning.
“I never had a lesson like that,” Fred says.
"He knows, man," Lee said.
“He knows what?” Ron said, leaning forward.
“He knows what it’s like to be out there doing it,” George said .
In an amazing way.
“You do what?” Harry said.
“The fight against the dark arts,” Fred said.
"He's seen it all," George said.
“ 'Amazing,'” Lee said.
Ron crashed his car for his shift.
“We won’t get it until Thursday!” he said nervously.
sound.

Chapter Fourteen
THE UNFORGIVENESS

The next two days passed without major incident, except you
Neville grumbled pouring his sixth cup into Potions. Professor Snape, who seemed to reach new levels of betrayal over the summer, gave Neville a leave of absence, and Neville returned .
from him in a state of nervous breakdown, having been made to empty a barrel full of horned rats.
“You know why Snape is in such a foul mood, don’t you?” said
Ron to Harry as they watched Hermione teach Neville the Scouring Charm to remove the spider hairs from the bottom of his fingers.
“Yeah,” Harry said. "moody."
It was common knowledge that Snape really wanted a Girl .
a work of art, and now he can’t get it for the fourth year in a row. Snape disliked all their previous dark arts teachers,
And he proved it — but he seems to be incredibly wary of showing off in detail .
Challenge to Madey Moody. In fact, whenever he sees Harry
Two of them together — during a meal, or when passing through the
ways — he had the distinct impression that Snape was avoiding Moody's eyes, whether magical or normal.
“I think Snape was a little scared of him, you know,” Harry said .
By thinking.
"Imagine if Moody turned Snape into a horned dragon," Ron said,
His eyes widened, “and shifted all around his prison. . . .”
The fourth years of Gryffindor were looking forward to Moody's
The first lesson so much that they arrived early on Thursday lunchtime.
And he got stuck in line outside his classroom before the bell even rang.
The only person missing was Hermione, who only came in
lesson time.
“He’s in —”
"library." Harry finished her sentence. “Come, quickly,
Or we don’t get the right seats.”
They quickly moved to three chairs in front of the teacher's
desk, took off their Strong Forces: A Guide to Self-Defense uniforms, and waited, unusually quietly. They soon heard Moody
Distinguished snowflakes coming down the trail, and he
He entered the room, looking as fierce and frightening as ever. they
He could just see her thin, wooden leg sticking out from under her slippers.
“You can put those away,” he growled, storming off to his desk .
And they sit down, “those books. You don’t need them.”
They carried the books to their shelves, and Ron looked at her curiously.
Moody pulled out a trigger, lowered his long barbed wire
Hair stood out from his twisted and twisted face, and he began to scream
names, her normal eye slowly scanning the list while her magical eye focused, scanning each student as he or she
he answered.
“Right then,” he said, when the last person declared himself present, “I have a letter from Professor Lupine about this .
class. It sounds like you have a good grounding in handling
Hard Animals — You’ve covered raccoons, black rattlesnakes, hunks,
grindylows, Kappas, and wolves, right?”
There was a general pause of questioning.
“But you’re behind — way behind — in keeping up with the audience,”
Modi said. “So I’m here to bring you up to speed on what wizards can do to each other. I have a year to teach you how to deal with it.
With darkness —”
“What, you’re not staying?” Ron hurried out.
Moody's magic eye turned to look at Ron; Ron looked.
Very confused, but after a while, Moody calmed down — the
First time Harry had seen him do that. The effect was to make his
A very tired face looks more rehearsed than usual, but
But it's good to know that it does something like
A friend is like a needle. Ron looked very surprised.
“You’re going to be Arthur Weasley’s son, yeah?” Modi said. “Your father .
Pulled me out of a very tight corner a few days ago. . . . Yeah, I just stayed that year. A special friendship for Dumbledore. . . . one year,
Then I’ll go back to my retirement of silence.”
He gave a tight laugh and then clapped his wrinkled hands together.
together.
“So — straight into it. We curse. They come in many strengths.
and forms. Now, according to the Ministry of Magic, I should
I’ll teach you common sense and leave it at that. I shouldn’t have to do
Show you what illegal red tape looks like until you’re in the sixth
year. You don’t have to be old enough to deal with it until it’s too late.
But Professor Dumbledore has a higher opinion than your roots,

' '
He thought you could cope, and I said, as you find out what
You’re against it, which is fine. How you should protect yourself
Yourself against something you don’t know? The wizard on
He’ll throw an illegal curse at you, he won’t tell you what he’s saying.
It will work. It doesn’t do anything nice and flattering to your face. You need
to be prepared. You have to be polite and consistent. You need to install
It’s that far, Mrs. Brown, when I’m talking.”
Lavender jumped and ran. She was showing Parvati
his complete horoscope under the desk. Apparently, Moody
The Magical Eye can see through a solid cloak, as well as from the
of his head.
"So . . . do any of you know which offense is most often punished under the code of signs?”
Several hands suddenly shot up in the air, including Ron's and
Hermione's. Moody reminded Ron, though his magical eye was
It’s still set on Lavender.
“Er,” Ron nodded, “my father told me about someone. . . . he is
called the Imperius Consort, or something?”
“Oh, yes,” Moody said enthusiastically. “Your father will know .
that one. He’s given the Ministry a lot of trouble at the same time, an Imperius rival.”
Moody climbed stiffly to his mismatched feet and opened his desk
coffee, and he pulled out a glass of tea. Three large black spiders were cowering inside it. Harry felt Ron shift slightly towards him —
Ron hated spiders.
Moody reached over to the pot, grabbed one of the spiders, and tapped
It in his hand for all to see. He then
He pointed his wallet at her and said with a smile, “Imperio!”
The spider jumped from Moody’s hand onto a fine silk thread and
He started swinging back and forth like he was on a trapeze. it
She kicked her legs out hard, then did a leg squeeze, breaking
wire and glue on the desk, where it starts to stick in circles. Moody drew his wand, and spiders rose on both sides of it
Back steps and goes into what is undoubtedly a lap dance.
Everyone laughs — everyone except Moody.
“You think it’s funny, don’t you?” he said. “You will love it, you will
You, if I did it to you?”
The laughter died down almost instantly.
“Total protection,” Moody whispered as the spider readied itself .
And it started falling fast. “I can talk him out of
The window, drowning itself, nestled itself under one of your armpits . . .”
Ron gave an involuntary chuckle.
"Years ago, there were many wizards and witches who were controlled by the Imperius Curse," Moody said, and Harry knew that .
He was referring to the days when Voldemort was all-powerful. “Some work for the department, they are trying to sort out who was available
They were forced to act, and whoever was acting willingly.
“The Imperius curse can be defended, and I will teach you .
How, but it takes real strength of character, not individual
got it. Better make sure to catch it if you can. constant
WATCH OUT!” He shouted, and everyone jumped.
Moody picked up the bouncing spider and threw it back.
In the coffee.
“Does anyone else know one? Another illegal curse?”
Hermione's hand flew into the air again and so, towards Harry's thigh
Surprisingly, Neville did. The only branch Neville usually volunteered for was Herbology, which was easily his best .
subject. Neville looked down at his wife.

' '
"Yes?" Moody said, his magical eye moving right away to fix
Nephilim.
“There’s one — a cruciatus maid,” Neville said with a small but .
A different voice.
Moody was looking very intently at Neville, this time with both
eyes.
“Is your name Longbuttum?” He said, his magic eye looking
below to see it again.
Neville frowned in confusion, but Moody made no further inquiries. He went back to reading in general and reached for the coffee
for the next beat and laid it on the counter, where it sat motionless, apparently too frightened to move.
"The Cruciatus Curse," Moody said. “It should be a little bigger
To get an idea,” he said, pointing to the counter.
“Ingorgio!”
The spider melted. She was now bigger than a tarantula. Abandoning all dignity, Ron pushed his chair back, as far
from Moody's apartment as far as possible.
Moody raised his wand again, pointed it at the spell, and muttered, “Crucio!”
Suddenly, sharp fingers pressed into his body; fell u
He started shivering nervously, swaying from side to side. Not a single shot came.
from him, but Harry was sure that if he could pick a voice, he would
He would be screaming. Moody didn't take his shirt off, and
The spider begins to grow and become more aggressive —
“Stop it!” Hermione said with a chuckle.
Harry looked at her. She was staring, not at the spider.
But over to Neville, and Harry, he followed her gaze and saw that Neville's
Her hands gripped the desk in front of her, her feet
White, his eyes wide and concerned.
Moody raised his wand. The spider’s legs relaxed, but she continued to shake.
“Reducio,” Moody murmured, and the spider returned to its seat .
the right size. He put it back in the sink.
“Pain,” Moody whispered. “You don’t need snowballs or
A knife for torturing someone if you can do the Cruciatus
curse. . . . That one was very popular once too.
"Right . . . does anyone know the others?”
Harry looked to his side. From the looks on everyone’s faces, he
I think they were all wondering what would happen to
The last drink. Hermione's hand tightened slightly as, for the third time,
She lifts him in the air.
"Yes?" Moody said, looking at her.
“Avada Kedavra,” Hermione whispered.
Several people looked at her in shock, including Ron.
“Oh,” said Moody, another smug smile adorning his head .
be. “Yeah, last and best. Avada Kedavra . . . killed
curse."
He put his hand in the glass jar, and it was almost as if he saw
Next thing, a third spider squeals nervously in the middle of
Under the couch, he tries to escape Moody’s fingers, but catches
it, and lays it on the plate. He started screaming in frustration.
On a wooden log.
Moody raised his wand, and Harry felt a twinge of
measures.
“Avada Kedavra!” Moody yelled.

' '
There was a flash of blinding blue light and a screaming, like
though something large and invisible was floating in the air—
Instantly, the spider lands on his leg, unmarked, but
He died without a doubt. Many students dismiss the call; has Run
He stumbled backwards, nearly falling out of his seat as
The spider curled up next to him.
Moody drags the dead spider out of the engine compartment onto the floor.
“It’s not good,” he growled. “He didn’t like it. And nothing
Constitution. No one can stop him. Only one distinguished person has
He didn’t move, and he stayed right in front of me.”
Harry felt his face flush red as Moody's eyes widened (both of them)
In his. He could feel everyone else looking at him.
also. Harry looked at the blackboard as if fascinated by
It, but he doesn’t really notice it at all. . . .
So that’s how his parents died . . . Exactly like that spider.
Are they also risk-free and symptom-free? If only they were
I saw a blue light and heard death rushing past.
before sucking the life out of their bodies?
Harry had imagined the death of his parents many times.
Three years ago, ever since he found out they had
He was killed, since he found out what happened
That night: Wormtail works out where his parents are i
Voldemort, who had come to find them in their apartment. how
Voldemort had killed Harry's father first. How James Butter
She tries to stop him, while he yells at his wife to take Harry
And running . . . Voldemort contacted Lily Potter and told her to
moved aside to kill Harry . . . How she beg
to him to kill her instead, he refused to stop taking care of his son . . . And so
Voldemort killed her too, before putting his wand
Harry. . . .
Harry knew these details because he listened to his parents .
tone when he fought the dementors last year — because that’s what he was .
The power of victim violence: forcing victims to live
bad memories of their lives, and they sink, powerlessly, into them
His hope. . . .
Moody was speaking again, from a great distance away, it looked like
Harry. With great effort, he pulled himself up to the present
And he listened to what Moody had to say.
“Avada Kedavra is a curse that needs a bit of a strong magic behind it — you can all get your stuff out now and point it at
I re-read the lyrics, and I doubt I’ll get much as a whistle.
But that doesn't matter. I’m not here to teach you how to do it.
"Now, if there's no curse, why did I show it to you?" because
You need to know. You have to appreciate what’s wrong. you
You don’t want to find yourself in a situation where you’re dealing
it. NATIONAL EMERGENCY!” he yelled, and the whole class
He sighed again.
"Now . . . the three sacrifices — Avada Kedavra, Imperius, and
Cruciatus — Known as the Unforgivable Rapes. The use of each
One of them on the other person can win a life
sentence in Azkaban. It’s what you earn. It's okay
I have to teach you to fight. You need preparation. You need saving. But most of all, you need to practice constantly, never stop
threat. Get your arms out . . . Copy this below. . . .”
They spent the rest of the lesson looking at each of the unforgivable transgressions. No one spoke until the bell rang — but when .

' '
Moody released them and they left the classroom, the speech bubble going off. Most people were talking about the 2019 season.
Repeat — “Did you see him squirm?” “— and when he killed .
It — just like that!”
They were talking about a lesson, Harry thought, as if
It was some kind of funny movie, but he didn’t find it very
She was surprised—and Hermione didn't seem to get it either.
“Hurry up,” she yelled at Harry and Ron.
“Isn’t that the Blue Library too?” Run said.
“No,” Hermione said quietly, pointing down a side street. “Neville.”
Neville was standing alone, halfway down the street, staring at
stone wall in front of him with the same panicked look, wide-eyed
He was wearing when Moody showed the cruciatus cross.
“Neville?” Hermione said calmly.
Neville looked around.
“Oh hello,” he said, his voice much louder than usual. “An interesting lesson, isn’t it? I wonder what’s for dinner, I—I’m starving, aren’t I?”
“Neville, are you alright?” Hermione said.
“Oh yeah, I’m fine,” Neville whispered in an unprofessional way .
sound. “A very interesting dinner — I mean a lesson — what a .
eating?"
Ron gave Harry a curious look.
“Neville, what — ?”
But there was a faint noise behind them, and they
He turned to see Professor Moody approaching them. Four n
They were silent, staring at him in confusion, but when he spoke,
He was on a much smaller and quieter rest than they had ever heard.
"It's okay, buddy," he told Neville. “Why don’t you come .
To my office? series . . . We can have a cup of tea. . . .”
Neville looked even more fearfully at the tea s
moody. He didn’t move, didn’t speak. Moody turns his magic on
Eye on Harry.
“You alright, are you, Potter?”
“Yeah,” Harry said, almost whispering.
Moody’s blue eye twitched slightly in her smile as she searched for
Harry. Then he said, “You should know. It looks dark, maybe,
But you need to know. There’s no point in guessing . . . Well . . . series,
Longbottom, I have a few books that might interest you.”
Neville looked sympathetically at Harry, Ron, and Hermione, but
They didn’t say anything, so Neville had no choice but to let
Himself to be absorbed, one of Moody’s hands pressed against his arms
shoulder.
“What’s that about?” Run said, looking at Nevil and Modi
Turn the corner.
“I don’t know,” Hermione said, looking puzzled.
“Any lesson, though, eh?” Run said to Harry as they made their way to the
The great room. “Fred and George were right, weren’t they? he
He really knows his stuff, Moody, doesn’t he? When Avada did
Kedavra, how the fly just died, just suffocated her enough—”
But Ron suddenly smiled when he saw Harry's face and
He did not speak again until they reached the great hall, when he said .
Thought they’d better start with Professor Trelawney’s funeral
views tonight, as they will take hours.
Hermione didn't join Harry and Run's conversation.
During dinner, but he ate angrily, and then I went to the library

' '
again. Harry and Ron returned to Gryffindor Tower, and
Harry, not thinking about anything else all dinner,
Now he takes up the subject of the unforgivable injuries himself.
"Won't Moody and Dumbledore get in trouble with the Ministry if they knew we saw the curse?" Harry asked as they approached the older woman.
“Yeah, maybe,” Ron said. 'But Dumbledore was always working .
Things his way, wasn’t it, and Moody was having a hard time becau
For years, I think. He attacks first and attacks later — look into it .
The boxes of dishes. Balderdash.”
The blonde turned around to show the entrance hole, and
They proceeded to the Gryffindor common room, which was
It’s full of noise.
“Shall we get our Divination stuff, then?” Harry said.
“S'pose,” Ron growled.
They arrived at the orphanage to pick up their books and papers.
He would find Neville there alone, sitting on his bed, reading. He looks
Much more interesting than the end of Moody’s lesson, though still
Not entirely correct. His eyes were slightly blue.
“Are you alright, Nevil?” Harry asked.
“Oh yeah,” Neville said, “I’m fine, thanks. Just reading this book
Professor Moody loaned it to me. . . .”
He carried the book: Magical Water Beasts of the Mediterranean.
“Apparently Professor Sprout told Professor Moody I really
good at veterinary science,” Neville said. There is a sense of pride in
her voice Harry had hardly heard there before. “He thought he would
similar."
When he told Neville what Professor Sprout had said, Harry thought,
It was a very clever way of developing Neville, since Neville is very
I rarely hear him being good at anything. It was kind of weird.
Professor Lupine will do.
Harry and Ron put their copy of Future Unfogging back .
He reached the common room, found a table, and started working on their room
forecasts for the next month. An hour later, they were done
Little growth, even though their table is full of blocks of
The paper had figures and symbols, and Harry's brain was like
It was full of fog like it was full of teacher breath
Trelawny Fire.
"I have no idea what this lot means," he said,
She looked down at a long list of calculations.
“You know,” said Ron, whose hair was tousled for all .
times he ran his fingers through it nervously, “I think it’s .
Back to the old Divination spell.”
“What — set it up?”
“Yeah,” Ron said, pulling out the pile of crumpled notes from the
The blackboard, dipped his pen in some moisture, and began to write.
“Next Monday,” he announced as he announced, “I may develop .
coughing, owing to the unfortunate combination of Mars and Jupiter.”
He looked up at Harry. “You know her — just put a pain stick on, and she’ll follow.”
“Of course,” Harry said, dismissing his first attempt as lobbying .
It on the heads of the shoe group the first years in the fire.
"Anaam . . . Monday, I shall be in danger of — er — fever.”
“Yeah, you would be,” Ron chuckled, “we’re seeing skrewts .
Also on Sunday. So, on Tuesday, I will . . . Erm . . .”
“Lose what’s important,” said Harry, who was fuming .
With Unfogging the Future for ideas.
“Good one,” Ron said, releasing him. “Because of . . .

' '
Erm . . . Mercury. Why wouldn’t someone you thought was a friend stab you in the back?”
"Yes . . . very good . . .” Harry said, shrugging it off, “because .
Venus is in the twelfth house.”
"And on Wednesday, I think I'll come out the best in the fight."
“Aaah, I was going to have sex. Okay, I’ll hazard a bet.”
“Yeah, you bet I’ll win my fight. . . .”
They keep making predictions (which are increa
more fun) for another hour, while the common room next to
They slowly turn them on as people go to bed. Crookshanks walked over to them, lightly perched himself in an empty chair, and looked at Harry blankly, not unlike how Hermione would if she saw them .
They weren’t doing their homework properly.
He looks around the room, trying to think of the kind of mess
Still not using, Harry sees Fred and George sitting together
Against another wall, heads together, legs off, facing each other
A piece of paper. It was unusual to see Fred and
George hid away in a corner and worked silently; There are usually
He likes to be in the throes of things and in the middle of the noise of things.
There was something mysterious about how they worked
piece of paper, and Harry recalled how they
They all sat down and wrote something back at the Burrow. have
Think then that this is another painting of honor for the Weasleys Wizard
Wheezes, but it doesn’t seem so this time; If there were, they
Surely he would allow Lee Jordan to step into the limelight. he asked himself.
Does it have anything to do with the Triwizard entry
championship.
As Harry watched, George tilted his head at Fred and frowned
Something up his sleeve, he said, in a voice too quiet not-
' '
Theless brought over the nearly empty room, “No — that sounds .
It’s like we’re accusing him. You have to be careful. . .”
Then George looked over and saw Harry staring at him. Harry
smiling and quickly returning to his thoughts — he didn’t want to
George will think he was joking. Shortly after that, the twins
They tore up their locker, said goodnight and went to bed.
Fred and George had been gone ten minutes or so when the spaceship opened and Hermione emerged into the common room .
She holds a paper bag in one hand and a pouch in which they keep the contents while she travels in the other. Crookshanks Arcades
Foot, looking.
“Hi, I just finished!” she said.
"me too!" Ron said triumphantly, shrugging his shoulders.
Hermione sat down and put the things she had in a
empty chair, and pulled Ron's features towards it.
“You haven’t had a very good month, have you?” she exclaimed as Crookshanks poked her in the thigh.
“Ah well, at least I’ve been warned beforehand,” Ron chuckled.
“It’s like she’s drowning twice,” Hermione said.
“Oh me?” Ron said, looking through his notes. “Better than me
Change one of them to be attacked by a predatory hippogriff.”
“Don’t you think it’s a little obvious that you made these up?” said
Hermione.
“How dare you!” Ron said, with a smug grin. “We’re acting like house elves here!”
Hermione raised an eyebrow.
“Just a word,” Ron said quietly.
Harry lowered his head too, having just finished telling his
His death by suffocation.

' '
“What’s in the bag?” he asked, looking at her.
“That’s funny you should ask,” Hermione said, with a wicked glance at .
run. She took off the basket and showed them its contents.
Inside were about fifty candles, all differently colored, but all .
took one letter: SPEW
“ 'Suck'?” Harry said, picking up a parcel and looking at it.
“What’s that about?”
“It’s not alcohol,” Hermione insisted. “It’s SPEW. stood
To the Pig Welfare Development Society.”
"Never heard of it," Ron said.
"Well, of course you don't," Hermione said quietly, "I only have . . ."
They just started it.”
"Yes?" Ron said with a smirk. “How many members have
possess?"
"Well—if you end two—three," Hermione said.
“And you think we want to go around in flagpoles saying .
'Suck,' you know?” Run said.
“Pull!” Hermione said anxiously. “I was going to put Stop the
Outrageous abuse of our fellow magical creatures and a campaign for change in their legal status — but it’s not enough. so
It’s our manifesto.”
She laid out paper gowns for them.
“I regularly look for it in the library. Pig breeding goes back thousands of years. I couldn’t believe no one had done anything.
About that before now.”
“Hermione — open your ears,” Ron said aloud. "They. Like. Yes.
They like being slaves!”
“Our short-term goals,” Hermione said, speaking further .
Ron’s voice was loud, and she pretended not to hear a word, “it’s .
Ensure houseelves fair wages and working conditions. Our long-term goals include changing the law on non-weapons use, and trying
to bring in an elf in the Processing and Control Department of
Magical creatures, because they’re perfectly represented.”
“And how do we do all this?” Harry asked.
“We’re starting with recruiting members,” Hermione said proudly. "I
Think a couple of Sickles would join — a lucky bet — and the resulting proceeds could feed our apple juice. You’re a banker, Ron — I have
I got you a mixing bowl upstairs — it’s Harry, you’re a writer, so
You might want to write down everything I’m saying right now, like
The record of our first meeting.”
There was a pause in which Hermione stared at the two
They were, and Harry sat, torn between concern for Hermione and
Amused at the look on Ron's face. The silence was broken, not
By Ron, who at all times looked like he was right
Dumbstruck, but with a smooth, smooth finish on the back. Harry looked
In the large room that was now empty and I looked, painted with
Moonlight, a snowy owl perched on the ledge.
“Hidwig!” He shouted, and shoved himself out of his chair.
and across the room to pull open the window.
Hedwig flew inside and flew across the room, landing on the
A panel about Harry's thoughts.
“About time!” Harry said, rushing past her.
“She has the answer!” Run said excitedly, looking at the mess
a paper slipper tied around Hedwig's leg.
Harry quickly unzipped it and sat down to read, causing Hedwig to spring to her feet, barking frantically.

' '
“What did he say?” Hermione asked rhetorically.
The letter is very short, and sounds like it was
I scrawled at top speed. Harry read it aloud:
Harry —
I fly north immediately. This information about your hair is
The latest in a series of strange comments reaching out to me
here. If it bothers again, go straight to Dumbledore — they are .
He said he brought MadEye out of retirement, meaning he
Reading signs, even if no one else does.
I will be in touch soon. Good news for Ron and Hermione. keep
Your eyes are open, Harry.
Harry looked at Ron and Hermione, who looked back at him.
“It’s flying north?” Hermione whispered. “Will he come back?”
“Dumbledore’s reading of what signs?” Ron said, looking confused. “Harry — what’s going on?”
Because Harry had just knocked himself into the hole with his hammer, knocking Hedwig out of her hole.
“I shouldn’t have told him!” Harry said excitedly.
“What are you talking about?” Ron said with a smile.
“He made him think he should come back!” Harry said, now
He slammed his fist on the table so that Hedwig knocked back
of Ron's chair, rocking furiously. “He will come back, because he
He thinks I'm in trouble! And there’s nothing wrong with me! And I
I don’t have anything for you,” Harry stormed over to Hedwig, who was .
she took a deep breath, “you’ll have to go to the Owlery .
If you want to eat.”
Hedwig gave him a very amused look and left for
An open window, she rubbed it over her head with her outstretched palm as she went.
“Harry,” Hermione began, in a soothing sort of voice.
“I’m going to bed,” Harry whispered. “I’ll see you in
morning."
Up in the dorm, he pulled off his pajamas and went into
Four of his plates, but he didn't feel too bad.
If Sirius comes back and gets caught, it’ll be his, and Harry’s,
fault. Why doesn't he keep his mouth shut? Pain for a few seconds and
He had to blab. . . . If he only had the sense to keep it
His hands. . . .
He heard Ron arrive at the inn a moment later,
But he didn’t talk to her. For a long moment, Harry stared at the
the blue sofa of his bed. The orphanage was completely silent,
And, if it hadn’t been so desperate, Harry would have realized that
Neville’s lack of regular breathing meant that he wasn’t the only
One remained awake.

Chapter Five

Boxbaton and Durmstrang

The next morning, Harry woke up with a plan that was entirely in
brain, like his sleeping brain was working on him all
night. He got up, put on the morning light, and left the orphanage.
Without it Ron wakes up, and goes back to the parallel realm
room. Here he takes a piece of paper from the table on which
His Divination work was still intact and he wrote the following letter:
Hey Sirius,
I think I just thought my shoulder would hurt, I was half asleep.
When I wrote to you last time. There’s no point coming back,
Everything is fine here. Don’t worry about me, my head is throbbing
It’s completely normal.
He then exited the spaceship, heading silently
Castle (just taken over briefly by Peeves, who tried to tear down a giant castle
vase on him halfway down the fourth-floor corridor), finally reaching the Owlery, located at the top of the West Tower.
The Owlery was a dark stone room, cold and damp.
because none of the spheres have any gas in them. The land was
They’re all covered in mud, animal dung, and exposed mud
Skeletons of animals and plants. Hundreds upon hundreds of animals of
Every type imaginable was mounted here on legs that came free
By the top of the tower, almost all are sleeping, though here
And there a pale amber eye was staring at Harry. He looked at Hedwig
Perched between a barn owl and a tawny owl, and reached him quickly,
They slid a bit on the hanging floor.
It took him a while to convince her to get up and then move
In it, as she continues to move around in her car, showing him
tail. Obviously, she was still angry about his lack of thanks.
Last night. In the end, it’s Harry who suggests that she might as well be
He was tired, and would probably ask Ron to borrow Pigwidgeon,
That made her stick her foot out and let him close the letter.
“Just find him, okay?” Harry said, kissing her neck as he led her on his arm to one of the holes in the wall. “Before the demented did.”
She snapped her finger, probably harder than she normally would, but screamed out in the most intimidating sort of way
Likewise. Then she spread her wings and flew off into the sunset.
Harry watched her fade out of sight with the familiar feeling of uneasiness returning in his stomach. He was sure that Sirius's answer
It will mitigate its risks rather than add to them.
"That was a lie, Harry," Hermione whispered at breakfast,
When she and Ron told him what he had done. "You don't see
your skin hurts and you know it.”
“So what?” Harry said. “He’s not going back to Azkaban because .
of me.”
“Put it down,” Ron whispered to Hermione as she opened it .
his mouth to claim anything else, and for the first time, Hermione heard him,
And he smiled.
Harry did his best not to worry about Sirius over the next couple of weeks. Of course, he couldn't stop himself from looking anxious every morning when the mail rabbits arrived, too, too late .
On the night before he went to sleep, he stopped himself from seeing visions of sinister Sirius, carried by dementors down some dark London street, but in between times he tried to keep his mind off of hers .
The Father of God. He wished he still had Quidditch to enjoy; Nothing works better in a troubled brain than a good, hard training session. On the other hand, their samples were increasing
It's harder and more demanding than ever, especially Moody's
Defense against the dark arts.
To their surprise, Professor Moody announced that he .
He would be casting the Imperius Curse on each of them in turn, so that
They will show its power and see if they can withstand its effects.
"But — but you said it was illegal, Professor," Hermione said helplessly as Moody slammed the tables shut .
Wand, leaving a large clear space in the center of the room. "you
He said — to use it against another person was —”
"Dumbledore wants you to be taught how he feels," Moody said,
His magical eye focused on Hermione and fixed her with a
Eerie, unmoving. “If you like to learn the hard way — when .
Someone puts it on you to control you completely —
Good by me. You are forgiven. Off you go.”
He pointed a pointed finger at the door. Hermione went.
Very green and looking something about that doesn't mean that she
He wants to leave. Harry and Ron looked at each other. They know
Hermione would rather eat goodberry juice than miss such an important lesson.
Moody began sending students forward in turn and threw
Imperius leaned over them. Harry watched, one by one, his
Classmates did extraordinary things under his influence.
Dean Thomas circled the room three times, chanting
The national anthem. The brown lavender shares an animal. Neville did a very amazing series of races, will definitely do it again.
They wouldn’t have been able to in his normal state. None of them
He seemed to be able to withstand the torture, and every one of them recovered
Only when Moody removed it.
“Potter,” Moody snapped, “you’re next.”
Harry continued forward into the middle of the classroom, to the
the floor that Moody swept off the shelves. Moody raised his wand.
He pointed it at Harry and said, “Empire!”
It was the best feeling ever. Harry felt a floating feeling.
As every thought and problem in his head was carefully digested,
Leaving nothing but vague, untraceable bliss. He stood there.
You feel very relaxed, just a little bit of looking at everyone I see
he.
And then he heard Mad-Eye Moody’s voice, echoing in some
The distant room of his disturbed mind: Jump on the desk . . . leap
On the desk. . . .
Harry braced his legs, preparing for the spring.
Jump on the desk. . . .
Why, though? Another voice rose in the back of his mind.

' '
Terrible thing to do, really, the voice said.
Jump on the desk. . . .
No, I don’t think I will, thank you, said the other voice, a bit more
strongly . . . No, I really don’t want to. . . .
leap! now !
The next thing Harry felt was a huge pain. has two
jumped and tried to stop himself from jumping — result
That he bumped his head into the desk and hit it,
And, with the feeling in his fingers, he dislocated both of his fingers.
“Now, that’s more like it!” said Moody's voice, and suddenly,
Harry felt the weird, tingly feeling in his head disappear. He remembered exactly what happened, and the pain in his legs
It looks like both.
“Look at that, you . . . Potter fought! He fought for it, and he
Damn near beat him! Let's try this again, Potter, it's up to you,
Pay attention — watch his eyes, that’s where you’ll see him — a lot
Good, Potter, very good indeed! They will have trouble coping
you!"
“The way he talks,” Harry muttered as he stormed out of Defense Against the Dark Arts class an hour later (Moody had insisted
About putting Harry through his paces four times in a row, until
Harry could have dropped that argument altogether), “you’d think we were together .
He’s going to get shot every second.”
“Yeah, I know,” said Ron, who was examining each proposal .
course. He had a much harder time with the curse than Harry.
although Moody had assured him the debt would be settled by lunchtime. “Talk about sexism . . .” Ron looked nervously at his
shoulders to make sure Moody was really out of earshot and
He continued. “No wonder they were happy that he was shot in the ministry. Listen to him tell Seamus what he did to the witch
The one who shouted 'Boo' after him on a foggy April day? And when are they
Should we study about resisting the Imperius Curse with everything else we have to do?”
All four years see a steady increase in
the amount of work they are required to do during this period. teacher
McGonagall explained why, when the class gave a particularly loud
She grumbled about the amount of Transformation homework she had
allowed.
“You are now entering one of the most important phases of your baldness .
Training!" she told them, her eyes twinkling mischievously after
Its square forests. “Your blonde highlights are disturbing —”
“We don’t take OWLs until year five!” said Diane Thomas
With anger.
“Probably not, Thomas, but believe me, you need all the preparation you can get! Mr. Granger remains the only person at this station.
who manages to turn a hummingbird into a satisfying predator. I can assure you that your stick, Thomas, still bites.
Terrified if anyone comes near him with a knife!”
Hermione, who was turning slightly red, seemed to be trying not to look too pleased with herself.
Harry and Ron were ecstatic when Professor Trelawney said
He told them that they got top marks on their homework in
their next Divination class. She read large chunks of what they said, and praised them for implicitly agreeing .

' '
horror drives them — but they’re less proud when
She asks them to do the same for the next month; both
in them were running out of protest ideas.
Meanwhile, Professor Binns, the ghost who teaches the history of
Magic, it’s easy to write weekly reviews of the 1990 monster uprising.
the eighteenth century. Professor Snape has been forcing them to research the effects of magic. They took that one seriously, as he said that
Might have to move one of them before Christmas to see if
The antidote works. Professor Flitwick asks them to study three
Other books in preparation for their lesson on Summoning Charms.
Even Hagrid was adding to their schedule. The bottle is over.
The screwts were growing at a remarkable pace because no one had
He still got the food. Hagrid is pleased, and part of
Their “suggestion,” suggested that they descend to his shop on different mornings to check out the screws and make notes of their unusual behavior.
“I wouldn’t,” Draco Malfoy whispered when he suggested Hagrid .
This is with the air of Santa Claus pulling a very large toy
of his car. “I see a lot of these negatives in lessons, .
thank you."
Hagrid's smile left his face.
“Yeh'llll wha' yer said,” he said, “or I'd be takin' a leaf outta
Professor Moody's book. . . . I heard yeh made a good farm, Malfoy.”
The Gryffindors laughed. Malfoy ran through the
anger, but apparently the memory of Moody’s punishment remains
with enough pain to stop him from retrieving. Harry, Ron, and
Hermione returned to the castle at the end of a lesson in class.
Spirits; Seeing Hagrid put Malfoy down was especially amusing.
BOXBUTTON and
DURMS ROAD
' '
Especially since Malfoy did everything in his power to get Hagrid
He was dismissed last year.
When they reached the entrance hall, they found themselves
They could not continue because of the huge crowd of students gathered there, all looking around a huge platform erected around
Marble countertop floor. Run, the eldest of three, stands
on their toes to see over the heads in front of them and read the sign
Out loud to the other two
TRIWIZARD Competition
The Beauxbatons delegations and
Arriving at Durmstrang at 6 p.m.
Friday, October 30th. These issues
She finished half an hour early —
"nasty!" Harry said. “It’s Potions last thing on Friday! snap
He doesn’t have time to make us all jealous!”
Students will return their backpacks and books
to their residences and gather around
of the castle to greet our guests before
The Ceremony of Reception.
“Only a week left!” said Hufflepuff's Ernie Macmillan, stepping out of the crowd, his eyes glittering. “I wonder if Cedric knew?
Think I’ll go tell him. . . .”
“Cedric?” Ron said with a grin as Ernie stormed off.
“Diggory,” Harry said. “He should have entered the tournament.”

' '
“That idiot, the Hogwarts captain?” Run said as they pushed
Their way through the crowd marching towards the platform.
“He wasn’t aggressive. Just don’t like him because he hits
Gryffindor in Quidditch,” Hermione said. “I heard that’s true
A good student—and a prefect.”
She spoke as if that settled the matter.
"You only like him because he's handsome," Ron sighed.
“Sorry, I don’t like people just because they’re nice!”
Hermione said excitedly.
Run gave a loud fake laugh, which sounded awful
“Luckhart!”
The appearance of magnificence in the entrance hall has a special effect on the inhabitants of the castle. In the following week,
There seems to be only one topic of conversation, no matter where
Harry gone: it's the Triwizard Tournament. Voices were coming out of the
Student-to-student as highly infectious organisms: who was to
Try being a Hogwarts vice president, what happens in that tournament,
How are the students at Beauxbaton different from Durmstrang and
themselves.
Harry also noticed that the castle seemed to contain a
Other cleaning. Many thermal images are available
They scrubbed, much to the displeasure of their subjects, who sat cowering in their frames staring into the darkness and squirming as they longed for
Dry faces. The heroic cups were simultaneously sparkling and
They moved without flinching, and Argus Filch, the overseer, was speaking similarly sternly to any student who forgot to wipe their feet .
shoes that startled a first-year girl into obsession.
Other members of the staff seemed nervous as well.
“Longbottom, please don’t prove that you can’t make a single
' '
With the magic of change speeding past everyone from Durmstrang!” Professor McGonagall exclaimed at the end of a particularly difficult ordeal
A lesson, at the time Neville had accidentally planted his
Ears on a cactus.
When they came down to breakfast on the morning of the thirtieth of October, they found that the great hall had been closed during the night. Large silk banners hung on the walls, each
in which they represent Hogwarts House: red with a gold lion for
Gryffindor, green with a silver dragon for Ravenclaw, yellow with
Black badger for Hufflepuff, and green with a silver snake for
Slytherin. Behind the teachers table was the largest bench
The Hogwarts Diary: The Lion, the Wolf, the Hedgehog, and the Snake unite
On a capital H.
Harry, Ron, and Hermione sat next to Fred and George on
The Gryffindor table. Once again, and quite unusually, there are
They sat apart from everyone else and spoke in a low voice. run
He made his way to them.
“That’s crazy, okay,” George repeats wistfully to Fred.
“But if he doesn’t speak to us in person, we should send him
A letter after all. Or we shoot it into his hand. He cannot forgive us.
forever."
“Who beat you?” Ron said, sitting down next to them.
“The thief will,” Fred said, looking pained at being interrupted.
“What’s a boomer?” Run asked George.
“You’ll have a git of a tail like you for your brother,” said George.
“You two have any ideas for the triwizard tournament yet?”
Harry asked. “Have you thought more about trying to get in?”
“I asked McGonagall how the champions were selected but she .

' '
He wasn’t messing around,” George sighed. “She just told me to shut up .
And it ended up looking my best.”
“Are you asking what the jobs will be?” Ron said with a smile.
“You know, I think we can make them, Harry. We did the wrong thing.
Things before. . . .”
"Not in front of a panel of judges, you won't," Fred said.
“McGonagall said that champions get points based on
The way they did things.”
“Who are the judges?” Harry asked.
“Well, the heads of schools who always attend the
panel,” Hermione said, and everyone looked at her, with a
They were surprised, “because all three were shot during the 1792 race, when a cockatrice was supposed to be rivals .
He would have been caught going on a rampage.”
She saw them all staring at her, and she said, with her usual air
of impatience that no one else had read all the books she had, “It’s .
All throughout Hogwarts, History. Although, of course, the book is not entirely reliable. The alternate history of Hogwarts would be a more accurate title. or the random and selective history of Hogwarts,
Which brings us to the nastier aspects of school.”
“What are you talking about?” Ron said, though Harry thought he was
He knew what was coming.
“House elves!” Hermione said, her eyes widening. “Not all at once, in
Over a thousand pages, if Hogwarts, History mentions that we
They all share the fate of a hundred slaves!”
Harry shook his head and leaned back against his fried eggs.
His lack of joy was from Run doing nothing to
They crushed Hermione's determination to pursue justice for the house elves.
' '
Of course, both of them had paid two Sickles for the SPEW stamp, but
They were just doing it to shut her up. Their jealousies were
He was relieved, however; If anything, they seem to have made Hermione
More talking. She had been pining over Harry and Ron ever since,
First they would wear the badges, then they would convince others to do the same, and
She also got to hang out in the Gryffindor room.
Every evening, they round up people and cram the collection stick under their noses.
“You feel that your tables have been turned, your fire kindled, .
The classrooms are cleaned, and your food is cooked by a group of wizards
an unpaid and enslaved creature?” She kept talking back.
Some people, like Neville, paid just to keep Hermione
from glowing over them. Some people seem interested in what
It should say, but they don’t want to take a more active role in the campaign. Many consider the whole thing a joke.
Ron now turned his eyes to the ceiling, which blinded them
Everything in the autumn sunlight, and Fred grew very fond of his
bacon (both companies refuse to buy the SPEW badge). George,
However, she picked up on Hermione's point of view.
“Listen, have you ever been under the toilet, Hermione?”
"No, of course not," Hermione said flatly, "I don't think students should —"
“Well, we have,” George said, remembering Fred, “a lot of times, .
I'll nick the food. And we met them, and they’re happy. They think
They have the best job in the world —”
“That’s because they’re uneducated and brainwashed!” Hermione began calmly, but her next few words were drowned out by
The pressure tone from the head, indicated by

' '
arrival of post animals. Harry looked up suddenly and saw Hedwig
floating to his side. Hermione abruptly stopped talking; She is a
Ron watched Hedwig worriedly as she hovered over Harry's
height, flapped its wings, and thrust out its leg in pain.
Harry copied Sirius' answer and handed Hedwig her wand.
clothes, which she ate happily. Then, they discover that Fred is
George were safely immersed in further discussion of the Triwizard race, Harry reading Sirius's letter in frown to .
Ron and Hermione.
Good try, Harry.
I went back to the surface and hid well. I want you to keep
Me posted about everything going on at Hogwarts. Do not use
Hedwig, keep changing circles, and don't worry about me, just
Take care of yourself. Don’t forget what I said about your haircut.
“Why d'you have to keep changing pigs?” Run asked in a small voice.
sound.
"Hedwig will attract a lot of attention," Hermione said suddenly.
“It started. The snowflake returns wherever
hidden . . . I mean, they’re not native birds, are they?”
Harry crumpled up the letter and tucked it inside his robe, wondering if he felt more or less worried than usual. He thought that Sirius had managed to get back without getting caught and
some. He couldn't even deny that the thought of Sirius was
Too close was intimidating; At least he didn’t have to wait that long.
She loves the response every time he writes.
“Thank you, Hedwig,” he said, hugging her. she cried out sleepily,
' '
She momentarily sank her mouth into her bottle of orange juice, then held
off again, apparently in need of a good long sleep in the Owlery.
There was a nice feeling of anticipation in the air that day.
No one was paying much attention to the lessons, as he was much more focused
On arrival that afternoon folks from Beauxbatons and
Durmstrang; Even Potions was more bearable than ever, as it was
Half an hour is difficult. When the bell rang earlier, Harry, Run, and
Hermione hurried to Gryffindor tower and dropped their bags
And the books as they were bidden, drew their clothes, and
He hurried downstairs to the entrance hall.
The Heads of the Houses were cheering their students in line.
“Weasley, head on straight,” Professor McGonagall said softly .
in Run. “Miss Patil, take that headband out of your hair.”
Parvati smiled and plucked a large decorative butterfly from the
The end of his smile.
"Follow me, please," Professor McGonagall said. “The first years in
front . . . No pressure. . . .”
They filled in the hedges and erected fences around the castle. it
It was a cool, clear evening; Evening had fallen and a pale, pale looking moon was already shining over the enchanted forest.
Harry, standing between Run and Hermione in the fourth row
From the front, he watched Dennis Creevey gracefully crack a smile among the other first years.
“Almost six,” Ron said, looking at his watch, then looking .
Down the car that leads to the front doors. “Do you think
Are they coming? The car?”
“I doubt it,” Hermione said.
“How then? Fireballs?” Harry suggested, looking towards the
A sky full of stars.

' '
“I don’t think so . . . Not from that distance. . . .”
“The backpack?” Run suggested. “Or they could Apparate — maybe .
Are you willing to do it under seven ten wherever they come from?”
“You cannot Apparate inside the Hogwarts grounds, how many times do you
Should I tell you?” Hermione said anxiously.
They scanned the ruined floor frantically, but nothing
looking; All was still, quiet, and exactly as usual. There was Harry
He started to feel cold. He hoped they would fall. . . . Perhaps the foreign students were planning a dramatic entrance. . . . He remembered what Mr. Weasley had said earlier in camp before he left .
Quidditch World Cup: “always the same — we couldn’t care less about the show .
off when we meet. . . .”
And then Dumbledore called from the backstage where he was .
He stands with other teachers —
"go ahead! If I am not mistaken, the delegation of
Buckbaton is near!”
"where?" Several students said excitedly, all looking at different things
Directions.
"there!" yelled a sixth year, looking over the forest.
Something big, much bigger than a spider — or, indeed, .
A hundred flashes of magic—it was soaring through the deep blue sky towards the castle, growing stronger each time.
“It’s a drag!” Screamed one of the first years, lost her ankle
completely.
“Don’t be complacent . . . It’s a flying house!” Dennis Creevy said.
Dennis's thoughts were close. . . . as a large black shape
Skimmed over the treetops of the haunted forest and the lights
Flashing through the windows of the castle struck it, they saw a huge, powder-grey crane the size of a large house creeping towards the
' '
ten, drawn across the air by dozens of winged horses, together with palominos, each the size of a pig.
The front three rights of the students pulled back like a car.
shaking all the time, reaching the ground with great speed —
Then, with a huge splash that made Neville jump back
On a fifth year Slytherin pair of horseshoes, bigger than
dinner plate, hit the floor. A second later, the car crashed.
He, too, leaps upon his great chariots, while the golden horses leap
Their massive heads and large, fiery blue eyes.
Harry had just enough time to notice that the wardrobe door had a
Flag (two intersecting, golden cauldrons, each spitting out three stars)
Before opening.
A boy in a blue suit jumped out of the car and jumped.
Next, he looks around for a moment at the car
ground, and unfurled a set of gold coins. He left respectfully. Then Harry saw a shiny, high-topped black figure take off.
From inside the car — a stroller-sized pump —
He was followed, almost immediately, by the most famous woman he had
seen throughout his life. The riders, and the horses, immediately explained. Some people are silent.
Harry had only ever seen a being as big as this woman in
his life, and with Hagrid; I doubt if
Inch difference in their height. But somehow — perhaps simply
because he had lost Hagrid — this woman (now under the foot of
steps, and look at the waiting crowd, wide-eyed)
It seems more unnaturally large. As she stepped into the light
peeking through the entrance hall, she revealed that she had a beautiful, olive-skinned face; Large, black eyes, looking like sand; and a
Often beaky nose. Her hair is pulled back in a shiny bun in the

' '
the base of his head. She was dressed head to toe in black.
satin, and lots of big glittering lace around her neck and about
His big fingers.
Dumbledore began to nod; disciples, following in his footsteps,
They even broke into a smile, many of them standing on their knees, so that we better look at this woman.
Her face relaxed in a kind smile and she stepped forward.
To Dumbledore's surprise, he held out a gleaming hand. Dumbledore,
Although he was tall himself, he almost bent down to kiss him.
“My dear Miss Maxime,” he said. “Welcome to Hogwarts.”
"In a strange way," said Madam Maxime in a deep voice. “I'll 'ope
I find you good?”
"At best, I thank you," Dumbledore said.
"My pupils," said Madame Maxime, stretching one of her large hands vainly behind her.
Harry, whose attention was completely focused
Madame Maxime, now discovering that about a dozen boys and girls,
All of whom, in turn, at the end of their pregnancies, emerge from
car and they were now standing behind Madame Maxime. they
They were pale, which wasn’t surprising, since their clothes
It looked like a fine silk, and none of them wore
balls. Some wore coats and hats over their heads.
From what Harry had seen of them (they were standing in Madame
Maxime's large shadow), they were heading up towards Hogwarts
with fearful looks on their faces.
“ 'That's how Karkaroff got so far?” Miss Maxim asked.
"He should be here any moment," Dumbledore said. "will
Would you rather wait here and greet him or would you rather come in and warm up a little something?”
"Calm down, I suppose," said Madame Maxime. “But ze 'bears —”
“Our Magical Beast Care Master would be happy to bring
Take care of them,” Dumbledore said, “the moment he gets back .
From dealing with a small situation that came out with some of it
other — er — right.”
“Screws,” Ron said to Harry, glaring at him.
“My horses are in serious need of — er — 'andling,'” said Madame .
Maxime, looked as if she doubted whether any Care of Magical Creatures teacher at Hogwarts could be up to the task. “They were
Very strong. . . .”
"I assure you that Hagrid will be fine with the job," Dumbledore said, smiling.
"All right," said Madame Maxime, bowing slightly. “You’ll pay
Please tell zis 'Agrid zat ze 'bears only drink single malt whiskey?”
“He will be attended to,” Dumbledore said, also bowed.
"Come," whispered Madame Maxime to her pupils,
And the Hogwarts crowd divided to allow her and her students to
Step on top of the rock.
“How big do you think the horses of Durmstrang would be?”
Seamus Finnigan said, leaning over Lavender and Parvati to speak to Harry and Ron.
“Well, if they’re bigger than this lot, Hagrid won’t be either .
He could handle them,” Harry said. “That’s if he doesn’t get caught .
With his screwdrivers. Wonder what happened to them?”
“They must have escaped,” Ron said hopefully.
“Oh don’t say that,” Hermione snapped. "imagine
That lot loose on the ground. . . .”
They stood, squirming a little now, and waited for Durmstrang .
The party will arrive. Most people were looking hopefully to the sky.

' '
For a few minutes, only Madame broke the silence
Maxime’s big horses neighed and pranced. But then —
“Can you hear anything?” Ron said quietly.
Harry listened; A loud and terrifying noise was rising to the side.
Out of the Darkness: The Monster and the Suspense
sound, like a large compressor moving
The river of the river. . . .
“The ice!” cried Lee Jordan, looking down at him. “Look at the
lake!"
From their position at the top of the cliff overlooking the
Basically, they have a clear view of the dark red earth of
water — except that the earth is not suddenly completely dry.
Some scuffle was going on on the dark floor; Huge storms were forming over the land, which were now washing families across
sand banks — and then, out on the beach, a
It looked bright, like a giant storm just came out of
The bottom of the ocean. . . .
What appeared to be a long, black tunnel began to slowly expand from
The heart of the bell . . . and then Harry saw the armor. . . .
“It’s a mast!” He said to Ron and Hermione.
Slowly, effortfully, the ship emerged from the water, glistening in the
Moonlight. She has a very simple hair look, like
It was a resurrected ship, and bright, glowing lights
In its bars they looked like the eyes of a ghost. Finally, with a loud crashing noise, the ship completely came loose, teetering on the whirlpool .
water, and began to wade to the bank. Moments later,
They heard the crash of a shovel being thrown on the floor, and the thud of a shovel being dropped on the bench.
People were begging; They can see their own footage.
They outshine the lights on the ship’s walls. All of them, Harry observed, seemed to be built along the lines of Crabbe and Goyle . . .
But then, when they got closer, they walked across the grass towards the light
coming out of the entrance hall, he noticed that most of them were real
Due to the fact that they were wearing hats of some sort,
Fur matted. But the man who brought them to the castle was
He wears fur of a different kind: silver and gold, like his hair.
“Drum!” he called out heartily as he walked around the corner.
“How are you, baby, how are you?”
"Blooming, thank you, Professor Karkaroff," Dumbledore replied.
Karkaroff has a productive, graceful voice; When he entered the
Light streamed in from the front gates of the castle, and they saw that he
He was as tall and dark as Dumbledore, but his white hair was short.
And her goatee (complete with a small ribbon) doesn’t quite hide hers
The chin is weak. When he reached Dumbledore, he shook his hand
With both of his own.
“Old Hogwarts,” he said, looking at the castle and smiling; Her teeth were a little yellow, and Harry could see that her smile
It didn't advance to his eyes, which remained cold and keen. "how
Good to be here, how good. . . . Victor, come on, read on.
Heat . . . Have you no idea, Dumblur? Viktor has a small chin.
cold. . . .”
Karkaroff muttered to one of his students. Like the boy
Passing, Harry caught a glimpse of a familiar pointed nose and
Dark brown eyes. He didn't need the shot on Ron's arm.
He gave him, or a tone in his ear, to recognize the element.
“Harry—that’s Krum!”

Chapter Sixteen
FIRE BOTTLE

I don’t believe it!” Ron said, in a low, Hogwarts -like voice.
The students retreated in a hurry after the party from Durmstrang. “Chrome, Harry! Victor Croom!”
"For heaven's sake, Ron, he's just a Quidditch player," he said .
Hermione.
“Only the Quidditch player?” Run said, looking at her like he
He couldn't believe his ears. “Hermione — you’re one of the best Seekers .
In the world! I didn’t know he was still in school!”
As they entered the entrance hall with the rest of Hogwarts
The students were heading for the main hall, Harry noticed Lee Jordan jumping up and down on the tip of his toes to get a better view of the
Behind Krum's head. Several sixth-year girls rummaged frantically in their pockets as they walked —
“Oh I don’t believe it, I don’t even have a gun on me—”
“Do you think he’ll sign my necklace?”
“Sure,” Hermione said sternly as they passed the girls, now .
They fight over the flame.
"I get his autograph if I can," Ron said. “You don’t have
Quill, have you, Harry?”
“No, they’re upstairs in my car,” Harry said.
They walked over to the Gryffindor table and sat down. run
Be careful to stay on the side facing the door, because Krum is
His Durmstrang friends were still crowding around him, apparently unsure of where to sit. The Beauxbatons students had chosen seats at the Ravenclaw table. They were lookin
in front of the Great Hall with somber expressions on their faces. three
of them still wearing cloaks and scarves over their heads.
“It’s not that cold,” Hermione said defensively. “Why didn't they
Get a dress?”
"here! Come sit here!” Run sighed. "here!
Hermione, bend over and take a seat—”
"what?"
“Too long,” Ron sighed.
Viktor Krum and his fellow students of Durmstrang have declared themselves
Themselves at the Slytherin table. Harry could see Malfoy, the Crab,
And Goyle looks very sorry for that. As he watched, Malfoy
He leaned forward to talk to Krum.
“Yeah, right, smartass, Malfoy,” Ron said .
with enthusiasm. “I hope that Krum can see right through him, though . . . bet
He gets people flipping out on him all the time. . . . where are you
Do they plan to rest? We can assign it a position in the
orphanage, Harry . . . I’m not going to give him my bed, I can
kip on a camp bed.”
Chapter Sixteen
' '
Hermione sighed.
"They look a lot more fun than the Beauxbatons liquor," Harry said.
The students of Durmstrang were drawing their heavy torch and
Looking up at the red ceiling adorned with angry expressions; a
Two of them were collecting gold plates and bags and
She squeezed them, obviously impressed.
Over at the staff table, Filch, the butler, was lifting chairs. he
He was wearing his old dark clothes that suited the occasion. Harry
He was surprised to see that he had added four chairs, two on either side of the
of Dumbledore.
"But there were only two other people," Harry said. “Why Filch
They’ve got four chairs, who else is coming?”
"Yes?" Ron said vaguely. He was still looking angrily at Krum.
When all the students entered the hall and lined up on the
Their Home allowance, the staff went in and invested up to the average allowance and
They take their places. Last in line were Professor Dumbledore, Professor Karkaroff, and Miss Maxim. When their instructor showed up, the Beauxbatons students jumped to their feet. Some of the
The Hogwarts students laughed. The Beuxbatons Party appeared .
They were not too embarrassed, however, and did not resume their positions until Madame Maxime was seated on Dumbledore's left side.
Dumbledore remained standing, and silence fell over the Elder .
hall.
"Good evening, ladies and gentlemen, dwarves and — especially — guests," Dumbledore said, smiling at the stranger's expression .
Students. “I have the great pleasure of welcoming you all to Hogwarts. I
Hope and trust that your stay here will be a wonderful one and
happy.”

' '
One of the Beauxbatons girls still clutches a necklace .
The chief gave what couldn't have been a mocking smile.
“No one’s letting you stay!” She loved Hermione, she cared about
her.
“The tournament will officially launch at the end of
wedding,” Dumbledore said. “I invite you all now to eat, drink, and
Make yourselves at home!”
He sat down, and Harry saw Karkaroff lean forward suddenly and
You continue it in the chat.
The shelves in front of them were filled with food as usual. The homeowners in the kitchen seem to have pulled out all the stops; there
There was more variety of dishes in front of them than Harry ever had
They believe, including many who are outright liberals.
“What’s that?” Ron said, pointing to a large piece of some sort of
a heap of leather standing next to a big steak-kidney pudding.
"The bull-bass," Hermione said.
“Bless you,” Ron said.
“It’s French,” Hermione said, “I had it the summer on holiday before
last. cool."
“I’ll take your word for it,” Ron said, helping himself to bolt .
Budding.
The main hall somehow seemed more crowded than
Anytime, even if there aren’t twenty other students
there; Probably because their different colored clothes.
it stood out so clearly against the black of the Hogwarts uniform. now
that they took off their feathers, and the students of Durmstrang were shown wearing deep bloodsuits.
Hagrid entered the hall through the door behind the staff table.

' '
Twenty minutes after the start of the concert. It fell into place on
Finally and nodded at Harry, Ron, and Hermione with a very tightly folded hand.
“Screwts doing all right, Hagrid?” Harry called out.
“Thrivin,” Hagrid replied cheerfully.
“Yeah, I’ll just bet they are,” Ron sighed. “It looks like they have
They finally found food they liked, didn’t they? Hagrid’s fingers.”
At that moment, a voice said, “I’m sure you want ze
bottles?”
It was the girl from Beauxbatons who laughed at Dumbledore's words. She finally took off her hat. Long Table
of silver hair that fell almost to her waist. She has a big, deep
Blue eyes, and very yellow, even teeth.
Ron went pink. He stared at her, opening his mouth to answer, but nothing came out except for a low whirring noise.
“Yeah, have it,” Harry said, pushing the cloth towards the girl.
“You done wiz it?”
“Yeah,” Ron whispered. “Yeah, it was nice.”
The girl picked up the box and carefully carried it to the
The Ravenclaw table. Ron was still looking at the girl like he had
I had never seen one before. Harr y started laughing. The sound was clear.
He would bring Ron back to his senses.
“She’s a veela!” He said softly to Harry.
“Of course she’s not!” Hermione said anxiously. “I didn’t see anyone .
Else looks at her like an idiot!”
But she’s not entirely right about that. As the girl passes
Hall, a lot of boys’ heads are round, and some of them seem to have
They became utterly speechless, as did Ron.
“I’m telling you, she’s not a normal girl!” Run said, leaning

' '
sideways so he can keep a clear view of it. “They don't
They’re the same at Hogwarts!”
“They get them for free at Hogwarts,” Harry said without thinking. Cho happens to stay only a few seats away from
Girl with silver hair.
“When you both roll your eyes,” Hermione said .
Simply, “you’ll see who just arrived.”
She was heading towards the staff table. Both remain empty
They had just filled the seats. Ludo Bagman was currently sitting on the opposite side of Professor Karkaroff, while Mr. Crouch, Percy's boss, was across from him .
To Mrs. Maxim.
“What are they doing here?” Harry said nervously.
“They’re organizing a Triwizard Tournament, aren’t they?” said
Hermione. “I think they want to be here to see it start.”
When it came to the second floor they too saw many acts unfamiliar. He served Run an indescribable variety of soft Blanmange.
close, then gently moved it a few inches to his right, so that
It will definitely appear from the Ravenclaw portfolio. The girl
Looks like a veela seems to have eaten enough, though, and
He didn’t come to get it.
When the golden plates were cleaned, Dumbledore
He stood up again. A strange kind of excitement seemed to fill the room
now. Harry felt a pang of happiness, wondering what the
coming. Several seats below them, Fred and George were
he leaned forward, staring at Dumbledore with a wide grin.
“The time has come,” Dumbledore said, looking at the .
A sea of ​​repetitive faces. “The Triwizard tournament is about to be
start. I want to say a few words of explanation before we get
In the car —”

' '
“What is that?” Harry said.
Run held up his hand.
“— just to clarify the way we’re going to handle this .
year. But first, let me introduce, for those unfamiliar with them,
Mr. Bartimaeus Crouch, Head of International Department
A simple partner”—there was a hint of amusement—“was Mr. Ludo Bagman, Head of the Bureau of
Magic games and sports.”
There was a much louder version of Bagman screaming than
For Crouch, maybe because of his involvement with the Beater, or just because he thinks he’s so much more beloved. He accepted it with a
jovial wave of his hand. Bartimaeus the Crook did not smile or wave.
When his name was announced. I remember him in his blue suit
At the Quidditch World Cup, Harry thought he looked awful in the
The Wizard's Cloak. His toothbrush filler and hard diffuser look
It was very pale next to Dumbledore's long white hair and beard.
" Sir. Bagman and Mr. Crouch worked diligently on the
The last few months on the run-up to the Triwizard Tournament," Dumbledore continued, "and to join myself, .
Professor Karkaroff, and Miss Maxim in the panel will
judge the efforts of the ancients.”
When the word “ancients” was mentioned, the focus of
Students who sounded like they were annoyed. Maybe Dumbledore had
He saw their immediate concern, for he smiled when he said, “The window,
Then, if you wish, Mr. Filch.”
Filch, who was lurking out of sight in a corner of the
Hall, now closer to Dumbledore brought a large wooden chest .
driven by need. It looks very old. The animal of
Cheers of delight rose from the watching pupils; Denis Crivey

' '
He actually stood up in his chair to see him properly, but, being so small, his
The head is almost never higher than the other's.
“The list of tasks the champions will face this year
They’ve already been picked up by Mr. Crouch and Mr. Bagman,” he said .
Dumbledore as Filch placed the chest gently on the table before
to him, “and they made due provision for each .
challenge. There will be three activities, with a difference in class
year, and they will engage fans in many different ways . . .
their magical strength — their durability — their ability to withdraw — and, of course, their ability to avoid danger.”
At this last word, a strange silence filled the room
that no one seems to be breathing.
“As you know, three teenagers are competing in this tournament,”
Dumbledore continued carefully, “one from each of the participants .
schools. They will be exposed to how they perform each of the
The largest total league and championship coverages after 2019.
the third mission wins the Triwizard Cup. The champions will be chosen by an uneasy choice: the Goblet of Fire.”
Dumbledore now removed his wand and tapped three times.
On the top of the tank. The box slowly closes. Dumbledore reached inside it and pulled out a large, roughly cut piece of wood .
cup. Wouldn’t be so great if it wasn’t full
to the middle with dark brown spots.
Dumbledore closed the casket and placed the cup carefully on it.
its summit, where it will be made public to everyone in the House.
“Anybody who wants to run for president has to write .
Their name and school clearly on a piece of paper and put it
At the top,” Dumbledore said. “League officials have
Twenty-two hours in which to list their names. tomorrow

' '
night, Halloween, the candy will repeat the names of the three
He insisted the most deserving represent their schools. The trophy will
It will be installed in the entry hall tonight, where it will be freely accessible to all who wish to compete.
“So that no underage student is ever offended,” he said.
Dumbledore, “I’m going to draw an age ring around the
fire when placed in the entrance hall. No one is under the
Seventeen years old will be able to cross the line.
“Finally, I want to encourage any of you who want to compete .
that this tournament was not to be entered lightly. If a ruler is chosen by the Goblet of Fire, he or she is obliged to
Watch the championship to the end. Putting your name
At the top represents a binding contract, magic. It can be
No changing of heart once you become president. Please be
Surely, then, that you are wholeheartedly preparing to play
Before you throw your name on the board. Now, I think it's time
For bed. Goodnight to you all.”
“The Age Line!” Fred Weasley said, his eyes sparkling, as they all
They made their way across the hall to the entrance hall doors.
"Well, that should be dispelled by the Aging Potion, shouldn't it?" and
If your name is on that locker, you laugh - it cannot be said
Whether you’re seventeen or not!”
“But I don’t think anyone under seven would stand a chance,”
Hermione said, “we just don’t learn enough . . .”
“Speak for yourselves,” George snapped. “You’re trying to get in,
Didn’t you, Harry?”
Harry briefly thought about warning Dumbledore that no one
Under seventeen had to submit their name, but then the pretty picture of himself winning the Triwizard tournament filled his name .

' '
The brain too. . . . He wondered how angry Dumbledore would be if
Someone no older than seventeen found a way to pass the time.
line. . . .
“Where is he?” Run said, not hearing a word of that
conversation, but looks around the crowd to see what happened to Krum. "Dumbledur didn't say where Durmstrang was
People are dreaming, aren’t they?”
But this question was answered almost instantly; are on the level
With the Slytherin dungeon now, and Karkaroff had just shrunk to
His students.
“Back to the boat, then,” it was reciting. “Victor, how are you
feeling? Did you eat right? Should I send some hot wine?
From the kitchens?”
Harry saw Krum shake his head as he pulled back his wand.
“Professor, I look like some roses,” said one of the other Durmstrang boys hopefully.
"I'm not serving you, Poliakoff," said Karkaroff, his
His father’s warmth evaporates at the same time. “I noticed you had
throwing food all over the front of your shirt again, it’s funny
boy -"
Karkaroff turned, led his pupils to the gates, and reached
of them at the exact same moment as Harry, Ron and Hermione.
Harry moved to let him go first.
"Thank you," Karkaroff said mischievously, glancing back at him.
And then Karkaroff fractured. He turned his head to Harry and
She looked at him like he couldn't believe his eyes. Behind them
Headmaster, the students of Durmstrang came to stop by as well.
Karkaroff's eyes slowly moved up to Harry's face, studying his face .
scar. The Durmstrang students were even looking at Harry with confusion.

' '
Out of the corner of his eye, Harry saw comprehension emerge in a
Their little faces. The boy with all the food down in front of him gasped
The girl in front of him and pointed blankly at Harry's cock.
“Yeah, that’s Harry Potter,” a soft voice said from behind
them.
Professor Karkaroff turned around. Maday Modi was standing
There, he leaned heavily on his haunches, his magical eyes fixed unwaveringly on the Durmstrang master.
The color drained from Karkaroff's face as he watched Harry. a
a terrible feeling of pleasure mixed with fear came over him.
"you!" he said, looking at Moody like he couldn't believe he was actually
They see it.
“I am,” Moody growled. “And if you don’t have anything to .
Tell the Potters, Karkaroff, you might want to move. You're blocking
gate."
true; Half the students in the Hall were now waiting behind them, glancing over each other’s shoulders to see what was
Because of stress.
Without another word, Professor Karkaroff cleared his students .
away with him. Moody watched him until he was out of sight, his
A magical eye peered into his head, a look of intense dislike in his
A ripped face.
Since tomorrow is a Saturday, most students will have
She ate the breakfast reluctantly. However, Harry, Ron and Hermione were not
Alone in the development much earlier than they usually do on weekends.
When they got to the door, they saw about
Twenty people mill around him, some of them eating stew, all gazing at the Cup of Fire. was placed in the middle of the

' '
the throne room that regularly carries the Sorting Hat. Thin gold
A line is drawn on the ground, forming a ten-foot circle around the
It on all sides.
“Has anyone put their name down yet?” Run asked a third year girl
willingly.
“All the dung of Durmstrang,” she replied. “But I didn’t see anyone .
From Hogwarts still.”
“Bet some of them put it on last night after we all went to bed,”
Harry said. “I would if I were you . . . won't
Everyone is watching. What if the cup ate right back at you
out again?”
Someone laughed behind Harry. Turning around, he saw Fred, George,
and Lee Jordan suddenly stepped up, all three looked very happy.
“She did it,” Fred said with a triumphant grin to Harry, Ron, and .
Hermione. “Just taking it.”
"what?" Run said.
“Terrible manners, terrible mind,” Fred said.
“One drop for each,” George said, rubbing his hands together and .
happiness. “We just need to have a great few months.”
“We will distribute a thousand Galleries between three
Us if one of us wins,” Lee said, grinning.
"I don't think that's going to work, you know," Hermione said .
Simply “I’m sure Dumbledore must have thought of that.”
Fred, George and Lee didn't count.
"ready?" Fred said to the other two, grinning excitedly.
“C'mon, then — I'll go first —”
Harry watched, fascinated, as Fred pulled a paper
From his pocket he carried the words Fred Weasley — Hogwarts. Fred

' '
He walked to the edge of the wall and stood there, shaking
His steps are like someone preparing for a fifty-foot drop. Then, with
The eyes of every person in the entrance hall were on him, he took a big
breath and stepped over the line.
For a split second, Harry thought that it worked—George certainly thought so, because he let out a victorious cry and jumped after .
Fred — but the next moment, there was a loud crashing sound, and
The two twins were kicked out of the golden city like they had
He was thrown by an unseen assailant. They fell painfully, ten
Feet on the cold stone floor, and to add insult to injury, there
It was loud, and they both turned out different
Long white beard.
The entrance hall roared with laughter. Even Fred and George
They took part in it, when they got to their feet and got a good look
In someone else's ear.
“I did warn you,” said a deep, proud voice, and everyone .
He turned to see Professor Dumbledore leaving the Great Hall.
He checked Fred and George, his eyes burning. “I suggest you
The two move towards Madam Pomfrey. She was already taking care of Mrs. Fawcett, of Ravenclaw, and Mr. Summers, of Hufflepuff, the two
who decided to tire themselves out a bit too. Although I must say,
None of their tastes look like yours.”
Fred and George leave for the hospital wing, accompanied by
Lee, who was howling with laughter, and Harry, Ron, and
Hermione, also giggling, went in for breakfast.
The decorations in the Great Hall are changing this morning.
As it was Halloween, the tree of living ghouls was floating around the
The painted ceiling, while looking out from the

' '
Every corner. Harry made his way over to Dean and Seamus, who
They were talking about those Hogwarts students of seventeen or more
He could be entering.
“There is an apparent rumor that Warrington rose early and .
Put his name down,” Dean told Harry. “That old Slytherin guy .
Who looks like an idiot.”
Harry, who was playing Quidditch against Warrington, shakes his leg
Head in pain.
“We can’t have a Slytherin chairman!”
"And all the Hufflepuffs are talking about Diggory," Seamus said .
With contempt. “But I didn’t think he would want to .
it affects his good looks.”
"listen!" Hermione said suddenly.
People were cheering in the entrance hall. They all turned around.
They spun in their seats and saw Angelina Johnson walking into the
Hall, grinning in a kind of embarrassment. Tall black girl
Played Chaser on the Gryffindor Quidditch team, Angelina came
In front of them, he sat down and said, “Oh, I got it! Just put mine
Name in!”
“You’re kidding!” Ron said, looking curious.
“You’re seventeen, then?” Harry asked.
“ 'Course she is, she can’t see a beard, can she?” Run said.
“I had my birthday last week,” Angelina said.
“Well, I’m glad someone from Gryffindor came in,” he said .
Hermione. “I really hope you find her, Angelina!”
"Thank you, Hermione," Angelina said, smiling at her.
"Yeah, you're smarter than PrettyBoy Diggory," Seamus said, causing several Hufflepuffs around their table to chuckle at him.

' '
“What are we going to do today, then?” Ron asked Harry and
Hermione when they had finished breakfast and were leaving
The large living room.
"We're not stopping by to check on Hagrid," Harry said.
“Fine,” Ron said, “just as long as he doesn’t ask us to give .
Fewer legs for the screws.”
A look of sheer joy suddenly spread across Hermione's
face.
“I just realized — I didn’t ask Hagrid to join SPEW .
Still!" she said with a chuckle. “Wait, you're going to want it, while I'm poking upstairs
And you’re going to get those secrets?”
“What’s with him?” Ron said, exasperated, as Hermione crossed
away from the marble pavement.
“Hi, Ron,” Harry said softly. “He’s your friend . . .”
Beauxbatons students were coming from the front
Appearances from above, including, veelagirl. Those gathered on the Peak of the Fire stood back to let them pass, looking on in amazement.
Madame Maxime entered the hall after her students and arranged them in a line. One by one, the Beauxbaton students
They crossed the age limit and put away their paper tags
in a yellowish-green sauce. As each name went up in flames, she turned
briefly and release arrows.
“What do you reckon will happen to those who aren’t selected?”
Run looked at Harry as the Veela girl dropped her paper
in the Cup of Fire. “Consider they go back to school, or quit
district to watch the championship?”
“I don’t know,” Harry said. “Hold on, I guess. . . . madam
Maxime stays to judge, doesn’t she?”

' '
When all of the Beauxbatons students submitted their names,
Madame Maxime dismissed them from the hall and went out to
foundation too.
“Where are they headed, then?” Run said, looking towards the
front doors and looks behind them.
A faint noise behind them announced that Hermione had returned to the SPEW's flagship.
“Oh shit, hurry up,” Ron said, and climbed off the rock .
Turning around, he keeps his eyes on the veelagirl’s back, which is now .
Halfway up the garden is Madame Maxime.
As they approached Hagrid's cabin on the edge of the Forbidden Forest, the mystery of the Beauxbatons' sleeping pavilion was solved.
The big powder blue car they arrived in had
They were stranded two hundred yards from Hagrid’s front door, and
The pupils were rising back inside her. The flying elephant.
The horses that pulled the cart were now grazing in a barn
paddock next to it.
Harry knocked on Hagrid’s door, and Fang’s smile instantly answered
“ 'Bout time!” Hagrid said, as he slammed the door open.
“Thought you quite forgot where I live!”
“We were really busy, Hag —” Hermione started to say, but .
Then she stops dead and stares at Hagrid, who appears to have fallen on
mandatory.
Hagrid was wearing his best (very messy) brown hair.
suit, plus a blue tie and a scarf. This is not a bad thing in
He is, though; Obviously, he tried to brush his hair, using a large
the equivalent of what seems to be car fuel. It was now detached.
down in two clusters — he probably tried the horse’s tail as

' '
Bill, but found he had too much hair. The view is really bad.
All Hagrid. For a moment, Hermione stared at him, then, apparently deciding not to speak, said, "Erm—where are those . . ."
Screws?”
“Out by the chimney,” Hagrid said excitedly. “They’re forming ‘massive, mus’ be nearly three feet long now. On'y problem is,
They started killing each other.”
“Oh no, really?” Hermione said, shooting a wary look at the
Ron, who, staring at Hagrid’s helpless smile, just opened his
Because he would say something about it.
“Yes,” Hagrid said sadly. “ 'S' good, though, I have them in separate boxes now. He's still abou' twenty.”
“Well, that’s great,” Ron said. Hagrid swallowed thickly.
Hagrid's castle had one room, in one of its corners
It was a big bed covered in a soft duvet. A large wooden table and chairs likewise stood in front of the fire under the
percentage of swollen hams and dead birds littering the ceiling.
They sat down at the table while Hagrid started making tea, and
They were soon lost in further discussion of the Triwizard Cup. Hagrid seemed as pleased for her as they were.
“You wait,” he said, smirking. “You jus' waiting. Yer going to see
Some things yeh've never seen before. The work of Firs . . . Oh, but I wasn’t
it’s ter.”
“Go on, Hagrid!” Harry, Ron, and Hermione pressured him, but he
He just shook his head and smiled.
“I don’t want to lose it fer yeh,” Hagrid said. "But it will be
spectacular, I'd say yeh that. Champions will have
Their work is cut out. I never thought I’d live to see the Triwizard
You played it again!”

' '
They ended up having lunch with Hagrid, though they didn't
eat a lot — Hagrid made what he thought was a beef casserole,
But after Hermione pushed a huge dick into his, she, Harry, and
Ron largely lost their temper. But, enjoy themselves
I wish Hagrid had told them what jobs were in the tournament
were to be, wondering which of the intruders might
They’re going to be voted in, and they wonder if Fred is
George were beardless.
Light rain began to fall by mid-afternoon; It was very cool.
They sat around the fire and listened to the crackling of the shells on the
of the classroom, watching Hagrid sport his socks and talk to Hermione about house elves — having flatly refused to join SPEW .
When she showed him her paintings.
"You're going to do them a disservice, Hermione," he said firmly,
Threading a large hair strand with bright yellow thread. " in
Their nature ter look at people, that's what they like, you see? Ihd
Be reluctant to finish their work, you will blame them
If yeh try ter pay 'em.”
“But Harry shoots Dobby, and he’s over the moon about it!”
Hermione said. “And we hear he’s asking for a salary now!”
“Yeah, well, yeh get weirdos in all kinds. I don’t mean there
Not the odd elf who would take liberties, but never too convincing
N 'em ter to do — no, there's nothing you can do, Hermione.”
Hermione looked genuinely concerned and stuffed her purse of
Badges walked back to his car.
By half past five, night had fallen, and Ron, Harry, and
Hermione decided that it was time to head back to the castle for the
A Halloween party — and, more importantly, a warning to
of old-schoolers.

' '
“I’m coming with yeh,” Hagrid said, dropping his darning.
“Jus' give us a sec.”
Hagrid stood up and moved to the dressing table next to his own.
bed, started searching for something inside. They didn’t pay
with lots of attention until a really foul smell reaches their nostrils. Quietly, Ron said, “Hagrid, what is that?”
"Yes?" Hagrid said, turning around with a large bottle in it .
hand. “Do you like it?”
“Is that what happens after the surgery?” Hermione said in a slightly shocked voice.
“Er — cologne water,” Hagrid muttered. He was approaching.
“It’s probably a little too much,” he insisted. “I’m going to go remove it, stop it
on . . .
He came out of the cabin and was seen washing himself
Seriously in the water well outside the window.
“Like cologne?” Hermione said in shock. “Hagrid?”
“What’s with the hair and makeup?” Harry said in a
under the sound.
"look!" Ron said quietly, pointing out the window.
Hagrid had just washed himself and turned 'a school. If he had
He was annoying earlier, it was nothing to what he was doing now.
They got up on their knees very cautiously, so Hagrid wouldn't see
They, Harry, Ron, and Hermione watch from the window and
I knew that Madame Maxim and the students at Beauxbaton had just
got out of their car, apparently about to retire
also. They couldn’t hear what Hagrid was saying, but he was telling
For the one-eyed, wild-eyed Madame Maxime had Hari
I’d never seen him wear it once before — when he was lookin
In great-grandson, Norbert.

' '
“He’s going with her to the castle!” Hermione said excitedly. “I thought he was waiting for us!”
Without glancing back at his crew, Hagrid was
Running around with Madame Maxime, the Beauxbatons students follow in their wake, trying to keep up
Their big moves.
“He loves it!” Ron said in disbelief. “Well, if they persist .
With kids, they’ll set a world record — bet any baby
of theirs will weigh a ton.”
They pushed themselves out of the cabin and closed the door behind them.
them. It was funny because it was dark outside. They let their hair out more
Almost in front of themselves, they laid out a winding gravel road.
“Ooh and they, look!” Hermione whispered.
Durmstrang’s party was marching up to the castle from
The ocean. Viktor Krum was walking side by side with Karkaroff, and
The other students of Durmstrang were cowering behind them.
Ron looked at Krum angrily, but Krum didn’t look the same
He reached the front doors a little ahead of Hermione, Ron, and Harry
And he went through them.
When they entered the Great Hall with nearly bursting glass.
The Cup of Fire was contaminated; He was now standing in front.
of Dumbledore's disappearing car at the teachers' table. Fred and
George — again with a clean slate — seemed to take their loss well.
"I hope it's Angelina," Fred said as Harry, Run and Hermione sat down .
down.
"me too!" Hermione said lightly. “Well, we’ll soon know!”
Halloween seems to take longer than usual.

' '
Probably because it was their second party in two days, Harry didn't
He seems to like food prepared as good as he wants it.
They normally have. Like everyone else in the House, judging by the constantly grinning brows, the impatient smiles on every face, the
watching, and standing to see if Dumbledore had finished eating yet, Harry just wanted the dishes to clear, and to
They listened to who was elected leaders.
Finally, the gold plates are back to their previous flawless looks
state; There was a marked increase in noise level within the
Hall, who died almost instantly when Dumbledore arrived in his
feet. On either side of him, Professor Karkaroff is Madame .
Maxime looked nervous and waited like everyone else. Ludo Bagman
He was out and about looking at the different students. Mr. Crouch, however, looked uneasy, almost bored.
"Well, it's too soon for breakfast to make its decision," Dumbledore said. “I think he needs one more minute. Now, when
They have called the names of the champions, I will ask them to come
To the top of the hall, go past the staff table, and pass
In the next room” — he pointed to the door behind the counter .
Table — “where their special instructions are to be given.”
He took out his wand and flicked a big round bite with it; in
Once, all the clothes except the one inside the carved buttons were
It disappeared, dropping them into a state of darkness. the
The fireball is now brighter than anything else in the
The whole hall, the flickering bell, the dirty blue-whitean almost painful on the eyes. Everyone is watching and waiting. . . . some
People keep checking their watches. . . .
“Any second,” Lee Jordan quipped, two moves over .
Harry.

' '
The flames inside the box had turned black again. Clothes
He started to snap out of it. The next moment, the tongue of fire took a shot at the
air, a piece of carbon paper sticking out of it — all
The room went silent.
Dumbledore took the piece of paper and held it in his hand.
length, so that he could read it by firelight, which had
He returned to blue-green.
"The Chairman of Durmstrang," it read, in a strong, clear accent .
The voice, “it’s going to be Viktor Krum.”
“There’s no future there!” Screams Run like a handball and
enthusiastically lights up the Hall. Harry watched Victor Krum rise from the
Slytherin's table and pillow next to Dumbledore's; he turned
right, walked around the staff table, and jumped off the
Door to the next room.
“Hi, Victor!” said Karkaroff, so loudly that everyone
He could hear it, even over all the commotion. “I know you have it in
you!
Mind and language are dead. Now everyone’s attention
He was staring again at the glass, which, a few seconds later, turned red
Once again. The second strand of the paper emerged from it, revised
with fire.
"The Chairman of the Beauxbatons," Dumbledore said, "is Fleur
Decorum!”
“She is, Run!” yelled Harry as the girl who looked so much like
Veela rose gracefully to her feet and lowered her silver plate.
Red hair, and split between Ravenclaw and Hufflepuff
The doors.
“Oh look, they’re all tight,” Hermione said of the
tone, turning to the rest of the Beauxbatons party.

' '
“Disappointed” was a bit of an understatement, Harry thought.
Two of the girls who were not selected burst into tears .
And they were screaming with their heads on their arms.
When even Fleur Delacour disappeared into the side room,
Silence fell again, but this time it was an almost deafeningly awkward silence. The Next Hogwarts Team . . .
And the Cup of Fire turned black again; The shoes were thrown away.
from him; The pilgrim's tongue jutted high into the air, and from his head
Dumbledore pulled the third piece of parchment.
"The Headmaster of Hogwarts," he called out, "that's Cedric Diggory!"
"No!" Ron said loudly, but no one but Harry heard him; the
The noise from the next table was much louder. Every single Hufflepuff
He sprang to his feet, shouting and kicking, as Cedric
He made his way past them, looking determined, and headed towards the
The room behind the teachers table. Indeed, the line i
Cedric carried on so much that shortly before Dumbledore
He could make himself heard again.
"excellent!" Dumbledore called out angrily as finally the challenge
dead. “Well, we have our three young men now. I believe that I
I can count on all of you, including the remaining students from
Beauxbatons and Durmstrang, so that you may give your ancients every
An ounce of support you can muster. With the encouragement of your captain,
You will be involved in a very real atmosphere —”
But Dumbledore suddenly stopped talking, it was obvious to everyone why he was angry.
The fire in the locker just turned black. Sparks were flying from it. A long pipe is held suddenly in the air, and twisted
over it was another piece of leather.
Automatically, it seemed, Dumbledore held out his long arm

' '
And he took the paper. He held it out and prayed the name.
I wrote about it. There was a long pause, during which Dumbledore stared at the wand in his hands, and everyone in the room stared .
On Damblr. And then Dumbledore cleared his throat and read .
out -
“Harry Potter.”

CHAPTER SEVEN
FOUR MONTHS s

Harry sat there, knowing that every head in the Great Hall had
He turned to look at him. He was surprised. He felt numb.
He was indeed dreaming. He didn't hear right.
There is no filling. A buzzing, like an angry bee, was
He began to pack the Hall; Some students were standing to get a
Better to watch Harry as he sat, frozen, in place.
Up on the top table, Professor McGonagall got to her feet .
And he passed Ludo Bagman and Professor Karkaroff to shut up
Simply to Professor Dumbledore, who had leaned his ear to him,
She looked a little.
Harry turned to Ron and Hermione; Above them, he saw
the long Gryffindor cheeks all stared, open-mouthed.
“I didn’t put my name down,” Harry said quietly. “You know I
He didn’t do it.”
The two just stared blankly back.
h
FOUR PILLS
' '
At the upper table, Professor Dumbledore washed himself,
to Professor McGonagall's surprise.
“Harry Potter!” He called out again. “Harry! Up here, if you please!”
“Go on,” Hermione whispered, giving Harry a little smile.
Harry rose to his feet, pushed on the hem of his robe, and rolled
little. He made his way between the Gryffindor and Hufflepuff lockers. It felt like an incredibly long journey; The table above is not working.
It looked like it was all coming closer, and he could feel hundreds and
hundreds of eyes on him, as if each one was a searchlight. the
The buzzing got louder. After what seemed like hours,
He was in front of Dumbledore, keeping an eye on all
teachers about it.
"It's . . . through the door, Harry," Dumbledore said. There was no
He's looking.
Harry pushed past the teachers table. Hagrid was sitting up.
In the end. Harry didn’t yell, he didn’t yell, he didn’t give any of
his usual glorious balance. He looked completely surprised and
She looked at Harry as he passed like the others. Harry went.
The entrance to the larger hall found itself in a smaller
room, covered in paintings of sex and sexuality. A beautiful
The fire was roaring in the blaze before him.
The faces in the photos smiled as he entered.
He saw a nurse step out of the frame of his picture and walk over to him.
The one next to it contained a walrus-tailed wizard. The wet witch began to whisper in his ear.
Shown are Victor Crome, Cedric Diggory, and Fleur Delacour
in front of the fireplace. They look sharp, shapely
against the fire. Krom, puzzled and thoughtful, was confident

' '
Against the mantelpiece, slightly towards the other two. Cedric
He was standing with his hands behind his back, staring into the flames.
Flur Delacour looked over as Harry walked in and put
followed by her line of long, silvery hair.
“What is it?” She said. “Does Zey want us to go back to Zey Hall?”
She thinks he came to deliver a message. Harry didn't
They struggled to describe what had just happened. He just stood there,
They look at three old ones. It struck him how long it was.
are.
There was a sound of shuffling feet behind him, and Ludo Bagman entered the room. He took Harry by the hand and led him away.
forward.
"extraordinary!" he mumbled, squeezing Harry's hand. "exist
extraordinary! Men . . . Lady,” he added, approaching the fireplace and addressing the other three. “I can create — it’s unbelievable .
Although it could be — the fourth Triwizard master?”
Viktor Krum straightened up. His bastard face grew pale as Harry shrugged. Cedric looked uninterested. View from Bagman
to Harry and he pretended not to hear well
What Bagman said. Fleur Delacour, however, furrowed her brows,
With a smile, he said, “Oh, funny joke, Meester Bagman.”
"joke?" Bagman repeated, pausing. "No, no, not at all!"
Harry’s name just came out of the Goblet of Fire!”
Krum’s glasses are a little thinner. Cedric still looked shyly shocked. Fleur shook her head.
“But obviously zair 'as been a mistake,” she said sheepishly .
For Bagman. “ 'E can't compete. 'E is too young.”
"That's . . . interesting," Bagman said, rubbing his middle chin .
And he looked back at Harry. “But, as you know, the age requirement

' '
It’s only required this year as an extra safety measure. And like his
His name came out of the hat. . . I mean, I didn’t think it would be
There will be some ducking out at this point. . . . It’s under the rules, you
utility . . . Harry will just have to do better to —”
The door behind them opened again, and a large group of people entered: Professor Dumbledore, closely followed by the Master.
Crouch, Professor Karkaroff, Miss Maxim, Professor McGonagall, and Professor Snape. Harry heard the muttering of the hundreds of students on the other side of the wall, next to the Headmaster .
McGonagall shut the door.
“Miss Maxim!” Fleur said suddenly, running over to him
The school nurse. “zey were saying zat zis little boy is to compete again!”
Somewhere beneath Harry's curls he felt the sting of
anger. A little boy?
Madame Maxime had stretched herself to her perfect height, and she was tall. The top of her beautiful head rubbed the candles filled with candles, and her huge black satin boobs flickered.
“What do zis mean, Dumblydorr?” She said defensively.
"I'd love to see that for myself, Dumbledore," Professor Karkaroff said. He wore an iron grin, and his blue eyes were
Like chips of ice. “Two Hogwarts wizards? I don’t remember anyone telling me that the dining hall was allowed two old ones — or
Didn’t I read the law correctly?”
He gave a short and gentle laugh.
"That is impossible," said Madame Maxime, with her large hand .
With her many wonderful touches she was lying on Fleur's lap.
“ 'Ogwarts cannot have two hosts. It’s completely unfair.”
“We were under the impression that your Age Line would remain
out come the lesser contestants, Dumbledore,” Karkaroff said, his iron

' '
The smile was still in place, though his eyes were colder than before. “Otherwise, we would have, of course, brought with us a larger selection of
Candidates from our own schools.”
"It was nobody's fault but Potter's, Karkaroff," Snape growled. his
Black eyes were glowing with mischief. “Don’t go blackmailing Dumbledore .
About Potter's decision to break the rules. He was crossing the lines.
Since he got here —”
"Thank you, Severus," Dumbledore said seriously, and Snape went .
He grinned, though his eyes still glistened evilly in his shorts
of olive red hair.
Professor Dumbledore was now staring at Harry, who
Staring straight back at him, trying to make out the words of
Allen after semi-monthly visits.
“Did you put your name on the Fire Chicken, Harry?” he
he asked softly.
“No,” Harry said. He was so embarrassed everyone was watching him.
Closely. Snape made a soft note of disbelief at
Shadows.
“You ask an older student to put it in the Cup of Fire .
For you?"' Professor Dumbledor said, not moving Snape.
“No,” Harry insisted.
“Oh, but of course 'e is lying!” said Mrs. Maxim. snap
He was now rubbing his head and rubbing his temples.
"He can't cross the age barrier," Professor McGonagall said flatly. “I’m sure we all agree on that —”
“Dumblydorr must have made a mistake wiz ze magic,” he said .
Madame Maxim, sighs.
"Possibly, of course," Dumbledore said politely .
"Dumbledore, you know damn well you didn't do a

' '
Mistake!" " Professor McGonagall exclaimed angrily. "Really, what the hell! Harry couldn't cross the line himself, and as far as Professor Dumbledore was concerned he didn't convince the eldest student .
I’ll do it for her, I think that should be good enough for everyone else!”
She shot a very amused look at Professor Snape.
" Sir. Crutch . . . Mr. Bagman,” Karkaroff said, his voice uncertain again, “you are our — er — judge of purpose. Of course you
Will he agree that this is completely irregular?”
Bagman wipes his round, boyish face with his fist and
He looked at Mr. Crouch, who was standing outside the circle of
Dim lighting, his face half hidden in shadow. It sounds a bit ridiculous.
The top half made it look much taller, giving it an almost shell-like appearance. When he spoke, however, he was in .
The usual short line.
“We have to follow the rules, and the rules clearly state that those
People whose names have been removed from the Fireball are associated with
They’re competing in this league.”
“Well, Barty knows the rule book backwards,” Bagman,
away and pointing towards Karkaroff and Madame Maxim, like
although that issue is now closed.
“I insist on recovering the names of my remaining students,” Karkaroff said. He dropped his impassive tone and his
Shut up now. His face wore a very similar look indeed. “To put .
ball of fire again, and let's keep adding names
until each school has two circles. It’s only fair, Dumbledore.”
"But Karkaroff, he doesn't work that way," Bagman said. "the
Goblet of Fire has only just been released — it won’t run until early 2019.
the next race —”

' '
“— in which Durmstrang certainly does not respond!” exclaimed Karkarof. “After all our meetings and discussions
and negotiations, I wouldn’t expect anything of the sort to
occur! I have half a mind to leave now!”
"A cruel threat, Karkaroff," said a voice from beyond the door.
“You can’t leave your coach now. He has to compete. They have
All are ready to compete. A binding magical contract, like Dumbledore
said. Proper, yes?”
Moody had just walked into the room. He rushed towards the fire.
And with every good step he took, there was a loud groan.
"convenient?" Karkaroff said. “I’m afraid I don’t understand
You, Muddy.”
Harry could tell he was trying to sound angry, like
What Moody was saying wasn’t worth mentioning, but his hands
He gave it to her; they had divided themselves into herds.
“Aren’t you?” Moody said quietly. “That’s pretty simple, Karkaroff.
Someone put Potter's name in that briefcase knowing he had to do it
They fight if she leaves.”
"Apparently, someone 'oo wants to give 'Ogwarts two options in ze
an apple!" said Mrs. Maxim.
"I quite agree, Miss Maxime," Karkaroff told her, bowing to her.
“I would be complaining to the Ministry of Nuclear and
International Federation of Architects —”
"If anyone has reason to complain, it's Potter," Moody said sharply,
"But . . . the funny thing. . . . I never heard him say a word. . . .”
“Why should she complain?” Fleur Delacour appears, shaking her
His foot. “ 'As ze state of distress, 'as ur 'e? We were all
'oping to be chosen for weeks and weeks! Ze honor to our schools!

' '
A thousand Galleons in prize money — zis a lot of opportunity to give
Die on!”
“Somebody probably hopes Potter dies for it,” he said .
Moody, with just a smile on his face.
A very heavy silence followed these words. Ludo Bagman,
Who looked very shocked indeed, freaked out and
He fell to his knees and said, “Moody, old man . . . What is this
say!"
“We all know that Professor Moody considers the vote wasted if .
He didn’t find six curses to kill him before noon,”
Karkaroff said aloud. “Apparently, he now teaches his students .
They may even be afraid of crime. Unbelievable quality in defense against
Master of the Dark Arts, Dumbledore, but no doubt you have
Reasons.”
“I’m thinking about things, am I?” said Mudi. “You’ll see things, eh?
She was a witch or witch wizard who put the boy’s name in this
liver. . . .”
“Oh, what proof is zero of a substance?” exclaimed Madame Maxime, holding out her broad hands.
“Because they used a very powerful magic item!” said
moody. “She will need a surprisingly powerful Confundus .
Charm will make the cup forget that only three
Schools compete in the tournament. . . . I think they brought Potter's name under the fourth school, to make sure he was the
The only one in its category. . . .”
“You seem to give this a lot of thought, Moody,”
said Karkaroff coldly, “and it is a very clever theory—though .
In fact, I heard you recently put it in your head that one of

' '
Your birthday gifts include a package decorated with herringbone.
An egg, and he smashed it to pieces before realizing it was a wheel clock.
So you’ll understand if we don’t take you all too seriously. . . .”
"There are those who will turn unfavorable circumstances to their advantage," Moody replied in a menacing tone. “It’s my job to think about
The way dark wizards work, Karkaroff — as you must remember. . . .”
“Alastor!” Dumbledore said quietly. He asks Harry about a
time who is he talking to, but then he realizes “MadEye”
It can’t be Moody’s real first name. Moody sighed, but
He still looked at Karkaroff with surprise — Karkaroff’s face was .
burned.
"How this situation came about, we don't know," Dumbledore said,
He addresses everyone gathered in the room. “However, it seems to me that we have no choice but to accept it. Both Cedric and
Harry was selected to compete in the Tournament. this,
Therefore, they will work. . . .”
"Oh, but Dumbledore—"
“My dear Madame Maxime, if you had anything else, I would .
Love to hear it.”
Dumbledore waited, but Lady Maxim did not speak, she
Just by looking. Nor was she the only one. Snape looked angry;
Karkarof is handsome; Bagman, however, seems a bit concerned.
“Well, let’s get closer, then?” He said, wringing his hands and looking around the room. “We need to give our heroes
Their advice, isn’t it? Barty, do you want to do the drugs?”
Mr. Crouch seemed to emerge from a deep thought.
“Yes, it’s a warning,” he said. Yes . . . The first task . . .”
He walked forward into the firelight. Almost, Harry thought
Obviously sick. There are dark shadows under his eyes and a freckle,

' '
The look of paper on his cracked skin that wasn’t there in
The Quidditch World Cup.
“The first exercise is designed to test your magic,” he tells Harry,
Cedric, Fleur, and Viktor, “then we weren’t going to tell you .
What is it. Courage in the face of the unknown is vital
depth in a letter . . . It has great value. . . .
“The first workshop will be held on November 24, 2019.
in front of the other students and the panel of judges.
“They have no right to solicit or accept aid from
Some kind of from their coaches to complete the tasks in the tournament. The tournament will tackle the first batting-only challenge with
their potatoes. Information about the second task will be received.
When the first finishes. Due to the demanding and time-consuming nature of the tournament, the youngsters were exempted from
End-of-year exams.”
Mr. Kruch turned to look at Dumbledore.
“I think that’s all, right, Albus?”
“I think so,” said Dumbledore, who was looking at Mr. Crouch .
With a small twist. “Are you sure you don’t want to stay at Hogwarts tonight, Barty?”
"No, Dumbledore, I must return to the Ministry," the Master said.
Close up. “It’s a very exciting time, very challenging at the moment. . . .
I left young Weatherby in charge. . . . A lot of fun . . . A bit of ridiculous fun, if truth be told. . . .”
“You’ll come for a drink before you go, perhaps?” said
Dumbledore.
“Come on, Barty, I’m staying!” Bagman said sarcastically. "It's all
It’s happening at Hogwarts now, you know, lots of interesting things here
Above the office!”

' '
"I don't think so, Ludo," Crouch said with a look of his old impatience.
“Professor Karkarof — Miss Maxim — is she a night owl?” said
Dumbledore.
But Madame Maxime had already laid her hand upon Fleur's .
of her body and was slowly carrying her out of the room. Harry can
They were both heard speaking softly in French as they walked to
The large living room. Karkaroff motioned for Krum, and they, too, left,
though in silence.
"Harry, Cedric, I suggest you go to bed," Dumbledore said,
She looked at them both. "I'm sorry, Gryffindor and Hufflepuff and . . ."
I’m looking forward to celebrating with you, and it would be a shame to miss it
Of them for this brilliant reason to commit so much mischief and
noise."
Harry looked at Cedric, he nodded, and they all left.
The great hall was empty now; The candle falls lower.
It gives room ants creepy, flickering
quality.
“Okay,” Cedric said, shrugging. “We played against everybody .
others too!”
“I do,” Harry said. He couldn’t really think of anything.
say. The inside of his head seemed to be in complete chaos, as
even though his mind was blown.
"So . . . tell me . . ." Cedric said as they reached the door .
hall, which was now lit only by sparkles in the void of the Cup of Fire. “How did you enter your name?”
“I didn’t,” Harry said, glaring at him. “I didn’t put it down.
They’re telling the truth.”

' '
"Oh . . . Okay,” Cedric said. Harry could tell Cedric didn't believe him. "Then . . . see you, then.”
Instead of climbing the marble counter, Cedric went to a
door to her right. Harry stood and listened to him as he panted.
stone steps above him, then slowly he begins to climb the marble
one.
Would anyone but Ron and Hermione believe him, or
Would they all think he’d put himself in the ring? still
How can anyone think like that, when facing competitors
Someone with three years more magic practice than someone with —
When he was now faced with things that not only looked very stupid, but to do them in front of hundreds of people? Yes, he thought about it . . . He was thinking about her. . . but
It was a shame, really, a kind of fuzzy dream . . . It’s not really,
Strongly considered entering. . . .
But someone else was thinking about it . . . Someone else wants to
to him in the tournament, and had made sure he got in. why?
To give it a shot? He didn't think so, somehow. . . .
Would you watch him make a fool of himself? So, there is a possibility that they will get
their will. . . .
But to kill him?
Was Moody just being his usual paranoid self? Couldn't someone put Harry's name in the cupboard as a trick, a clever joke?
Does anyone really want to die?
Harry could answer at once. Yes, one wants it.
He died, someone wanted him dead since he was a year old
ancient . . . Lord Bulldemort. But how could Voldemort ensure
that Harry's name entered the Goblet of Fire? There was Buldemort

' '
He must be far away, in some distant land, in hiding,
alone . . . He is weak and powerless. . . .
But in the dream he saw, just before waking up with his wife .
With a sigh, Voldemort wasn't alone . . . He was talking to Wormtail . . . They think about killing Harry. . . .
Harry got a shock as he found himself facing the Fat Lady already. he
He barely noticed where his feet were taking him. He was also a
She was surprised to see she wasn't alone in her frame. The one who was dismissed
The witch who appeared at the neighbor’s painting when he had
He had joined the government at the bottom and was now sitting calmly beside her.
The Fat Woman. It must flow through each picture frame.
Seven stairs to get here in front of him. Both she and the elder woman
They were looking at him with great interest.
“Well, well, well,” said the old lady, “Violet’s just told me everything. Who just got elected headmaster, then?”
“Balderdash,” Harry said quietly.
“Of course he wasn’t!” said the nurse excitedly.
“No, no, Vi, it’s the password,” the blonde said soothingly, and .
She turned away on her pillows to let Harry in on the conversation.
room.
The blast of noise that met Harry's ears as the picture appeared
It opened almost wide back. Next thing he knew, he
He was curled up inside the common room by about a dozen
Two hands, and he was looking at the whole of Gryffindor House, the whole
Of them they were angry, angry, and angry.
“You should have told us you came in!” cried Fred; Look
Half painfully, half reluctantly.
“How do you do it without a wife? Burning!"
George.

' '
“I didn’t,” Harry said. “I don’t know how —”
But Angelina had distracted him now; “Oh what if
It can’t be me, at least not a Gryffindor—”
“You’ll be able to repay Diggory for that last Quidditch .
Meeting, Harry!” said Katie Bell, another from Gryffindor
The leaders.
“We’ve got food, Harry, come and eat something—”
“I’m not hungry, I’ve had enough at the party —”
But nobody wanted to hear that he wasn’t hungry; anything
He wanted to hear that he hadn’t put his name in the cupboard; No one
A single person seems to know that he’s not entirely in
mood to celebrate. . . . Lee Jordan found a Gryffindor.
banner from elsewhere, and insisted that he
Harry as a whimper. Harry couldn't leave; Whenever he tries to
Sit on the stairs to the dorms, the crowd around
Closed his wheels, forced another draft beer, filled
candles and peanuts in his hands. . . . Everyone wants to know
The way he did it, the way he worried about Dumbledore’s age gap and
He managed to get his name in the cup. . . .
“I don’t know,” he said, quietly, “I don’t know how .
happened."
But for all that individual grasping, he may not have
He answered it all.
“I’m tired!” he finally said, after nearly half an hour. "No,
Seriously, George — I’m going to bed —”
He wanted more than anything to find Ron and Hermione, to
Find a little muscle, but none of it seems to be in the club room. He was forced to sleep, and almost lost
Creevey’s younger brothers as they tried to settle him in

' '
At the foot of the stairs, Harry managed to get everyone down and leave
up to the orphanage as quickly as possible.
Much to his surprise, he found Ron sitting up in his bed in the
Otherwise it was an empty orphanage, still fully clothed. He looked down when
Harry shut the door behind him.
“Where are you?” Harry said.
“Oh hello,” Ron said.
It was annoying, but it was kind of an innocent, gentle smile.
In an instant, Harry became aware that he was still wearing the red cloak.
The Bank of Gryffindor that Lee had closed. He tried to
remove it, but it was fastened too tightly. Ron sat on the bed unmoving and watched Harry struggle to take it off.
“Okay,” he said, when Harry finally removed the bandage and .
He backed into a corner. “Azuz.”
“What do you mean, congratulations?” Harry said, looking at the
run. There’s definitely something wrong with the way Run
By comparison: It was more like a snowflake.
"That means . . . no one else is over the age limit," Ron said. "Uncle
Even Fred and George. What did you use — invisible .
cup?"
"The cloak of invisibility won't get me over that line," he said .
Harry quickly.
“Oh sure,” Ron said. “I thought you might have told me if it was
The cup . . . Because it would have kicked us both, wouldn’t it?
But you found another way, didn’t you?”
“Listen,” Harry said, “I didn’t put my name in that cupboard.
Maybe someone else did.”
Ron raised an eyebrow.
“What would they do that for?”

' '
“I don’t know,” Harry said. He felt it would sound too melodramatic to say, “To kill me.”
Ron's hips rose so low they were in danger of bursting into his hair.
“It’s okay, you know, you can tell me the truth,” he said. “If you
I don’t want everyone else to know, okay, but I don’t know why you’re
You're afraid to lie, you won't get in trouble for it, will you? that
The Fat Lady's best friend, that Violet, had already told us all Dumbledore had let you inside. A thousand prize money for Galleons, eh?
And you don’t have to do end-of-year exams either. . . .”
“I didn’t put my name in that pot!” Harry said, starting to sob
angry.
“Yeah, well,” Ron said, sounding as skeptical as a .
Cedric. “Only you this morning said you would do it yesterday,
And no one will see you. . . . I’m not a coward, you know.”
“You’re making a really good impression on him,” Harry whispered.
"Yes?" Ron said, and there was no trace of a smile, forced or otherwise, on his face now. “Do you want to get into bed, Harry. I’m waiting.
You’ll need to wake up early tomorrow for a photo shoot or something.”
He cut off the legs around his four boards, leaving
Harry stood there by the door, peering through the dark red velvet curtains, now hiding one of the few people he was sure would believe him.

CHAPTER EIGHTEEN
ANIMAL VACCINES

When Harry woke up on Sunday morning, he received a
Time to remember why he felt so low and awkward. Then the memory of last night washed over him. he
He sat down and kicked off the curtains of his four-pack, intending to talk to Ron, to force Ron to believe him — only to find that .
Ron's bed was empty; It appears to have faded into the evening.
Harry got dressed and went down the spiral stairs to the common room. When it came out, those people who were already
He finished the coffee and broke into a sip again. Hope for the soul
Down the great hall and catching up with the rest of the Gryffindors, all
You treat him like some sort of hero, who is not inviting; There is this,
But, or stay here and allow himself to be kicked around the
The Creevey brothers, who were both cheering for him to
Join them. He walked heavily towards the picture line and pressed
He opened it, climbed out of it, and found himself face to face with
Hermione.
“Hi,” she said, taking a sip of the drink, which she had in the kitchen. “I brought this for you. . . . Want to go for a walk?”
“Good idea,” Harry said cheerfully.
They went downstairs and past the entrance hall quickly without
They move around the Great Hall, and soon they’re wandering around the woods
By the sea, where the Durmstrang Canal anchors, it looks
It’s black in the water. It was a cold morning, and they kept moving.
They chew their cake, as Harry tells Hermione what's really
It happened after he left the Gryffindor table the night before. I
wide-eyed, Hermione accepted his story without question.
“Well, of course I know you didn’t get involved,” she said when .
He finishes telling her about the scene in the room upstairs from the House.
"The look on your face when Dumbledore read your name!" but
The question is, who put it? Because Moody was right, Harry . . .
I don’t think any student can do it . . . They never can
To humiliate the Cup, or pass Dumbledore’s—”
“Have you seen Ron?” Harry interrupted.
Hermione hesitated.
“Erm . . . Yes . . . He was in the morning,” she said.
“Does he still think I came in myself?”
"That's . . . no, I don't think so. . . Not really," Hermione said
with difficulty.
“What do you mean, 'not really'?”
“Harry, isn’t it obvious?” Hermione said in shock. "he
jealous!"
"jealous?" Harry said in disbelief. “The taste of what? He wants to
He made a prat in front of the whole school, didn’t he?”
“See,” Hermione said patiently, “you’re always the one who gets all the .
mind, you know it is. I know it’s not your fault,” she added
Quickly, he saw Harry open his mouth wide in anger. “I know you don’t know
Ask him. . . But — well — you know, Ron had all those brothers
He would compete against her at home, and you were his best friend, and you
It’s really funny — always brushed to one side whenever people bring up
I see you, and he brags about it, and never mentions it, but I
Let’s say that this is just one time too many. . . .”
“Great,” Harry sighed. “It’s really great. Tell him from me to
swap whenever desired. Tell him from me that it is a blessing to him. . . .
People crawl up my back everywhere I go. . . .”
"I'm not telling him anything," Hermione said flatly. "tell
By yourself. It’s the only way to unlock that.”
“I’m not going to run after him to try to make him grow up .
Downstairs!" Harry said, so loudly that several birds in a nearby tree brought
The ship is in shock. “He will probably believe that I do not admire myself for a moment .
I know my ass or —”
“That’s absurd,” Hermione whispered. “This isn’t funny in
All." She looked very concerned. “Harry, I was thinking —
You know what we have to do, right? Right, time for us to get back to the castle?”
“Yeah, give Ron a good line about —”
“Write to Sirius. You need to tell him what happened. he
Please ignore whatever is going on in
Hogwarts. . . . It’s almost like he was waiting for something like this to
happen. I got some paper and coffee out with me—”
“Get away from her,” Harry said, looking around for them .
He couldn’t hear, but the floor was very dark. "he
It came back to the surface just because my watch cracked. He’ll probably come and approach the castle right away if I tell him something got into me in the triwizard circle—”
"He'll want you to tell him," Hermione insisted. “He will go to
Find out anyway —”
"how?"
“Harry, this isn’t going to be kept quiet,” Hermione said, desperately .
really. “This tournament is known, and you are known. I will be
I’m actually surprised there’s nothing in the Daily Prophet about
You're competing. . . . You’re already halfway through the books on YouKnowWho, you know . . . And Sirius wanted to hear from
You, I know he will.”
“Okay, then, I’ll write to him,” Harry said, typing in his last piece .
emissions into the ocean. They both stood and watched her disappear there.
A moment later, before a large shark emerged from the water and
Scoop it down to the bottom. Then they returned to the castle.
“Who do I use as a hook?” Harry said as they climbed on
stairs. “He told me never to use Hedwig again.”
“Ask Ron if you can borrow —”
"I didn't ask Ron for anything," Harry whispered.
“Well, borrow one of the school pets, well, anyone can use
them,” Hermione said.
They got into the Owlery and Hermione gave Harry a piece of
pen, pencil, and ink bottle, then pass through the middle of the
Long lines of cars, peering into all the different windows, while Harry
He sat down against a wall and wrote his letter.
Hey Sirius,
You said I’d keep you up to date with what’s going on at Hogwarts, so here it is — I don’t know if you heard, but the Triwizard Tournament is going to be held this year and on Saturday .
night I was voted 4th president.I don’t know who put mine
Name in the Goblet of Fire, because I didn’t. The other Hogwarts champion was Cedric Diggory, from Hufflepuff.
He pauses at this point, thinking. He intended to say something about the enormous weight of stress that seems to have stuck
inside his chest since last night, but he couldn't think of a way to translate that into words, so he quickly pulled his shirt back into the pillow .
bottle and wrote,
I hope you’re well, and Buckbeak —
“It’s over,” he told Hermione, rising to his feet and brushing .
coffee from his clothes. At this, Hedwig came flying over her body .
her shoulder and stretched her leg.
“I can’t use you,” Harry told him, looking around the school .
The doors. “I have to use one of these. . . .”
Hedwig gave a very loud shriek and darted away until her
talons cut into his back. She kept her back to Harry all the time.
He was attaching his letter to the leg of a large barn rat. When the prison is
The sphere disappeared, and Harry reached out to touch Hedwig, but she
She took off her hat in anger and walked out into the tunnels from
reach.
"First Ron, then you," Harry growled. “This isn’t my fault.”
If only Harry had thought things would improve once everyone
I hated the idea of ​​being a director, the next day
He showed her how wrong he was. He couldn't help but
The rest of the school when it returns to lessons — and it seems
that the rest of the school, like those in Gryffindor, thought Harry'.
He had entered himself for the race. Unlike Gryffindor,
However, they don’t seem fazed.
Hufflepuffs, who are generally on good terms with
Gryffindors, it has become incredibly cold towards the
them. One Herbology lesson was enough to demonstrate this. it
Turns out the Hufflepuffs felt Harry stole from them
championship honors; A sense heightened, perhaps, by what is
Hufflepuff House very rarely gained any popularity, and that Cedric was
One of the few that gave them anything, when he hit
Gryffindor once in Quidditch. Ernie McMillan and Justin Finch-Fleckley, who compete with Harry on a regular basis, disagree .
to him even though the Bouncing Bulbs were standing in
One photo — although they laughed evilly when one
The 5 Bouncing Bulbs shattered from Harry's hand and the
Look him hard in the face. Ron wasn't talking to Harry either.
Hermione sat between them, talking very forcefully, but
Although both answered her normally, they avoided making eye contact with each other. Harry thought even Professor Sprout appeared
Far from it—but back then, she was the Hufflepuff House Head.
He would be looking forward to seeing Hagrid under the
Normal circumstances, but controlling magical creatures means seeing
Even Slytherin — his first time coming face-to-face .
with them since he became president.
Presumably, Malfoy arrived at Hagrid’s cabin through his familiar
Sneer firmly in place.
"Oh, look, boys, he's a coach," he told Crabbe and Goyle .
the moment he got in Harry's ear. “He got your autograph
Books? Better get a signature now, because I doubt it will work
Be around for a long time. . . . Half of the Triwizard youth have
dead . . . How long do you think you'll be staying, Potter? ten
Thirty minutes on the first workout is my bet.”
Crabbe and Goyle nodded in agreement, but Malfoy had to
Stop right there, because Hagrid stepped out from behind his cabin
Lined up with rotating towers of cars, each with a much larger
Screw the hot end. To the horror of the class, Hagrid goes on to explain that the reason the screwdrivers were fighting each other was
Excess energy is trapped, and the solution will be for
Each student should tighten the grip on the screw and bring it to a slow speed.
The only good thing about this plan was that it confused Malfoy .
completely.
“Taking this thing for a walk?” he repeated sarcastically, looking at
One of the dishes. “And where exactly do we need to fix
The wall? The bell curve, the end of the stick, or the stick?”
“Roun' the corner,” Hagrid said, pointing. “Er — yes
He may wish ter to put yer mountain body gloves, jus' as an extra precaution, e.g. Harry — you’ll come here and help me with this big
one. . . .”
However, Hagrid’s real intention is to talk Harry away from
The rest of the class. He waited until everyone left with
Skrewts them, then turned to Harry and said, very seriously, “So —
Yer competition, Harry. in the championship. The school team.”
“One of the best,” Harry spat.
Hagrid's dark brown eyes peered out softly beneath his mask.
Eyes.
“Don’t you know who put yeh in it, Harry?”
“You believe I didn’t do it, then?” Harry said, hiding the
Trouble was the gratitude he felt in Hagrid's words.
“ 'Course I suppose,” Hagrid said quietly. “Yeh say it is you, an' I believe yeh — an' Dumbledore believe yer, an' all.”
“I wish I knew who did it,” Harry sighed.
The two of them stared out into the woods; The school was great.
They’re divorced now, and all in big trouble. The Screws are now up.
Three feet tall, and very powerful. He didn't stay with the clothes and
Colorless, they created a kind of blue, white, blue color.
They look like a cross between a larger and a darker animal
crabs — but still without recognizable heads or eyes. They have become too powerful and too difficult to control.
“They seem to be having fun, don’t they?” Hagrid said excitedly.
Harry assumed he was talking about screwts, because his classmates certainly weren't; Every once in a while, with a caveat
Bang, one of the screwts ends will explode, causing it to shoot
forward several yards, and more than one person was dragged
along on their stomach, desperately trying to get back on their feet.
“Oh, I don’t know, Harry,” Hagrid stammered, looking back .
underneath him with a frightened look on his face. “The headmaster . . . Everything seems ter happen terk, doesn’t it?”
Harry didn't answer. Yes, everything seems to be happening for
he . . . That's what Hermione said as they
She walked in the middle of the ocean, which is why, according to her,
that Ron wouldn't talk to him.
The next few days were some of Harry's worst days at Hogwarts. the
It’s the closest it’s ever come to feeling like this is what it was at the time
months, during his sophomore year, when a large section of the school suspected him of cheating on fellow students. But Run was in
Tamas then. He thinks he can deal with the rest of
A school trip if he could just get Ron back as his friend, but
He wasn't going to try to convince Run to talk to him if Run didn't.
I want to. However, it was difficult with problems arising for it
From all sides.
He could understand the Hufflepuffs' plight, even if he didn't .
Like him; They have their coach to help. He was waiting
It was nothing less than a Slytherin’s typical joke—it was .
They are very unpopular there and always have been, because it has
They helped Gryffindor beat them by a lot, both in Quidditch and
of the championship among the houses. But he was hoping the Ravenclaws
Perhaps they will find it in their hearts to help him so
Cedric. He was falling, though. Most Ravenclaws seem to think
that he was anxious to gain for himself a little recognition by forcing a confession so that she would accept his name.
Then there's the fact that Cedric looks the part of a captain a lot better than he does. Absolutely beautiful, with his
Straight nose, dark hair, and dark brown eyes, it’s hard to tell which is which
It’s more acceptable these days, Cedric or Viktor Krum.
Harry really noticed those sixth year girls who were so eager
To get Krum's autograph he asks Cedric to sign their school uniforms
Same lunchtime.
Meanwhile there was no response from Sirius, Hedwig was refusing
Coming anywhere near him, Professor Trelawney had predicted .
Death more surely than ever before, and he did so badly in
Summoning Charms in Professor Flitwick's assigned classroom
extra homework — the only person who gets any, besides Neville.
“It really isn’t that hard, Harry,” Hermione tried to reassure him .
When they left Flitwick School — she was doing things
zoom across the room to her entire lesson, as if something
The odd kind of magnet for clipboards, empty paper bags, and
The binocular. “You just haven’t been shaking enough—”
“Wonder why that is,” Harry said in a Cedric Diggory -like voice.
She walked forward, surrounded by a large group of giggling girls, all of
who stares at Harry like a particularly large Blast-Ended Screw. “Still — doesn’t matter, eh? Double points to look at
Forward to this afternoon. . . .”
Double Potions has always been a weird experience, but these days
It was nothing but torture. He was locked up in jail for a
An hour and a half with Snape and Slytherin, they all show up
Determined to punish Harry as much as he could because he could become Headmaster, it was about something he didn't like at all
Harry could guess. He was already struggling through a date on Friday, with Hermione sitting next to him whispering “ignore
ten, threaten them, threaten them.” under his breath, and he couldn’t see why today was supposed to be any better.
When he and Hermione arrived at Snape's dungeon after lunch,
They found the Slytherins waiting outside, each and every one of the
They were wearing a big badge on the front of his coat. for one
raw mode Harry thought it was SPEW strips — then he
I saw that they were all getting the same message, in glowing red letters
which burned brightly in the poorly lit underground passageway.
“Like them, Potter?” Malfoy said loudly as Harry approached.
“And that’s not all they do — look!”
He puts his badge on his chest, and the message on it
It disappears, to be replaced by another one, which glows green:
The Slytherins roared with laughter. Each of them throws
Even their secrets, to the point where the message POTTER STINKS glows brightly all around Harry. He felt the heat rising on his face and
neck.
“Oh that’s very interesting,” Hermione whispered to Pansy Parkinson .
and his gang of Slytherin girls, who laughed more than
Everyone, “really smart.”
Ron was standing against the wall with Dean and Seamus. he
He wasn't laughing, but he wasn't joking to Harry either.
“Do you want one, Granger?” Malfoy said, giving the floor to
Hermione. “I have a penalty. But don't touch my hand, now. I just have
Wash it, and see; I don’t want Mudblood to lose it.”
Some of the anger Harry had been feeling for days.
It was like something was coming out of a basket in his chest. He reached his.
Wand before he could think what he was doing. People everywhere
They got out of the way and continued on the road.
“Harry!” Hermione said cautiously.
“Go on, then, Potter,” Malfoy snapped, releasing his own .
A stick. “Moody is not here to take care of you now—do it, if you have
He got a line —”
For a split second, they gazed into each other's eyes, and then, in an instant, they were both doing it.
“Furnoncolos!” Harry shouted.
“Densaugyu!” shouted Malfoy.
Jets of light hit each other from two directions, hitting each other in the air, and
corners—Harry's hit Goyle in the face, and Malfoy's hit Hermione. Goyle sighed and put his hands to his nose,
Where big bubbles of goodness floated — Hermione, whimpering in horror, clasped her mouth.
“Hermione!”
Ron had rushed upstairs to see what she was missing; Harry
He looked around and saw Run pulling Hermione's hand away from him.
face. It was not a pretty sight. Hermione’s front teeth — already
larger than average — they were now growing at an astonishing rate; she
It looked more and more like a lobster as its teeth grew.
It passed over her bottom lip, down her chin — she took a fright, felt
in them and let out a terrified cry.
“And what’s all this noise?” A low, low voice said.
Snape growled. The Slytherins voted for their votes; Snape pointed a long yellow finger at Malfoy and said,
"explain."
“Potter caught me, sir —”
“We push each other at the same time!” Harry shouted.
“— and he beat Goyle — see —”
Snape examined Goyle, his face now resembling something
He would be at home in a book about sharks.
“The hospital wing, Goyle,” Snape said quietly.
“Malfoy found Hermione!” Run said. "look!"
Forcing Hermione to show Snape her teeth — she was doing .
She could hide them with her hands, though that was difficult because
they were now growing in front of his nose. Pansy Parkinson is
The other Slytherin girls were dressed in silent necklaces, indicating
At Hermione from behind Snape's nose.
Snape looked coldly at Hermione, then said, "I don't know . . ."
difference."
Hermione let out a gasp; Her eyes filled with tears, she
She turned on her heel and ran, ran all the way up the street and out
of view.
It was good, perhaps, that Harry and Ron had started cheering
At Snape at the same time; Luckily, their voice is much louder in
Stone road, because in there dangerous, it is impossible to
You heard exactly what it’s called. Got the basics down, though.
“We’ll see,” he said, his voice low. “Fifty points from
Gryffindor and one dungeon each for Potter and Weasley. Get it now
Inside, or it’ll be a week’s jail.”
Harry's ears were ringing. His guilt made him want to
Curse Snape into a thousand pieces of shit. He walked past Snape, walking
With Ron to the back of the block, and putting his bag down
On the table. Ron was shaking with anger too—for a while,
I feel like everything has become normal between them, but
Then Ron turned around and sat with Dean and Seamus instead,
He left Harry alone at his table. On the other side of the courtyard,
Malfoy turned his back to Snape and grabbed his wand, smiling.
POTTER STINKS bursts into the room again.
Harry sat there staring at Snape as the lesson began, looking
Terrible things happened to him. . . . If only he knew how to
of Croatius . . . To have Snape sharp on his back so
spidery, itchy and sticky. . . .
“Sick!” Snape said, looking at them all, his cool
Black eyes glittered uncomfortably. “You all should be ready .
Your salads now. I want you to cook them gently, and then, we
It will be your choice of whom to test for. . . .”
Snape's eyes met Harry's, and Harry knew what was coming.
Snape was going to be jealous. Harry thought about raising his
coffee, and run to the front of the class, and bring it
Down on Snape’s greasy head —
And then Harry's wardrobe door burst open .
thoughts.
and Colin Creevey; He entered the room, glowing in the
Harry, and walked over to Snape's desk at the front of the room.
"Yes?" Snape said quietly.
“Please, Sir, I need to take Harry Potter upstairs.”
Snape looked up his nose at Colin, whose smile dropped
from his hot face.
“Potter has one more hour of Potions to go,” Snape said .
With the cold. “He’ll come upstairs after this class.”
Colin went pink.
"Sir—sir, Mr. Bagman wants him," he said nervously. " all
champions have to go, I think they want to take photos. . . .”
Harry would give anything he had if he stopped
Colin said those last few words. He half looked at Run.
But Ron was staring intently at the ceiling.
“Very, very,” Snape said quietly. “Oh, Potter, leave your stuff .
Here, I want you to come back here later to practice your magic.”
“Please, sir — he must take his things with him,” he whispered .
Colin. “All slaves —”
"quite !" Snap said. “Potter — get your bag and get out of .
My theory!”
Harry slung his bag over his shoulder, stood up, and went to the
gate. As he walked through the closets of Slytherin, POTTER
STINKS fly at him from all sides.
“That’s funny, isn’t it, Harry?” Colin said, starting to speak
The moment Harry closed the closet door behind him. “Not so,
though? Are you the president?”
“Yeah, it’s really fun,” Harry insisted as they made their way towards the .
line to the entrance hall. “What do the photographers want,
Colin?”
“Everyday prophet, I think!”
“Great,” Harry said quietly. “Exactly what I needed. More press.”
"good luck!" Colin said when they reached the right room.
Harry knocked on the door and entered.
He was in a very small district; Most of the arenas are
It was pushed to the back of the room, leaving a large space in the
mean; Three of them, however, had been installed end-to-end in
front of the window and covered by the length of the frame.
Five chairs were placed behind velvet-covered tables, and Ludo
Bagman was sitting in one of them, talking to a friend of Harry's
He had never seen anyone who was dressed in blue before.
Viktor Krum was standing calmly in a corner as usual and not
You talk to everybody. Cedric and Fleur were in the conversation. Fluor
She looked much happier than Harry had seen her yet; She holds
She tilted her head back so her long silver hair held
LIGHT. A muscular man, holding a large black camera that was slightly glowing, was watching Fleur out of the corner of his eye.
Bagman suddenly sees Harry, gets up quickly, and stops
forward.
“Oh, here he is! Fourth President! In you come, Harry, in
You'll come. . . Nothing to worry about, just a heavy stick
Ceremony, the rest of the judges will be here in no time —”
“Rose Wand?” Harry repeated in shock.
“We need to make sure your legs are fully functional, no .
problems, you know, because they’re your best tools in
jobs ahead of us,” Bagman said. “The shadow expert now is Dumbledore. And then there’s going to be a little bit of a photo shoot. this is
Rita Skeeter,” he added, pointing to the pink-haired model .
furniture. “She does a small piece in the tournament for the Daily .
Prophet. . . .”
"Maybe not so small, Ludo," Rita Skeeter said, her eyes wide .
Harry.
His hair was styled in slicked down and slightly wavy curls that contrasted sharply with his heavy-boned face. She wears earrings with jewels. The thick fingers holding his buckskin purse ended
In double-pointed rings, they are decorated with blue.
'I was wondering if I could have a little word with Harry before I .
Start?" she said to Bagman, but she was still watching Harry intently. "t
The little championship, you know . . . Would you add a little color?”
"really!" shouted Bagman. “That — is Harry innocent?”
“Er —” Harry said.
“Dear,” said Rita Skeeter, and in a second, her blue eyebrows .
The fingers had Harry's hand in a surprisingly strong grip, and
She was leading him out of the room again and opened a nearby
gate.
“We don’t want to be there with all that noise,” she said. "will
see . . . Oh, yes, that’s fine and wonderful.”
It’s a prison of graveyards. Harry stared at her.
“Come on, darling — that’s right — darling,” said Rita Skeeter .
Another time, she sat awkwardly on an added bucket,
Harry stomped down onto a cardboard box and closed the door,
He leads them into darkness. “Let’s see now . . .”
She unzipped her animal leather purse and took it out.
The hand of the candle, which she shattered with the blow of her staff
And magicians in the air, to see what they
did.
"You don't mind, Harry, if I use the Photographic Quill?" It allows
I am free to talk to you on a regular basis. . . .”
“Oh what?” Harry said.
Rita Skiter’s smile is growing. Harry counted three gold teeth.
She reached into her candy box again, pulled out a long piece of rosewood and a piece of string, and pulled it out .
including about an all-purpose Mrs. Skower magic cart
Removal of Mess. She put the tail of the green rabbit in her mouth.
He inhaled it for a moment in obvious satisfaction, then set it standing
On paper, where it stands balanced on its object, it expands
little.
“Temptation . . . My name is Rita Skeeter, the regular Christmas journalist.”
Harry quickly looked at the spell. That moment Rita
Skeeter called out, and the green hood began to squirm, tearing at the paper:
Attractive flower Rita Skeeter, aged forty-three, with her wild ass
Quill interrupts a lot of enlightened knowledge —
“Girlfriend,” Rita Skeeter said, yet again, and shook the floor .
He took out a piece of paper, peeled it off, and put it in
A handbag. Now she leaned over to Harry and said, “Okay, Harry . . .
What made you decide to enter the Triwizard Tournament?”
“Er —” Harry said again, but he was distracted by the touch.
Even when he’s not speaking, she’s drifting across the board, and in his memory he’s able to utter a new phrase:
An ugly tribute, a reminder of a gloomy past, distorts the character of
At least Harry Potter’s face, with his eyes —
"Don't mind that puppy, Harry," Rita Skeeter insisted. Reluctantly,
Harry looked at her instead. “Now — why did you decide to .
Are you getting into the ring, Harry?”
“I didn’t,” Harry said. “I don’t know how my name got into the
A box of fire. I didn’t put it there.”
Rita Skeeter raised a pencil-sized eyebrow.
“Come now, Harry, you don’t have to be afraid to go inside .
trouble. We all know you shouldn’t really go in at all. but
Don't worry about that. Our readers love the minister.”
“But I didn’t go in,” Harry replied. “I don’t know which —”
“How do you feel about the tasks ahead?” said Rita Skeeter.
"Is he angry? Angry?"
“I didn’t really think . . . Yeah, I’m nervous, I guess,” he said
Harry. His insides churned uncomfortably as he spoke.
“The Lightning died in the past, didn’t they?” Rita said
Skeeter quickly. “Have you thought about this at all?”
"That's why . . . they say it's going to be a lot safer this year," he said
Harry.
Quill swiped at the paper between them, back
and forward like skating.
“Of course, you’ve looked death in the face before, haven’t you?”
exclaimed Rita Skeeter, watching him closely. “How can you say that
Does it hurt?”
“Er,” Harry said, still.
“You think that the pain you’ve been through might be done .
Want to prove yourself? To go by your name? Do you think
Maybe you get invited to the Triwizard Tournament
because -"
“I didn’t go in,” Harry said, beginning to relax.
“Can you remember your parents at all?” said Rita Skiter, speaking for her.
“No,” Harry said.
“How do you think they would feel if they knew you were competing
In the Triwizard Tournament? proud? worried? angry?"
Harry was feeling really anxious now. How on earth is
Do you know how his parents would feel if they were alive? He can feel
Rita Skeeter is watching him very closely. With his head, he avoided her
Take a look and look down at the words the chief has just written:
Tears filled those amazing blue eyes as did our conversation
He looks at the parents he can't remember.
“I HAVE NO tears in my eyes!” Harry said aloud.
Before Rita Skeeter could say a word, the bathroom door
the lid was pulled open. Harry looked to the side, staring at the
A bright light. Albus Dumbledore stood there, staring at the two
Of these, they were torn in prison.
“Drum!” cried Rita Skiter, with every movement of
fun — but Harry noticed that his clothes and paper had
He suddenly burst out of the magical fire throwing screen, and
Rita’s clawed fingers were slowly tapping her pussy.
Carved leather key. "how are you?" she said, standing up and holding out one of her large, feminine hands to Dumbledore. " bid
Did you see my report over the summer about the International Confederation of Architects conference?”
“What’s terribly wrong,” Dumbledore said, his eyes tearing up. "I
I especially like your description of me as a worthless dingbat.”
Rita Skeeter didn’t seem to be smiling at all.
“I was just commenting that some of your ideas are a little .
of old, Dumbledore, that many wizards in the way —”
“I shall be glad to hear the reason behind the mischief, .
Rita,” Dumbledore said, with a reverent and frowning expression, “but .
I'm afraid we'll have to discuss this later. The weight of
Wands is about to start, and it can’t happen if one of us
champions is hiding in a dungeon.”
Too glad to be off Rita Skeeter, Harry hurried back to the
The room. The other old ones were now sitting in chairs near the
door, and quietly sat down next to Cedric, looking up at the
The framed table, where four of the five judges — Professor Karkaroff, Madame Maxime, Mr. Crouch, and .
Ludo Bagman. Rita Skeeter positioned herself in a corner; Harry
She saw him take the paper out of her bag again and put it on
hand, push out the end of the QuickQuotes Quill, and drop it once
More on the map.
“May I introduce Mr. Olivander?” Dumbledore said, taking his
A place at the judges’ table and conversation with elders. " to be .
They watch your shoes to ensure they’re in tip top shape before the tournament.”
Harry looked around and, in surprise, saw an old wizard with big, blue eyes standing quietly by the window. He had Harry
He’s met Mr. Ollivander before — he’s been the drummer ever since .
Harry bought his ring over three years ago at Diagon
way.
"Miss Delacour, can we have you first, please?" said
Mr. Ollivander, stumbled into the empty space in the middle of the
room.
Flur Delacour took out Mr. Olivander and handed him over .
His wand.
“Hmmm . . .” he said.
He twirled the wand between his long fingers like a club and he
They brought out a lot of purple and gold. Then he caught it near the
his eyes and examined her carefully.
“Yes,” he said aloud, “nine and a half meters . . . It doesn’t change . . .
A pine tree . . . and having . . . Dear to me. . .”
“An 'air from the ze 'ead of a veela,” said Fleur. “One of the .
of the great.”
So Fleur was part veela, Harry thought, making a mental note to
Tell Run . . . Then he remembered that Ron wasn't talking to him.
“Yeah,” said Mr. Ollivander, “yeah, I don’t use veela skins myself, of course. I find it makes for cool stuff . . .
However, to each his own, and if that works for you . .”
Mr. Ollivander ran his fingers over the material, evidently checking for scratches or dents; Then he muttered an “Orkid!” and a
clusters of flowers emerge from the top of the spike.
"All right, all right, she's in good shape," Mr. Ollivander said, and he pulled out the flowers and handed them to Fleur s .
His wand. " Sir. Diggory, you’re next.”
Fleur hurried back to her seat, smirking at Cedric as he walked past her.
“Oh, now, this is one of mine, isn’t it?” Mr. Oliphander said, with
Much more fun, as Cedric handed over his wallet. “Yes, I remember it well. It contained a hair from the tail of a rather large male . . . There should be seven hands; soon
she nodded at me after I scratched her forehead. Twelve and a quarter inches . . . ash . . . With the joy of spring. In excellent condition. . . .
Do you treat it every day?”
“Saved it yesterday,” Cedric said, smiling.
Harry looked at his wand. He could see the fingerprints.
All about him. He gathered a handful of cloth from his shoulder and tried to
Raised cleanly in secret. Several golden chains came out of the end.
In it. Fleur Delacour gave him a very sexy look, and he
He stopped.
Mr. Ollivander sent a stream of wisps of silver smoke across the
room from Cedric's wand tip, he said himself confessed,
and then said, “Mr. Chrome, if you please.”
Viktor Krum sprang to his feet and slumped, barefoot, towards Mr. Ollivander. He took off his wand and stood up.
with a grin, his hands in his coat pockets.
“Hmm,” said Mr. Olivander, “this is Gregorovit’s creation, .
Was I not very wrong? Good swordsman, although kind of
That wasn’t who I was . . . however . . .”
He picked up the ring, examined it for minutes, and put it back
And before his eyes.
"Yes . . . ring and dragon heart?” He shot at Krum,
who noticed. “Much more than one has seen in general . . . quite
tough . . . Fourteen meters . . . Warning!”
The mosquito net produced a bubble-like plume, and many of the
Small, screaming birds flew out of the end and into the open ground.
Window in aqueous sunlight.
"Okay," Mr. Ollivander said, handing Krum his wallet.
“Which leaves . . . Mr. Peter.”
Harry scrambled to his feet and walked across Krum to Mr. Ollivander.
He offered his wand.
“Aaaah, yes,” said Mr. Ollivander, his green eyes suddenly sparkling. “Yes, yes, yes. How I remember.”
Harry could remember too. He can remember it as a
It happened yesterday. . . .
Four summers ago, on his eleventh birthday, he had joined Mass.
Olivander's shop with Hagrid to buy a wand. Mr. Olivander has
He took his measurements and started giving teams to
try. Harry pulled out what felt like every wand in the pantry, until
The latter found the one who was right for him — the one, who was
It was made of wood, eleven inches long, and had a feather
From the body of a fin. Mr. Ollivander was very surprised.
that Harry was very appreciative of this baby. “He’ll see,” he said
He says, “curious,” and not until Harry asks what curious is .
Has Mr. Ollivander confirmed that the phoenix feather on Harry
The wand comes from a bird that gives rise to the essence of
of Lord Bulldemort.
Harry had never shared this piece of information with anyone.
He was fond of his wand, and as much as his relationship with Voldemort’s wand was something he couldn’t help —
Exactly like that he couldn't help being Aunt Petunia's favorite. however,
He really wished Mr. Ollivander wasn't going to tell the room
therefore. He’s Had a Surprising Feeling Quill by Rita Skeeter
He could only explode with pleasure if he did.
Mr. Ollivander spent a long time examining Harry's ring.
than anyone else. Eventually, however, he made a spring of .
He drained the wine from him, and handed it to Harry, announcing that
Still in excellent condition.
"Thank you all," Dumbledore said, standing next to the judges.
table. “Perhaps you should return to your lessons now—or perhaps you should .
Would definitely just go to dinner, since I’m about to
eventually -"
Feeling that something had finally gone right today, Harry got
He got up to leave, but the man with the black camera jumped up and
He cleared his throat.
“Gifts, Dumbledore, gifts!” shouted Bagman excitedly. " all
rulers and ancients, what do you think, Rita?”
“Er — yeah, let’s do those first,” said Rita Skeeter, rolling her eyes .
They were on Harry as well. “And then maybe some individual conversations.”
The photos took a long time. Madame Maxime puts everyone else in shadow wherever she goes, and the photographer
He could not stand far enough back to get her in the frame; eventually
She had to sit while everyone else stood around her. Karkarof took
He twirls his goat tail around his finger to give it extra crease; chromium,
Who would have thought Harry would have been honored at this
Kind of weird, skulking, half-hidden, in the middle of the group. the
The designer obviously wants to bring Fleur forward, but Rita
Skeeter kept rushing forward and pulling Harry into the main
Great. She then insisted on separate shots of all officials. Finally, they were free to go.
Harry went down to dinner. Hermione wasn't there—he thought she was still in the hospital wing getting her teeth fixed. he
He ate alone at the end of the table and then went back to Gryffindor
Tower, thinking about all the extra work on Summoning Charms for
It has to work. Up in the dorm, he finds Ron.
“You’ve got a mouse,” Ron snapped the moment he walked .
In. He was looking at Harry's collar. The school envelope was
They were waiting for him there.
“Oh — right,” said Harry.
"And we have to have our break tomorrow night, Snape's
prison,” Ron said.
He then walked straight out of the room, not looking at Harry.
For a moment, Harry thought about following him—he wasn't sure .
If he wanted to talk to him or hit him, both seemed fine—but the lure of Sirius' answer was too strong. Harry
stroded over to the shopkeeper, took the letter from his shoulder, and unfolded it.
Harry —
I can’t say everything I want to in one letter, it’s too complicated.
If infidelity is allowed — we need to talk face to face.
Can you ensure you are alone by the fire in Gryffindor
The Tower at one evening on November 2nd?
I know better than anyone that you can take care of yourself.
And while you’re around Dumbledore and Moody I don’t think
Anyone will be able to harm you. However, something seems to be
He has a good try. Going into that tournament I
They were very lucky, especially under Dumbledore's watch.
Be safe, Harry. I still want to hear about somethin
unusual. Let me know on November 22nd soon.
As much as you can.

CHAPTER NINETEEN
THE HUNGARIAN FOUNDATION

The prospect of a face-to-face conversation with Sirius was everything
He took care of Harry for the next couple of months, the same position that stood out
In a style that doesn’t look heavy. Exit Campaign
Himself as headmaster is a bit lost now, and the fear of
What he was facing started to sink in. The first thing was getting closer and closer; He felt like he was leaning forward
As like some horrible monster, he blocks her way. He had never had such feelings; They were far beyond anything he had experienced before a Quidditch match, even his last one against
Slytherin, who decided who would win the Quidditch Cup.
Harry was finding it hard to think about the future at all; It feels like
Although his whole life had been leading to, and would continue
S, first task. . . .
Of course, he didn't see how Sirius could be bothered .
Something beautiful about having to do a difficult unknown
and dangerous magic in front of hundreds of people, but that’s all
a friendly face smile would be something at the moment. Harry
He wrote to Sirius saying that he would be next to a partner
Fire up the room while Sirius proposed, he and Hermione
They spent a lot of time looking into plans to force some loser from
The common room on the night in question. If worse comes to
Worse, they were going to drop a bag of Dungbombs, but hopefully
They didn’t get that — Filch would have skinned them alive.
Meanwhile, life becomes even worse for Harry inside the
Castle Sunday, as Rita Skeeter posts her
about the triwizard race, and it turns out he wasn't
More coverage of the tournament as a colorful life story
of Harry. Most of the front page is devoted to a picture
of Harry; The article (continued on pages two, six and seven) has
They were all about Harry, the names of the Beauxbatons and Durmstrang knights (not misspelled) cut into the last cover .
article, and Cedric wasn’t mentioned at all.
The article was published ten days ago, and Harry was still sick,
A feeling of shame filled his stomach every time he thought.
therefore. Rita Skeeter told her a lot of
Things he couldn’t remember ever saying in his life, let alone in
That piece of architecture.
I think I get my strength from my parents. I
I know they would be so proud of me if they could see.
I am now. . . . Yes, sometimes at night I still cry
About them, I’m not ashamed to admit it. . . . I
I knew nothing could hurt me during the tournament.
Because they care about me. . . .
But Rita Skeeter went further than changing her outfit .
“Er's” in long, sick sentences: She was calling other people .
on him too.
Harry finally found love at Hogwarts. His approach
Friend, Colin Krivi, said Harry was rarely seen
From the union of one Hermione Granger, and
A very beautiful Muggle-born girl, like Harry,
He was one of the top students in the school.
Since that article, Harry has had to
They put up with people—Slytherins, mostly—dismissing it as it was .
He passed and made bold movements.
“Would you like a hanky, Potter, in case you start crying in the Changing?”
“Recently you were one of the top students in
School, Peter? Or the school that you and Longbottom founded .
together?"
“Hello — Harry!”
“Yes, of course!” Harry found himself blushing as he stared
ahead in motion, as it has just the right amount. “I just have
I cried my eyes out for my dead mom, and just went to work
A little more. . . .”
“No — it’s just — you took off your clothes.”
It was Cho. Harry felt the color rise in his face.
“Oh — sure — I’m sorry,” he murmured, putting the clothes back on.
“er . . . Good luck Tuesday,” she said. “I really hope you do
Well."

' '
Which made Harry feel very foolish.
Hermione even joined in with her fair share of annoyance,
But she didn’t start yelling at those innocent bystanders; In fact,
Harry is filled with pride at how careful she is
situation.
“Stunning cock? Is it free?" Pansy Parkinson shouted first
The moment when she came face to face with Hermione after Rita's article
It was obvious. “What was she judging him for — a rabbit?”
“You’re ignoring him,” Hermione said in a respectful tone, holding her head .
in the air and chase down giggling Slytherin girls like
She couldn’t hear them. “Just behave, Harry.”
But Harry couldn't ignore it. Run didn't speak to him at all.
Because he told her about Snape's stops. Harry has half
I hope they create jobs in the two hours they are
They tried using rat brains in Snape's dungeon, but that was
The release of Rita's article certainly cemented Ron's belief that Harry was really enjoying all the attention.
Hermione was furious with both of them; She went from a
For another, he tries to force them to talk to each other, but Harry
He was serious: He would talk to Ron again only if Ron agreed
that Harry didn't put his name in the Fire Chick and apologized for calling him a liar.
“I didn’t start this,” Harry said quietly. “That’s his problem.”
“You love him!” Hermione said calmly. “And I know he
She loves you —”
“Do you like him?” Harry said. “I don’t like it. . . .”
But that was patently false. Harry loved Hermione dearly.
But she just wasn't like Ron. There was very little laughter.
and many others who wandered around the library when Hermione was
Your old friend. Harry still didn't know the magic spells.
He seemed to have invented something about them,
And Hermione insists that learning the theory will help. they
As a result, they spent a lot of time poring over the books during their
lunchtime.
Viktor Krum was in the library a lot too, and Harry
He wondered what he was talking about. He was studying, or was researching
For things to help with the first job? Hermione often complained about Krum being there — not that it didn't hurt .
There are — but since gangs of girls giggling often show up to fuck
on him from behind the bookshelves, and Hermione found the figure
It's changing.
“He’s not even a good guy!” She said angrily, looking at the
Detailed profile of Krum. “They just love him because he’s famous!
They wouldn’t look twice if he couldn’t do that Wonky-Faint thing—”
"Wronski Feint," Harry growled, through gritted teeth. Exactly
From being obsessed with getting Quidditch punters right, he called another
hard to recall Run's words if he could have heard Hermione
Talk about WonkyFaynt.
It’s funny, but when you’re afraid of something, u
He would give anything to save time, he has an incredible habit of
development. The days until the first tasks seem to pass as
Although someone has programmed the clocks to work at double speed.
Harry’s sense of uncontrollable awe was with him wherever he went
Gone, as usual as snide comments about Christmas everyday
article.
On the Saturday before the first activity, all students in the third

' '
For a year and up they were committed to visiting Hogsmeade Village.
Hermione told Harry that he would be better off leaving the
The castle was small, and Harry didn't need much persuasion.
“What about Ron, though?” he said. “You don’t want to go with
he?"
"Oh . . . That's . . .” Hermione went a little wild “I think we are.
He can meet her on three boards. . . .”
“No,” Harry said flatly.
“Harry, this is so awful —”
“I’ll come, but I’m not meeting Ron, and I’m wearing my invisibility cloak.”
“Oh okay then . . .” Hermione said quietly, “but I like talking .
With you in that suit, I don’t know if I’m looking at you or not.”
So Harry put on his invisibility cloak in the dorm and went
They returned downstairs, and he and Hermione set off for the
Hogsmeade.
Harry felt wonderfully free under the blanket; He sees others
Students walked past them as they entered the village, most of the
were sporting the Cedric Diggory Foundation! Badges, but no derogatory words came his way for a change, and nobody remembered that
Stupid article.
“People keep staring at me now,” Hermione whispered as .
they left the Honeydukes Sweetshop later, eating huge bags of cream. “They think I’m talking to myself.”
“Don’t look too much then.”
“Come on, please just take your hoods off for a bit, no one’s going to bother you here.”
“Oh yeah?” Harry said. “Look behind you.”
Rita Skeeter and her photo friend just got out of
the Three Dogs pub. They speak in a low voice, past
Straight through Hermione without looking at her. Harry turned back to the
The Honeydukes wall to stop Rita Skeeter taking it with her
Handbag with vegan leather. After they left, Harry said, “She .
They stayed in the village. I bet she’ll come and see the first job.”
As he said it, his stomach filled with a dissolved bitterness.
He didn’t mention that; He and Hermione never talked about what
He was coming into the very first work; He had a feeling she didn't
I want to think about it.
“She’s gone,” Hermione said, looking straight at Harry at the end of the street. “Why don't we go have a butterbeer
At three bags, it’s a bit chilly, isn’t it? You don’t hav
Talk to Ron!” she added angrily, explaining her silence well.
The Three Broomsticks were crowded, especially Hogwarts students enjoying their free evening, but also various wizarding creatures Harry hadn't seen anywhere else. Harry thought that
Hogsmeade was the only wizarding village in Britain, it was a bit of
It’s a fun place for monster-like creatures, who aren’t as cunning as witches in
They define themselves.
It’s so hard to navigate through the crowd in Invisibility
Cloak, in case you’ve taken someone by surprise, who tends to
They lead to pointless questions. Harry slowly moved to a sigh.
Table in the corner while Hermione went to buy a drink. On his way
In the hallway, Harry spotted Run, who was sitting with Fred,
George, and Lee Jordan. Confronting the desire to give Ron a choice
He reached the back of his head and finally reached the table and sat down
Down in it.
Hermione joined him a moment later and slid the brisket under his pillow.

' '
“I look like such an idiot, sitting here by myself,” she smiles. “I guess I got something to do.”
And she pulled out a notebook in which she was saving a
purchase of SPEW members. Harry saw his and Run's names in the
top of a very short list. It has been clear for a long time that they have
They had been making out the scenes together, and Hermione had
They resigned and were appointed secretary and treasurer.
"You know, maybe I should try to get some of the villagers into SPEW," Hermione mused, looking around .
The shop.
“Yeah, right,” Harry said. He held a beer pitcher underneath him.
The coat. “Hermione, when are you going to give up on this shit .
stuff?"
“When household members have better pay and working conditions!”
she cried out loudly. “You know, I’m starting to think it’s time for more .
Direct action. I wonder how you get into the school uniform?”
“No idea, ask Fred and George,” Harry said.
Hermione sank into contemplative silence, while Harry drank his
Butterbeer, watching people in the hallway. They all look
Happy and relaxing. Ernie McMillan and Hannah Abbott were
exchanging Chocolate Frog cards at a nearby table; In both
Cedric Diggori Sports Foundation! Badges on their uniforms. Exactly
At the door he saw Cho and a large group of Ravenclawis
friends. She wasn't wearing Cedric's badge though. . . . this
Harry said just a little bit. . . .
What doesn’t matter if he’s one of these people, he stayed
In the midst of laughter and conversation, with nothing to worry about but
homework? He wonders how it would feel to be here if it were his .
The name did not come from the Pole of Fire. There was no
' '
They wore the Invisibility Shirt, for one thing. Run will be sitting
with him. The trio would probably be thinking happily
What deadly tasks will school students face
on Tuesday. He would actually be waiting for her, assuming
They do whatever it is . . . Appreciate Cedric and everyone
Else, safely somewhere in the middle of the stairs. . . .
He wondered how the other teens felt. whenever
He saw Cedric lately, surrounded by his admirers and
She looked tired but pleased. Harry saw Fleur Delacour from
time to time in the streets; She looked the same as she always did.
You love and she doesn’t care. And Krum just sat in the library, lookin
About books.
Harry thought of Sirius, and the thick, heavy voice in his chest
He seemed to have softened a bit. He will speak to her in just more
Twelve hours, since tonight is the night they meet at the
Common room fire — presumably nothing happened, as everything else has lately. . . .
“Look, it’s Hagrid!” Hermione said.
The shaved back of Hagrid’s big head—mercifully abandoning his boxers—towered over the crowd. Harry
He wondered why he hadn't noticed it at once, since Hagrid was so
He was older, but he stood still and noticed Hagrid was busy talking to Professor Moody. Hagrid had his big tankard in front of him as usual, but Moody was drinking from his .
The hip flask. Madame Rosmerta, the beautiful housekeeper, is inconspicuous
Think long and hard about this; She was staring as-cannedly at Moody as she gathered candles from the tables around them. Maybe she thinks it’s
It was an embarrassment to his stupid arrogance, but Harry knew better. He had Mudi
He told them all during their last lesson in Defense Against the Dark Arts .

' '
that he preferred to prepare his own food and drink at all times, as well as
It is very easy for Dark wizards to poison an unaccompanied cup.
As Harry looked around, he saw Hagrid and Moody get up to leave.
He sighed, then remembered that Hagrid couldn't see him. moody,
Still, he paused, his magical eyes centered on where Harry was
stood. He caught Hagrid in the small of the shoulder (he couldn’t
to reach his shoulders), something he said to her, and then
The two of them made their way back across the stairs towards Harry and
Hermione's table.
“Alright, Hermione?” Hagrid said aloud.
“Hi,” Hermione said, smiling broadly.
Moody rolled over the table and roared; Harry thought
He was reading a SPEW book, until he muttered, “Nice .
Clothes, Rainbow.”
Harry stared at him in surprise. Big part missing
From Moody’s head it was especially evident in the top few inches. Moody chuckled.
“Can your eyes — I mean, can you — ?”
"Yeah, he can see through the monitors," Moody said quietly. “And it’s come in handy at times, I can tell you.”
Hagrid was looking at Harry too. He knows Harry Hagrid
He couldn't see it, but it was clear that Moody had told Hagrid that he was
there. Hagrid is now stuck due to the call of
SPEW of the script as well, and said with such sarcasm that no
Harry could hear it, “Harry, meet me tonight at midnight for me .
The cabin. Wear that hat.”
Immediately, Hagrid said aloud, “Good to see,
Hermione,” she rolled her eyes and left. Moody followed.
“Why does Hagrid want me to meet him at midnight?” Harry
he said, very surprised.
“Is there?” Hermione said, looking confused. “I wonder what it is
And? I don’t know if you should go, Harry. . . .” Look
with panic on the edge and he smiled, “Maybe he’ll make you sick Sirius.”
Of course going down to Hagrid’s at midnight would mean
He had interrupted his meeting with Sirius very graciously indeed; Hermione offers to send Hedwig to Hagrid to tell him that he can’t
Go — always assuming she’ll agree to take the note, n
course — Harry, however, figured it was better just to rush through whatever Hagrid wanted him to. He was curious to know what that was.
It can be; Hagrid had never asked Harry to visit him on a night like this.
At half-past eleven that evening, Harry, who pretended to go
to bed early, pulling the cloak of invisibility over himself and
Make it downstairs to the common room. Just a little
People are still there. The Creevey brothers managed to get
Leave a Support Desk Cedric Diggory! plates and were looking for
They were tricked into saying Help Harry Potter! instead. so
However, all they managed to do was connect the envelopes
About POTTER SLEEPING. Harry stretched them to picture length.
And he waited a minute or so, keeping an eye on his watch. so
Hermione opened the blue box for him from outside as they
It's planned. He brushes past her “Thank you!” and install
off to the castle.
The floor was very flat. Harry walked across the grass towards the
The lights flickered in Hagrid's cabin. within the larger
The Beauxbatons’ box was also illuminated; Harry could hear Mrs.
Maxime spoke inwardly as he knocked on Hagrid's front door.

' '
“You there, Harry?” Hagrid sighed, opening the door and
They looked around.
“Yeah,” Harry said, leaning inside the box and pulling .
his clothes off his head. "what's up?"
“Got summed ter show yeh,” Hagrid said.
There was a great air of optimism about Hagrid. was
He wears a flower-like necklace around his neck. He seemed to have abandoned the use of the ship.
oily, but he really did try to comb his hair— Harry .
He could see the broken teeth of a comb tangled in it.
“What did you show me?” Harry said bitterly, wondering if
Skrewts lays eggs, or Hagrid manages to buy another prince
A three-headed dog from a stranger in a courtyard.
“Come with me, shut up, an' keep yourself covered with this
clothes,” Hagrid said. “We didn’t catch Fang, he didn’t care. . . .”
“Listen, Hagrid, I can’t stay much longer. . . . I have to go back to the future for
castle at one evening —”
But Hagrid wasn't listening; He had opened the cabin door and
flowing into the night. Harry was determined to follow and found out, he would
His greatest tribute, because Hagrid used to take him to Beauxbatons
car.
“Hagrid, what — ?”
“Chch!” Hagrid said, knocking three times on the door
They carry carved gold baskets.
Madame Maxime opened it. She was wearing a pleated silk skirt.
On his great forehead. She smiled when she saw Hagrid.
“Oh, ‘Grid . . . Is it time?”
"Bongsewer," Hagrid said, looking at her, and held out a
A hand to help her fall into the golden step.
Madame Maxim closed the door behind her and Hagrid gave her
his hand, and they set off across the square in which Madame Maxime’s great winged horses, and Harry, were fully
They get alarmed and run to chase after them. If Hagrid wanted
Show him Miss Maxim? He could see her every old time he was
wanted . . . It wasn't exactly difficult. . . .
But it turned out that Madame Maxime was in the party as .
Harry, because after a while she jokingly said, “Wair is you .
He got me, 'Grid?”
“Yeh'll enjoy this,” Hagrid said sternly, “it’s worth seeing, trust me.
On'y — don't go tell everybody I show yeh, right? You’re not
S'posed ter know.”
"Of course not," said Madame Maxime, flashing him long .
Black eyes.
And still they walked, Harry growing more and more like
Running through their parade, checking his watch every
so. Hagrid has some monkey-headed invention in his possession, which can
Make Sirius embarrassed. If they didn’t arrive soon, he would
Turn around, go straight to the castle, and let Hagrid enjoy his moonshot walk with Madame Maxime. . . .
But then — when many went over the edge .
of the forest that the castle and the lake were out of sight — Harry
I heard something. The men were cheering in front . . . Then came a
a piercing, ear-splitting noise. . . .
Hagrid led Madame Maxim around a clump of trees and came
to a stop. Harry rushed towards them—for a fraction of a second, he .
He thought he saw fireworks, and men rushing at them —
Then his mouth fell open.
Dragons.

' '
Four huge, ferocious-looking dragons were rising up on their hind legs inside an enclosure protected by heavy boards .
of wood, roaring and roaring — the waves were whistling in the
The dark clouds from their open, hooded mouths, fifty feet above the
ground on their exposed asses. There was a silvery green one.
With long, massive horns, they tease and tease witches about
floor; A medium-sized green one, which was moving and
she pushed with all her might; One is red with a solid gold ring.
Stripes on his face, which was shooting fire in beast form
clouds in the sky; It was a giant black one, more animal-like than
Others, it’s the one closest to them.
At least thirty witches, seven or eight for each dragon, were
You try to control them, you pull the chain connected to
wearing thick cloth on their necks and shoulders. wonder,
Harry looked, looked up, and saw black eyes
The dragon, with pupils upright like a cat’s, flinches in fear or
shock, he couldn't say which. . . . He was making strange noises, a
yowling, with a desperate cry. . . .
“Keep in there, Hagrid!” shouted a wizard near the wall, shaking the chain he was holding. “They can fire in a range of
Twenty feet, you know! I’ve seen this Horntail do forty!”
“Isn’t it beautiful?” Hagrid said quietly.
“It’s not good!” shouted another wizard. “Amazing quotes, about .
Count three!”
Harry saw each of the rangers draw their wand.
“Stop!” They screamed in unison, and the terrifying spells shot
In the darkness like fireworks, flickering in the shower of stars on
Dragon Beasts —
Harry noticed the nearby dragon was shaking dangerously.
his hind legs; His lips were pursed high in a silent sneer; Her nose
They were suddenly less smoky, though they still smoked — back then, many
Slowly, she sank. Several tons of pitted black snow rained down
Earth with a whisper that Harry could try to make trees
Her back quivered.
The Dragon Guard dropped their spears and advanced towards the
their ruined remains were each the size of a small mountain. they
He tried to break the chains and fasten them securely to the iron shackles,
who forced him to the floor with their fists.
“Wanna take a closer look?” Hagrid asked Madam Maxim excitedly.
The two made it to the fence, and Harry followed.
The wizard who warned Hagrid not to get angry
He turned around, and Harry realized who it was: it was Charlie Weasley.
“Alright, Hagrid?” he said, coming up to speak. "they
Should be fine by now — we shot them with Sleeping Draft in
way here, think maybe they better get the
Darkness and silence—but, as you see, they’re not happy, not
You’re all happy —”
“What kind of gender have you got here, Charlie?” Hagrid said, looking at the
A short, black dragon, with something approaching shame.
His eyes were still just open. Harry could see a streak of glistening ink beneath his swollen black mask.
"This is a Hungarian shepherd," Charlie said. “There’s a Common Welsh Green in there, the smaller one — the Swedish ShortSnout, the blue-green one — and the Chinese Fireball, which is red.”
Charlie looked around; Madame Maxim was walking away.
around the corner of the stairs, looking at the painted dragons.

' '
"I didn't know you were taking her, Hagrid," said Charlie,
with his head. “The adults aren’t supposed to know what’s coming — she’s bound to tell her student, isn’t she?”
“Jus' thinking she'd like to see them,” Hagrid said, still staring, fascinated, at the dragons.
"Truly a lovely date, Hagrid," Charlie said, shaking his head.
“Four . . .” Hagrid said, “so it’s one fer each in the poles, it’s
it? What are they supposed to do — fight for them?”
"Just pass them, I guess," Charlie said. “We will be on hand if
It gets nasty, Exfoliating wipes at the ready. They want to breed mothers, and I don’t know why . . . But I’ll tell you this, I’m not jealous
Who is carrying the Horntail. Damn thing. His back end is just as bad as his front, see.”
Charlie pointed at the Horntail's tail, and Harry looked long,
bronze-colored sparks appeared on it every few inches.
Five of Charlie’s fellow guards contacted Horntail for
That moment, he carried a bunch of large granite boulders between
of them in a box. They carefully placed them in Horntail’s enclosure
appearance. Hagrid let out a sigh of relief.
"I know them, Hagrid," Charlie said quietly. Then he
“How’s Harry doing?” he said.
“Okay,” Hagrid said. He was still looking at the eggs.
"I just hope he's still good after facing this much," Charlie said .
Solemnly, he looks up at the mountain range. “I can’t say
Mom what he had to do for the first job; It already has cats on it. . . .” Charlie imitates his mother’s voice with affection.
“ 'How they let him into that circle, he's so young!
I think they are all safe, I think it will never
Limit!' She was in heat after that Daily Prophet article about her.
'He's still crying for his parents! Oh well, I don’t know! ”
Harry had had enough. She relies on the fact that Hagrid cannot
You love it, with the four dragons and Madame stuff
Maxime was going to catch up, turned silently and started walking away,
Return to the castle.
He didn’t know if he was happy because he saw the future
do you. Maybe this way is better. The first phase is now over.
Maybe if he’d seen the animals for the first time on Tuesday, he’d
He would go out cold in front of the whole school . . . but
He probably would have done it anyway. . . . He was going to be armed with his
potatoes — which, right now, don’t feel like anything more than a tight bun
strip of wood — against a rainbow fifty feet long, light, bright, and hot. And he had to get past it. With everyone’s attention. how?
Harry sped up and skirted the edge of the forest; He had only under
Fifteen minutes to go back to the fireside and talk to Sirius, and he
I can’t remember, ever, wanting to talk to anyone more than her
It worked just now — when, without warning, he crashed into something
Very strong.
Harry fell backwards, his juices ringing, holding the cock in the middle.
he. A voice nearby said, “Uch! Who’s there?”
Harry quickly checked that the wand was awake and dozed off.
Still very much, he stared at the edge of the blade he had struck. he
It shows the goat’s head . . . and Karkaroff.
“Who’s there?” said Karkaroff again, very suspiciously, looking .
ahead in the dark. Harry remained still and silent. After
For a minute or so, Karkaroff seemed to decide that he had lost some sort

' '
of an animal; He was staring at the height of the table, as if expecting to see a dog. Then he quickly returned under the influence of
trees and started walking forward towards the place where the dragons were.
Slowly and carefully, Harry rose to his feet and left.
Repeat as quickly as possible without making too much noise, avoiding
Down the bridge towards Hogwarts.
He has no qualms about what Karkaroff is up to. have
He leaves his ship to try and find out what the first tasks are
to be. He probably even saw Hagrid and Madame Maxim
They ride through the forest together — they’re not bad
You will see in the distance . . . And now all Karkaroff had to do was follow the sound of voices, and he, like Madame Maxime, would
They know what’s in store for the adults.
Ideally, only the president would face
Unknown Tuesday was Cedric.
Harry arrived at the castle, snuck in through the front gates, and
It began to rise with a marble countertop; He was very breathless, but he
He couldn't stop. . . . It takes less than five minutes to get up.
to the fire. . . .
“Balderdash!” He smiled at the blonde, who was panting in the
Its frame near the top corner.
“If you say so,” she said sleepily, without opening her eyes, .
and the picture bends forward to receive it. Harry went inside. The common room was empty, and, to judge honestly
That she smelled so normal, Hermione didn't need to leave
A few Dungbombs to ensure that he and Sirius got lucky.
Harry took off the invisibility cloak and slipped into a
A chair by the fireplace. The room was in the dark; the
The air is the only source of light. Nearby, on the table, help
Cedric Diggory! The Creeveys’ fences were meant to be improved
they were glistening in the firelight. They now read POTTER for real
IT'S COLD. Harry looked back at the fire and jumped.
Sirius' head lay in flames. If Harry hadn't seen Mr Diggory doing exactly that in the Weasleys' bathroom, he would have
They scared him out of his mind. Instead, his face approaches the first
A smile he had been wearing for days, he leapt out of his chair and bent
Under the breath, he said, "Sirius—how are you?"
Sirius looked different from Harry's memory of him. When they are
He said well, Sirius's face was pale and collapsed, covered in a lot of long, black, matted hair—but hair .
It was short and clean-shaven now, Sirius' face was fuller, and he looked
He was small, much like the only picture Harry had of him,
which was taken at the Potters' wedding.
“Don’t worry about me, how are you?” Sirius said seriously.
“I —” For a second, Harry tried to say “maybe” — but he couldn’t .
Do it. Before he stopped himself, he was saying more than he would say
She talked in days — about how no one believed he hadn’t joined the
of cycling with her free will, how Rita Skeeter lied about
At Christmas every day, how can he not walk down the aisle
Without acknowledgment—and for Ron, Ron didn't believe him,
Run’s jealousy . . .
“. . . And now Hagrid just showed me what’s to come in the first
Task, and it’s dragons, Sirius, and I’m an idiot,” he finished grimly.
Sirius looked at him, eyes filled with worry, eyes unrelieved
He lost the vision that Azkaban had given them — the dead one,
A vision of hell. He let Harry talk to himself in silence without

' '
You nodded, but now he said, 'Dragons we can deal with, Harry, .
But we’ll get to that in a minute — I don’t have much time here . . . I have
They broke into a wizarding house to use fire, but they could be
Return at any time. There are things I should have warned you about.”
"what?" Harry said, feeling his spirits rise a few more times.
Resources. . . . Surely there couldn’t be anything worse than animals
coming?
"Karkarof," Sirius said. “Harry, he was deadly serious. You know
What are Death Eaters, aren’t they?”
“Yeah — he — what?”
“He was arrested, he was in Azkaban with me, but he was released.
I'd bet everything is why Dumbledore wanted an Auror in
Hogwarts this year — to be careful. Modi was arrested
Karkaroff. Put him in Azkaban in the first place.”
“Has Karkaroff been released?” Harry said slowly — like his brain .
He will be struggling to digest yet another disappointing piece of news. “Why did they fire him?”
"He made a deal with the Ministry of Magic," Sirius growled.
“He said he knew the error of his ways, and then he named
pronouns . . . He put a bunch of other people in Azkaban in his apartment
place. . . . Not very well known there, I can tell you. And since
Turns out, from what I can tell, he taught fine arts
For every student who attended his school. So look
out for the Durmstrang tournament as well.”
“Okay,” Harry said quietly. "But . . . you said Karkarof
Put my name on the board? Because if he does, he’s a really good one
actor. He seemed angry at her. He wants to stop me from
They’re fighting.”

“We know he’s a good actor,” Sirius said, “because he’s convincing .
Ministry of Engineering to release it, isn’t it? Now, I was
You’re keeping an eye on Everyday Christmas, Harry —”
“— You and the whole world,” Harry growled.
“— and read between the lines of that Skeeter’s article last month, Moody was arrested the night before he started at
Hogwarts. Yeah, I know she said it was another shit,” Sirius .
He said quietly, seeing Harry was about to speak, “but I don’t think so, .
somehow. I think someone tried to stop him from getting to Hogwarts. I think someone who knows their job would be much more difficult.
with him around. And no one will see it closely;
Madey's listened to the farmers a bit too often. But that doesn’t mean he
He still couldn’t see what was real. Moody is the best Auror the department has ever had.”
"So . . . what do you say?” Harry said quietly, “of Karkaruf.
Are you trying to kill me? But — why?”
Sirius sighs.
“I’ve heard some pretty interesting things,” he gushed.
“Death eaters seem to be a bit more active than usual lately.
They proved themselves at the Quidditch World Cup, didn’t they?
Someone set up a heavy mark . . . And then - you hear
About the missing Magic Ministry wife?”
“Berta Jurkins?” Harry said.
"Certainly . . . it has fallen in Albania, and that is certainly
Where Voldemort was reported as the last . . And she wanted to have
She knows the Triwizard Tournament is coming, doesn’t she?”
“Yeah, but . . . It wasn’t possible for her to go straight inside.
Voldemort, right?” Harry said.

' '
"Listen, I know Berta Jorkins," Sirius insisted. “She was
At Hogwarts when I was, a few years older than your father.
And she was an idiot. Very nosy, but no brains, none at all. Not
Good company, Harry. I’d say it would be much easier to incorporate into a
trap.
"So . . . So Voldemort might have found out about the ring?” Harry said “is that what you mean you think Karkaruf?
Can he be here on his own instructions?”
“I don’t know,” Sirius whispered, “I just don’t know . . .
Karkaroff doesn’t strike me as the type to go back to Voldemort
Unless Voldemort knew he had the power to protect him.
But whoever put your name on that board did it for a reason, and
I can’t help thinking that the tournament would be a very good way to
They attacked you and made it look like an accident.”
“It sounds like a really good plan from where I’m standing,” he said .
Harry looks worried. “They should just stand back and let
The dragons do their thing.”
“Of course — these legs,” Sirius said, speaking very fast .
now. “There is a way, Harry. Don’t you dare try the amazing
Spell — dragons are strong and too powerful with magic to be
Hit by a Stunner, you need about half a dozen wizards at a time to defeat a dragon —”
“Yeah, I know, I just saw,” Harry said.
"But you can do it alone," Sirius said. “There is a way, and it’s just a simple trick you need. just -"
But Harry raised a hand to silence him, his heart racing
They squirmed like she was going to break up. He heard footsteps coming down the spiral stairs behind him.
"go!" He smiled at Sirius. "Go! There's someone coming!”
Harry shrugged, hiding the fire — in case anyone saw .
Sirius face inside the walls of Hogwarts, they would raise a
The great challenge — the Ministry will appear — is,
Harry, to be asked about Sirius’s whereabouts —
Harry heard a small pop! in the fire afterwards and recognized Sirius
He walked. He looked down the barbed wire rack. Who has
He decided to go for a walk one evening, and
Did he stop Sirius to tell him how to cross a bridge?
It was Run. Wearing his blue Paisley pajamas, he stopped Run
He died in front of Harry at the front of the room, and looked around.
“Who are you talking to?” he said.
“What’s that got to do with you?” Harry shouted. “What are you
Do you work down here at this time of night?”
“I was just asking where you —” Ron was cut off, shrugging.
"No. I'm going back to bed.”
“Just thought you’d come with a smile, didn’t you?” Harry
he shouted. He knew that Ron had no idea what he was getting into,
He knew he didn’t do it intentionally, but he didn’t care — in that
That moment hated everything about Run, so much
Inches of thick skin showing beneath her pajama pants.
“Sorry about that,” Ron said, his face red with anger.
“You have to understand you don’t want to be intimidated. I'll let you take
on having your next interview in peace.”
Harry grabbed one of POTTER's REALLY HURTING spells
table and bent it, as best he could, across the room. Hit
Ron over the shoulder and out.
“There you go,” Harry said. “Anything you wear .

' '
Tuesday. You might even have sex by now, if you’re lucky. . . . This
What you want, isn't it?”
He crossed the room to the window; He half expected
Ron to stop him, even Ron would be willing to shoot
into him, but Ron just stood there in his very small suit, and
Harry, after rushing upstairs, lay frozen in bed panting for a long
time after and she didn't hear him as he went to bed.

CHAPTER TWENTY
THE FIRST K

Harry woke up on Monday morning and dressed so carefully that it took a moment before he realized he was trying.
He would pull his shirt over his shoulder instead of his pants. When will the end
He got all his clothes on the right parts of his body and slowly went to
Find Hermione, find her at the Gryffindor table in the Common
Hall, where she was eating breakfast with Ginny. Even feeling
Needing to eat, Harry waited until Hermione had eaten the last of his
a pile of soup, then spat it out on the ground.
There, he told her all about the dragons, and all
Sirius said, while they took another long walk along the beach.
As she had been instructed by Sirius about Karkaroff,
Hermione still thought the dragons were more threatening
problem.
“We’ll just try to keep you alive until Tuesday morning,” she said.
Groaningly, “then we can deal with Karkaroff.”
Chapter Twenty
They walked three times across the lake and tried all the way to
Think of a simple line that will shake a dragon. Nothing occurred to them, so they retired to the library instead.
Here, Harry pulls up every book he can find on dragons,
And the two of them started running around the big pond.
“ 'A sharp knife with a knife . . . Surface treatment . . .' This is no
Great, this is for the nerds like Hagrid who wants to hold them
healthy. . . .”
“ 'The footprints are very hard to kill, because of the old knife .
The immues their monsters are tough, none but the strongest
He can enter . . .' But Sirius said it was an easy one to do. . . .”
“Let’s try some simple spellbooks, then,” Harry said, drawing .
Aside men who like dicks too much.
He went back to the table with a bunch of sketchbooks and put them down
Down, he began to spill into each in turn, and Hermione hissed incessantly into her throat.
“Well, there are bells of change . . . But what’s the point of
Did you change it? Unless you replace his lips with alcoholic beverages or something that will make him look less appealing. . . . The problem is, it seems
The book says, not much would pass a dragon bitch
hide. . . . I would say Transfigureit, but something that big, you really
I had no hope, I doubted Professor McGonagall either . . . unless
Should you put pressure on yourself ? Maybe give yourself
Extra capacity? But it’s not simple manipulations, I mean, we don’t do
Every single one of those in school, I only knew because I was doing OWL level papers. . . .”
“Hermione,” Harry said, through gritted teeth, “you’re going to stop .
Breathe a little, please? I’m trying to focus.”
But all that happened, when Hermione was silent, was that
PART ONE
' '
Harry's mind was filled with a sort of hazy, unclear
To leave room for observation. He stares hopelessly down at the deck of Basic Hexes for Busy and Vexed. Instantaneous scalping . . . but
Dragons do not have hair . . . Pepper breath . . . This would probably increase the heat capacity of a dragon . . . The tongue of the dogs . . . However he
It had to, to give him another ammunition . . .
“Oh no, he’s back again, why can’t he study on his stupid ship?”
Hermione exclaimed excitedly as Viktor Krum walked in, putting on a sly smirk .
Looked at the two of them, and curled up in a far corner with a stack of books. “Come on, Harry, let’s go back to
Common Room . . His fan group will be here in no time, on twitter
away. . . .”
And sure enough, as they exited the library, a group of girls flew to their feet .
In front of them, one of them wears a matching Bulgarian veil
waist.
Harry barely slept that night. When he woke up Monday morning, he thought seriously for the first time just in passing
Away from Hogwarts. But as he looked around the great hall about .
Coffee time, and think about what would happen if I left the castle
I mean, he knew he couldn’t do it. It’s the only place he has
He was happy. . . So, he thought he should be happy with
His parents did too, but he couldn't remember that.
Somehow, the knowledge that he was here and dealing with a dragon rather than going back to Privet Drive with Dudley was good for
know; It made him feel a little anxious. He finished his taxes with
problem (his voice isn’t working well), and as he and
Hermione woke up and saw Cedric Diggory leaving Hufflepuff
table.

' '
Cedric still doesn’t know about dragons . . . It was the same chairman who didn’t, if Harry was right in thinking that Maxime was
Karkaroff would tell Fleur and Krum. . . .
“Hermione, I’ll see you in the greenhouses,” Harry said, coming .
considering his decision as he watched Cedric leave the Hall. “Go on, I’ll
I’ll catch you.”
“Harry, you’ll be late, the bell is about to ring—”
“I’m going to catch you, okay?”
By the time Harry reached the bottom of the marble staircase,
Cedric was at the top. It was with a load of sixth year friends.
Harry didn't want to talk to Cedric in front of them; are
Among those quoting Rita Skeeter’s article about it
Every time he approached them. He followed Cedric from a distance.
And he saw that he was heading to the Charms store. this
He gave Harry an idea. He stopped at a distance from them and breathed
his wand, and took aim calmly.
“Define!”
She opened Cedric's bag. Paper, clothing, and books come out of it
On the ground. Several ink bottles were destroyed.
“Don’t worry,” Cedric said sounding as annoyed as his friends .
He knelt down to help. “Tell Flitwick I’m coming, go on. . . .”
That was what Harry had hoped for. He passed down his property.
Wand went back to his desk, waited until Cedric's classmates left for their classes, and hurried down the stairs, which d
He was now the center of everyone but himself and Cedric.
“Hello,” Cedric said, holding up a copy of A Guide to Advanced .
The existing transfiguration was obscured by a storm. “Just my bag
split . . . New and all . . .”
“Cedric,” Harry said, “first job is the feet.”

' '
"what?" Cedric said, looking up.
"Footprints," Harry said, speaking casually, in case Professor Flitwick had come out to see where Cedric had gotten to. “They have four,
One for each of us, and we have to surpass them.”
Cedric stared at him. Harry sensed something of the panic he was
The feeling from Saturday night flashed in Cedric's blue eyes.
“Are you sure?” Cedric said in a shocked voice.
“He’s really dead,” Harry said. “I’ve seen them.”
“But how did you get it? We don’t need to know. . . .”
“He won’t,” Harry said quietly—he knew Hagrid would be .
In trouble if he told the truth. “But I’m not the only one who knows.
Fleur and Krum would know by now — Maxim and Karkaroff both .
He even saw footprints.”
Cedric straightened, his hands full of ink, paper,
and books, her tattered bag dangling from one shoulder. Looks at the
Harry, and there was a look of confusion, almost suspicion in his eyes.
“Why did you tell me?” he asked.
Harry looked at him in disbelief. He was sure that Cedric would never do it.
They asked that if he had seen the monsters himself. Harry didn’t want to
They let his evil villain deal with those unprepared monsters — well,
Maybe Malfoy or Snap . . .
“It’s just . . . Fair, isn’t it?” he told Cedric. “We all know
now . . . We’re on the same page, aren’t we?”
Cedric was still looking at him slightly suspiciously when
Harry heard a familiar rustling noise behind him. he turned
ahead and saw Mad-Eye Moody emerge from a nearby hill.
“Come with me, Potter,” he begged. “Diggory, you leave.”
Harry looked at Moody in shock. Did he hear them?

' '
“Er — Professor, I should be in Herbology —”
“You won’t, Potter. In my office, please. . . .”
Harry followed, wondering what the
to him now. What if Moody wanted to know how he found
About dragons? Moody goes to Dumbledore and tells him
Hagrid, or would you just turn him into a butterfly? So, it might be easier to
Pass a dragon If it were a beast, Harry thought, it would be
Small, often not easy to spot from a height of fifty feet . . .
He followed Moody to his office. Moody closed the door behind them, and turned to look at Harry, his magical eyes fixed on him .
to him it is the same as the original.
"That's very nice of you to do just now, Potter," Moody said .
silently.
Harry didn't know what to say; That wasn't the answer he had.
It’s all expected.
“Sit,” Moody said, and Harry sat up, looking around.
He had visited the office under two of its former occupants. in
On Professor Lockhart’s day, the walls were lined with glowing, sparkling pictures of Professor Lockhart himself. When Lupine is
Living here, you are more likely to get a sample of
Some strange new green creature he had prepared for them to
Reading in school. Now, however, the office was filled with a number of odd items that Harry claimed Moody had used in
The days when he was an Auror.
On his desk stood what looked like a large, cracked glass window; Harry instantly recognized it as the Sneakoscope, because he
He has one himself, though much smaller than Moody's. in
Cornered on a small table was an object looking at something
Like a gold, black-and-white television set. She was warming up.

' '
little. What appeared to be a mirror hung in front of Harry on
wall, but he wasn't visible in the room. Shadowy figures were moving inside it, none of them clearly in view.
“Like my Dark Detectives, are you?” said Moody, who was
She looked at Harry closely.
“What’s that?” Harry asked, looking at the purple gold.
hotel.
“Secret censorship. He is shocked to discover a secret and
lies . . . No advantage here, indeed, too much innocence — students
All around they lie about why they don’t do their homework. Been humming ever since I got here. I need to reduce
Sneakoscope because it doesn’t stop with the sneakers. is more sensitive,
He runs things about a mile around. Of course, it can be optional
up more kid stuff,” he added to a chuckle.
“What’s a mirror?”
“Oh and my Foe-Glass. Do you see them out there, squirming?
I wasn’t really in trouble until I saw their eyeballs. This
When I open my trunk.”
He let out a short, sweet laugh and pointed to the giant potato
Under the window. It has seven shipping containers in a row. Harry asked.
What was there, until Moody’s next question led to
He quickly returned to the ground.
"So . . . you found out about the dragons, did you?"
Harry hesitated. He was afraid of that — but he didn’t say
Cedric, and he certainly wasn’t going to tell Moody, that Hagrid
He had broken the rules.
“It’s okay,” Moody said, sitting up and holding out his hand .
Wooden floor with beam. “Cheating is a traditional part of the Triwizard Cup and always has been.”

' '
“I didn’t screw up,” Harry said quietly. “It’s — kind of an accident .
that I have come.”
Moody chuckled. “I don’t blame you, son. I was saying
Dumbledore from the beginning, could be as high minded as he liked,
But you can bet old Karkaroff and Maxime aren’t. They will have
They told their old ones everything they could. They want to win. they
They wanted to beat Dumblur. They want to show they’re just human.”
Moody gave another cruel laugh, and his magical eye rolled
forward as quickly as it made Harry anxious to watch.
"So . . . do you have any ideas about how to cross your leg
Still?" Moody said.
“No,” Harry said.
"Well, I won't tell you," Moody insisted. "I don't
Show the farm, me. Just to give you some grace, General
advice. And the first step is — play to your strengths.”
"I don't have anything," Harry said, before he could stop himself.
“I’m sorry,” Moody snapped, “you have the powers if I say .
You have them. Think now. What do you like best?”
Harry tried to refocus. What was so good about it? So, there’s this
Simple, really —
“Quidditch,” he growled, “and a lot of help—”
“That’s right,” Moody said, looking very serious at him, his magic
The eye barely moves at all. “You’re a good shooter from what I’ve got
heard."
“Yeah, but . . .” Harry stared at him. “I’m not allowed to have a body,
I have only my wand—”
"My second general piece of advice," Moody said aloud, interrupting him, "is to use a good, precise smile that will allow you to . . ."
Give what you need.”

' '
Harry looked at him blankly. What does he need?
“Come on, baby . . .” said Mudi. “Put them that way . . .
It’s not that hard. . . .”
And click. It was the best thing on the plane. should pass
A jumper in the sky. For that, he needs his Firebolt. And for his Firebolt, he needs —
“Hermione,” Harry whispered, as he trudged towards the treehouse .
Three minutes later, he said a silent apology to Professor Sprout .
As he passed it. “Hermione — I need you to help me.”
“What do you think I was trying to do, Harry?” she said with a smile, her eyes longingly looking over the top of the Flutterby Bush she was picking.
“Hermione, I need to learn how to do a seductive spell .
All right until tomorrow evening.”
And that’s how they trade. They didn’t eat lunch, but went to
free reading, where Harry tried with all his might to push various objects flying across the room towards him. He still has
Problems. Books and puzzles end up losing heart halfway through
the room and dropped like stones to the ground.
“Focus, Harry, focus. . . .”
“What do you think I’m trying to do?” Harry said angrily. "a
The great big dragon keeps popping up in my head for some reason. . . .
So, try again. . . .”
He wanted to skip Divination so he could keep practicing, but Hermione
He outright refused to enable Arithmancy, and no
point in staying without it. He therefore had to rely on a
Professor Trelawney's hour, who spent half the lesson talking

' '
Everyone that the position of Mars relative to Saturn in that
time means that people born in July are at greater risk of
A quick, violent death.
“Well, that’s nice,” Harry said aloud, his excitement reaching
Better, “just as long as it’s not drawn. I don't wanna
suffer."
Ron looked for a moment as if he were going to laugh; he
He actually caught Harry's eye for the first time in days, but Harry
He was still too worried about Ron to care. He spent the rest.
of the lesson tries to pull small objects to it under the
The table with its staff. It succeeds in performing an expansion directly to
His hand, though not quite as strong as his in
Summoning Charms — maybe the baby was just being silly.
He insisted on some dinner after Divination, and then went back to
The empty universe and Hermione, using the Invisible Child
To excite teachers. They continued to practice until midnight.
They would be long gone, but Peeves returned, and, pretending to think Harry wanted things thrown at him, began .
Chucking chairs across the room. Harry and Hermione appeared in a
hour before the audience Filch pulls away, and returns to the
The Gryffindor common hall, which was now mercifully empty.
At two in the morning, Harry stood in front of the fireplace.
Surrounded by piles of stuff: books, bags, a lot of added
four chairs, an old set of Gob stones, and Neville’s sculpture, Trevor. Only in
The last hour was in Harry actually discovering the Summoning wand
Magic.
"That's better, Harry, that's a lot better than that," Hermione said, sounding tired but very happy.
"Well, now we know what we'll do next time I can't manage a

' '
With magic,” Harry said, turning back the spell dictionary for Hermione, .
To be able to try again, “threaten me with a drink. right . . .” he
He raised his wand again. “Accio’s Dictionary!”
The heavy book slipped from Hermione's hand and flew over
room, and Harry took it.
“Harry, I’m sure you have!” Hermione said excitedly.
“Just as long as it works tomorrow,” Harry said. “of fire
It would be much farther away than things are here, it would be
I was in the castle, and I was going to be out there in the open. . . .”
“That’s incredible,” Hermione insisted “Just .
You feel really, really strongly about it, it will come. Harry, to
Better get some sleep. . . You’re going to need it.”
Harry was very dedicated to learning Summoning
Charm that afternoon that somehow his blind panic left him. It was back to the same size, however, the following morning. The atmosphere in the school was one of great festivity and exuberance.
Lessons were to stop at noon, giving all students time to get
to the dragon’s temple — although, of course, they didn’t
But they knew what they’d find there.
Harry definitely felt different from everyone around him, whether
they were wishing him luck or whispering “Let’s have a shoebox box, Potter ” as he passed. It’s a state of depression so overwhelming that he wonders if he just can’t keep his head down .
When they tried to push him back to his beast, and start trying
We cursed everyone in the eye. Time was traveling in a more complicated manner than ever before, rushing by at great speeds, so that a moment would
He seems to be stuck in his first lesson, the history of magic, and .
Next, walking in lunch . . . And then (where morning

' '
gone? Last of the unsleeping hours?), Professor McGonagall .
He was yelling at her in the Great Hall. Many people are
observe.
“Potter, the elves must come down to earth .
now. . . . You have to get ready for your first job.”
“Okay,” Harry said, standing up, his fork falling onto his plate .
With one ship.
“Hello, Harry,” Hermione whispered. “You’ll be fine!”
“Yeah,” Harry said in a voice that didn’t sound like his own.
He left the Great Hall with Professor McGonagall. It didn't work.
She showed herself too; In fact, she seemed almost as anxious as Hermione. As she climbed down the stone staircase and went out to
On a cold November afternoon, she put her hand on her cheek.
“Now,” she said, “don’t worry, just keep a cool head. . . . We have
There is magicians standing to judge the situation if it gets out of
hand. . . . The main thing is just to do your best, and no one else will
Think about the worst of you. . . . Are you okay?”
“Yeah,” Harry said to himself. “Yeah, I’m fine.”
She was taking him to the place where the dragons were,
in the middle of the forest, but when they approached the herd
of trees behind them the store will be clearly visible, Harry
He saw that they had pitched a tent and that his door faced them, shielding the dragons from sight.
"You're going in here with the other heads," the teacher said .
McGonagall, in a slightly shaky sort of voice, “and wait .
Turn around, Peter. Mr. Bagman was there . . . He will tell you —
The window. . . . good luck."
“Thank you,” Harry said, in a low, distant voice. She left him in
entering the tent. Harry went inside.

' '
Fleur Delacour was sitting in a corner on a dark wooden chair.
She doesn’t look nearly as active as usual, but she is pale and
Aclamy. Viktor Krum looks even weirder than usual, a fact confirmed by Harry
supposedly was his way of showing nervousness. Cedric was recovering and
down. When Harry walked in, Cedric gave him a small smile, which
Harry returned, feeling his facial muscles work hard,
They seem to have forgotten how to do it.
“Harry! outstanding!" Bagman said angrily, smiling at him.
“Come in, come in, make yourself at home!”
Bagman somehow looks like a slightly detached villain, standing amongst all the ring-faced champions. He was wearing
his old Wasp costume again.
“Well, now we’re all here — time for me to fill you up!” Bagman said
With light. “When the people gather, I will be serving .
Each of you this bag” — picked up a small piece of thin silk and .
He challenged them — “from each of them to choose a small sample of .
The thing you almost face! There are different — er — kinds,
You see. And I have to tell you something else too . . . Ah, yes. . .
your job is to collect the golden egg!”
Harry looked away. Cedric moved his head once, to show that he
He understood Bagman's words and then started looking around the
The estimate is also; It looked a little green. Fluor Delacour and Chrome
He didn’t answer it at all. Maybe they thought they might get sick if
They opened their mouths; That's exactly how Harry felt. but
They, at least, were ready for it. . . .
And in no time at all, hundreds upon hundreds of feet
They were heard passing about the tent, their leaders talking excitedly,
She's laughing, she's kidding. . . . Harry felt he stood out from the crowd as
although they are different species. And then — it looks like

' '
About a second later for Harry — Bagman had opened the lid of .
A green silk scarf.
"Women first," he said, handing it to Fleur Delacour.
She put a shaky hand inside the box and pulled out a small, perfect model of a dragon — a Welsh Green. He has a number two.
in his head. And Harry knew, because Fleur didn't show
a teasing sign, but a firm recognition, that he had
There was certainty: Madame Maxime had told him what was to come.
The same goes for Krum. He took out the red Chinese.
The ball of fire. He had the number three on his collar. It didn’t work either
Blink, he just laid back and stared at the floor.
Cedric put his hand in the bag, and out came the pink
Swedish ShortSnout, and the first number attached to his head. Seeing what was left, Harry reached into the silk stocking and pulled
out came the Hungarian Horntail, and number 4. he crossed himself.
Wings as he looks down at her, and exposes his tiny fangs.
“Well, there you are!” Bagman said. “Every one of you has forgiven .
The dragon you face, and the numbers refer to the position you
You’re going to take it against the dragons, you see? Now, I will have
I’ll let you in a moment, because I’m moving on. Mr Diggory,
You go first, just go out into the hallway when you hear the exhaust.
you're welcome? now . . . Harry . . . Can I have a quick word? outside?"
“er . . . Yeah,” Harry nodded, and stood up and walked out of the .
The tent with Bagman, who slightly accompanies him, to the
trees, then turned to her with a fatherly look on his face
face.
“Are you feeling alright, Harry? Anything I can get you?”
"what?" Harry said. “I — no, not at all.”

' '
“You got a plan?” Bagman said, lowering his voice playfully.
“Because I don’t feel any emotions, if you will, .
You know. So,” Bagman continued, lowering his voice still more, “you’re the villain here, Harry. . . . Anything I can do
help . . .”
“No,” Harry said so quietly that he knew he sounded strange,
“Nothing — I — I know what to do, thank you.”
"No one can know, Harry," Bagman said, smirking at him.
"No, I'm fine," Harry said, wondering why he kept telling people that, wondering if he was ever okay. "I have
He came up with a plan, and I —”
She had dropped a body somewhere.
“Good lord, I have to run!” Bagman said in shock, and stormed off.
Harry returned to the tent and saw that Cedric had left it,
Greener than ever. Harry promised to wish him well when he passed,
But all that came out of his mouth was a sort of gibberish.
Harry went back inside to Fleur and Krum. Seconds later, they
The cheering of the crowd was heard, indicating that Cedric had joined the
prison and was now face to face with the living counterpart of
Its like. . . .
It was worse than Harry could have imagined, sitting there
and listening. The crowd shouted . . . He screams . . . He sounded like a multi-headed maniac, as Cedric did whatever he did to get
previously through the Swedish ShortSnout. Chrome is still looking at
soil. Fleur now got to retrace Cedric's path, about
and around the tent. And Bagman’s explanation does everything
Very, very lucky. . . . Confusing images formed in Harry’s mind

' '
As heard: “Oooh, sweet miss there, very sweet” . . . “He’s taking drugs, that one!” . . . “Smart trick — sad doesn’t work!”
And then, after about five minutes, Harry heard that faint whistle that could only mean one thing: Cedric had passed .
His dragon and holding the golden egg.
“It’s very good indeed!” Bagman was screaming. “And now the brand .
From the judges!”
But he didn’t destroy the brand; Harry thought the judges
They were holding them and displaying them to the public.
“One down, three to go!” Bagman yelled as the spring released.
again. “Miss Delacour, if you please!”
Fleur was trembling from head to foot; Harry felt even warmer.
Read more than he did until she left the tent with her head
She held on tight and his hand held her waist. He and Krum were
They sat alone, on the other side of the tent, avoiding each other’s gaze.
As it started up again. . . . “Oh I don’t think that exists
Word hunter!" they heard Bagman say excitedly. "oh . . . soon!
Hold on now . . . Good lord, I thought she had it then!”
Ten minutes later, Harry heard the crowd break into applause.
Once again. . . . Fleur must have arrived too. pause, while
Fleur’s name was revealed . . . More fun . . . Then, the
The third time, it’s heat.
“And here comes Mr. Krum!” shouted Bagman, and Krum
Quickly, he left Harry alone.
He felt much lighter than before; She is very emotional.
How his heart was beating fast, and his fingers quivering with
concern . . . But at the same time, he seemed to be outside himself, seeing the walls of the tabernacle, and hearing the crowd, as if from afar .
away. . . .

' '
“Very brave!” Bagman was screaming, and Harry heard the Chinese Fireball let out a tinkling, whistling sound, while the crowd pulled .
His collective breath. 'It's a certain nerve that shows — it's — .
Yes, he has an egg!”
Fatigue stained the summer air like broken glass; Chrome has
She continued — it would be Harry's turn every time.
He stood up and vaguely noticed that his legs looked like they were made of
marshmallows. He waited. And then he heard a soft click. he
He walked out the door of the tent, the panic escalating to a
crescendoing inside her. And now he was walking past the trees.
through a hole in the stall wall.
He saw everything before him as much more
Dream of colors. There were a hundred and a hundred smiling faces.
Has from the boards that have been there since
The last stands at this place. And then there’s Horntail, in another chapter
of the store, she remains vulnerable to her eggs, her wings
Half fucked up, evil eyes, circles on him, he's weak, he's stupid,
A red squirrel, flicking its hairy tail, leaves a long tail across the yard
brands on hard ground. People were doing a lot of
noise, but whether it was friendly or not, Harry didn't know or care. it
It was time to do what had to be done . . . He will refocus, completely
And by the way, on the thing that was his only chance. . . .
He raised his wand.
“Accio Fire Spring!” he shouted.
Harry waited, every fiber of him hoping and praying. . . . If it weren’t
It works . . . If only he hadn't come. . . He seemed to be looking at
Everything around him was covered with some sort of glowing, luminous glow, like a sheet of heat, that coated the prison and the
The hundreds of faces around him swam nervously. . . .

' '
And then he heard it, spinning fast in the air after him; he
He turned and saw his Firebolt running towards him across the line.
of grass, flies through the barn, and stops dead at the
Midair at his side, waiting for him to board. The crowd was making more noise. . . . Bagman was saying something . . . but
Harry’s ears didn’t work right . . . listening
It doesn’t matter. . . .
He got his foot on the table and slid out of the
soil. And a second later, something miraculous happened. . . .
The higher he climbed, the more the wind whipped through his hair, the more he felt .
The faces of the crowd became mere patches of flesh color below, and
Horntail shrank back to the size of a frog, knowing that he didn’t leave
Only the ground behind, but also the fear of it. . . . returns where
He was hers. . . .
This was just another Quidditch match, that’s all . . . Another Quidditch match, and that Horntail was just too unlucky
Enemy group. . . .
He looked down at the pile of eggs and saw the golden one,
shining against her cement-coloured companions, nestled safely between the front steps of the dragon. “Well,” Harry said to himself, “promotional tactics . . . going to. . . .”
He shrugged. The Horntail Chief followed him; He knows what he
He was going to work and got out of the hole just in time; Fire jet
Had he been released exactly where he would have been had he not been
He went too far . . . But Harry didn’t care . . . This is no more than
picking up a Bludger. . . .
“Great Scott, he can fly!” Bagman shouted as the crowd booed
And he smiled. “See that, Mr. Krum?”
Harry went higher in a circle; He’s still following Horntail

' '
its size; His mind was spinning in his long neck — if he kept that
above, it’ll be fine — but you better not push it too far, or
He’ll be breathing fire again —
Harry flinched as soon as the Horntail opened his mouth, but
This time he wasn’t so lucky — he tried flames on her, but the voice
came through the court to meet him instead, and as he turned to
left, one of its long blades grazing his stomach and tearing his clothes—
He could feel it crawling, he could hear screaming and yelling
from the crowd, but the cut didn't seem deep. . . . Now he
zoom in on the Horntail Bridge, and the opportunity occurs
had. . . .
Horntail didn't seem to want to leave, she was very protective of her eggs. Though worn and worn, it is vibrant and
She spread her wings and got those scary blue eyes.
Harry, afraid of straying too far from them . . . But you have to
Convince her to do it, or he won’t pick them up. . . . The trick
He was going to do it carefully, gradually. . . .
He began to drift, first this way and then the other, not near enough to
Have her shoot fire to block him, but it still seems appropriate
warning him to ensure she kept an eye on him. His head spun like this.
The way and that, she could see it from those standing students, her lips
They tried. . . .
He’s gone too far. Horntail's head rose with him, his head
Now stretched to its limits, it still throbs, like a snake before
His maintenance. . . .
Harry rose a few more feet and let out a loud yelp. He was like a fountain to her, a fountain she longed to water; His voice
Thrashed again, but it was too high to reach now. . . . She fired a shot.
In the air, he gasped. . . . His lips opened wide. . . .

' '
“Come on,” Harry whispered, looking up at the pillow above him,
“Come on, come get me . . . Pull out now. . .”
And then she added, spreading her big, black, leather wings
Finally, as high as those in a small plane—and Harry disappeared.
Before the beast knew what it had done, or where it had disappeared to, it was hurtling towards the ground as fast as it could .
Go, to the eggs not now protected by its clawed forelegs —
He takes his hands off his Firebolt — he holds gold .
egg -
And with one big burst of speed, he took off, he was flying
Above the table, a hard egg safely under his uninjured arm, and
It’s like someone just turned up the volume —
For the first time, he became properly aware of the sense of
The crowd, who were cheering and clapping as loudly as the Irish
leaders in the World Cup —
“Look at that!” Bagman was screaming. “You’ll look at that! our
The little champion is the fastest to get her egg! So, this will
Squeeze the blame on Mr. Potter!”
Harry watched the dragon rangers rush forward to attack
Horntail, and, by the door of the barn, Professor
McGonagall, Professor Moody, and Hagrid hurry to meet him,
They all turn towards them, their surprise evident even
From this distance. He flew past the barricades, the sound of
The crowd clapped at his belt, and he stepped gingerly to the floor, his
Light hearted as it has been in weeks. . . . passed from
The first job, he was successful. . . .
“That’s wonderful, Potter!” Professor McGonagall shouted as he
He stepped out of the Firebolt — which from him was high praise. he
She saw that her hand was shaking as she pointed to her wand. "will

' '
You should see Madam Pomfrey before your judges give out
score. . . . There, she must have satisfied Diggory already. . . .”
“Yeh did it, Harry!” Hagrid said sarcastically. “Yeh did it! An' against'
Horntail is everything, and yeh you know Charlie said it was
fortune' -"
“Thank you, Hagrid,” Harry said quietly, so Hagrid wouldn’t hear .
He bowed and indicated that he had shown Harry the animals.
before.
Professor Moody seemed quite pleased as well; His magic eye was
He danced in her wake.
“Nice and easy does the trick, Potter,” he said quietly.
“Just then, Potter, the first aid tent, please . . .” The teacher said
McGonagall.
Harry walked out of the closet, still panting, and saw
Madam Pomfrey stood at the mouth of the second tent, looking
worried.
“Dragons!” she said, sounding annoyed, and pulled Harry inside.
The tent was divided into apartments; He could understand Cedric's
Shadow through the canvas, but Cedric didn't seem terribly hurt; He was sitting down, at least. Ms. Pumfrey discusses
Harry's voice, speaking cheerfully the whole time. “Last year dementors, this year dragons, what are they going to bring into this school .
next? You're very lucky. . . This is very normal. . . It will need cleaning before I cure it, though. . . .”
She cleaned the scratch with a gray blotting block
She coughs and squirms, but then stabs him in the shoulder with her fist,
And he felt it heal instantly.
“Now, just sit quietly for a minute—sit! And then you can go
And give your price.”

' '
She carefully walked out of the tent, he heard her walk towards the door and
Say, “How are you feeling now, Diggory?”
Harry didn't want to sit down: he was so full of adrenaline. he
He got to his feet, wanting to see what was going on outside, but before he could reach the mouth of the tent, two people came stumbling in—Hermione, followed closely by Ron.
“Harry, you’re awesome!” Hermione said with a chuckle. there
There are finger marks on her face where she was holding it
In fear. “You were amazing! You’re right!”
But Harry was looking at Run, who was very pale and looked
In Harry it was like a ghost.
“Harry,” he said, very seriously, “whoever put your name in this .
goblet — I — reckon they’re trying to get you!”
It was as if the last few weeks had never happened—like that .
Although Harry was meeting Ron for the first time, right after the
He was made president.
“You catch, do you?” Harry said coldly. “It took you long
enough."
Hermione started confused between them, flipping from one to 100.
another. Ron unwittingly opened his mouth. He knows Harry Rune
He was about to apologize and suddenly realized he didn’t need to
Listen to him.
“It’s okay,” he said, before Ron could get the words out. “Forget it.”
“No,” Ron said, “you don’t have to—”
“Forget it,” Harry said.
Ron smiled awkwardly at him, and Harry grinned back.
Hermione burst into tears.
“Nothing to cry about!” Harry said, confused.
“You two are so weird!” She screamed, stomping her foot on the

' '
floor, tears streaming down her face. Then, after one of the
They can stop her, she gives them both a shake and storms off.
Away, now gracefully crawling.
“Mad barking,” Ron groaned, shaking his head. “Harry, come on,
They will put your results. . . .”
He picked up the golden egg and his Firebolt, feeling happier
As much as he wanted to believe it could have been an hour ago, Harry lost
They left the tent, Ron at his side, speaking softly.
“You were okay, you know, no contest. Cedric did that.
the exact point where the stone is embedded in the ground . . . he turned
In a dog . . . He was trying to let go of the dragon and go to the dog.
instead. So, it was a progressive move, and
He did something, because he found the egg, but he burned like
Well — the hero changed his mind halfway through and decided
prefer it to a Labrador; It just came out.
And that Fleur girl tried this kind of sewing, I think she was tryin
Putting it in the trap — well, that kind of worked too, it went all out .
He fell asleep, but then he smiled, and this huge plume of fire came up, and
It caught fire in it - she put it out with a little water from it.
A stick. And Krum — you don’t believe this, but he doesn’t believe it either .
Think of an airplane! He’s probably your best bet, though. Hit it
With some sort of needle directly in the eye. Only thing is, she went rolling in pain and spoiled half the real eggs — hold .
Marks off on that, shouldn’t do them any damage.”
Ron drew in a breath as he and Harry reached the basement. Now that the Horntail had been removed, Harry could see
Where five judges sit — directly in the opposite corner, in
raised arms overlaid with gold.
“It’s an average out of ten of each,” Ron said, and Harry,

' '
Glancing up, he saw the first judge — Madame Maxime — .
He raised his wand in the air. Something like a long silver screen shot
From it, which unfolded itself into a large figure of eight.
"not bad!" Ron said as the crowd applauded. “I think she
He removes the brand on your shoulder. . . .”
Mr. Crouch came forward. He shot a nine into the air.
“You’ll look good!” Ron shouted, kicking Harry in the shoulder.
Next up, the Dumblur. He too threw nine. The crowd was louder than ever.
Play Bagman — ten.
"ten?" Harry said in disbelief. "But . . . I'm hurt. . . . what's
He’s playing in?”
“Harry, don’t complain!” Ron shouted excitedly.
And now Karkaroff raises his baton. He paused for a moment.
then a number came out of his memory as well—four.
"what?" Ron shouted excitedly. “Four? You stupid, damn bastard, you gave Krum a ten!”
But Harry didn’t care, he wouldn’t have cared if Karkaroff had
is assigned zero; Ron’s namesake ship is worth a
One hundred points to him. He didn’t say this to Ron, of course, but his
His heart felt lighter than air as he turned to leave the hallway. And he
It wasn’t just Ron . . . Those aren’t the only Gryffindors who shit in
crowd. When it came to him, when they saw what it was .
Before, most of the school was on his side as
of Cedric. . . . He didn’t care about Slytherin, he could stand
Whatever they put into it now.
“You bonded in the first place, Harry! You’re Krum!” Charlie said
Weasley, hurrying to meet them as they head towards the
school. “Listen, I gotta run, I gotta go send my mom an

' '
owl, I resolved to tell him what had happened — but that was not allowed! Oh yes — and I was told to tell you that you should stop
around for a few more minutes. . . . Bagman wants a word and turns in
The tent of the ancients.”
Ron said he would wait, and Harry went back into the tent, which
Somehow she looked very different now: friendly and cheerful. he
He imagined what it felt like to ride Horntail, and
Contrast it with the long stare before he stepped out to confront her. . . .
There is no question; The need was immense.
Fleur, Cedric, and Krum entered together. One side of the
Cedric's face was covered in dark orange pigmentation, which was supposedly lightening his pimple. Harry smiled when he saw it.
“A good one, Harry.”
“You are,” Harry said, smiling back.
“Hi, all of you!” said Ludo Bagman, flourishing in
tent and looked as pleased as if he himself had just found
past one drag. “Now, just a few quick words. You have nice hair.
break after the second task, which will be held at nine-thirty
On the morning of February twenty-fourth — but we are getting
You something to think about in the meantime! If you look down
In all those golden eggs you keep, you will see that
open . . . See the shops there? You need to select the folder inside the
egg — because it’ll tell you what the second task is, and communicate
You prepare it! Is everything clear? sure? Well, you go, then!”
Harry left the tent and turned back to Run, and they started walking back
They went around the edge of the forest and talked loudly; Harry wanted to listen.
which the other ancients did more effectively. Then, as they
She circled the clump of trees behind which Harry heard for the first time
The dragons roared, and a fairy came out from behind them.
It was Rita Skeeter. She was wearing an acid garden dress today; the
QuickQuotes The quill in his hand worked just as well against them.
“Good luck, Harry!” she said, looking at him. “I ask
Can you give me a quick word? How did you feel when you faced that
Drag? How do you feel now, about the need to score?”
“Yeah, you can have a word,” Harry said defensively. "goodbye."
And back to the castle with Ron.

Chapter Twenty - NEW
PET RESCUE DEPARTMENT

Harry, Ron, and Hermione go to the Owler
afternoon to find Pigwidgeon, so Harry could send
Sirius a letter telling him that he had managed to pass his
The dragon was not hurt. Along the way, Harry filled Ron in on everything
Sirius had told him about Karkaroff. Although I initially struggled to
They had heard that Karkaroff was death row, by the time they entered the Owlery Ron was saying that they should suspect
All at the same time.
“It should, shouldn’t it?” he said. “Remember what Malfoy said on the day of .
the train, about his father and friends of Karkaroff? Now we know
Where they know each other. Maybe they were lookin
In all masks at the World Cup. . . . Let me tell you one thing,
Although, Harry, if it was Karkaroff who put your name in the box, he'd be feeling really silly now, wouldn't he? doesn't work,
Did he? You just got a boat! Come here — I’ll do it —”
Pigwidgeon was very pleased with the delivery process he
They flew over Harry's head and wandered relentlessly. run
He took the Pigwidgeon out of the air and held it still while Harry
He stuck the letter to his leg.
“There’s no way any of the other tasks could be that bad, how could they be?” Run continues as Pigwidgeon wins
to the window. “You know what? I reckon you can win this tournament, Harry, I’m serious.”
Harry knew that Ron was just saying this to make up for his behavior for the past week, but he accepted it all the same.
Hermione, however, leaned against the wall of the Owlery and fell on it
arms, and looked at Ron.
"Harry has a long way to go before he finishes the competition," she said firmly. “If that’s the first job, I like to think .
What’s next.”
“It’s really a little ray of sunshine, aren’t you?” Run said. “You’re a
Professor Trelawney needs to get it together sometime.”
He pushed Pigwidgeon out of the hole. Pigwidgeon fell twelve feet before he managed to get himself back up again;
The note tied to his back was much longer and heavier than the
Usual — Harry couldn't resist giving Sirius a blow job about the way he twisted, turned, and wriggled .
The Roar of the Dog. They watched Pigwidgeon fly off into the darkness, and then Ron said, "Well, we'd better get down for the
Surprise party, Harry — Fred and George should check
Enough food from the kitchens so far.”
Sure enough, when they entered the Gryffindor common room
She exploded with joy and excitement once again. There are mountains.
cookies and flags of pumpkin seeds and butterbeer at every
surface; Lee Jordan put out some filibuster fire, as
The air was thick with stars and meteors; and Dian Thomas, who
She was so good at drawing, she put up some amazing new banners.
Most of them show Harry staring at Horntail’s head
In his Firebolt, though two people showed Cedric with his head on
hell.
Harry helped himself to the food; Almost forgot what it was
He seemed properly sorry, and sat with Ron and
Hermione. He couldn't believe how happy he felt; Run got back.
In turn, he passed the first task, and had no
He will face the second for three months.
“Blimey, this is heavy,” Lee Jordan said, holding up the gold .
An egg, which Harry had left on a table, and he was rolling it around in his hands.
"Open it, Harry, and finish!" Let’s just see what’s inside!”
“He’ll have to work that shit out himself,” Hermione said .
quickly. “It’s in the rules of the tournament. . . .”
“I have to work out how to get past the smear on my car .
too,” Harry whispered, so only Hermione could hear, and .
You exclaimed rightfully.
“Yes, go on, Harry, open it!” A lot of people commented.
Lee passed the egg to Harry, and Harry dug his heels into the
groove which is turned all the way around and prized open.
It was all pale and tender — but that moment Harry .
He opened it, the most horrible noise, the screaming loud and deafening,
He filled the room. The closest thing Harry had heard was
The orchestra of ghosts at the anniversary concert of Nearly Headless Nick, who
They were all playing musical instruments.
“Listen!” Fred shouted, his hands over his ears.
“What’s that?” Seamus Finigan said, looking at the egg as if
Harry shrugged it off. “He smelled like a banshee. . . . might
You’ll have to pass one of the next ones, Harry!”
“He’s the one who was raped!” said Nevil, who went
too egg and the bacon bits ended up all over the floor. “You go
We’ll have to fight the cruciatus curse!”
"Don't be an idiot, Neville, this is illegal," George said. "they
She did not use the cruciatus attack on the Ancients. I thought about it.
It sounds a bit like Percy singing . . . Maybe you should take
While he’s in the shower, Harry.”
“Would you like a jam tart, Hermione?” Fred said.
Hermione looked suspiciously at the envelope he was handing her.
Fred grumbled.
“It’s okay,” he said. “I didn’t do anything to them. is
Coffee cream you should see —”
Neville, who had just served coffee creamer, hesitated and
Take it out. Fred laughed.
“Just my little joke, Neville. . . .”
Hermione took a bite of the jam tart. Then she said, “You got all this .
From the kitchens, Fred?”
“Yeah,” Fred said, smiling. answered a loud cry
Squeak and share a house-elf. “ 'All we can get you, sir, .
Anything at all!' They die helping . . . Get a roast chicken if I say
I was an addict.”
“How do you get in there?” Hermione said in an awkward tone.
Casual kind of voice.
“Easy,” Fred said, “the door is hidden behind the steam box .
of fruits. just an entrance to the farm, and she’s giggling and —” He stopped and .
He looked at her suspiciously. "why?"
“No,” Hermione said flatly.
"I'll try to put the pets to rest now, and
You?" said George. "I'm going to give up all the tiles and try .
And you brought them into rebellion?”
Many people are educated. Hermione didn't answer.
“Don’t go shaming them and telling them they have to .
Take clothes and scale!” Fred said sarcastically “You’ll take them off .
Their cooking!”
Immediately, Neville caused a little confusion by turning to a
A giant canary.
“Oh — I’m sorry, Nevil!” Fred shouted at all the laughter. “I forgot — and the coffee cream we used —”
Within a minute, though, Neville had disappeared, and once,
The feathers fell out and he came back looking completely normal. he
He also enters laughing.
“Canary Creams!” Fred shouted to the cheering crowd. “George
And I made them—seven Sickles each, a good deal!”
It was nearly one in the morning when Harry finally made his way to the
the orphanage with Run, Neville, Seamus, and Dean. Before the
Pulling the sleeves of his four aprons, Harry put his little like
of the Hungarian Horntail on the table next to his bed, where the
He yawned, bent over, and closed his eyes. Surely, Harry thought, as he said
Pulling the curtains on his four locked drawers, Hagrid had
point . . . They were all fine, of course, dicks. . . .
The beginning of December brought snow and ice to Hogwarts. The spring .
Although the castle was always in winter, Harry enjoyed its fire.
and heavy walls whenever he passed Durmstrang Wall on
The coast, which was swaying in high winds, its black walls towering
against the dark skies. He thinks the Beauxbaton car is
likely to be pretty chilly too. Hagrid, he knew, was careful
Madame Maxime’s horses are well supplied with their favorite drink
of single malt whisky; The smoke billowing from the ship in
the edge of their bow was sufficient to do all the Care of
The criteria are easily applied. This was unhelpful, as they
They still care about dirty screws and need their attention on
them.
"I don't know if they're having fun or not," Hagrid told the
classroom circles in the windmill pumpkin patch Next lesson. "thought
Let’s just try to see if they like the same kip . . . Let’s just solve them
down in these boxes. . . .”
There are now only ten screws left; Obviously, their desire to
Killing another is not done by them. Each of them
He was now close to six feet tall. Their thick gray armor;
Their strong, stubborn legs; their fiery heads; Their jealousy
and their suits, combined to make the screw the most disgusting thing Harry had ever seen. The class looked dispiritedly at the
The big balls that Hagrid had brought out were all decorated with glitter
and silver spoons.
“Let’s just bring them in here,” Hagrid said, “and put the blankets,
It’s to see what happens”.
But the skrewts, it turns out, don’t care, and don’t take kindly to being forced into stalls with cushions and locked in them. Hagrid
She soon cried out, “Don’t move, now, don’t move!” While the screws
They crunch on top of the pumpkin, now scattered with bits of melting cookies. Most of the high school — Malfoy, the Crab,
and Goyle at the top — escape to Hagrid’s cabin via the
the back door and settled in; However, Harry, Ron, and Hermione were among those who stayed outside trying to .
Help Hagrid. Together they were able to stop and tie nine of
Skrewts, albeit at the cost of a lot of bullets and cuts; eventually,
Only one screw left.
“Don’t be frightened, now!” He has bought Hagrid like Run and Hari
They use their trunks to shoot bullets at the screw, which
She was leaning over them menacingly, her hips quivering, trembling,
on his back. “Jus' try an' slide the stone 'on his bow, that he may win'.
It’s gotten some others!”
“Yes, we don’t want all!” Run has been angry with the same point as it and
Harry returned to the line in Hagrid's cell, still holding
Screw off with their buttons.
“Well, well, well . . . This looks like fun.”
Rita Skiter was leaning against Hagrid's garden wall, staring at the
The injustice. She was wearing a dark green car with a horn.
Today, the structural structure, and the leather skin of the car is on the
arm.
Hagrid pushed himself forward onto the top of the screw that was
she faced Harry and Ron and smiled at him; A puff of fire erupted from the
The end, you are exposed to the nearby slavery.
“Who are you?” Hagrid asked Rita Skiter as he unwrapped a handful of
Utweet on the Skirtk ear on the Skir ear on the earliest of Skirgrounds and expanded.
“Rita Skeeter, the regular Christmas journalist,” Rita replied, beaming in .
he. His gold teeth sparkled.
“Thought Dumbledore said you weren’t allowed inside the
There’s no school anymore,” Hagrid said, frowning slightly as he stepped out of
The screw tightened a bit and he started dragging her back to his friends.
Rita pretended not to hear what Hagrid said.
“Why say they say are bad? Takes, enjoying more sensitive.
“Screws of magic,” Hagrid snapped.
"really?" said Rita, visibly filled with the joy of life. “Never
I’ve heard them before . . . Where are they coming from?”
Harry became the right Morocco of the Hagred
Red beard, and his heart sank. Where did Hagrid get the scars
from? Hermione, who seemed to be thinking along these lines, said .
Simply, “They’re so funny, aren’t they? Aren’t they, Harry?”
"Dadou? Is . . . . . . . . . . . . he said
stepped on his foot.
“Oh, you’re here, Harry!” exclaimed Rita Skeeter as she looked around.
“So you like taking care of magical creatures, huh? One of your favorite lessons?”
“Yes,” Harry insisted. Hagrid stared at him.
“Oh dear,” Rita said. “I’m really excited. How long have you been teaching?” she
He added to Hagrid.
A Harrey who died about Dean (a longevities
for a beat), Lavender (whose bad clothes were sung about), Seamus (who was packing a lot of burned shoes), and then into the kitchen .
windows, where most of the school stood, their noses pressed against the
The train is waiting to see if the coast is clear.
“This is o'ny me second year,” Hagrid said.
"Beautiful. . . . I don't think you'll give a damn,
Do you want? Share some of your experience of magical creatures?
Christ does an animal science circle every Wednesday, as I’m sure
You know. We can feature — er — this Bang-Ended Scooter.”
“Screws of maggots,” Hagrid said excitedly. “Er — yes, why .
not?"
Harry had a bad feeling about that, but there was no way he
He passed it on to Hagrid without Rita Skeeter knowing, so he had
He would stand and watch in silence as Hagrid and Rita Skiter
arrangements to meet at Three Broomsticks for a nice long interview later that week. Then the bell rang in the castle, signaling the end of the lesson.
“Well, bye, Harry!” Proudly called by Rita Skiter as
He left with Ron and Hermione. “Until Friday night, then,
Hagrid!”
“She’ll change anything he says,” Harry said under his breath.
"Just as long as he didn't insert the screwdriver illegally or something," Hermione sighed. They looked at each other —
It was the sort of thing Hagrid could do.
“Hagrid has been in a lot of trouble before, what with Dumbledore’s
It didn’t disappoint,” Ron said soothingly. “The worst thing that could happen
Is Hagrid going to have to get rid of the screws. Sorry . . . Did I say something bad?
I mean the best.”
Harry and Hermione laughed, and, feeling rather cheerful, left for lunch.
Harry had thoroughly enjoyed the second Divination that evening;
They still did star charts and forecasts, but now that he was
Run were friends again, everything looked so much fun
again. Professor Trelawney, who was very pleased with both
of them when their tragic deaths were being told,
They slowly became bored as they giggled at his explanation.
The 5 different ways Pluto can disrupt everyday life.
"I would have thought," she said, with a shrewd smile that did not conceal her evident anxiety, "that some of us"—she smiled a lot .
meaning in Harry — “it might be a bit awkward if they were .
I saw what I saw in my crystal vision yesterday. As I sat
Here, with my sweatpants on, the desire to discuss pain overcame me. I stood up and stood in front of her, looking at her
crystal surface . . . What do you think I know I look back
we?"
“An ugly old bat in outer space?” Ron looked down.
breath.
Harry fought hard to keep a straight face.
“Death, my shares.”
Parvati and Lavender put both hands over their mouths,
They looked terrified.
“Yes,” Professor Trelawney said, nodding, “he’s coming, .
Close up, whirling around his head like a spider, growing . . . ever
Under the castle. . . .”
She glared at Harry, who grinned widely and
sure.
“It would be a little strange if you hadn’t done it for about eight years .
Times before,” Harry said as the fresh air finally returned to the .
wall below Professor Trelawney's room. “But if I were to fall
Every time I say to have gods, I will be apartment
miracle."
“You’re going to be an overrated kind of ghost,” Ron says,
They shudder, as they pass the Bloody Baron walking around
The biggest opinions, the big messages are pleasant with goodness. “At least there’s no surprise .
homework. Hopefully Hermione has taken a lot of Professor Vector, I love
It doesn’t work when it is. . . .”
But Hermione was not in dinner, nor did she not in the car.
They went looking after him. The only person there
Vikousechur Kruum. Run ran for a while behind the bookshelves.
Krum, they’re seen in the saddle and Harry if
He had to ask for a lawyer — but they two Ron understands that six or .
Seven girls were searching at the books of the books, they talk well
It is one thing, and he fell is coordinating from the idea.
“Do you ask that it’s come?” Run said as he and Hari
She returned to the burage of Griffindor.
"I don't know . . . Balderas.”
But the blonde woman was barely starting to look up when he
Appointed by the footsteps advocate behind the sliding Hermione behaviors.
“Harry!” She sniffed, leaning in next to him (the blond woman
looking down at her, raised eyebrows). “Harry, you need to come —
It’s important to come, the most interesting thing happened —
please -"
She took a hand of Harry, and she started trying to get up back.
That way.
“What’s wrong?” Harry said.
“I’ll show up when we arrived there — oh you’ve gotten, quickly —”
Harry was buried to Ron; He turned and looked at Harry.
exciting.
“Yes,” Harry said, started with the store with the store with
Hermione, Ron stutters to continue.
“Oh don’t mind me!” » Massa Tavekka Sir behind.
“Don’t apologize for embarrassing me! I’ll just be here, I’ve been very closely,
Until you get back, shall I?”
“Yes, thank you!” Ron has been angry on the ship.
“Heermion, where to go?” Shortrate Hari, terms do you pursue
They were followed by six, Mararmar’s back to the slave hall.
“You’ll see, you’ll see in a minute!” Hermione said excitedly.
Turning left at the bottom of the stairs, she sped quickly towards the
The door that Cedric Diggory walked through the night after
the top of the Fire confused his and Harry's names. Harry
There was no passing before. He and Run followed
Hermion has been on a singer, but instead will end in
One way of underground such a snape, found themselves on a large stone road, with the squad of ace .
With the bodies, and they were charged with the slices of the poll that
Especially of food.
“Oh stop . . .” Harry said softly, halfway down the hallway.
“It’s a little bit, a Hermione. . . .”
"what?" She turned to look at him, waiting all
His face.
“I know what that means,” Harry said.
Ron let go and pointed to the picture just behind him.
Hermione. He showed a large silver fruit bowl.
“Hermione!” Ron said, grinning. “You’re trying to make us
In that sticky thing again!”
“No, no, I’m not!” She said quietly. “And isn’t that funny, Ron —”
“You changed the name, did you?” said Ron, nodding.
"What are we now, then, the House-Elf Liberation League?" I'm not
I went into that kitchen and tried to stop them working, I
I’m not doing it —”
“I didn’t ask you to!” Hermione said calmly. “I came
Here right now, to talk to them all, and I got — oh come on .
on, Harry, I want to show you!”
She grabbed his arm again and pulled him in front of the picture of
A big bowl of fruit, she stuck out her index finger, and licked
The big green butterfly. He started giggling, laughing, and suddenly
It became the back of the big green door. Hermione grabbed him and pulled him
The door opened, and he pushed Harry hard in the back, forcing him
inside.
He had a brief description of a large, high-ceilinged room.
It’s as big as the great hall above, with glittering glass towers
Coffee and towels were scattered along the stone walls, and a large brick fireplace at the opposite end, when something small flashed towards it .
From across the room, he chimes in, “Harry Potter, sir! Harry
plate!"
The next second, all the air went out of him as
The snarling elf hit him hard in the back of the stomach, squeezed so hard that he
He thought his ribs would rot.
“Dobie?” Harry sighed.
“It’s Dobby, sir, it is!” The voice rang out from somewhere.
on his back. “Dobby was hopeful and wishful to see .
Harry Potter, sir, and Harry Potter has come to see him, sir!”
Dobby let go of her and took a few steps back, beaming in the
Harry, his big, green, tennis-ball eyes filled
With tears of joy. He looked pretty much as Harry remembered him; Cone-shaped nose, animal-like ears, long fingers
and shoes — all except the leather, were very similar.
When Dobby worked for the Malfoys, he always wore
With a dirty old needle. Now, however, he was wearing a
the best assortment of clothes Harry had ever seen; He had done
The job of dressing himself is worse than that of magicians in the world
cup. He was wearing a tea suit for hair, to which he put
So many beautiful signs; tie embroidered with horseshoes on a
Bare chest, a pair of pants that looked like children’s basketballs, and
Old girls. One of them, Harry noticed, was the black one Harry had
He took off his own back and coaxed Mr. Malfoy to give
Dobby, therefore, sets Dobby free. The other was buried in anticipation.
and orange blossoms.
“Dobby, what are you doing here?” Harry said proudly.
“Dobby has come to work at Hogwarts, sir!” Dobby yelled.
With pleasure. “Headmaster Dumbledore gave Dobby and Winky assignments, .
Sir!"
“Winky?” Harry said. “Is she here too?”
“Yes, sir, yes!” Dubi said, and grabbed Harry's arm, pulling him.
He took it out to the kitchen between four long wooden tables
He stood there. Each of these boxes, Harry noticed as he passed them,
was nestled perfectly under the four Home tabs above, in the
The large living room. Meanwhile, they were clear of food, dinners had
They continued, but he noticed that they had been dressed for hours
with boxes that are then sent through the roof to their homes
Linear models.
At least a hundred baby pigs were standing around the kitchen.
They flinched, clattered, and clattered as Dobby surged past them.
They all wore the same outfit: a tea towel embellished with
clothes from Hogwarts, and attached, as Winky's was, like a rag doll.
Dobby stopped in front of the brick fireplace and pointed.
“Winkie, sir!” he said.
Winky was sitting on a chair by the fire. Unlike Dubbie, she had
Obviously not applied to clothes. She was wearing a neat little dress.
It's a blouse with matching green fabric, it has holes in it
Large ears. However, while each of Dobby’s collection
of clothes was so clean and well-maintained that they looked brand new, Winky didn't seem to take care of her clothes at all. there
There were sugar marks all under her blouse and burns in her pants.
“Hi, Winky,” Harry said.
Winky’s legs twitched. Then she left in tears, which
out of her big blue eyes and flashed up at him, just as
They were working on the Quidditch World Cup.
“Dear,” Hermione said. She and Ron follow Harry
and Dobby to the end of the pack. “Winky, don’t cry, please
don't . . .”
But Winky cried harder than ever. Dobby, on the other hand,
exclaimed Harry.
“Would Harry Putter like a cup of tea?” He screamed aloud, for
Winky shrugs.
“Er — yeah, okay,” Harry said.
Instantly, about six house elves came running after him,
He brought a large silver tray filled with a teapot, cups to Harry, Ron,
and Hermione, a glass of milk, and a large plate of biscuits.
“Good service!” Ron said, in a low voice. Hermione
She looked surprised, but the pigs all looked happy; Very broken.
low and high.
“How long have you been here, Dobby?” Harry asked as Doobie
is provided by the tea source.
“Only a week, Harry Potter, sir!” Dobby said excitedly. “Bear
He came to see Professor Dumbledore, Ma ss. You see, Sir, it’s very difficult for a dismissed housemate to get a new position,
Sir, it is very difficult indeed —”
At this, Winky screamed even louder, her sewing machine of
The nose flapped all over her, even though she made no effort to
stem of flow.
“Dobby went two whole years across the country, sir, trying .
To find a job!” He scolded Dobby. “But Dobby never got a job,
Sir, because Dobby wants to pay now!”
Housewives around the kitchen, who ever heard of
And they look excited, all turn to these words, as if .
though Dobby said something incredibly rude and ridiculous.
However, Hermione said, “Good morning, Dobby!”
“Thank you, ma’am!” Dobby said, grinning at her. "but
Most witches don't want a householder willing to pay, miss.
'That's not the point of being a housewife,' they said, and shrugged .
door in Dobby's face! Dobby loved working, but he wanted to wear
clothes and wants to be paid, Harry Potter. . . . Dobby likes to be free!”
Hogwarts house elves are now starting to separate from the
Dobby, it seems, caught something twisted. Winky,
However, she stayed where she was, despite a slow rise in the volume of her breathing.
“And then, Harry Potter, Dobby went to visit Winky, and he got
out Winky is saved too, sir!” Dobby said excitedly.
At this, Winky threw herself forward from her chair and struck herself face down on the patterned stone floor, striking at it with her tiny arms and
positive with a painful start. Hermione fell down slowly.
Kneeling at her side, he tried to help her, but nothing
He said it made a bit of a difference. Dubby continued his story,
Outraged at Winky’s performances.
"And then Dobby had the idea, Harry Potter, sir!" 'Why not
Do Dobby and Winky get a job together? Dubby said. 'where
Is there enough labor for two pet swine?' Winky said. And Bear
He thinks, and comes to him, Sir! Hogwarts! So Dubby and Winky
They came to see Professor Dumblur, sir, and Professor Dumblur
He got us!”
Dobby is so bright, and tears of joy are streaming down his eyes
again.
“And Professor Dumbledore offered to pay Dobby, sir, if .
Dobby wants to pay! And so, Dobby is a free agent, sir, and Dobby
He gets a Galleon a week and a day off a month!”
“That’s very rare!” Hermione shouted angrily from
floor, about Winky complete with a scream and a slapstick.
“Professor Dumbledore gave Dobby ten galleons a week, and .
The weekend,” Dobby said, suddenly giving a little grin, as .
Although the stakes of many injuries and wealth are frightening,
“But Dobby beat him, baby. . . . Dobby loves freedom, miss,
But he doesn’t want much, son, he likes work more.”
“And how much does Professor Dumbledore pay you, Winky?”
Hermione asked kindly.
If she thought that would make Winky happy, she was wild
mistake. Winky had actually stopped crying, but as she kept staring at Hermione with her big blue eyes, her whole face .
sopping wet and simply delightful.
“Winky is a despicable fool, but Winky still doesn’t get paid!” she
He squeaked. “Winky didn’t fall enough! Properly winky
Lucky to be saved!”
"ashamed?" Hermione said with a frown. "But—Winky, come on!"
It’s Mr. Crouch who should be ashamed, not you! ⵓⵔ ⵜⴳⵉⴹ ⴰⵔⴰ
Some of the good, it was really a guilty to you —”
But with these words, Winky stretched her arms over the holes in
his hat, shielding his ears so he couldn't hear a word, and
They roared, “You will never insult my master, child! You shall not underestimate Mr. Crouch! Mr. Crouch is a good wizard, lady! Mr. Cruch is
Justice will satisfy the bad Winky!”
“Winky’s having trouble adjusting, Harry Potter,” he joked .
Dobby with a boss. “Winky forgot she wasn’t connected to the Master.
Crouch often; She has a right to say what’s on her mind now, but she
He didn’t do it.”
“Can’t house elves speak their mind about their masters, then?”
Harry asked.
“Oh no, sir, no,” said Dobby, looking at him suddenly serious. " 'is
Part of being a housewife, sir. We took their secrets and
Our silence, sir. We maintained family honor, and never talked
He was sick of them — even though Professor Dumbledore had told Dobby that he was sick .
They don’t insist on that. Professor Dumbledore says we are free to —
I -"
Dobby looked suddenly confused and motioned for Harry to come closer.
Harry leaned forward. Dobby sighs, “He says we’re free to call
Him a — and old old barmy if we please, sir!”
Dobby gave a kind of scared moan.
"But Dobby wouldn't, Harry Potter," he said, speaking .
normally too, and shakes his head so his ears are flattened.
“Dobby loves Professor Dumbledore very much, Sir, and he is proud .
We will maintain his privacy and our silence about him.”
“But can you say what you like about the Malfoys now?” Harry
he asked, answering.
A slightly frightened look came into Dobby's incredible eyes.
“Dub — dub can,” he said honestly. His land
Small shoulders. “Dobby can tell Harry Potter that his former masters were—were—bad Dark wizards!”
Dobby stood for a moment, twitching all over, taken by surprise by
with a smile—and then rushed to the nearest table and began banging his head on it violently, exclaiming, “Bad Dobby! bad
Bear!”
Harry grabbed Dobby by the collar of his tie and pulled.
from the table.
“Thank you, Harry Potter, thank you,” Dobby whispered, .
He shakes his head.
“You just need a bit of practice,” Harry said.
"do!" exclaimed Winky excitedly. “You have to be .
You’re ashamed of yourself, Dobby, talking like that about your masters!”
“They’re not my masters, Winky!” Dobby said with a chuckle.
“Dobby doesn’t care what they think!”
“Oh you’re a bad boss, Dobby!” Winky said, tears streaming
Under his face again. “My poor Mr. Crouch, what is he doing .
Without Winky? He needs me, he needs my help! I've been taking care of Crouches all my life, and my mom did it before
Me, and my mom did it in front of him . . . Oh what are they
wondering if they saw Winky rescued? Oh the shame, the shame!”
She buried her face in her pants again and cried.
'Winky,' said Hermione firmly, 'I'm sure Mr. Crouch is doing just fine without you. We saw it, you know —”
“Have you seen my lord?” Winky said breathily, picking it up
A tear-stained face emerges from his shirt again and stares at the
Hermione. “Do you see him here at Hogwarts?”
“Yeah,” Hermione said, “he and Mr. Bagman are judges in the Triwizard Cup.”
" Sir. Is Bagman coming too?” cried Winky, and at older Harry
Surprise (and Ron and Hermione's too, with the looks of their
faces), looked pleased again. " Sir. Bagman is the evil wizard! quite
Evil Wizard! My master doesn’t mind, oh no, not at all!”
“The parrot—bad?” Harry said.
“Oh yes,” said Winky, nodding her head excitedly. “Mr.
He was telling Winky some things! But Winky doesn’t mean . . .
Winky — Winky keeps her master’s secret. . . .”
She dissolved into tears again; She was heard crying in
his clothes, “Poor Sir, poor Sir, no Winky to help no
further!
They couldn't get another word of intelligence out of Winky. They’re gone.
Her to her creinging and finished their breakfast, while Dobby talked excitedly about his life as a free elf and his plans for his wages.
“Dobby’s going to buy a sweater next, Harry Potter!” He said
Frustrated, he stares at her bare breasts.
“I’ll tell you what, Dobby,” said Ron, who looked caught .
I love the size for the pork, “I’ll give you the one my mom made me this
Christmas, I always get one of hers. You don't have a problem with red, do
you?"
Dobby cheered.
“We might have to size it up a bit to suit you,” Ron told him, “but .
It will go well with your tea.”
As they prepared to take their leave, many of the bystanders
the elves insist on them, offering a liquor to bring upstairs.
Hermione refused, with a sad expression about how elves maintain
They go and they bore, but Harry and Run filled their pockets
with snowmobiles and boats.
"thank you very much!" Harry said to the elves, who had all gathered
in front of the door to say good night. “See you, Doobie!”
“Harry Putter . . . Can Dobby come see you sometimes, sir?”
Dobby asked suddenly.
“ 'Course you can,’ said Harry, and Dobby was pleased.
“You know what?” Ron said, once he, Hermione, and Harry had
They had left the boxes behind and were climbing the stairs to the entrance hall again. “All these years I’ve been really fascinated by
Fred and George, scavenging food from houses — well, not so
It’s really difficult, right? They can’t afford it!”
“I think this is the best thing that could have happened to those
elves, you know,” Hermione said, leading the way back up the marble staircase. “Dobby would come to work here, I mean. Other pigs
He’ll see how happy he is, because he’s free, and soon dawn will dawn on them
that they want that too!”
"Let's hope they don't look too hard at Winky," Harry said.
“Oh you’ll ease up,” Hermione said, though she sounded a little .
He doubted. “Once the shock wears off, and you get used to Hogwarts, she’ll see how much better it is without that Crouch .
man."
“She seems to like it,” Ron said matter-of-factly (he’d just started in
cream cheese).
“But, she doesn’t think much of Bagman, does she?” Harry said.
“Wonder what Crouch said at home about her?”
“Perhaps he says it’s not a very good Udiwan slide,” he said .
Hermione, “ⵓ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵉⴷⵏⴻⴼⵀⴻⵎ . . . ⵢⴻⵙⵄⴰ ⵏⵏⵉⴳⵙ, ⵎⴰⵞⵞⵉ ⴰⴽⴽⴰ ?”
“I still love working more than Crouch Yadim,” Ron said. "in
At least Bagman has a sense of humor.”
“Don’t let Percy hear you say that,” Hermione said, blushing .
little.
“Yeah, well, Percy wouldn’t want to work for someone with a sense of humor .
of poetry, will it?” Ron said, starting now with a chocolate eclair.
“Percy wouldn’t know shame if he danced in front of her naked .
They’re wearing a tea party Dobby.”

Chapter Twenty - TWO
TAENWSA UR NTTRAJU ARA

plate! Wezli! ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⴼⴽⴻⴹ ⴰⵣⴰⵍ ⵉ ⵡⴰⵢⴰ?”
Headmaster McGonagall's voice cracked like a whip.
With the call for Change on Thursday, and Harry and Ron
They both jumped, looking up.
That was the end of the lesson; They had their job; the
Guinea sands were stained and Guinea's dogs are closed
away in a giant cage on Professor McGonagall's desk (Still Neville's
He has rice); ⵙⵙⵓⴼⵖⴻⵏⴷ ⵍⴻⵛⵖⴰⵍⵏⵙⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵅⵅⴰⵎ ⵙⴻⴳ
The slope of the window (“Save, with examples, the barriers that the change names should be respected when the names of the lens change”).
The hall should ring at all times, and Harry and Ron, the
He had a sword fight with both Fred and George
Fake balls in the back of the school, he looked up, Run grabbed a shield
The parrot is Harry, the rubber chicken.
"Now that Potter and Weasley were kind enough to do

Their age,” Professor McGonagall said, with an angry glare at the .
Two of them when Harry’s hunter’s head bounced off and disappeared
Silently to the ground — Ron’s parrot head cut him moments
Before — “I have something to tell you all.
“You’re close to you’re getting the Yule — a former Teqbuck of Triwzard and it’s the opportunity to meet the population .
Irish governments. Now, the team will just run for the fourth and
Unfortunately — even if you can try for the younger student if
hope -"
Lavender Brown illuminates a sight of the ear. The Barvati Batil
Severely stuck in the hair, her face contorted with anger as she too struggled not to
pleasure. ⵎⵓⵇⵍⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵙⵉⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ Harry. Professor McGunagall
He didn't leave them, which Harry thought was unfair, since she was
Just been told about her and Ron.
“Your Birls will be guaranteed,” Professor McGonagall continues, .
“And the ball will start on the evening of the evening on the Nnbi day, to end .
At night’s morning at Uxxam Amqqran. ⵜⵓⵔⴰ ⵉⵀⵉ —”
Professor McGonagall looked determinedly around.
“Yue’s team is really an opportunity to — to — let’s leave .
Bone down,” she said, sounding disapproving.
Lavender laughed harder than ever, with her hand clenched tightly
against her mouth to muffle the sound. Harry could see what was
Celebrity this time: Professor McGonagall, with her hair in a ponytail
bun, it looks like she never lets her hair down in any sense.
“But that does NOT mean,” Professor McGonagall continued, .
“That we will rest in the standard of conduct we expect from
Students at Hogwarts. I would hate for a Gryffindor student to embarrass the school in some way.”

' '
The bell rang, and there was the usual hustle and bustle of activity as everyone adjusted their shoes and pushed them over their shoulders.
Professor McGonagall spoke above the noise, “Potter — speech, .
If you like.”
Considering this has something to do with his headless paper
haddock, Harry carefully walked over to the teacher's desk. teacher
McGonagall waited until the rest of the class had gone, then .
“Potter,” he said, “the slaves and their partners—”
“What partners?” Harry said.
Headmaster McGonagall looked at him suspiciously, as if she
He thought he was trying to be funny.
"Your partners for the Yule Ball, Potter," she said coldly. "your
Dance partners.”
Harry's insides seemed to twist and turn.
“Dance partners?” He felt himself going red. “I don’t dance,” he
He said quietly.
“Oh yes, you’re right,” Professor McGonagall said sternly. “This is
What I'm telling you. Traditionally, it is the leaders and their partners who open the ball.”
Harry has a mental image of himself in a top hat and
Tails, accompanied by a girl in a pink dress style Aunt Petunia
Always dressed to Uncle Vernon’s work parties.
“I don’t dance,” he said.
"That's old," Professor McGonagall said firmly. “You’re a
Captain of Hogwarts, and you will do what is expected of you as
A representative of the school. So be sure to get yourself a partner, Potter.”
“But — don’t —”

' '
"You heard me, Potter," Professor McGonagall said in a serious tone .
The last type of route.
A week ago, Harry was going to say he was going to find a partner for a dance
It would be a cinch to compare her to the Hungarian Horntail female.
But now that he had done the latter, and was facing the consequences of
He asks a girl about football, thinks he'll have another round
With a dragon.
Harry didn't know enough people to put their names
down to stay at Hogwarts for Christmas; It always works, of course,
because the rest was mostly back to Privet Drive, but
There was always a lot on the menu before now. this
year, however, everyone in year 4 and up seems to be
They sit down, and they all seem to Harry excited for the ball to come — or at least all the girls are, and it’s funny how .
Several Hogwarts girls at once seemed to hold; It doesn’t have all
She had seen that before. Girls giggled and whispered in the hallways.
Girls shrieked with laughter as boys passed them, girls cheered
They compare trends on what to wear on Christmas Day
night. . . .
“ⴰⵛⵓⵖⴻⵔ ⵉⵍⴰⵇ ⴰⴷ ⵎⵙⴻⴼⵀⴰⵎⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵜⴼⴻⵔⴽⵉⵡⵉⵏ?” Harry asked Run as a
A dozen girls or so walked past them, giggling and staring at Harry.
“How you have to find one themselves to ask them?”
“Leave one?” Run suggested. “Do you have any idea who you’re goin
try?"
Harry didn't answer. He knew exactly who he wanted
ask, but exercise is something else. . . . Cho was a
A great year for him; She was so beautiful; She was very good.
Quidditch player, and she was also very famous.

' '
Ron seemed to know what was going on inside Harry's head.
“Listen, you have no problem. You are a champion. You just killed a Hungarian Horntail. I bet they will be
lines up to go with you.”
In honor of their recent friendship, Ron had taken
bitterness in his throat to the edge. Also, to Harry
Surprisingly, he turned out to be right.
A third year brown haired Hufflepuff girl that Harry had
He never spoke in his life, he asked her to go bowling with him
The next day. Harry was so surprised, he said no before doing
He paused to consider the matter. The girl walked away, looking good.
He gets hurt, and Harry has to put up with Dean, Seamus and Ron's abuse
All over it with the history of magic. The next day, both
She was asked by more girls, second year and (to her horror) fifth year
which sounds like she might knock him out if he refuses.
“She was very good,” Ron said assuredly, after a pause .
laughing.
“She was a foot taller than me,” Harry said, still in shock.
“Imagine how I’d be if I tried to dance with him.”
Hermione's words about Krum kept coming back to her. "they
Only like him because he’s dirty!” Harry highly doubted if
Some of the girls who have asked to be her partners so far, she will have
He wanted to go to football with him if he wasn’t the school president. Then he wondered if that would bother him if he asked Cho .
he.
Mostly, Harry had to admit that even with the embarrassing thought of opening a curtain in front of him, life definitely had
He has improved since the first task. He wasn’t pulling nearly as much crap on the streets, which i

' '
I suspect it had a lot to do with Cedric — he had an idea Cedric
Maybe he'd tell the Hufflepuffs to leave Harry alone, thankfully
For Harry's vision of the dragons. Turns out there was very little.
Sure Cedric Diggory! Membership badges as well. Draco Malfoy, of
Sure, he was still telling her the Rita Skeeter article at every opportunity, but he was getting a lot of laughs from
It — and just to boost Harry’s sense of well-being, no story
About Hagrid he was out at Christmas every day.
“She seems pretty interested in magical creatures, ter tell yeh
Truth,” Hagrid said, when Harry, Run, and Hermione asked .
How did her interview with Rita Skeeter go during the most recent season
Care Magical Creatures Word Lesson. For their very old
Hands down, Hagrid has given up on direct contact with Screws now,
And they were just lurking behind his cabin today, sitting in a
Trestle tables and preparing a new selection of food with which to
Try Screws.
“She just wanted me to talk about you, Harry,” Hagrid continued in a low voice. “Well, I told him we’ve been friends since I left .
Ter take it from the Dursleys. 'I shouldn't have told him to leave at four
years?' She said. 'He didn't play you in lessons, did he?' I said
No, an' she didn't seem happy at all. You think she wants me to
Tell yeh they were bad, Harry.”
“ 'Course worked,” Harry said, throwing chunks of dragon liver .
into a large metal bowl and picked up his knife to cut something else.
“She can’t keep writing about what a sad little kid I am, he’s going to get
boring."
“She wants a new voice, Hagrid,” Ron said wisely as he pulled out a gun .
Salamander eggs. “You must say Harry’s a villain!”

' '
“But it’s not!” Hagrid said, looking genuinely shocked.
"She should have investigated Snape," Harry growled. "will
Give him the stuff for me any day. 'Potter has been crossing lines for a long time
Since he first arrived at this school. . . .' ”
“He said that, didn’t he?” Hagrid said, while Ron and Hermione
He laughed. “Well, you may have broken a few rules, Harry, but you all
Righ' really, aren't you?”
“Hi, Hagrid,” Harry said, smiling.
“Are you coming to this football thing at Christmas, Hagrid?” said
run.
“Though' I could look into it, yes,” Hagrid said grudgingly.
“It should be fine, I think. To be open dance, not open.
Yes, Harry? Who are you taking?”
“No, not yet,” Harry said, feeling himself turn red. Hagrid didn't follow the hint.
The last week of the semester became increasingly challenging as it went on. Word of the Yule Ball was going around everywhere,
Though Harry didn’t believe half of them — for example, that
Dumbledore bought eight hundred barrels of magic oil.
From Mrs. Rusmerta. It seems to be true, however, that he has
booked the Weird Sisters. Who or what are the alien sisters
Unbeknownst to Harry, he never had access to a wizard's wand, but he took away from the fun of wielding those who had
I grew up listening to WWN (Wizarding Wireless Network)
that they were a very popular musical group.
Some of the teachers, like young Professor Flitwick, dared to try .
They would have taught them much when their minds were so clearly elsewhere; he
He let them play games in his lesson on Wednesdays, and spent
Most of it was talking to Harry about the perfect memory foam.

' '
Harry had used it during the first exercise of the Triwizard Cup.
Other teachers were not so generous. Nothing will change
Professor Binns, for instance, from his innocence through his observations .
about the rebellions of the monsters — as Binns didn’t let his own death stand in
way of finishing learning, they see it as a small thing like
Christmas didn’t work. It was surprising how the
It can even make bloody and brutal violence sound as exciting as
Percy's report of the cruise. Professors McGunagall and Moody
They kept them working till the last second of their classes too.
And Snape, of course, wouldn’t let them play games at school
Beyond questioning Harry. He looks at them all sympathetically and informs
in them that he would test them for poison pills during the
The last lesson of the term.
“Worse, he is,” Ron muttered that night in the Gryffindor common room. “A test spring for us on the last day. Ultimate damage
Bit of a term with a full tuition break.”
“Mmm . . . You're not pushing yourself, though, and
You?" » Hermione said, looking up at him through the Potions .
opportunities. Ron was holding off building the Card Castle from his Exploding
Snap pack — it’s a lot more comfortable than a Muggle
cards, because of the chance that the whole thing will get stuck in the
Every second.
"It's Christmas, Hermione," Harry whispered; He was repeating.
Flying through the Canyons for the umpteenth time in a seat near the
hell.
Hermione watched him closely as well. “I would think
You’ll be doing something constructive, Harry, even if you don’t
You want to learn your trade!”

' '
“Like what?” Harry said as he watched Joey Jenkins of the Cannons fish a bludger towards a Ballycastle bullfighter.
“The egg!” Hermione whispered.
“Come on, Hermione, I’ve got until February 24th,”
Harry said.
He put the golden egg up in his bowl, but it was gone.
He has opened it since the inauguration after the first service. are
Still two and a half months to go until he should know what all
the comfort of being meaningful, after all.
“But it’ll probably take weeks to finish!” Hermione said. "you
You’d look real stupid if everyone else knew what was going to happen
Is that you don’t!”
"Leave it, Hermione, he's had a bit of a fun time," she said .
Ron, and placed the last two cards on top of the castle and
Too much unfurled, singeing her eyes.
“Good music, Ron . . . Go well with your clothes, and that’s what’s going to happen.”
It was Fred and George. They sat down at the table with Harry.
Ron, and Hermione as Ron felt how much damage had been done.
“Ron, can we borrow Pigwidgeon?” George asked.
“No, he’s out to deliver a letter,” Ron said. "why?"
“Because George wants to invite him to the prom,” Fred said sheepishly.
“Because we want to send a letter, you big asshole,” he said .
George.
“Who do you keep writing to, eh?” Run said.
"Break the nose, Ron, or I'll burn this too," Fred said, smirking .
His babies honestly. "So . . . have you had enough football clothes yet?”
“Nope,” Ron said.

' '
“Well, you better hurry, kid, or all the good guys will be .
gone,” Fred said.
“Who are you going with, then?” Run said.
“Angelina,” Fred whispered, unconcerned.
"what?" Ron said, taken aback. “Have you asked her already?”
“That’s right,” Fred said. He turned his head and called the
club room, “Oi! Angelina!”
Angelina, who dated Alicia Spinet near the
Fire, he looked at him.
"what?" she called out.
“Do you want to come to the ball with me?”
Angelina gave Fred a confused smile.
“Alright, then,” she said, turning back to Alicia and continuing to speak with a little smile on her face.
“There you go,” Fred said to Harry and Ron, “cockpit.”
He rose to his feet, hovering, and said, “We’d better use school .
Secret then, George, come on. . . .”
They’re gone. Run stopped feeling his eyes and looked away.
burning his cardboard castle into Harry.
“We’ve got to step up, you know . . . Ask someone. he
right. We don’t want to end up with a couple of trolls.”
Hermione let out an exasperated sigh.
“A woman of . . . What, excuse me?”
“Well — you know,” Ron said, smirking. "I'd rather go alone
Rather than with—with Eloise Midgen, say.”
“Her acne has finally cleared up — and she’s really good!”
“His nose isn’t in the corner,” Ron said.
“Oh I see,” Hermione said, shrugging. “So basically, you go

' '
You’re going to take the prettiest girl that will have you, even if she’s completely naked?”
“Er — yeah, that sounds good,” Ron said.
“I’m going to bed,” Hermione whispered, storming off to the girls’ pool without another word.
The staff at Hogwarts, showing a perfect willingness to please
Visitors from Beauxbatons and Durmstrang, appear eager to show off the castle at its best this Christmas. When the colors added up, Harry thought they were the best
He still saw the inside of the school. Permanent hair was tied to the marble patio window; Twelve Ancient
The Christmas trees in the main hall are decorated with everything
From sparkling hazelnuts to true, glittery, gold-toned, and
the heroic crew were all enchanted to sing funny songs whenever anyone passed them. It’s such a treat to hear “Oh Come, All Ye .
Faithful” was sung by a fake helmet who only knew half the words.
Several times, Filch the villain had to pull Peeves out of the inside .
the fortress, where he got to hide, is full of holes in the
Songs with lyrics he composed himself, all of which were pretty awesome.
And still, Harry hadn't asked Cho to the ball. He and Run were
They’re getting much older now, though Harry says, Ron
be much less aggressive than he would be without a partner;
Harry had to start dancing with someone else.
Champions.
"I think there's always Moaning Myrtle," he sighs, referring to the ghost haunting the girls' dorms on Day Two .
floor.
“Harry — we’ve just got to grit our teeth and get it done,” Ron said in

' '
Friday morning, with a sound indicating they were planning
storming ⵏ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵍⵃⴻⴱⵙ ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⴽⴽⴻⵙ ⴰⵔⴰ. “When we come back to
common room Tonight, we’ll both have partners — agreed?”
“er . . . Unfortunately,” Hari said.
But every time Cho recalls that day — during the holiday, and
Sein and Lawan’s Lawan’s Lawan is time on the history of the ear history — she .
He was surrounded by friends. Don’t go anywhere else?
Could he maybe fuck her when she went into the bathroom?
But no — it seems she also went there with an escort of four or five people .
girls. But if you don’t worry with the ads, they must be reduced
by someone else.
He finds hard to make the ball to the Snape of Potions, and
So he adds the main element — a bezoar —
Ansians is that the Under-eastern champions reached down. No love, but; he
He was hesitant with his courage about what to do.
When the bell rang, he grabbed his bag and hurried to the prison entrance.
“I’ll meet you in dinner,” he told Ron and Hermione, and he.
He went upstairs.
He just had to ask Cho private, and that’s just. . . . he
She hurried out into the crowded streets, looking for him, and
(Phurse for the meaning) found, you left out of it.
A lesson in defense against the dark arts.
“Er — what? What can I say a word with you?”
Kissing should be made illegal, Harry thought angrily, because all
The girls in Cho’s class started doing it. She didn’t, though. She said,
“Okay,” and follows from the ear ears of the school.
Harriy is supposed to be accomplished and Abadusi gave a silent singer.
The Amazon tried to stop a level to fight.

' '
“Re,” he said.
He couldn't help but ask her. unable. But it has to work. Cho stood there.
She looked shocked and looked at him.
The words were left to reach Harry to the tongue.
in their midst.
“Gobails?”
"Sorry?" Cho said.
“D’you — d’you want to go to the ball with me?” Harry said.
So why should it go right now? why?
"Oh!" C said Cho, and too, you’ve left a black. “Hey Harry, I really
Supremely,” and really well. “I’ve always been going to go with another.”
“Oh,” Harry said.
He was vulnerable; Some time you would have been inside the magnetic increase
The rights, but in a time obviously no inside.
“Oh by good,” he said, “the problem.”
“I’m really sorry,” she said again.
“Noach for it,” Hari said.
They stood out there come up in the other, Sinen said Cho,
"Well -"
“Yeah,” Harry said.
“Well, ‘bye,’ said Cho, still very red. She went.
Harry called after her, before stopping himself.
“Who is a go with him?”
“Oh — Cedric,” she said. “Cedric Diggory.”
“Ah really,” Hari said.
Inside it came back again. The likelihood
filled with sand in their prisons.
He is all the dinner, he returned to Awallah.

' '
Back in Gryffindor Tower, Cho's voice ringing in her ears with every step
committed. “Cedric — Cedric Diggory.” He was beginning to significantly
Like Cedric — it’s easy to help that he had once .
He beat him at Quidditch, and he was handsome, and popular, and
ⵇⵔⵉⴱ ⴷ ⴰⵙⴻⵍⵡⴰⵢ ⵏ ⵢⴰⵍ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ. Now suddenly he realized
Cedric was truly a useless handsome boy who didn’t have enough.
Brains to fill an egg cup.
“The woman’s body,” he quickly told the elderly woman — the verse has .
It was replaced the previous day.
“Yes, of course, dear!” She cheers, straightens her new hair
band as she looks forward to accept him.
When he entered the Union room, Haarry grew up to the municipality, and to the Winnis
With the joy Ronn was silently remaining in a terrible ship. Ginna
He was sitting with her, talking to her in what seemed to be low music,
A calming voice.
“What happened, Ron?” Harry said, joining them.
Ron looked at Harry, a kind of blind panic on his face.
“Why did I do it?” he said wildly. “I don’t know what made me
Do it!”
"what?" Harry said.
“He — er — just asked Fleur Delacour to go to the ball with .
ⵖⵓⵔⵙ », ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ Ginny. It seemed to be fighting against it
Smile, but she kept squeezing Ron's hand sympathetically.
“You are what?” Harry said.
“ⵓⵔ ⵥⵔⵉⵖ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⵉ ⵢⵉⵢⴻⴵⴵⴰⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵅⴻⴷⵎⴻⵖ!” Ron regained his composure. "what
I was playing in? ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵢⴻⵎⴷⴰⵏⴻⵏ — ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⴰⵍ ⵜⴰⵎⴰ — ⵕⵓⵃⴻⵖ
Mad — everyone watching! I was just going in front of the kitchen room — she was standing there talking to Diggiy — and and .
ⵚⵚⴻⵏⴼ ⵏ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵙⴰ ⵢⵓⵙⴰⴷ ⴼⴻⵍⵍⵉ — ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵙⵜⴻⵇⵙⴰⵖⵜⵜ!”

' '
Ron ⵉⵄⴻⴳⴳⴻⴹ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵔⵔⴰ ⵓⴷⴻⵎⵉⵙ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵉⴼⴰⵙⵙⴻⵏⵉⵙ. ⵢⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⴻⵙⵍⴰⵢ,
although the words are almost indistinguishable.
“She looked at me like I was a sea slug or something. ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵅⴷⵉⵎ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ
answer. And then — I don’t know — I just came back to my senses .
ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⵓⵣⵣⴻⵍ ⴼⴻⵍⵍⴰⵙ.”
“It’s a vela sector,” Harry said. « ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵍⵃⴻⵇⵇⵉⴽ — ⵢⴻⵎⵎⴰⵙ ⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ. It’s not a lunar, I think you’re just
As an old silence was charged with the Diggroy and the bomb
of that — but she was wasting her time. She went with Cho Chanang.”
Ron ⵉⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵙⴷⴰⵜ.
“She asked to go so far just,” Harry said quickly, “I’m .
He told me.”
Ginny was suddenly shocked.
“That is a short thing,” Ron said. “We are just the remaining .
He got one—well, except Neville. Hey — guess who’s asking?
Hermione!”
"what?" ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ Harry, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵙⴼⴻⴹ ⴰⴽⴽ ⵙ ⵍⴻⵅⴱⴰⵔⴰⴳⵉ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⵡⴻⵀⵎⴻⵏ.
“Yes, I’ve seen!” Ron said some dances back in
The face as he started to start. “He said after Potions! she said
He was always really nice, helping him with work and stuff —
ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰⴰⵙ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⵜⴻⴷⴷⴰ ⵢⴰⴽⴰⵏ ⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ. Ha! equal!
ⵓⵔ ⵜⴻⴱⵖⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴽⴰⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⴷⴷⵓ ⴷ Neville . . . ⵉⵀⵉ, ⴰⵏⵡⴰ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵜⵢⴻⵙⵇⴻⴷⵛⴻⵏ?”
"don't!" Ginny said, excited. “ⵓⵔ ⵜⵜⴰⴹⵙⴰⵢ ⴰⵔⴰ —”
Just then Hermione jumped out of the window of the screen.
“Why aren’t you two at dinner?” She said, coming in
them.
« ⴰⵛⴽⵓ — oh ⵙⵙⵓⵙⵎⴻⵜ ⵜⴰⴹⵙⴰ, ⴽⴻⵞⵞ ⴷ ⵙⵉⵏ — ⴰⵛⴽⵓ ⵙⵙⴰⵡⴹⴻⵏ .
Both of them just got accepted by girls asking them to the ball!” said
Genie.

' '
That was what set Harry and Ron apart.
“Thanks so much, Ginny,” Ron sighed.
“All the good ones taken, Ron?” Hermione said anxiously.
“Eloise Midgeen starts looking very beautiful and now? So, I
Surely you will find someone somewhere who will have you.”
But Run was looking at Hermione as if he suddenly saw her
In the new light with free.
“The Hermione, the sadness of Neville — you’re a girl. . . .”
“Oh well,” she sighed.
“Well — you can come with one of us!”
“No, I can’t,” Hermione said flatly.
“Ah you’ve achieved,” he said with Live, “We need chicken, let’s see it’s really bads if we don’t have, each other .
have . . .”
“I can’t come with you,” Hermione said, now blushing, “because .
We’re just going to go and one.”
“No, you’re not!” Run said. “You only said that to get rid of
Neville!”
“Ah I?” said Hermione, and her eyes widened dangerously.
“Just because it took you three years to warn him, Ron, doesn’t mean .
No one else I was a girl!”
Ron Turkey. Then he smiled again.
“Well, well, we know it’s a girl,” he said. “It’s what’s what? will
Out now?”
“You’ve ever said!” Hermione said for a great joy. “I’m going
With another!”
And it quickly came out to the girls’ shop again.
“She’s lying,” Ron said quietly, watching her go.
“She’s not,” Ginny said quietly.

' '
“Who is it then?” Ron said quietly.
"I'm not telling you, that's his business," Ginny said.
“Of course,” said Ron, who looked very relieved, “this is getting .
stupid. Ginny, you can go with Harry, I’ll —”
“I can’t,” Ginny said, and even get out with the ear. “I’ll go
With — with Nivil. He finished when it reported Hermie only.
thought . . . Well . . . I couldn’t have left otherwise, I
Man at the fourth year.” She’s a very sadness. “I think I'll go
Also they eat to eat the villages,” she said, Reddah, name for
The shipping of the ship, the chroys is linked to.
Ron Model to Hari.
“What’s gotten into them?” He asked.
But Hari just saw Parvati and Lavender enter with .
The line of the screen. The time for decisive action has come.
“I’m just here,” he told Ron, and stands, and went straight .
For Parvati, Isias: “Parvati? Will you go to the ball?”
Parvati entered in a wedding creature. Harry waited to reduce, the footsteps were snapped in the squad of the prize.
“Yeah, okay then,” she finally said, blushing furiously.
“Thank you,” says Harry, with joy. “Lavender — you’ll go with .
Run?”
“She’s dating Seamus,” Parvati said, and the two of them .
The possibility more than ever.
Harry sighed.
“Can’t you think of anyone to go with Ron?” He said, lowering his voice so Ron wouldn't hear.
“What’s Hermiyun Granter?” Paravati said.
“She’s dating someone else.”
Parvati Timel with joy.

' '
“Ouh — who?” She said calmly.
Harry shrugged. “No idea,” he said. “So what about Ron?”
"Well . . ." Parvati said quietly, “I think my sister can .
Padma, you know. . . In Ravenclaw. I’ll ask her if you want.”
“Yeah, that would be nice,” Harry said. “Let me know, I’ll
you?"
And back to Ron, he felt that this team was a lot .
More trouble than it should be, and I very much hope that Padma
Patil’s nose was a death of darkness.

CHAPTER TWENTY-THREE
YULE BAKE

Although the homework is very hard says the 4th
years devoted to holidays, Harry was at no
job status when the year ends, and I spent a week before
Christmas wishes itself well along with everyone else
else. Gryffindor Tower wasn't nearly as crowded now as it had been back then.
time-time; It seems to have declined a bit too, as its population
They were much more violent than before. Fred and George have
a huge success with their Canary Creams, and the first female
During the holidays, people keep flying with feathers all around
That place. Before long, however, all Gryffindors learned to .
Treat food given to them by anyone else with extreme caution, if
She has a Canary cream hidden in the corner, and George tells Harry that he and Fred are currently busy expanding .
Something else. Harry put a note in his mind not to argue too much.
Like a car from Fred and George in the future. Still hasn't forgotten
Dudley and tongue-in-cheek Toffi.
Rain was falling steadily on the castle and its palace now.
The blue Beauxbatons car looks like a big, cool,
A grilled pumpkin in front of the hot ginger house that is Hagrid's room, while the walls of Durmstrang Ship are coated in glass .
With ice, the wreath is white with ice. Pets down in the
They were aligning themselves with a class of wealthy, loving
stews and stews are delicious, and only Fleur Delacour seems to be
He might find something to complain about.
“It’s so weird, all the zis’ Ogwarts food,” she’s heard saying .
bitterly as they left the main hall after him one evening (Ron
skulking behind Harry, worried that Fleur wouldn't notice). “I don’t do
It’s perfect in my leather jacket!”
“Oooh it was fun,” Hermione whispered as Fleur pulled away .
in the entrance hall. “She really thinks a lot about herself, that one,
Isn’t she?”
“Hermione — who are you going to the ball with?” Run said.
He kept asking her this question, hoping to impress her
in the same response by asking her when she least expected it. however,
Hermione just nodded, "I'm not telling you, I'll . . ."
They just made fun of me.”
“You’re kidding, Wesley!” Malfoy said, behind them. “You’re not
I'm told someone asks that for a ball? Not someone with long hair
Warm blood?”
Harry and Ron both glared, but Hermione said
Aloud, someone moves over Malfoy's shoulder, "Hello, Professor Moody!"
Malfoy turned gray and jumped back, looking frantically in all directions.
to Moody, but he was still up at the staff table, finishing his dish.
“An annoying little bug, aren’t you, Malfoy?” Hermione said
Carefully, and she, Harry, and Run climbed the marble wall
He laughed heartily.
“Hermione,” Ron said, looking sideways at her, quickly clearing his throat, “Your teeth . . .”
“What about them?” She said.
“Well, different . . . I just noticed. . . .”
“Of course they are — you expect me to keep those bones .
Malfoy gave it to me?”
“No, I mean, different from how they were before he threw
The hex is on you. . . . They all. . . The live is — and nomalisé.”
Hermione suddenly smiled mischievously, and Harry
Also noticed: It was a very different print than he had
He remembered.
"It was . . . when I went to Mrs. Pumfri's to get them
She shrunk, picked up the mirror, and told me to stop it when
they were back as normal,” she said. “We just get . . . let
It goes on a little bit.” She smiled more. “Mom and Dad
It doesn't take long. I tried to convince them to leave me alone.
They demoted them for ages, but they wanted me to keep doing my job
Resources. You know, they’re dentists, they don’t just think about teeth and
Shure should — see! A foot!
Ron’s special ship was closed by Larn on the ears of the ears of the ears, and the text of the creature Ishdah is up to the foot. People pass
They were pointing and laughing, a group of third year girls
He stopped and said, “Oh look at the weeny monkey! Isn’t he cute?”
“You stupid little feather git!” Run sighed and slowly climbed up the stairs.
and the use of Pigwidgeon. “You deliver the letters to whoever is called!
You’re not going to expose yourself!”
Pigwidgeon cried out happily, his head popping up on Ron's shoulder.
The third year girls all looked very nervous.
"wipe!" Ron's worms, the right hand caught the Pgwedgeon, which he added with more joy than it was released by the .
air. “Hatan — Tyft, Harry,” Ron Show under the ears as he said .
Third year-year girls were accompanied by Scandale Zed. The Sirius’s answer was stolen from Pigwidgion’s foot, Harry smashed in the juniors, managed to quickly .
He went back to Gryffindor tower to read it.
Everyone in the common room was too busy leaving the
off more holiday steam to take care of what everyone else is.
Run, Harry, and Hermione sat apart from the others in front of a dark
window that gradually filled with snow, and Harry read
out:
Hi Harry,
Congratulations on passing Horntail. who put
The name in the coffees shouldn’t be a very pleasure, and the fact
now! I would suggest an anti-inflammatory intervention, such as
The eyes of the dragon and his legacy — “That’s what Krum said .
It worked!" Hermione smiled — but your way is good, I
Abss.
Don't be discouraged, though, Harry. You just did a
task; Whoever put you in the tournament has a lot more
Opportunity if they are trying to harm you. Keep your eyes
Led — especially when the person is going to talk to
around — and concentrate on keeping yourself out of trouble.
Keep in touch, I still want to hear about anything unusual.

' '
"He looks like Moody," Harry whispered, cautiously .
A parting letter is also inside his coat. “ 'Always alert!' will
I imagine walking around with my eyes closed, banging on the walls. . . .”
“But he’s right, Harry,” Hermione said, “you still have two .
things to do. You have to look at that egg, you know,
And start working out what it means. . . .”
“Hermione, he’s aged!” said Run. “I want a game of chess,
Harry?”
“Yeah, okay,” Harry said. Then she saw Hermione's look
Face, he says, “Come on, how am I supposed to focus with everything
This walking noise? I can’t even hear the egg on this one.
quite."
“Oh I guess not,” she said, and sat down to watch .
The chess match, culminating in Ron’s chess match,
It involved two incredibly brave and one very courageous couple.
lbefoyfor.
Harry woke up abruptly on Christmas Day. I wonder what
He caused her to quickly return to consciousness, he opened his eyes,
And he saw something with big, blue, blue eyes staring back
To him in the dark, they almost met nose to nose.
“Dubbi!” Harry screamed, sprinting away from the stallion.
He almost fell off the bed. “Don’t do that!”
“Embarrassed Dobby, sir!” yelled Dobby, jumping back with his long fingers over his mouth. “Dobby just wants .
Let's wish Harry Potter 'Happy Birthday' and get him a present,
Sir! Harry Potter did say Dobby could come and see him sometimes, sir!”
“It’s okay,” Harry said, still breathing faster than before,

' '
But his heart returned to normal. “Just — just prod me or .
Something in the future, well, don’t bother me so. . . .”
Harry pulled the bandages around his four papers and took his
clothes from his suitcase, and put them on. Her screams have
They woke up Ron, Seamus, Dean, and Neville. They were all looking
with the slits in their foreheads, with narrow eyes and dark brown hair.
“Did someone attack you, Harry?” Seamus asked sleepily.
“No, it’s just Dobby,” Harry shrugged. “Now back to sleep.”
"No . . . Gifts!” Seamus said, seeing the large cup in the
The foot of his bed. Ron, Dean, and Neville decided that they were now
awake can likewise prevent some presentopening too.
Harry turned to Dobby, who was now standing shocked
in front of Harry's bed, still looking worried that he had scared Harry.
There was a Christmas tree tied to the tree above her tea.
cozy.
“Can Dobby give Harry Potter his present?” He shouted
quickly.
“ 'Course you can,’ said Harry. “er . . . I have something i
you too."
It’s a lie; He didn’t buy anything for Dobby at all, but he
He slowly opened his trunk and pulled out a precious bag.
the roll-up of the top. Its predecessors are damage, mustard
It is yellow, and formerly belonged to Uncle Vernon. The reason for this
they were literally the fact that Harry had been using them to propel his Sneakoscope for over a year. He got out the Sneakoscope, handed the drops to Dobby, and said, “I’m sorry, I forgot to .
Throw them away. . . .”
But Dobby was perfectly happy.

' '
“T-shirts are Dobby’s favorite clothes, his favorite clothes, sir!” He said, flipping off his fake ones and pulling on Uncle Vernon's. “I have seven
Now, sir. . . . But Mr . . .” he said, his eyes flashing, as he pulled
both peaks up to their maximum size, to reach up to
Under his shirt, “they made a mistake in the store, Harry
Potter, they give you two like that!”
“Oh, no, Harry, how can you not see that?” Ron said, looking up from his bed, which was now covered in blankets .
paper. “Tell you what, Dobby—here you go—take these two, .
And you can mix them well. And here’s your sweater.”
He threw Dobby a pair of blue socks that he had just unwrapped.
and the lovely handmade sweater Mrs. Weasley had sent. Dubi
She looked sorry.
“Sir is very kind!” He screamed, his eyes brimming with tears.
Also, a nod to Ron. “Dobby knows master must be great .
The wizard, because he was Harry Potter’s best friend, but Dobby didn’t know it
Know that he was also a spiritual lover, as a hero, as an innocent—”
“Just socks,” said Ron, who went a bit pink .
around the ears, though he looks happy all the same.
“Wow, Harry —” He had just opened Harry’s gift, and it was Chudley .
Hat the cannon. "cool!" He tied it around his head, where it matched
freaked out by her hair.
Dobby now gives Harry a small parcel, which turns out to be
Be — girls.
“Dobby makes them himself, sir!” The rabbit said excitedly. "he is
Buy the wool from his mill, sir!”
The left circle was black and had a hooked pattern
on it; The coffee on the right was dark compared to Snitches.
"is . . . They really are. . . Well, thanks, Dobby,” said Harry,

' '
And he pulled them, making Dobby's eyes widen once more with excitement.
“Dobby should go now, sir, we are already having Christmas .
Dinner in the kitchen!” Dobby said, and stormed out of the bathroom, waving goodbye to Ron and the others as he passed.
Harry’s other gifts were much more satisfactory than
Dobby’s unusual girls—with the obvious exception of the Dursleys,
There was a tinge to it, something we didn't get all the time— Harry thought they even remembered Ton-Tongue Toffee.
Hermione gave Harry a book called Quidditch Teams of
Great Britain and Ireland; Ron, the Dungbombs that popped up; Sirius, a
a handmade penknife with features related to erasing any marking and marking any
sound; and Hagrid, a large rose box containing all of Harry’s favourites: Bertie Bott’s berries of every stripe, chocolate mushrooms, .
The drooble of the woodpecker, and the whizbees of the woodpecker. was
Also, of course, the original Mrs. Weasley package, including a new
Shirt (blue, with a picture of a dragon on it — Harry thought
Charlie told him all about Horntail), and a lot of
Homemade spice pies.
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⴷ Run ⵎⵍⴰⵍⴻⵏ ⴷ Hermione ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⴻⵅⵅⴰⵎⵜ ⵏ ⵜⴷⵓⴽⵍⵉ,
And they want to eat breakfast together. They spent most of the
Morning in Gryffindor Tower, where everyone is enjoying their
gifts, then back to the main hall for a sumptuous lunch,
There were at least a hundred turkeys and Christmas cookies, and huge piles of Cribbage's Wizarding Crackers.
They went out to the palace in the evening; The snow was
It is not accessible except for the deep passages forged by Durmstrang
and the Beauxbatons students on their way to the castle. Hermione
He’d rather watch Harry and the Weasleys snowball fight than

' '
attend, and at five o'clock she says she'll go back upstairs to get
Ready for football.
“What, you need three hours?” Ron said, looking disbelieving and compensating for his disbelief in his expression as a .
snowball, thrown by George, hit him hard on the side of the head.
“Who are you going with?” He shouted after Hermione, but she just
shrugging and climbing up the stone stairs to the castle.
ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵍⴰⵜⵜⴰⵢ ⵏ Nuel ⴰⵙⵙⴰ, ⵉⵎⵉ ⵜⴰⴽⵓⵔⵜⵏⵏⵉ ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷⴻⴳⵙ ⵜⵎⴻⵖⵔⴰ, ⵉⵀⵉ
At seven in the morning, when it became difficult to aim well, the others abandoned their snowball fight and returned en masse to the common room. The blonde sits in her frame with her friend.
Violet from below, both were very boring, and empty bottles
of chocolate dust dripping down her picture.
“Lairy fights, that’s who!” She laughed when they gave
password, and slid forward to let them in.
Harry, Ron, Simon, Dean, and Neville changed into
Dressed in robes in their locker room, they all looked very self-conscious, but none quite like Ron, who had squeezed himself into
A tall mirror in the corner with a confused look on his face. there
It’s not just about getting around the fact that his clothes are more visible
clothes above all else. In a desperate attempt to make them
Looking more masculine, he used a Severing Charm on the nose and throat.
It works perfectly; At least now he’s lace-free, although he didn’t do a very impressive job, and his eyebrows still look so lovely .
Frayed as the boys started down.
“I still can’t figure out how you two got the best girls in
A year,” Dean muttered.
“Animal magnetism,” Ron growled, pulling the stray thread .
from his hands.

' '
The common room was dimly lit, filled with people wearing different colors instead of the traditional pink fireplace. Parvati was waiting
To Harry at the foot of the stairs. It looks very beautiful indeed, in
The stunning pink dress, with its dark green lace trimmed with gold,
and rings of gold glittered on his wrists. Harry sighed to
See that she is not smiling.
“You — er — look beautiful,” he exclaimed.
“Thank you,” she said. “Padma will meet you at the door
hall,” she added to Ron.
“Of course,” Ron said, looking around. “Where’s Hermione?”
Parvati held out her hand. “Shall we get down then, Harry?”
“Okay,” Harry said, wishing he’d just stayed in the kitchen .
room. Fred looked at Harry as he passed him on the way out of the
Image size.
The entrance hall was full of students too, all smiling
At eight o’clock in the evening, when the doors of the Great Hall
to be thrown open. Those people who were dating partners
From different houses they were running through the crowd trying to
Find each other. Parvati found her sister, Padma, and brought her to
For Harry and Run.
“Hello,” said Padma, who looked as stunning as Parvati in
Beautiful purple dress. She didn’t seem too excited about
He has Ron as a partner, though; His blue eyes remained fixated on the
brows and lips on her thighs as she bounced him up and down.
“Hi,” Ron said, not looking at her, but smirking .
crowd. “Oh no . . .”
He bent his knees slightly to hide behind Harry, because Fleur
Delacour was hanging around, looking stunning in a silvery-gray gown
satin, and accompanied by the Ravenclaw champion of Quidditch,

' '
Roger Davis. When they broke apart, Run stood straight
Once more and he looks over the heads of the crowd.
“Where’s Hermione?” He said again.
The group of Slytherins came from their wards.
Common room. Malfoy was next; He was wearing a
The high-waisted black judge is why, in Harry’s opinion
Looking like a vicar. Pansy Parkinson in leather clothes is a loser
He was holding onto Malfoy's hand. Crabbe and Goyle were both wearing
green; They look like gemstones, and none of them,
Harry was pleased to see, he had managed to find a partner.
The front doors of the bay opened, and everyone turned to look as
The students of Durmstrang entered with Professor Karkaroff. Chrome is
At the front of the party, he was accompanied by a beautiful girl in a green dress
Harry didn't know. Above their heads he saw that an area of ​​grass
The front of the castle was transformed into a sort of
grotto filled with fairy lights — that means hundreds of real-life
The heifers remain in the beehives raised there.
And they get excited about making what appears to be Father Christmas and his reindeer.
Then Professor McGonagall's voice called out, "The ancients of
Here, please!”
Parvati arranged her aprons and beamed; She and Harry said “Look
You in a minute” to Ron and Padma and they walked forward, the chattering crowd parting to let them pass. Professor McGonagall,
who was dressed in red tartan and arranged a
A neat rose bush on the edge of his hut, he told them
They would wait on one side of the doors while everyone else went in;
They must enter the main hall with a ceremony when the rest of the
The disciples sat down. Flour Delacour and Roger Davis are credited

' '
Their hands are close to the gates; Davies was very surprised at his kindness.
Luckily he had Fleur as a partner and couldn't get his own
His eyes from her. Cedric and Cho was almost even Harry; Look
Away from them so he would never speak to them again. His eyes fell.
Instead on the girl next to Krum. Her eyebrows dropped.
It was Hermione.
But she didn't look like Hermione at all. She did something with her hair; It is no longer dull but bright and shiny, and
attached to an elegant bow at the back of her head. She was
He wore a suit made of thin, dark blue material, and she
She was holding herself differently, somehow—or maybe she was
The lack of a number of books or values ​​they have in general
on his back. It was also looking — oddly, it
It’s true — but reducing the back of the front of the front is more
It’s more predictable than ever; Harry couldn't understand how he didn't
has been demonstrated before.
“Hi, Harry!” She said. “Hello, Barvati!”
Parvati was staring at Hermione in disbelief. she
He wasn’t the only one either; When the doors to the main hall are
He was still, Korum tourists squad from the hunger and sanctified.
Hermione murmured with deep reproach. Pansy Parkinson looked at her
As she walked with Malfoy, even he seemed unable
Find a joke to throw at him. Run, however, went ahead
Hermione without looking at her.
When all the other people were able to set themselves at Uxxam, the teacher McGonagall said for footballers and their partners to stay in the sale and .
He would follow her. They did so, and everyone in the great hall clapped as they entered and began walking upstairs to a large hallway .
the round table at the top of the House, where the judges sit.

' '
The room ships were all buried by the vessels.
Ice, with hundreds of chunks of grass and trees crossing the
Switching black and stars. Uxxam’s fingers were able to leave; Instead, there
There are about ten small, airy spaces that seat about 100 each.
Twenty people.
Harry willed himself to keep from stumbling to his feet. Parvati appears
There will be sensitively; She was buried at each, Harry fully harres a testimony until the such as the film's death.
She was putting through her paces. He took a look at Run and
Padma as he approached the top table. Ron was watching Hermione.
Go back with a heavy eye. Padma was looking pitiful.
Dumbledre is studied with joy when the greatest adults were closed to
The middle of the middle, but Karkaroff has been instructed by value as the Ron's
Because Khoum and Hermione are roomed. Ludo Bagman,
Tonight wearing a pink dress with big purple stars, he was squealing as excitedly as any of the students; and Mrs.
Makime, who changed early brown Satan with a
gowns of flowing lavender silk kept them dignified. but
Mr. Crouch, suddenly, Harry realized, wasn't there. Session Five
In the grave he was attacked by Percy Weasley.
When the fighters and their partners arrived at the table, Percy
He pushed out the empty chair beside him, looking thoughtfully at Harry.
Harry took the hint and sat down next to Percy, who was wearing
New, navy blue swimsuit clothes and a smug look that Harry thought had to be punished.
“I lost,” Percy said before he could even ask Harry, .
And from the tone of it, he may have been announcing his election and
The greatest ruler of the world. “I’m now Mr. Crouch’s personal assistant, and I’m here representing him.”

' '
“Why didn’t he come?” Harry asked. He wasn’t looking ahead.
It’s going to be a conference on top of the cake all through dinner.
“I am afraid to say Mr. Crouch is not well, not at all well. doesn’t have
He has been consistent since the World Cup. Not surprisingly — poor performance.
He’s not as young as he was — though he’s still smart, n
Sure, the ball remains as big as it ever was. But the World Cup
It was a fiasco for the whole department, and then Mr. Crouch moved
Man's great sympathy with the bad behavior of his pet pig,
Blinky, or whatever it was called. Naturally, he kicked her out right after, but — well, as I said, he goes on, he needed
He’s paying attention, and I think he’s found a drop of stuff in his office
Love ever since she left. And then we have a championship for
set, it’s the Cup’s fault to deal with — Skeeter’s grumpy wife is buzzing — no, poor guy, he’s got a
Okay, silent Christmas. I’m just glad he knows he has someone he can trust to take over.”
Harry wanted so badly to ask if Mr. Crouch had
He had refrained from calling Percy “Weatherby” yet, but he accepted the gesture.
There was no food yet on the shiny gold plates, but
Small menus were lined up in front of each of them. Harry chose his own
awkwardly and looked around — no servants. Dumbledore, however, looked wistfully down at his menu, and then .
He says very clearly to his plate, “pigs!”
And the elephant seals appear. You get the idea, the rest of the table
They put their orders through their boxes as well. Harry glanced at the
Hermione to see how she felt about this new and wedding-like experience — it sure meant a lot of prep work for
House trials? 'But for once, Hermione didn't seem to

' '
Thinking About SPEW Was In Deep Talk With Viktor Krum
And it almost didn’t matter what she was eating.
It now occurred to Harry that he had never actually heard Krum .
They had talked before, but he was really talking now, and very happily at that.
“Veil, ve have a castle too, not so big, not so fancy,
I wonder,” he told Hermione. “Ve have only four legs,
And fires were lit only for magic. But we have reasons.
Great for these too — although in winter, ve have very little daylight, so ve don’t enjoy them. But in the winter, they melt.
Every day, over hills and mountains —”
“Well, now, I Viktor!” ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ Karkaroff ⵙ ⵜⴰⴹⵙⴰ ⵓⵔ
It arrives in the sights, “Don’t go to give anything else, now, or .
Your handsome friend will know exactly where to find us!”
Dumbledore ⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⵙⴻⵎ, ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⵜⵜⵛⴻⵡⵡⵉⵇⴻⵏⵜ. “Igor, all this nonsense . . .
One could almost say you didn’t want guests.”
“However, A Dumbledore,” said Karkaroff, you’ve introduces the green .
The journalist with their Qur'an, “We are all about political .
Interesting, aren’t we? Do we not visit with the instructions of the teachings who have been given? Are we not supposed to pray?
that we alone know the secrets of our school, and a duty to protect them?”
“Ah I don’t wait to think of all Hogwarts, A Igoor,” said Dumbledrere for good. « ⴰⵍⴰ ⴰⵙⵙⴰ ⵏ ⵙⵙⴻⴱⵜ, ⵉ .
For example, I took a way that is not good on the road to rest of the
I found myself in a beautiful room I didn’t see.
ⵓⵇⴱⴻⵍ, ⵢⴻⵙⵄⴰ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵙⵎⴻⵍ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜⵜ ⵙ ⵡⴰⵣⴰⵍⵉⵙ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⵡⴰ ⵏ ⵜⴻⵅⵅⴰⵎⵜ. When I went back to use more harassment, I found that the room went out. ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵉⵍⴰⵇ ⴰⴷ ⵃⴰⴷⵔⴻⵖ ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏⵉⵡ ⴼⴻⵍⵍⴰⵙ.

' '
Perhaps it was only overwhelmed and a half afternoon. Or could
They only appear at a quarter of the moon — or when the seeker has an unusually full bladder.”
Harry went through the glams. Percy’s escaped, but Hari
He swore Dumbledore gave him a very small smile.
In Lawanny, Fleur Delacour was complaining about Hogwarts weddings for Roger Davis.
“The food is something,” she said with the sights of slavery, is still in the middle of the woman .
The vessels of the Uxxam Amqran vessels. “At the Beauxbtons, we .
'ave lkulptur of the whole ice cream in the middle of the wedding room in Chreestmas.
ⵣⴻⵢ ⵓⵔ ⵜⵜⴼⴻⴳⴳⵉⴹⴻⵏ ⴰⵔⴰ, ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ . . . ⵣⴻⵢ ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⴰⵎ 'ⵓⴳⴻ ⵍⵎⴻⵚⵏⵓⵄⴰⵜ ⵏ ⵍⵃⴻⵎⵎⴰⵎ,
They shine instead ze. ⵓ ⵣⴻ ⵍⵇⵓⵜ ⴷ ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵉⴳⴻⵔⵔⵣⴻⵏ. and they
'ave chorales ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵟⵟⵓⵜ ⵏ ⵓⵙⴻⴽⵍⵓ, 'oo ⵙⴻⵔⴻⵏⴰⴷⴰⵖ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵏⴻⵞⵞⴰ. We have
No one of them singing the hunt in Ze 'Alells, and Eve a pletergeist was no
In Beauxbtons, 'E will be done like Zate.” He ready with the tree.
Hand on table gently.
Roger Davies was supposed to speak with a ear of the ear.
ⵓⴷⴻⵎ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵣⴳⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⵓⵍⴼⵓ ⵙ ⵢⵉⵎⵉⵙ ⵙ ⵜⴼⴻⵔⴽⴰⵉⵏⴻⵙ. He was Harry
The vision that Davis was a lot in Fleur to take in one
The word says he states.
“All right,” he said quietly, waving his own hand .
for the table with the view of Fleur. “As. Yes."
Harry has grown to the room. Hared was in one of the
other personnel resources; He came back in his brown suit with messy hair and
A squat to the average level of average. ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵉⵡⴰⵍⴰⵜ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴰⴽⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ ⵜⴰⵎⴻⵛⵟⵓⵃⵜ, ⵓ
She’s next to the side, saw Madeame Maxime launched, apolys and stood on the light of Qalia.
Hermione was currently teaching Kum to say the name properly; he
She continued to call him “Hermiown.”

' '
“Hermyohnee,” she said softly and quietly.
“The Hermney.”
“Close enough,” she said, catching Harry’s eye and smiling.
ⴰⵙⵎⵉ ⴰⵢ ⵜⵜ-ⵉⴷ-ⵜⴻⵜⵜⴰⵔⵔⴰ ⴰⴽⴽ ⵜⵓⵞⵞⵉⵜ, ⵉⴱⴻⴷⴷ ⴷⵓⵎⴱⵍⴷⵓⵔ
And he asked the students to do the same. Then, with one of his visions
wand, all the plates going around the walls and coming out on the floor
obvious, and then created a raised platform in the universe around the
The right wall. ⵜⴰⴳⵔⴰⵡⵜ ⵏ ⴹⴻⴱⴱⴰⵔ, ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⵏ ⵍⴳⵉⵟⴰⵔⴰⵜ, ⵍⵓⵜ, ⴰⵙⴻⵍⵍⵓ, ⴷ
Some lights were placed on it.
The Weird Sisters now took to the stage to a rapturous ovation; They all had a lot of hair and wore
black clothes that are artfully torn and folded. They picked up
Their tools, and Harry, who was so focused on watching them that he was almost oblivious to what was coming, suddenly .
He realized that all the lamps on the other tables were gone, and
that the other slaves were separated from their partners.
"series!" ⵜⴻⵙⵃⵉⵙⵙⵉⴼ Parvati. “ⵉⵍⴰⵇ ⴰⴷ ⵏⵛⴻⴹⵃⴻⴹ!”
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⵖⵍⵉⴷ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⵡⴰ ⵏ ⵍⵇⴻⵛⵛⵉⵙ ⵎⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⴽⴽⴻⵔ. ⵜⵉⵙⵙⴻⵜⵎⴰⵜⵉⵏ Weird ⵙⵙⵓⴼⵖⴻⵏⵜⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵍⵃⴻⵏⵏⵉ ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ, ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ; ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵢⴻⴷⴷⴰ ⵖⴻⴼ
A brightly lit dance floor, carefully catching no one’s eye (he
He could see Seamus and Dean looking at him and scowling at him), and
Next moment, Parvati clasped her hands and placed one in front of her
ⵍⵇⴻⴷⴷ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴹⴻⴳⴳⵉⵄ ⵡⴰⵢⴻⴹ ⵙ ⵍⴵⴻⵀⴷ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⵉⵏⵉⵙ.
ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵏ ⴷⵉⵔⵉ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⵣⵎⴻⵔ ⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⵍⵉ, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Harry ⴷⴻⴳ ⵡⵓⵍⵉⵙ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ
A fast in the place (Parvati was guilty). ⵢⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵡⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏⵉⵙ.
ⴻⴼ ⵢⵉⵇⴻⵔⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵢⴻⵎⴷⴰⵏⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵍⵉ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵓⵔ ⵜⵄⴻⵟⵟⴻⵍ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⴷⴻⴳⵙⴻⵏ .
They also came to the dance stage, so there were no old
longer the center of attention. Nivil ⴷ Jinni ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵜⵜⵛⴻⴹⵃⴻⵏ
Nearby—he could see Ginny smiling widely as he fucked Neville .

' '
On his knees — and Dumbledore was sleeping with Madame .
Maxim. He was smaller than her down to the top of his blue cap.
almost to his chin; Still, looking pretty good for a
The woman is much older. Madey Moody was doing something very strange.
Two steps with Professor Sinistra, who was screaming in horror .
ⴰⴹⴰⵔ ⵏ ⵓⵙⴻⴽⵍⵓ.
“ⵜⵉⵇⵛⵉⵛⵉⵏ ⵢⴻⵍⵀⴰⵏ, ⴰ Potter,” ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Moody ⵎⵉ ⵢⴻⵣⵔⵉ, ⵙ ⵙⵙⴻⵃⵔⵉⵙ .
ⵜⵉⵟ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⴹⴻⴱⵙⵉⵢⴻⵏ ⵏ Harry.
“ⴰⵀ — ⵉⵀ, Dobby ⵍⴱⴰⴹⵏⴰ ⵏ ⵓⵅⵅⴰⵎ ⵉ ⵢⵉⴷ-ⵢⴻⵙⵏⵓⵍⴼⴰⵏ,” ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ .
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵇⴻⵚⵚⵉⵔ.
“ⴷ ⵡⵉⵏ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵡⵀⴰⵎⴻⵏ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ!” Parvati ⵜⵃⴻⵙⵙⴷ ⵎⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⴼⴻⴹ Moody. "I
Don’t think you should leave that eye!”
Harry listened to the last bell, shaking from the spell with excitement. The alien sisters stopped playing, and voice filled the room once
More, and Harry has left Paravati at once.
“Shall we stay, shall we?”
“ⴰⵀ — ⵎⴰⵛⴰ — ⴰⵢⴰ ⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⵍⵀⴰⵏ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ!” ⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ Parvati ⴰⵎ
Weird Sisters have announced a new song, which is very unique.
“No, I don’t,” Harry lied, taking her from .
The dance floor, next to Fred and Angelina, who were dancing like this
Happy that the people around them are committed to the
Fearing injury, and went to the table where Ron and Padma were
remain.
“How are you doing?” Harry Ron asked, sitting down and opening a
A bottle of cheese beer.
Ron didn't answer. He was glaring at Hermione and Krum, who
They were dancing close. Padma was sitting on her hands and knees.
He ran, one foot jerking in time to the music. whenever
She cast a disapproving look at Run, who was wondering all

' '
her. Parvati sat down across from Harry, crossed her arms and
His legs as well, and within minutes he was asked by a child to dance from
Buckbatons.
“Aren’t you sure, Harry?” Parvati said.
"what?" Harry said, who was now looking at Cho and Cedric.
“Oh never mind,” Parvati said, leaving with her
Bookbutton chick. When the song ended, she didn’t come back.
Hermione came over and sat down in Parvati's empty chair. she
He was a little grey in the face from dancing.
“Hi,” Harry said. Ron didn't say anything.
“It’s hot, isn’t it?” Hermione said, fanning herself with her arm.
“Viktor just went to get some drinks.”
Ron gave him a shy look. “Victor?” he said. “It’s not him
Did he ask you to call her Vicky yet?”
Hermione looked shocked. “What happened to you?” she
said.
“If you don’t know,” Ron growled, “I won’t say .
you."
Hermione looked at him, then at Harry, who frowned.
“Ron, what — ?”
“He’s from Durmstrang!” He took out Run. “It fights against
Harry! Against Hogwarts! You — you —” obviously Ron .
searching for words strong enough to describe Hermione's
crime, “frattining with the enemy, that’s what you do!”
Hermione's mouth hung open.
“Don’t be so stupid!” She said after a moment. “The enemy!
Honestly — who was the most excited when they saw
achieve? Who wants his autograph? who
Did he get a sample of it in their orphanage?”

' '
Ron chose to ignore that. “I think he asked you to come by
to him while you two were in the library?”
“Yes, he did,” Hermione said, the tips of her nose .
It’s brighter. “So what?”
“What happened—you tried to drag him into the spew, did you?”
“No, I am not! If you really want to know, he — he said he was
He comes to the library every day to try and talk to me, but he
He can’t muster the courage!”
Hermione said this softly, and blushed so hard that i
It was the same color as Parvati’s dress.
“Yeah, well — that’s her story,” Ron said innocently.
“What does that mean?”
“Obvious, isn’t it? He was a pupil of Karkaroff, wasn't he? recognize
Who you hang with. . . . He’s just trying to get closer to
Harry — give the inside information on him — or as close as possible .
Jinxit—”
Hermione looked as if Ron had pissed her off. When the
she spoke, her voice shaking.
“For your knowledge, he didn’t ask me a single thing about .
Harry, it’s not the same —”
Ron changed tack at the speed of light.
“Then he hopes you can help him find out what his yellow means!
I think you were putting your heads together at the time
Wonderful little library sessions —”
“I didn’t help him make that egg!” Hermione said, looking
He's angry. "Urjun. how can you say something like that — I want to .
Harry will win the championship, Harry knows that, don't you,
Harry?”
“You have a funny way of putting it,” Ron chuckled.

' '
“This whole tournament should be about recognition .
Foreign wizards and make friends with them!” Hermione said
With heat.
“No it’s not!” shouted Run. “It’s about winning!”
People started staring at them.
“Ron,” Harry said quietly, “I don’t have a problem with .
Hermione is coming with Krum—”
But Ron didn't care about Harry either.
“Why don't you go find Vicky, he'll be wondering where .
You,” Ron said.
“Don’t call her Vicky!”
Hermione jumped to her feet and burst onto the dance floor.
earth, disappears into the crowd. Ron watched her walk away with shock and pride on his face.
“Are you going to ask me to dance together?” Padma asked.
“No,” Ron said, still trailing behind Hermione.
“Fine,” Padma said quietly, getting up and going to join Parvati .
and the boy from Beauxbatons, who tricked one of his friends into
Join them so fast Harry could have sworn he had messed him up
There by a Summoning Charm.
“Vare and that Herm?” said a voice.
Krum had just walked up to their table holding two bottles of bubbles.
“No idea,” Ron muttered, looking back at him. “She lost it, she had
you?"
Krum was looking calm again.
“Veil, if you see her, tell her I half drinks,” he said, and he
He left.
“You’ve made friends with Viktor Krum, have you, Ron?”
Percy was shaking, rubbing his hands together and looking

' '
With a lot of pride. "Cockroaches! That's the point, you
Sign up — magical international cooperation!”
Much to Harry's displeasure, Percy now took the place of the departed Padma.
The center table was now empty; Professor Dumbledore was dancing
with Professor Sprout, Ludu Bagman with Professor McGonagall;
Madame Maxime and Hagrid were cutting the highway around the
dance as they danced among the students, and Karkaroff
He was nowhere to be seen. When the next song ended, everyone clapped again, and Harry saw Ludo Bagman kiss the Professor .
McGonagall's hand and made his way back through the crowd, over
What a thing Fred and George did.
“What do they think they are doing, they pissed off the Supreme Court .
members?” Percy sighed, watching Fred and George suspiciously.
“No respect . . .”
Ludo Bagman shook Fred and George off guard, however, when he saw Harry, he grinned and walked over to their table.
“I hope my brothers aren’t bothering you, Mr. Bagman?” said
Percy suddenly.
"What? Oh no, not at all!" Bagman said, “No, they are.
They just tell me a little bit more about those monster scars of theirs. I was wondering if I could advise them on marketing. I promise to
Put them in touch with my two folks at Zonko
Memory Shop. . . .”
Percy didn't look happy about it at all, and Harry was ready
He'd bet he'd be hurrying to tell Mrs. Weasley about it the moment he got home. Apparently, Fred and George's plans evolved.
More reviews lately, if they hope to sell to the public. Bagman opened his mouth to ask Harry something, but Percy .
established.

' '
“How are you feeling about the tournament, Mr. Bagman? our
A serious department — a sentence with a Goblet of
The fire.”—he glanced at Harry—“was a bit painful, of course, .
But it seems to have gone a lot smoother since then, don’t you think?”
“Oh yes,” Bagman exclaimed, “it was all a lot of fun.
How was old Barty? Too bad he couldn’t come.”
"Oh I'm sure Mr. Crouch will be up in no time," he said .
Percy raised his eyebrows, “but at the same time, I was more than willing to .
Take responsibility. Of course, not everything is involved in football” — he
He laughs bitterly — “oh no, I’ve had to deal with all sorts of things .
who appeared in his prison — you heard Ali Bashir was .
Getting caught crashing a convoy of cars flying to the surface? And then we were trying to persuade the Transylvanians to .
They signed an international ban on cricket. I have a meeting with
Head of their magical cooperation in the New Year —”
“Let’s go for a walk,” Ron murmured to Harry, “move away from .
Percy. . . .”
Pretending to drink more, Harry and Ron let
Table, stepped around the dance floor, and sauntered into the entrance hall. The front doors stood open, a sparkling garden
The lights in the rose garden twinkled and twinkled as they asked.
The front rows, where they found themselves surrounded by
forests; winding, winding streets; and large heaps of stone. Harry
He could hear running water, which sounded like a splash. here
And there, people sat on carved benches. He and Ron set up
off on one of the winding roads through the pine forest, but
They had only gone a little way when they heard unpleasant news.
A familiar voice.
“. . . You don’t see what there is to worry about, Igor.”

' '
“Severus, you can’t pretend this didn’t happen!” of Karkaroff
His voice sounded calm and quiet, as if he wished not to be heard. “It’s been brewing for months. I feel so strongly, I cannot deny it—”
“Then run,” Snape snapped. “Run away — I’ll do .
Sorry. I am, however, staying at Hogwarts.”
Snape and Karkaroff came around the corner. Snape had his
He went out on a leash and was spreading wild roses, his speech more
Not good shape. squeals came from several trees, and darkness
Things came out of them.
“Ten points from Ravenclaw, Fawcett!” Snape giggled girlishly.
He ran past him. “And ten points from Hufflepuff too, Stebbins!” as
The kid went quickly after her. “What are you two doing?” he
He added, keeping an eye on Harry and Ron on the path ahead.
Karkaroff, noticing Harry, looked a little restlessly to see them
He stood there. His hand went nervously to his goatee, and he
He started twirling it around her finger.
“We’re leaving,” Ron told Snape quietly. “Not against the law,
he is?"
“Keep walking, then!” Snape sighed, and brushed past them,
her long black dress flowing behind her. Karkaroff insisted
away behind Snape. Harry and Ron kept going.
“What’s Karkaroff worried about the most?” He looked at Run.
“And since when is he and Snape on a first-name order?”
Harry said quietly.
They had now reached a large rock chip, upon which they were
He could see the flickering pockets of a tall body. The shadowy forms of two older figures appeared on a stone bench.

' '
They see the water in the moonlight. And then Harry heard
Hagrid spoke.
“The moment' I saw it, I knew,” he said, in a raspy voice .
sound.
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⴷ Ron ⵙⴳⴻⵔⵔⵣⴻⵏ. ⵡⴰⴳⵉ ⵓⵔ ⵉⴱⴰⵏ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⵎ ⵚⵚⴻⵏⴼ ⵏ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ
They have to walk in, somehow. . . . Harry looked away,
He returned to the street, and saw Fleur Delacour and Roger Davies standing half cross-legged in a pine tree nearby. He caught Ron on
His shoulders and turned his head towards them, meaning that they
He could easily leave that way without being noticed (Fleur and
Davies looked Harry very shocked), but Ron, his eyes wide with horror at the sight of Fleur, shook his head violently, and pulled
Harry ground into the darkness behind the pillow.
“What do you know, Agrid?” said Madame Maxim, with a nod in the
Her small voice.
Harry definitely didn't want to hear that; He knew Hagrid.
ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⴽⵕⴻⵀ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵙⵍⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⴻⴳⵏⵉⵜ ⴰⵎ ⵜⴰⴳⵉ (ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ
He would have) — if he had been able to put his fingers in his ears and whisper louder, but that wasn’t really an option. Instead he tried to cradle himself in a reptile
Stone deer track, but the animal wasn’t that scary
managing to suppress Hagrid's next words.
“I know . . . ⵥⵔⵉⵖ ⵜⴻⵍⵍⵉⴹ ⴰⵎ ⵏⴻⴽⴽ. . . . She was your mother.
Or yer father?”
“I — I don’t know what you mean, 'Agrid. . . .”
“And my mother,” Hagrid said quietly. “She was one of the las'.
ⵡⵉⴷ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⴱⵔⵉⵟⴰⵏⵢⴰ ⵜⴰⵎⴻⵇⵔⴰⵏⵜ. 'Of course, I can' remember it well . . . She came out,
see. When I was abou' three. She wasn’t really his mother’s type.

' '
Well . . . It’s not in their nature, is it? I don’t know what happened
her . . . He could be dead fer all I know. . . .”
Madame Maxim said nothing. And Harry, though
Himself, taking his eyes off the monster, he looked up at the top of the
the snakes’ tails, they speak. . . . He didn't hear Hagrid speak.
About his childhood before.
“Me father was heartbroken when she went'. A tiny little man,
There was my father. By the time I was six, I could pick it up and put it down.
With the top o' the pillow if it confuses me. Used ter did it
laugh. . . .” Hagrid's deep voice dropped. Madame Maxime was listening, unmoving, apparently fixated on the silver screen. "father
It woke me up . . . But he died, o' course, jus' after I started school.
Sorta had ter made his way to me after that. Dumbledore was right
Help, brain. Very good ter-i, was. . . .”
Hagrid pulled out a large strapped silk mantle and pulled out his own.
Nose tightly.
"Yes . .
What side do you have on him?”
But Madame Maxime suddenly rose to her feet.
“It’s cold,” she says — but either way, it’s .
It was nowhere near as cold as his voice. “I think I’ll go in now.”
"Yes?" Hagrid said with a grin. “No, don’t go! I have — I’ve never met
Another one first!”
“Another what, exactly?” said Madame Maxim, her tone icy.
Harry could have told Hagrid it was better not to answer; stood
There in the shadows he gritted his teeth, hoping against hope he
He couldn’t — but it wasn’t right.
“Half another woman, o' right!” Hagrid said.
“ 'Ow you love!” said Mrs. Maxim. Her voice cracked.

' '
With a peaceful night air like a gentle breeze; Afterwards, Harry
They heard Fleur and Roger have elicited from their forest forests. “I wasn’t
More crazy in my life! 'The main alpha? Ami? I'm 'ave — 'ave great bones!”
She left quickly; Large swarms of multi-coloured ants moved to
Live so, with the flying shuttles with. Hagrid is still
He sat down on the bench and stared after her. It was too dark for
give his word. Then, after about a minute, he stood up .
And he went out, not into the castle, but out into the darkness
ground in the direction of his entrance.
“C'mon,” Harry said, much too quickly for Ron. " going to. . . .”
But Ron didn't move.
"what's up?" Harry said, looking at him.
Ron’s pilot to Harry, hiriris is really very lucky.
“You know?” Iwessus. “At Hagrid’s a half of the woman?”
“No,” Harry said, shrugging. “So what?”
He knew immediately, from the look Ron gave him, that .
He was once again showing his knowledge of the wizarding world.
Raised by the Dursleys, there were many things that witches had created .
It got weird that it was a revelation to Harry, but it was funny
were increasing with each passing year. Now, however, he
It goes without saying that most pilots won’t say, “So what?” on
She found out that one of their friends had a nanny for my mother.
“I'll explain inside,” Ron snapped, “c'mon. . . .”
Fleur and Roger Davies disappeared, perhaps within a more timeline
special angle of grass. Harry and Run return to the Elder
hall. Parvati and Padma are now sitting at a table far away with a
The whole crowd of Beauxbaton boys, and Hermione was once again
Dance with Krum. Harry and Ron sat down at a table away from the dance floor.

' '
"so?" Harry warned Ron. “What’s the giants problem?”
“Well, they were . . . They are . . .” Ron struggles for words. “. . . not
Very good,” he concluded solemnly.
“Who cares?” Harry said. “There’s nothing wrong with Hagrid!”
“I know he’s not, but . . . Blimey, no wonder he caught it
Quiet,” Ron said, shaking his head. “I always thought he went in .
Way too bad Engorgement Charm when he was a kid or something. I don’t like to mention it. . . .”
“But what’s the point if his mother is a mistress?” Harry said.
"That's why . . . nobody who knew him would care, because they'd know
He’s not a fan,” Ron said flatly. "But . . . Harry, they're just
Fools, heavenly. It’s like Hagrid said, in their nature, they’re like
Trolls . . . They just love to kill, everyone knows that. They are not
Someone’s left in Britain now, though.”
“What happened to them?”
“Well, they were dying anyway, and then the prison got themselves killed by the Aurors. There should be clouds outside,
though. . . . They hide in the mountains mainly. . . .”
“I don’t know who Maxime thinks she’s kidding,” Harry said,
I see Madame Maxime sitting alone at the judges’ table, looking
He's very handsome. “If it’s Hagrid’s half-sister, it’s definitely her. Large bones . . .
The only thing with bigger bones than it is a dinosaur.”
Harry and Ron spent the rest of the ball talking about giants in
their class, neither of them had any dance background.
Harry tried not to watch Cho and Cedric too much; He gave her a
Strong desire to throw something.
When the alien sisters finished playing at midnight, everyone
He gave them one last, loud, goodbye and started walking away
The way to the entrance hall. Many people express that desire.

' '
That the ball could have gone further, but Harry was exactly
You’re happy to go to bed; As it is, the afternoon
It wasn’t much fun.
In the entrance hall, Harry and Ron saw Hermione saying
Goodnight to Krum before he returned to the Durmstrang ship.
She gave Ron a very cold look and passed him up the marble.
clock without speaking. Harry and Ron follow her, but
Halfway down the stairs Harry heard someone call him.
“Hello — Harry!”
and Cedric Diggory. Harry could see Cho waiting for him in the
Lower entrance hall.
"Yes?" Harry said coldly as Cedric rushed to his side.
Cedric seemed reluctant to say whatever was in
in front of Ron, who frowned, looked bad, and continued
They will climb onto the shop.
"listen . . ." Cedric lowered his voice as Ron "for.
I owe you one for telling me about the dragons. You know that
The golden egg? Does yours stink when you open it?”
“Yeah,” Harry said.
"Then . . . take cover, okay?”
"what?"
“Throw yourself down, and — er — take an egg with you, and — er — .
Just looking at things in hot water. It will help you think. . . . trust
we.
Harry stared at him.
“Tell you what,” Cedric said, “use the prefects’ baton.
The fourth gate to the left of that statue of Boris the Fool on
Have the third of five. The password is 'fresh pin.' I had to go to. . . I want to say good luck.
night -"

' '
He smiled at Harry again and sauntered back down the stairs to the
Cu.
Harry returned to Gryffindor tower alone. That’s what it was
The times has been happy. The worst slot will work
What does a weeping egg mean? Did Cedric pull his leg? He had
She tried to make Harry look like a fool, so Cho would love it too
More by comparison?
The woman’s green woman and friend Vii were looking at the
The story of the window. Harry had to yell “Fairy lights!” Snded to accomplish
He picked them up, and when he did, they were very confused. he
He went to the partner's room and found Run and Hermione.
It has a flying surface. Standing ten feet apart, they were cheering
In another, everyone is gray in the face.
“Well, if you don't like it, you know what the solution is, don't
Remember?” telling Hermiyune; skiing was afraid from the stone of the ear, and the face was smoked by the sand.
“Oh yeah?” Ron was news to strength. “What’s that?”
“Next time there is a ball, ask me before someone else does, and
It’s not the final decision!”
Ron slaughtered Amamochiss Wars as a golden sands of the waters like
Hermione turned on her heel and stormed up the girls' corridor to the
bed. Ron turned to look at Harry.
“Well,” he smirked, “well — it’s just .
it means — completely missing the point —”
Harry didn't say anything. He likes to go back to words.
They talk to Ron long enough for him to say what’s on his mind right now — but he
Somehow he thought that Hermione had gotten a lot better than Ron.

CHAPTER TWENTY-FOUR
TASKUP of RITA SKITER

Everyone woke up late on Boxing Day. The Gryffindor Association’s mission is a lot more familiar than the end, much
Pitiful yawns punctuated the sounds. Hermione's hair was
Boshi also; She told Harry she had used liberal.
The Point of Slekezy’s slot for the ball, “but it’s the way .
Many of a day you will work every day,” she said with advertising, .
She has tried a Crookshanks that smells behind the ears.
Ron and Hermione such as the agreement did not say not to talk about custody. They were very friendly.
to another, despite its illegality. Run and Harry wasted no time.
In Hermione’s reaction to the overheard conversation between Madame Maxime and Hagrid, but Hermione doesn’t seem
Find the information that Hagrid was a half king’s almost impossible by Am
Run worked.
“Well, I suppose it must be,” she said, shrugging. “No know
They could not have been pure divine as they were about twenty feet high. but
' '
Honestly, all this hysteria about giants. They can’t be all the worst. . . . And a single place had people about
The fox. . . . It’s just chaos, isn’t it?”
Run looked as if he wanted to retaliate in pain.
But perhaps he didn’t want a lot more, because he agreed by Emanis by raising the head by luxury while Hormion was no .
They look.
It was now time to think about the homework they had missed.
During the first week of vacation. Everyone seems to be concerned
So quickly because Nuel was finished — every single one
Harry, so, that, who started (another of the other) feels a bit.
The difficulties is that Furar 24 is very much
Nearly from Noël, and he still doesn’t work on the vision of view within the gold meal. He therefore started releasing an egg from his womb every time he went out .
To the youth house, is born, and also heard that
ⵜⵉⴽⴽⴻⵍⵜⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⵓ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵍⵎⴻⵄⵏⴰ. ⵢⴻⵄⵔⴻⴹ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵅⴻⵎⵎⴻⵎ ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⵉ
It shows me, in the firing from the dialects of the ears, but it ishing
I’ve never heard of anything else like it. The white ties, snapped with grief, and it was alive to see if it changed the Soviet, but
He doesn't have. He tried to review the white question, to talks for all
Please were accused, but not what happened. He also put the white on
Parents — although they really don't really want to help that.
Harry doesn’t add what Cedric was given, but
Illusnishs are not friends to Cedric now and say that
He was guilty to not hold aid if he could stop. In each case, he
The Panamas that if Cedric really wants to give Harry A
The hand, it will be very clear. He, Harry, said
Cedric is well done what’s going on in the first job — and that of Cedric .

' '
The blame exchange idea was to tell Harry to swim. Well,
norins of the table of bouncing -brene from one
For the remaining on the streets hand in hand and Cho, anyway.
So this is the first day of the new constitution, Harry finished to
The course, loaded with books, paper, and clothes as usual,
But also with the vaccine in the aerospace in the abdominal, and
ⵖⴰⵙ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴰⵡⵉⴷ ⴰⵢⴰ ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ ⵢⵉⴷⵙ.
The snow was still thick on the ground, and the windows of the greenhouse were so thickly covered with fog that they could hardly see .
ⵙⴻⴳⵙⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ Herbologie. One doesn’t want the Care of
Very magical creatures at this point, though as Ron said, the
Skrewts will probably warm them up just fine, either by pressing
them, or are surprisingly pleasant to hold the Hagrid
hell.
However, when they reached Hagrid's cabin, they found an older woman with short curly hair and a very pale complexion .
The chariot stands in front of the front door.
“Hurry, now, the alarm rang five minutes ago,” she yelled in .
ⴷⴻⴳⵙⴻⵏ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵜⵜⵏⴰⵖⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⵔⵙ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⴷⴼⴻⵍ.
“ⴰⵏⵡⴰ ⵉ ⵜⴻⵍⵍⵉⴹ?” Ron said, he is acknowledged. “ⴰⵏⵉⴷⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ Hagrid?”
She quickly said: “Ismiw is a professor GrobeblyPlank. "I am
Your Master of the Magic Staff Maintenance Season.”
“Where’s Hagrid?” Harry repeated louder.
“He doesn’t have a sense of humor,” Professor Grubbly-Plank said quietly.
An unpleasant chuckle reached Harry's ears. He turned;
Draco Malfoy and the rest of the Slytherins were walking into the dorm.
They all looked happy, and none of them looked bored
See Professor GrubblyPlank.
“Right, please,” Professor Grubbly-Plank said, and trotted off .

' '
off near the pasture where the Beauxbatons horses grazed. Harry, Ron, and Hermione followed, looking back
their camp in Hagrid's cabin. All the curtains are closed. was
Hagrid there, alone and sick?
“What’s wrong with Hagrid?” Harry said, hurrying to reach
and Professor GrubbliPlank.
“You don’t care,” she said as if she thought he was .
The nose.
“But, I don’t have a clue,” Harry sighed. “What happened to him?”
Professor GrubblyPlank pretended not to hear him.
She took them past the stables where the great horses of the Beauxbatons were .
They were standing, shivering in the cold, by the tree on the
the middle of the forest, where a huge and beautiful cocoon is bound.
Lots of girls “ooooohed!” In the view of a head.
“Oh so beautiful!” exclaimed Lavender Brown. “How did you
Do you understand it? They must be really tough to catch!”
The unicorn was so white it made snow all around.
See gray. It was covering the ground in awe with its gold.
his body and throws his horned head back.
“Boys stay back!” said Professor GrubblyPlank, dropping
They reached out and gripped Harry tightly against his chest. “They know how to
fairy godmothers, unicorns. girls to the front, and approached her with
Try, come on, easily done. . . .”
She and the girls slowly walked forward towards a tiger.
They left the boys standing against the wall of the pond and watching. the
At that moment Professor GrubblyPlank was out of earshot, Harry
He turned to Run.
“What do you think? You don’t think
Screw — ?”

' '
"Oh he won't be caught, Potter, if that's what you're thinking," Malfoy snapped. “No, he was just ashamed to show off his greatness,
Ugly face.”
“What do you mean?” Harry said quietly.
Malfoy reached inside his pants pocket and pulled
They pulled out a page of crumpled newspaper paper.
“There you go,” he said. “Hate to break it to you, Potter. . . .”
He smiled as Harry took the page, unfolded it, and read it,
With Ron, Seamus, Dean, and Neville looking over his shoulder. it
There’s an article with a picture of Hagrid looking very
It's changing.
DUMBLEDOR'S BIG MISTAKE
Albus Dumbledore, the headmaster of Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry, wasn’t
They will be willing to establish staff calls involving negotiations, by Rita Skiter, Director of Medicine. in
September of this year, he hired Alastor “MadEye” .
Moody, the former Auror known for his jinx pleasure, would
They taught Defense Against the Dark Arts, a decision
That raised a lot of eyebrows in the department.
of Magic, since Moody has a well-known habit of killing anyone who makes a sudden movement .
In his presence. Maday Moody, however, looks
It’s responsible and benevolent when placed next to the vampire Dumbledore employs to teach maintenance of
Magical creatures.
Rubeus Hagrid, who agreed to be deported
from Hogwarts in his third year, he enjoyed the

' '
Position as a gamekeeper at school since, a
a job that Dumbledore had given him. Last year,
However, Hagrid used his mysterious power on
The Head of School will ensure a supportive role of
Protecting Magical Creatures Guide, Heads
of many more qualified candidates.
An older and rougher-looking man,
Hagrid was using his new powers to
confused the students in his charge with a series of
Amazing creatures. While Dumbledore turns blind
Eye, Hagrid confused multiple students simultaneously
the series of lessons so widely acknowledged that “many .
frightening."
“I was attacked by a coyote, and my friend .
Vincent Crabbe got a bad bite from a squirrel,”
said Draco Malfoy, a fourth year student, "We all
I hate Hagrid, but we’re too afraid to say
anything."
Hagrid had no intention of stopping his attack.
of corruption, however. In conversation with a
The Daily Prophet reporter last month confessed
the creation of creatures he called “Blast-Ended
Skrewts,” the most dangerous crossbreeds between manticores and sharks. Creating a new type of
A magical creature, of course, is mostly action
It is closely guarded by the Department of Magical Animal Regulation and Control. Hagrid,
However, he sees himself above such petty
Resources.

' '
“I was just having fun,” he said, before .
She quickly changed the subject.
As if that wasn’t enough, Everyday Prophet has .
Now he’s got evidence that Hagrid doesn’t exist — like .
He was always pretending — a pure-blooded wizard.
He was not, in fact, even a pure being. His mother,
We can only conclude, it is none other than
The elder Fridwulfa, whose whereabouts are still unknown.
They thirsted for blood and violence, they took heaven
themselves to the last by fighting
between them in the last century. the
With a handful left they climbed into the ranks of who shouldn’t be nominated, and were leaders .
For some of the worst mass Muggle crimes out there
a reign of terror.
While many of the heroes who served who must never be named were killed by Aurors working against the Dark Side, Fridwulf was not
between them. She may have escaped to one of the
Large communities still in diaspora
The slopes of Mt. If her antics in Care of Magical Creatures lessons are any indication, however, Fridwulf's son seems to have inherited her raw charm .
nature.
In an odd twist, Hagrid is known to have
She developed a close friendship with the boy
brought around you-know-who fell out of
Powerful — so cooked by Hagrid’s own mother,

' '
Like the rest of YouKnowWho, at
hidden. ⴰⵀⴰⵜ Harry Potter ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵥⵔⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ ⵓⵔ ⵏⵃⴻⵎⵎⴻⵍ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵓⵎⴻⴷⴷⴰⴽⴻⵍⵉⵙ ⴰⵎⴻⵇⵇⵔⴰⵏ — ⵎⴰⵛⴰ Albus .
Dumbledore certainly had a responsibility to ensure that Harry
Potter, along with students of students, was forced
About the danger of collaborating with partisans.
Harry finished reading and looked at Ron, his mouth was
Open open.
“How does she look?” Iwessus.
ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵎⴰⵞⵞⵉ ⴷ ⴰⵢⴰ ⴰⵢ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⵃⵉⵙⵙⵉⴼⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⴼ Harry.
“ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⵜⴻⴱⵖⵉⴹ ⴰⴷ ⴷⵜⵉⵏⵉⴹ, 'ⵏⴻⴽⵕⴻⵀ ⴰⴽⴽ Hagrid'?” Harry grinned at Malfoy.
« ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓⵜ ⵍⴱⴰⵟⴻⵍⴰⴳⵉ ⴼⴻⵍⵍⴰⵙ » — ⵢⴻⵙⵎⴻⴽⵜⴰⴷ Crabbe — « ⴰⴷ ⴷⵢⴰⵡⵉ ⵢⵉⵔ ⵍⵃⴻⵎⵍⴰ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵖⴻⵔⵙⵉⵡ ⵏ flobber ? They don’t even have teeth!”
Shrubbe was close, and Band was very happy to be very personal.
« ⴰⵛⵓ ⴽⴰⵏ, ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵍⵉⵖ ⴷ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⵢⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⴼⴽ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⴽⴼⵓ ⵛⵛⵖⴻⵍ ⵏ ⵓⵙⴻⵍⵎⴻⴷ ⵏ oaf », ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Malfoy, ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⵜⵜⵛⴻⵔⵛⵓⵔⴻⵏⵜ. “ⴰⵣⴳⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵟⵟⵓⵜ . . . And there was
I think he just ate a bottle of SkeleGro when he was
tiny. . . . None of the mothers and fathers would care
All this. . . . It will be caught to eat their children, ha, ha. . . .”
"you -"
“Do you stop there?”
Professor Grubbly-Plank's voice reached the boys; the
She was all silent for unicorn now, they are long-looked. Harry
He was so furious that the Daily Prophet article shook in his hands as it was .
He stressed that he did not see for a plant, with a lot of farmers
This is written by Professor GubblyPlank with a bright
The voice, to even listen.
“ⵙⵙⴰⵔⴰⵎⴻⵖ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎ, ⵜⴰⵎⴻⵟⵟⵓⵜⵏⵏⵉ!” Parvati Patal when the lesson is

' '
ⵢⴻⴽⴼⴰ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⴰⴽⴽ ⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵍⴻⵇⵚⴻⵔ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵞⵞⴻⵏ ⵉⵎⴻⴽⵍⵉ.
“It was more than I thought it would be to protect magical creatures .
as . . . People such as muni, unconditionally. . . .”
“ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⵖⴻⴼ Hagrid?” Harry said angrily as they fought over
steps.
“ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⵉ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ?” said Parvati in a harsh voice. “It can still be
Watcher of games, can’t he?”
Parvati ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵃⴻⵎⵎⵉⵍ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⵖⴻⵔ Harry ⵙⴻⴳ ⵡⴰⵙⵎⵉ ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⴼⴼⴻⵖ ⵜⴽⵓⵔⵜ. He thought he should pay her a little attention, but she
He seemed to have a good time together. ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜⵜ
She told everyone who would have heard that you are the court.
I will meet the singer of Bookpaton in Hogsmside for life.
A weekend trip.
“ⴷ ⵜⴰⵎⵙⵉⵔⵜ ⵢⴻⵍⵀⴰⵏ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ,” ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ Hermione ⵎⵉ ⴽⴻⵛⵎⴻⵏ .
The great room. “I don’t know the half of what Professor GrubbyPlank said of Uni —”
“Look at this!” ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵉⵄⴻⴳⴳⴻⴹ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⴼⴻⵖⴷ Nnbi ⵏ ⵢⴰⵍ ⴰⵙⵙ
article under Hermione's nose.
Hormiee’s creature was learned to read. Reactions is just as important for Ron.
“How did Skeleter’s sickered woman? You don’t think
ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴰⵙⴷ Hagrid ?”
“No,” Harry said, leading the way to the Gryffindor table .
and sat himself in a slavery, glad. “Not not to me, too, .
compliance? ⵃⴻⵙⴱⴻⵖⵜⵜ ⵜⴻⴼⵛⴻⵍ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⵓⵔ ⴰⵙⴷ-ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴰⴽ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵍⵃⴻⵇⵇ ⵏ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵙⵉⵡⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵜⴽⴻⵔⴽⴰⵙ ⴼⴻⵍⵍⵉ, ⵜⴻⴷⴷⴰ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⴼⴻⵔⵔⵉⵇ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵉⴷⵜⴻⵔⵔ.”
“Perhaps she heard him speaking to Madame Maxime at the retreat,” she said .
Hermione sighed.
“We’ll see her in the garden!” Run said. “Anyway, she wasn’t

' '
He should come to school more often, Hagrid told Dumbledore
He forbade her. . . .”
“Maybe she’s got an invisibility wand,” Harry said, sarcastically .
A piece of chicken on his plate and he sprinkles it everywhere on his plate
anger. “The kind of thing she would do, wouldn’t she, hide in the bushes and listen to
people."
"Like you and Ron, you mean," Hermione said.
“We weren’t trying to hear him!” Ron said cheerfully. "we
He didn't have a choice! The Lonely Prat, Talking About His Grandma
Mom where everyone can hear her!”
“We should go see him,” Harry said. “This afternoon, after
literature. Tell him we want him back . . . Do you want him back?”
He shot at Hermione.
“I — well, I’m not going to act like a nice change wasn’t enough, .
had a good lesson in dealing with magical creatures for once — but I .
I want Hagrid back, I really do!” Hermione said quickly,
she bowed under Harry's excited gaze.
So that evening after dinner, the three of them left the castle.
Another time and he fell through the frozen ground into Hagrid's
The cabin. Leave, and pick up Fang's weapon.
“Hagrid, it’s us!” Harry shouted, pushing for the door. "open
up!
Hagrid didn't answer. They could hear Fang shaking in the
The door, she knocked, but didn't open. They hit him with ten
more minutes; Run went too, knocking on one of the windows.
But there was no answer.
“What’s wrong with us?” Hermione said when they had
Eventually they gave up and were heading back to school. “He’s really .
Don’t think we’ll care if it’s half-hell?”

' '
But it looked like Hagrid cared. They didn’t see a symbol on it .
All week. He didn't show up at the staff table at lunchtime, they didn't show up
They saw him go about his duties as a Beast Keeper in the background, and Professor GrubblyPlank continued to take classes in the care of Magical Beasts. Malfoy was freezing at every possible opportunity.
“You lost your half-breed boyfriend?” He kept counting on Harry.
Whenever a teacher is around, to be safe from
Harry's method. “Did you lose that pig man?”
A visit to Hogsmeade was made in the first half of January. Hermione was very surprised that Harry would go.
“I just thought you would want to take advantage of the common good .
The room was silent,” she said. “Really easy to work on that egg.”
“Oh I — I think I have a pretty good idea of ​​what it means .
Now,” Harry lied.
“You really have?” Hermione said, smiling brightly. "Well
done!"
Harry's insides gave a ridiculous squeal, but he ignored them. he
He still had five weeks to do that white paper, after all, and this was
Age . . . If he got into Hogsmeade, he could escape to
Hagrid, and you'll get a chance to convince him to come back.
He, Ron, and Hermione left the castle together on Saturday and
out of the cold, wet ground towards the gates. As they are
They pass Durmstrang's ship moored in the ocean and see Viktor
Krom climbed onto the bridge, wearing nothing but a swimsuit
Jewelry. He was very sweet indeed, but looked very strong
As he looked, because he went out to the side of the ship,
He put out his hands, and dived, right into the ocean.
“Awesome!” Harry said, looking at dark Krum's neck as he grinned
They went out to the beach. “It must be freezing, it’s January!”

' '
"Where he came from, it was very cold," Hermione said. “I think he’s very hot.”
“Yeah, but there’s still a big buck,” Ron said. It didn’t work.
Tone desperate — if anything, tone of hope. Hermione noticed the tone of his voice and looked up.
“It’s really cute, you know,” she said. “It’s not at all like you
Think, coming from Durmstrang. He likes it a lot better here, he
He told me.”
Ron didn't say anything. He hasn’t mentioned Viktor Krum since
ball, but Harry finds a small hand under his bed on Boxing Day, which looks a lot like
Reveals a tiny figure wearing a Bulgarian Quidditch
furniture.
Harry kept his eyes peeled to see Hagrid's symbol all the way.
on the main fire road, and suggests a visit at three .
Broomsticks once determined that Hagrid wasn’t in one of the
Shops.
The hall was crowded as usual, but a quick glance at the
All the resources told Harry that Hagrid wasn't there. The heart sinks, he
He walked up to the bar with Ron and Hermione, ordered three potatoes from Madam Rosmerta, and thought bitterly that he could .
All right they stayed behind and heard the rooster crying behind
all.
“He didn’t go into the office?” Hermione whispered suddenly. "look!"
She pointed to the mirror behind the bar, and Harry saw Ludo
Bagman meditates there, sitting in a shady corner with a herd
of animals. Bagman was speaking quietly in a low voice to

' '
The animals, all having their arms crossed and moving
With a lot of caution.
Of course it was an odd one, Harry thought, that Bagman was here in the
Three hooks in one weekend when the Triwizard wasn’t around
Event, that is, no judgment will be made. He sees Bagman
In the mirror. He looked shocked again, just as shocked as he was.
He was that night in the forest before the Black Mark showed up.
But just then Bagman looked at the bar and saw Harry, standing up .
up.
“At the same time, at the same time!” Harry heard him say quietly to
The monsters, and Bagman literally running down the hallway to Harry,
His boyish grin was back in place.
“Harry!” he said. "How are you doing? Been hoping to meet you!
Everything going well?”
“Okay, thanks,” Harry said.
“Perhaps if I could have a quick, quick word, Harry?” Bagman said excitedly. “You can’t even give us a moment, you two, can you?”
“Er — okay,” Ron said, and he and Hermione left to find a
table.
Bagman took Harry on the boundary border to the most hardened end of
Mrs. Rusmert.
“Well, I just thought I would thank you again for .
beautiful performance against that Horntail, Harry,” Bagman said.
“It really is a beautiful thing.”
"Thanks," Harry said, but he knew that couldn't be all Bagman wanted to say, because he might like Harry in
in front of Ron and Hermione. Bagman doesn’t appear in any detail
Avoid spilling the beans, though. Harry saw him looking at the

' '
The mirror above the bar at the birds, who all looked at him and
Harry in silently for their green, red-hands.
"That's bullshit," Bagman told Harry in a low voice,
She watched Harry watch the ghosts too. “Their English is not very
good . . . It’s like turning into all Bulgarians at the Quidditch World Cup . . . But at least they use alternate sign language
A person can know. This lot goes on to speak throughout Gobbledegook . . . And I only know one word of Gobbledegook. Bladwak. it
It means 'picax'. I don’t like using it if they think I’m threatening them.”
He gave a short, booming laugh.
“What do they want?” Harry said, watching the animals react
Bagman still believed in a lot.
“Er — please . . .” Bagman said, looking suddenly terrified.
"They . . . are . . . looking for Barry Kruch.”
“Why are they looking for her here?” Harry said. “He was in
Ministry in London, isn’t it?”
“er . . . Honestly, I don’t have the idea where it was,” said Bagman. “It’s kind of . . . They stopped coming to work. You don’t belong to anyone.
Two weeks now. The young Percy, the guard, said it was a number. For the fact that he would be done to the ear in a ear. But it will
Are you sure you won't tell anyone about this, Harry? Because Rita
Skeeter is still looking everywhere she can, and I’m willing to
Bet will work to work Barty to something good. might
Instantly fell like Berta Jokins.”
“Have you heard anything about Berta Jorkins?” Harry asked.
“No,” Bagman says, looking stern again. “I have people
They’re moving, really . . .” (about time, Harry thought) “and that’s all .
It's very difficult. You really got to Albanya, because it’s lucky

' '
My second cousin there. And then she left that cousin's house to go.
South and see Uncle . . . and there is like we have
Follow along the way. Blowed if I can see where it is . . . It didn’t work.
It seems kind of elope, for example . . . But still. . . . What are we?
Did he, talking about animals with Bertha Jorkins? I really want to
I asked you” — he lowered his voice — “how you are doing .
Your golden egg?”
“er . . . Not bad,” Harry said innocently.
Bagman seems to know it’s not real.
“Listen, Harry,” he said (very low voice again), “I’m very tired .
ⵢⵉⵔ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵡⴰⵢⴰⴳⵉ ⴰⴽⴽ. . . ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⴹⴻⴳⴳⵔⴻⴹ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⴻⵍⵖⵓⵖⴰⴰ, ⴽⴻⵞⵞ
ⵓⵔ ⵜⵉⴷⵢⴻⴼⴽⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵙ ⵜⴷⵓⴽⵍⵉ. . . And if there is . . .” (ⵜⴰⵖⴻⵛⵜⵉⵙ ⵜⴻⵙⵙⵓⵙⴻⵎ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⵜⵓⵔⴰ,
Harry had to approach to hear) “If I can love all . . . one production in
good moment . . . I loved. . . Your way
Lookous for the radical! . . . Live, Inside only words.”
Harry looked at Bagman's round, pale face and his huge,
Lines of the blue slots.
“We have to do the ideas that are, so you all?” He said,
He cares to stay solely and does not appear like he’s being a 2019 2019 Games and sports advocacy.
They broke the rules.
"That . . . . . . . Y., yes," said Bagman by Hirhi, “But — — you’re .
, Harry — We want all Hogwarts wins, why is it all?”
“Do you give the assistance to Cedric?” Harry said.
The young ears of ears the face of Bagman who followed. “No, I
They don’t have,” he said. “I — well, like I said, I took a break.
I just thought to give . . .”
“Well, thanks,” said Harry, “but I think I’m almost there with
The egg. . . Two more days should make it easier.”

' '
He wasn't entirely sure why he refused Bagman's help, except that Bagman was almost a stranger to him, and he accepted his help .
Help would somehow feel more like a cheat than asking for advice from Ron, Hermione, or Sirius.
Bagman is nearly insulted, but he can’t say much more like
Frade and George were in the event.
“Azul, Mass Bagman,” said Fred by ear. “We if we do us
drink?"
“er . . . Only,” said Bagman, with the final view of the currency on .
Harry, “Lay, thank you, arch . . .”
Fred and George look as confused as Bagman, who
He was looking at Harry like he had fucked him badly.
“Well, I have to pee,” he said. “ All of all. good luck,
Harry.”
He came upon a calf from prison. The dogs are all open from their crews.
and after him. Harry went back to Ron and Hermione.
“What does he want?” Run said in Lawanny in remaining Harry
down.
"He offered to help me with the golden egg," Harry said.
“He shouldn’t have done that!” Hermiyun said, a lot of
exciting. “He’s one of the guards! And anyway, you already have
A work — why do all?”
“er . . . It’s almost,” Hari said.
“Well, I don’t think Dumbledore would like it if he knew Bagman was trying to convince you to cheat!” Hermiyun said, still
The competition didn't go. “I’m hoping to help Cedric like
quite!"
“It’s no, steal,” Harry said.

' '
“Who cares if Diggory gets help?” Run said. Harry privately
They agreed.
“The dogs don’t seem to be very friends,” said Hermione, she loves potatoes of potatoes. “What were they doing here?”
“I’m looking for Crouch, according to Bagman,” says Harry. "he
Still another. There is no work in work.”
"Maybe Percy poisoned him," Ron said. “Maybe he’s wondering if .
Crouch snuffs it to be made head of the Office for International Cooperation.”
Hermione gave Ron a look that they weren't kidding about things like that,
He added: “Ayen’s amazing, sights are looking for Mass Crouch. . . . Specifically, they will deal with the Regulatory and Compliance Department of
The goods of the Seer.”
“Crouch can speak a lot of different languages, though,” he said .
Harry. “Maybe they need a translator.”
“You’re worried about the 'ickle goblins, now, are you?” Ron asked.
Hermione. “Are you thinking about starting SPUG or something? Rare Animal Hunting Society?”
“Ha, ha, ha,” Hermione whispered. “Animals don’t need
Hahab. You weren't listening to what Professor Binns said
She was telling us about the rebellion of the dragons?”
“No,” Harry and Ron said together.
“Bow, a lot can be able to deal with horrors,” he said .
Hermione, took another principal of potatoes of potatoes. “They are very protected.
They’re not like house elephants, they’re insecure.”
“U-hoh,” Ron said, peering through the door.
Reta Skiter just entered. There was a typical slave of the panty.
collapse Meanwhile were refugees, and we

' '
accompanied by its paunchy spectator. eat
Westy, and I and I and I and the portfolio fan have made their way in
Glashi to a nearby tablet, Hari, Run, and Hermione are accompanied by
Briefly. She was talking slowly and looked very convinced.
For some.
“. . . It’s not clear that it’s so much to talk to ours, or to, Bozo? now, so
Will this be, it is free? And what does he do with a can of
goblins in tow anyway? Show them visions . . . fighting . . He was always a bad liar. Have something there? mind
Need we do a little digging? 'The former Magical servant is supposed to be
Games and Sports, Ludo Bagman . . .' Snappy starts the sentence,
Bozo — we just have to find a story to fit it —”
“Trying to ruin someone’s life?” Harry said aloud.
Some people look around. Rita Skiter’s eyes widened after
her glasses rose as she knew who was talking.
“Harry!” She said, she was happy. “How you like! What did you not eat?
And they’re involved —?”
“I’m not close to you with the ears of ten feet,” he said .
Harry with Eghest. “What did you do that to Hagrid, eh?”
Rita Skeeter erased Tinis with the Galam.
“Our readers have a right to the truth, Harry. I’m just doin
my -"
“While who loves them if it’s half of the sick?” Harry shouted. “Nothing
Life!”
The whole pub had gone quiet. Madam Rosmerta was watching from behind the bar, apparently unaware that
the flagon she had been filling with mead was overflowing.
The Rita Sketer's edition is a little bit better, but you take
almost almost at once; She quickly opened her animal leather purse.

' '
The Taqicticis of QuickQuotes said, “Amk will you give .
Me an interview about Hagrid you know, Harry? The man behind the window? Your unlikely friendship and the reasons behind it
it. Would you call it a replacement for my father?”
Hermione stood up quickly, her ice beer clinging to her
The likes of the likes of the bombs.
“You wicked woman,” she said, through gritted teeth, “you .
It doesn't hurt, you're doing, something for the story, and anyone would, didn't
they? Even Loudu Bagman —”
“S remain, the little girl, don’t talk about what you have
You don’t understand,” Rita Skeeter said coldly, her eyes piercing as .
They fell on Hermiyene. “I know things about Ludo Bagman that .
It will make your hair break. . . Not that she needed it —” she added,
She stared at Hermione's blonde hair.
“Let’s go,” Hermione said, “Come on, Harry — Ron . . .”
thou out; Many people have grown up as well as being. Harry
They looked back as they reached the door. A Quick Word by Rita Skiter
Quill was outside; it was zooming backward and forward over a piece of
paper on the table.
“It’ll be behind behind after, A Hermione,” Ron with a woman’s som and loyalty said when they were going quickly back to the road.
“Let her try!” said Hermione with a grin; She was growing s
rage. “I'll show him! The little girl, and I? Oh, I'll give it back to
this. First Harry, then Hagrid . . .”
“You don’t want to go to count Rita Skeeter,” Ron Shuf said. “I swear, Hermione, she’ll dig you something—”
“My parents don’t say Christmas every day. You can’t hear me in
hidden!" She said Hermione, she’s really surprising that all
Harry and Ron could work to keep up with him. Last time Harry

' '
Seeing Hermione in such rage, she punched Draco Malfoy
On the face. "And Hagrid doesn't hide anymore!" Should
Never let that human excuse get you down! series!"
She started at a run and took them all the way up,
With the cups that have been seen with wireless, by find S
It is home to the Hagrid company.
The curtains were still drawn, and they could hear Fang whistling
The closer they got.
“Hagrid!” told Hermionee, approaching the front door. “Hagard, this is something to do! We know you were there! No one cares if
My mother was great, Hagrid! You can’t leave that Skeeter lady
Do you! Hagrid, get out of here, you’re just —”
The door opened. Hermione said, "About the —!" And then
She stopped, at once, because she found faces face,
Not Hagrid, but Albus Dumbledore.
“God memoir,” he said with joy, and he’s advised with slavery.
"We — er — want to see Hagrid," Hermione said in a .
in a small voice.
"Yes, I think so," Dumbledore said, his eyes twinkling.
“Why didn’t you come in?”
"Ah . . .m . . . . . . . .
She, Ron, and Harry entered the kitchen; Vang sighed on Harry in Lawan inserted, guilts with Light and wake up
He would love his ears. Harry stopped Fang and looked away.
Hagrid was sitting at his table, where two large dogs
of tea. He looks a real idiot. His face was covered in bruises and his eyes were sunken.
And he had walked to the other end where it was right in his hair; I want to try to get it fixed, now it looks like a dump
of the wire used.

' '
“Hi, Hagrid,” Harry said.
Hagrid looked up.
“ 'Lo,' he said in a very quiet voice.
“More than tea, I suppose,” Dumbledore said, closing the door behind him .
Harry, Ron, and Hermione, drew his wand, and looked
it; A painting of a tea staring into the sky was displayed along with a plate of cookies.
Dumbledore moves the tray onto the table, and everyone sits
down. There was a small pause, and then Dumbledore said, 'If .
Did you by any means hear what Mrs. Granger was screaming, Hagrid?”
Hermione went a little pale, but Dumbledore smiled at her
And he continued, 'Hermione, Harry, and Ron still seem to want to .
I know you, judging by how hard they were trying to escape
gate."
“Of course we still want to get to know you!” Harry said, looking at the
Hagrid. "You're not going to think anything of that Skeeter cow—sorry, Professor," he added quietly, looking at Dumbledore.
“I went deaf for a while and didn’t have any idea what you were
He said, Harry,” Dumbledore said, twiddling his thumbs and smirking .
on the ceiling.
“Er — of course,” Harry shrugged. “I just wanted to say—Hagrid, .
How could you think we would care about what that woman wrote
On you?”
Two relieved tears rolled down Hagrid's gold-black eyes and fell
suddenly in his confused memory.
"It's living proof of what I'm telling you, Hagrid," Dumbledore said, still staring anxiously up at the ceiling. “I showed you .
Letters from countless parents referring you from
Their days here, they tell me in no uncertain terms that if I
They mislead you, they’ll have something to say about it —”

' '
“Not all,” Hagrid said quietly. “Not all of 'em wan' me .
Ter stay.”
"Surely, Hagrid, if you're holding on to the universal adventure,
I’m afraid you’re going to be in this cabin for a long time,” Dumbledore said, now staring intently at his half-moon necklace. “It’s not
It had been a week since I became principal of this school when I
I don’t have at least one kid that complains about how much I sweat.
But what should I do? I put myself in my study and I succeed.
Are you talking to someone?”
“Yeh — yeh ain’t half a bastard!” Hagrid said with a chuckle.
“Hagrid, look what I have for humans!” Harry said excitedly.
“Look Dursley!”
"It's really good," Professor Dumbledore said. “New .
His brother, Aberforth, was charged with disorderly conduct
Charms about the goat. It was all in the papers, but Aberforth did
hide? No, it didn’t! He held his head high and went about his
business as usual! Of course, I’m not entirely sure he can read, so
This may not be terrorism. . . .”
“Come back to teach, Hagrid,” Hermione whispered, “please .
Come back, we really miss you.”
Hagrid growled. More tears flowed from her eyes inwards
His missing wife.
Dumbledore stood up. “I will soon accept your strike,
Hagrid, and I look forward to seeing you again on Monday,” he said. "you
He would join me for breakfast at half-past eight in the Great Hall. No reason. Good evening to you all.”
Dumbledore exited the capsule, stopping only to lick Fang's ears.
When the door closed behind him, Hagrid began to sob.

' '
The most commonly used solutions in dostbin. Hermione kept patting his arm, and at
The last one, Hagrid turning around, his eyes very red indeed, said: “Great.
Man, Dumbledore . . . The old man . . .”
“Yeah, he is,” Ron said. “Can I have one of these cupcakes, Hagrid?”
“Help yourself,” Hagrid said, wiping his eyes over the bridge of his nose .
hand. “Ar, he’s an asshole, hey — hey everybody . . . I’m bin an idiot . . .
My ol' father would be ashamed o' how I was bin behavin'. . . .”
More tears spilled out, but he wiped them away more firmly,
And he said, “I will not show you a picture of my old father, will he?
here . . .”
Hagrid got up, went to his desk, opened a drawer, and
A picture of a blue player with Hagrid's computer appeared.
Eyes, wide as he sat on Hagrid's lap. Hagrid was a
Seven or eight feet tall, judging by the apple tree next to it,
But his face is beardless, young, blond, smooth — smiling .
hardly more than eleven.
“Tha' was taken jus' after I got to Hogwarts,” Hagrid said.
“My father is dead . . . Think I can’t be healthy, see,
'cos I'm a mom . . . Well, whatever the case. 'Of course, I'm not a big fan of
A shame, really . . . But at least he didn’t see me get knocked out. He died, see,
I'm in my second year. . . .
“Dumbledore was the one who took me in after my father left.
He got me a job as a game warden . . . He takes people, he does. Give 'm
The second date . . . that's what sets him apart' from other heads, see.
He would challenge anyone at Hogwarts, s'long as talented as they were.
Knows people can turn out okay even if their families weren' . . .
Well . . . All tha' respected. But some don't understand that. was
Something that constantly held her against Yah . . . There are some peo

' '
They act like they just have big bones rather than stand up and say — I
As for me, hanging doesn't count. 'Don't swim through it,' I warned.
My father used ter saying, 'there are some that will hold it against you, but they
You don't have to worry about it.' Another warning. I have a novel. am
I don't mind too much, I promise yeh that. Large bones . . .
I’ll give him big bones.”
Harry, Ron, and Hermione look at each other suspiciously;
Harry wants to take fifty Blast-Ended Skrewts for the ride
Beyond admitting to Hagrid that he overheard him talking to
Madame Maxim, but Hagrid was still talking, obviously unaware
that he said something odd.
“Yeh you know what, Harry?” he said, looking up from his father's photo, his eyes very bright, “when I met you firs', you .
It reminded me a little. Mom and Dad are gone, and you're worried'.
Like yeh wouldn't fit in at Hogwarts, remember? I don't know yeah.
really . . . an' now look at yeh, Harry! The school principal!”
Harry looked for a moment saying, sure,
“You’re watching what I love, A Hari? I’ll love the Yeh of that, I’ll really love.
Rad show 'em all . . . Heyya 'itern if it's corn they're eating. Yes
Don't ask them to explain what she is. He would show them that Dumbledore had planned it right, letting everyone in as soon as they could
Dear gladar. How do you speak English, Harry?”
“Great,” Harry said. “Really great.”
Hagrid's confused face broke into a wide, watery grin.
“That’s my boy . . . You're showing 'em, Harry, you're showing 'em. beat
'em all.”
Lying to Hagrid wasn't quite like lying to anyone else. Harry
He returned to the castle later that evening with Ron and Hermione, unable to photograph the happy memories on

' '
Hagrid's face when he thought Harry had won the championship. The incompatible kingdom is nothing more than a
Sometime in Harry's mind that evening, and during the time he had
He climbed into bed and made his decision — time to lay his
Frame and see if Cedric’s harassment is worth it.

CHAPTER TWENTY-FIVE
THE EGG AND TH THE e.

Somehow Harry didn't know how long he had to do himself.
In addition to the golden ring, he decided to do it in
night, when he can take as much time as he wishes.
He is very nervous but he is going to accept more news from Cedric, he
They also decided to use the protocols of protocols; Dears many people who are.
He’s allowed in there, so it’s pretty rare to be
It's being used.
Harry planned his trip carefully, because he was
Caught out of bed and out of bounds by Filch the guard in
midnight once before, and he had no intention of re
experience. The Invisible Cup, of course, would be interesting,
And as an added precaution, Harry thought he’d take
The Marauder's Card, which, along with the click, proved to be the most valuable aid.
For Harry's Governor. The map shows all of Hogwarts, including many of its main corridors and secret passages and,
Most importantly, it reveals the people inside the castle as
a

' '
A small one, with designated points, facing the streets, so that Harry
It will stop as something approaches the house.
On Thursday night, Harry went on strike, went on strike,
I went down below, and, as it was at night when
Hagrid showed him the monsters, waiting for the flat ship to
open. This time it was Ron waiting outside to hand over the blue lady .
The word choice (“banana leaf”). “I’ll go,” Run sighed,
He ran into the room when Harry enters him.
It was an uncomfortable nightmare under the covers tonight, because Harry
He had a heavy egg under one arm and a map held in front of him
Nose to the other. However, the moonlit corridors were empty
And silently, and by drawing the card in strategic times, Harry
He can ensure that he never crosses anyone wants
avoid. When he reached the statue of Boris the Bewildered, a lostlooking wizard with his gloves on the wrong hands, he located the
right door, approached it, and whispered the password, “Pine .
,” as Cidric said.
The door creaked open. Harry went inside and opened the door.
After him, he came out of the Infisobili clock, turning around.
His straightforward answer is that it would be worth becoming a
just perfect to be able to use this bathroom. It was promptly destroyed by a
beautiful chandeliers filled with candles, and everything done with
white marble, in which looks like a hole, a rod
The swimming pool runs through the middle of the floor. About a hundred
golden rings stood together on the sides of the circle, each with a different colored jewel placed in its handle. There is also wrapping
board. Long old fibers appear to be arranged in sheets; A large piece of meat.
Twenty-five white bowls sit in a corner, and there’s a gold-framed painting on the wall. There was a blonde mermaid who

' '
She was lying on a rock, rubbing her long face against his face. Go out.
Every time she stirred.
Harry walked forward, watching as he turned around.
Ships. Magnificent, although the hospital is — and wants a lot
Although he had to try some of those guns—now he was here he .
He couldn't help the feeling that Cedric might be
He has it on. How on earth was this supposed to help solve the
A glove cleaner? However, he put on one of those fluffy pants,
Aklu, Kakarda, and Tglait in the area of ​​the field where there are residences of Uummu, continue to appear in some areas.
He could tell at once that they were getting different kinds of bubbles.
Bars compete with water, although not a merchant like Harry
He was unfazed. One network produced red and blue bubbles
the size of the ball; Another spread a thin ice-white cloth down to Harry
He thought he would strengthen his right as he did so;
The third sent heavily colored clouds of dust hurtling across the water’s surface. Harry amused himself for a moment as he stared at the roses.
By and large, especially to the delight of someone who owns a jet
evaporates from the water surface in large quantities. Then, when
A deep pool filled with hot water, steam, and steam, which holds a
Very short time considering his size, Harry destroyed all the potions,
He takes off his pajamas, his clothes, and his book, and goes back to
water.
It was so deep that his feet barely touched the bottom, and he actually made a couple of dives before swimming to the side and
He covers the water and looks at the egg. It’s pretty good though
Swimming in hot water is diving through different colored clouds.
steam billowing in all directions, and not a trace of spark came to him,
There is no definitive branch of knowledge.

' '
Harry reached out, picked up the egg in his wet hands, and
He opened it. Wood powder, heating is full of cold,
echoed and echoed off the marble walls, but it was only audible
Just as misunderstood as before, if not more so with all the accents. he
He stops him again, worried that the audience will take Filch,
Please if this is not Cedric’s program — both,
It made him jump gracefully until he laid an egg, which shattered on the bathroom floor, and someone spoke.
“I’ll try to put into the water, bear and I.”
Harry ate a lot of bottles in the
warning. Based, he was slaughter, sees a bunch of a brilliant girl which is located at the top of one of the streets. compliance
Merettt succeeds, who usually will be listening to
Place a rest three feet below.
“Merm! Harry said in conversation, “I — I wasn’t using
anything!"
It’s very easy to get the right and it’s always the same, but it has one
The unconditional feeling that Myrttle was protecting him from one
stone since arrival.
“I closed my eyes when you walked in,” she said, smiling .
with its blue paintings. “You will not answer me for a year.”
"Yeah . . . . . . .” Harry said, twisting his hands slightly, and
You have been reported that Myrtle could not see any other archaeology.
"I shouldn't have come into your living room, should I?" It's for girls.
one."
“You never had sex before,” Myrtle said sadly. “There was before
In there all the time.”
This was true, though only because Harry, Ron, and Hermione .
He found Myrtle’s informal gardens a great place to smoke

' '
Secret Polyjuice Potion — a forbidden concoction that surrounds
We are Ron in the living Crabbe and Goyle life for an hour,
To be able to enter the Slytherin hall.
"I came out of it to get in there," said Harry, half-passing; Percy catches him once he leaves Myrtle's field.
“I thought I wasn’t going back after that.”
"Oh . . . I see . . .” Myrtle said, choosing a spot in her room at
A morose kind of way. "So. . . anyway . . . I'll try an egg in
water. This is what Cedric DeGuerre did.”
“Do you want to sing it again?” Harry said really.
“What do you work, you’ve been the car in the afternoon to see the prerefiktien make bass?”
“A few times,” Myrtle said, turning around, “but I never left
Let’s talk to someone beforehand.”
“I’m sorry,” Harry said honestly. “You keep your eyes!”
He made sure Myrtle covered her cheeks appropriately before pulling himself out of the bathroom, wrapping the towel tightly around her waist .
It's running, it's running to destroy the kingdom. Once back in the water,
Myrtle looked at her feet and said, “Go on, then . . . open
Underwater!”
Harry placed the egg under the foggy snow and opened it.
it . . . And this time, she doesn’t hesitate. A strange song was playing.
of this, a song that cannot compete with water.
“You’ve got to put your head down too,” said Myrtle, who .
It turned out to be too valuable to spend. "carry on!"
Harry took a deep breath looking under the covers — and now,
He sat on the floor of the outgoing battalion, knew a
chorus of terrible voices sung to her from the open egg in her hands:

' '
“Come and seek us where our voice is heard,
We cannot sing above ground,
And while you’re browsing, think about this:
We’ve got what’s going to get you through,
A long hour will let you see,
And to return what we got,
But the hour passed — black looking li,
For a long time, it’s gone, never to return.”
Harry let himself back up and broke the tub surface, brushing his hair out of his eyes.
“Did you hear him?” Myrtle said.
"Yes . . . 'Come seek us where our voices sound . . .' and if I
They need convincing . . . hang on, I need to listen again. . . .”
He disappeared under the water again. She got three more underwater
Tifinagh of the song of the night before Harry showed it; so
He treads water for a while, thinking a lot, while Myrtle stays and
Look at it.
“I need to go looking for people who can’t raise their voices .
Above ground. . . .” He said quickly. “er . . . Who could this be?”
“Slue, didn’t you?”
Moning never saw Myrtle much, bla
The day when she gave Hermione a shot of Polyjuice
The face and tail of a hairy cat. Harry stood at the house,
Thinking . . . If the voices can only be heard underwater, then
It helps them to live in underwater habitats. He ran this
Looking past Myrtle, who smiled at him.
"Well, that's what Diggory thought," she said. “It will be there

' '
He talked to himself for ages about it. Collecting and collecting . . . Almost all
The guns were gone. . . .”
“Bottom money . . .” Harry said truthfully. “Mirl . . . What resides in
whales, except for the giant squid?”
“Oh all sorts,” she said. “I sometimes go down there . . . Sometimes I don’t have a choice, if someone washes my naked when I’m
Don't expect it. . . .”
Try not to think of Moaning Myrtle with a
stream to the lake with what was at rest, Harry said, “Well,
does anything in there have a human voice? stop -"
Harry's eyes fell on the picture of the screaming mermaid.
on the wall.
“Myrtle, there aren’t any locals there, are there?”
“Ooooh, well,” she said, her papers old, “I’m up
It runs much faster than that! And what went with it?
Even she” — Myrtle jerked her head toward the mermaid with a look of intense discontent on her pale face — “giggled and pointed .
She hears and listens to her voice. . . .”
“That’s it, isn’t it?” Harry said excitedly. “Second service to run
And to find mermaids in the ocean is . . . and . . .”
But suddenly he understood what he was saying, and he felt the anger radiate from him as if he had just pulled a
ⵜⵛⵓⴷⴷⴻⴹ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⵄⴻⴱⴱⵓⴹⵉⵙ. ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵄⵓⵎⵎⵓ ⵢⴻⵍⵀⴰⵏ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ; never
It has a lot of features. Dodley has issues in his youth, but my aunt
Petunia and Uncle Vernon, no doubt hoped that Harry would
I gave up one day, he didn't give her any day. Two n
The entire length of this swim was very good, but the lake was very big.
It’s very deep . . . and merpeople would surely live right at the
bottom. . . .

' '
“Myrtle,” Harry said truthfully, “how am I supposed to listen?”
In this, Merktel's eyes are filled with tears once again.
“No tact!” she said, rummaging through her pockets for a handkerchief.
“What do we have no idea?” Harry said, confused.
“Talking about breathing in front of me!” She said calmly, and
His voice broke high in the hall. “When I couldn’t . . .
when I haven't . . . Not for ages . . .”
She buried her face in his shoulder and sobbed loudly.
Harry remembered how deadly Myrtle had always been, but none of the other wizards he knew had ever made such a fuss .
therefore.
“I’m sorry,” he whimpered. “I don’t know — I just forgot . . .”
“Oh yes, it’s easy to forget about Myrtle’s death,” Myrtle sighed, .
I could see the outside of his eyes. “No one alerted me just when
I was alive. It took them hours and hours to find my body — I know,
I sit there and wait for them. Wolf Hornby came to
Potatoes — "Are you here again, sleepy, Myrtle?" she said, 'because Professor Dippet asked me to look for you —' And then she said .
He looked at my man . . . ooooh, don't forget him till his dying day, I
You made sure of that . . . Afterwards I reminded him and reminded him, I made him cry.
I remember at his brother’s wedding —”
But Harry was no assllw; He was thinking again of the merpeople's song. “We take what you’re going to lose seriously.” That sounds
Like they’re going to steal some of it, some of it
You have to come back. ⵎⴰ ⴰⵢ ⴷ-ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⴰⴷ ⴰⵙ-ⴷ-ⵙⵄⴻⴷⴷⵉⵏ ?
“— and then, of course, she went to the Ministry of Engineering to .
Stop chasing her, so I have to come back here and live in my apartment
bath."

' '
“Okay,” Harry said vaguely. « ⴰⵛⵓ ⴽⴰⵏ, ⵏⴻⴽⴽ ⵍⵍⵉⵖ ⵙⴷⴰⵜⵉ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ
was. . . . ⵖⴻⵍⵎⴻⴹ ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏⵉⴽ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⴻⵍⵜ ⵏⵏⵉⴹⴻⵏ, ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜⴻⵅⴷⴻⵎⴹ? I’m leaving.”
He retrieved the egg from under the bed and climbed out,
He dried himself off, and pulled on his pajamas and panties again.
“Will you come visit me in my lair again?”
Myrtle asked anxiously as Harry raised the invisibility cloak.
“er . . . I’ll try,” Harry said, though he was honestly just thinking .
The way to visit Myrtle's house again is that everyone on the other streets in the city. “See you, Myrtle . . . ⵜⴰⵏⴻⵎⵎⵉⵔⵜ ⵖⴻⴼⵏⵡⴻⵏ
help."
“ 'bey, 'Bie', he said with LHir, and when he snapped Harry Talcict of U
ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⴱⵔⵉⴷ ⵏ ⵟⵟⵍⴰⵎ, ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⴼⵇⴻⴷ ⵜⴰⴽⴰⵔⴹⴰ ⵏ ⵎⴰⵔⴰⵓⴷⴻⵔ
To see if it is still clear. Yes, those points belonging to
Velch and his cat, Mrs. Norris, are in their own jury . . . There’s nothing else that’s not out of Beave, though it’s
It rests on the top floor of the cage on the high ground. . . . Harry
He made his first step towards Griffindor Tower when someone else has on the map and took his eye. . . Something thing is not special.
Peeves was not the only thing that was moving. ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⵏⵇⵇⵉⴹⵜ ⵜⴳⴰ ⵜⵜ
They finished in a room in the middle of the under — Snape's .
office. ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵜⴰⵏⵇⵇⵉⴹⵜ ⵓⵔ ⵜⴳⵉ ⵜⵉⵏ “Severus Snape” . . . compliance
Bartimaeus Crouch.
Harry fell to that point. Mr. Crouch was supposed to be too ill
Let’s go to work or let’s go to Yule Ball — that’s what makes it,
Sneaking into Hogwarts at one in the morning? Harry
She sees a lot when a change happens in the house and in the house,
ⵃⴱⵙ ⴷⴰ ⴷ ⴷⵉⵏⵏⴰ. . . .

' '
Harry snapped, thought. . . ⴷ ⴹⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⴰⵙ, ⴰⵙⵃⵉⵙⵙⴻⴼ-ⵏⵏⴻⵙ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴰⵡⴻⴹ-ⵉⵜ-ⵉⴷ. It seems to be back in the opposite direction to
ⴰⵙⵡⵉⵔ ⴰⵏⴻⴳⴳⴰⵔⵓ. He sees what Croch is.
Harry leaves the serial so quickly as possible, though
Persons in some meanings still are exploited with the vision of the view of one
Tafaw, is the rush of its Bajama. It continues along the way down, smoked a slope of a snack on the half of the road along the length, and goes
With the way of a stand, the highest road will lead to two
tablets. ⵢⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⴽⴰⵔⴹⴰ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵅⴻⵎⵎⵉⵎ . . . It’s not just clear in Syva, so if, for Mass Crouch which is established, the law applies .
He’ll be poking around in someone’s office later this night. . . .
And then, halfway down the stairs, he doesn't care what
He was working, and no more than any other witness of Mass Crouch, the Harry’s foot falls at once directly from the
Tricky move Neville always forgets to jump. And he gave him a flesh that was not burnt, and a golden spoon, and it was torn from the flesh, and it was torn from under his hand. ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵖⵓⵍ ⵙ ⴷⴰⵜ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵔⴰⵔ ⴰⵔ ⵜ ⵉⵜⵜⴰⵎⵥ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⵓⵖⵓⵍ ⴱⴰⵀⵔⴰ;
She falls under the woodland with a hill like Abas
drum ⴳ ⴽⵓ ⴰⵙⵓⵔⵉⴼ — ⵉⵏⴼⵉⴱⴰⵔ ⴽⵍⵓⴽ ⵉⴼⴼⵖ — ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ
He left him, and the Marader's card ran out of his hand
He added six shops, where from the shop until more traditions,
ⵓⵔ ⵉⵣⵎⵉⵔ ⴰⴷ ⴰⵙ ⵢⴰⵡⵉ.
The golden egg falls from the table under the
Sad, Illdy, started hard in the shop below. Harriy snapped potatoes and tried to keep the Marader’s card, so that she was sanctified, but it’s very easy to achieve —
He cried by historic name, Harry he knew of the Always, and had heard incision, he had heard quickly. . . ⵓ, ⵇⵔⵉⴱ
immediately -

' '
“WARNING!”
It is a snake of the arrest of the mild Filch.
Harry could hear fast, creeping footsteps coming closer and
Almost, the ears of the ears hang out with happiness.
« ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓⵜ ⵔⵔⴰⴽⴻⵜⴰⴳⵉ? Remove all the monsters, will you work? I will have
You, Peeves, I’ll have you, I’ll . . . What is that?”
Filch’s footsteps stopped; There is an iron-on-iron nail and
The party stops — Filch picks up the egg and hangs it.
Harry stood for a long time, one leg still firmly wrapped around the wizard
Step, listen. Any moment now, Filch will pull aside
smiling, waiting to see Peeves . . . And it wasn’t
Heroes . . . But if he leaves the station, he'll see a Marauder's Map . . . and Invisibility Cup or not, the card will
The show “Harry Putter” stands well where it is.
"egg?" Filch said hurrying down the stairs. “My sweetness!” —
Mrs. Norris appeared with him—"This is a Triwizard reaction!"
This belongs to a headmaster!”
Harry felt sick; His heart was beating fast —
“WARNING!” Filch shouted excitedly. “You were stealing!”
He ripped open the table underneath, and Harry saw his confusion,
A pale and grizzled face, blue eyes staring into the darkness and (at
filch) with a thin layer.
“You’re hiding, are you?” He said quickly. “I’m coming to get you,
Heroes. . . . You went and stole the Triwizard manuscript, Peeves. . . .
Dumbledore will let you get out of here so you're screwed, you're screwed
Abutergist. . . .”
Filch started climbing the stairs, his grey, dust-colored cat in
its peaks. Mrs. Nouris's eyes, so bright, so bright,

' '
they were directly parallel to Harry. He had an opportunity before now to
They asked if the blindfold worked on cats. . . . sick
Horrified, he watches Filch creep closer and closer in the
his old flannel suit — he tried desperately to pull his
He gets his free leg, but he’s only lost a few more inches—any moment now, Filch’s going to see a map or walk right into it—
“Philc? What’s going on?”
Filch stopped a few steps below Harry and turned around. At the foot of the
The president stands as the only person who can handle Harry's case.
Self: Snap. He wears a long skirt that looks
green.
"It's Peeves, Professor," Filch said with a wicked grin. “He put
This egg under the stairs.”
Snape slid down the stairs and sat down next to Filch.
Harry gritted his teeth, convincing his fast-beating heart to
Give it in every moment. . . .
“Flattering?” Snape said quietly, looking at the egg in Filch's hands.
“But Peeves can’t come into my office. . . .”
“Is this egg in your office, Professor?”
“Of course not,” Snape said quietly. “I heard the whistle and
They sing —”
“Yes, Professor, that’s the white one —”
“— I was coming to check —”
“— Peeves dropped her, Professor —”
“— and when I walked past my office, I saw that the windows had been lit .
And a cockpit door is a joke! Someone is buying it!”
“But Peeves can’t —”
“I know he couldn’t, Filch!” Snape rushed back. “I burned down my office

' '
With a spell none but a wizard can break!” Snape looked at
With a smile, straight through Harry, then through the bottom. “I want you to come help me look for the intruder, Filch.”
“I’m yes, a teacher — but —”
The Velch looks back and snacks, and he turns out to Harry, which
He may believe that he’s a lot creeps to allow the Eves’s opportunity. Ow, he asked Harry with silence, go and Snape . . .
walk . . . Mrs. Norris was accompanied by Filch’s legs. . . . He had Harry
Specialized view that she can tell. . . . Why does he have
Isures and this sprinkle with a lot of the most sensitive hand?
“That is, the teacher,” Filch in mind, “The principle of the president .
He will ask me this time. PEVE was making a one
student, this could be my chance to kick him out of the castle
Once and for all —”
“Filch, I don’t give a shit about this bulldozer being built; is
My favorite space —”
Clonk. Clonk. Clonk.
The Scientific sparked and speaks in a fun way. He and Filch are silent in two
Under the flesh leg. Harry saw Dr. Moody's puzzled expression
In case of theittology between the crew between the streets. Modi is
The former Ansar rejoiced at the night ago and recycling
Her staff is like every time.
“Bajama’s car, is it?” he growled up the stairs.
"Professor Snape and I heard a noise, Professor," Filch said in
one. “Peves Poletergeist, you’re trading things like every time —
Then Professor Snape discovered that someone had broken
His —”
"shut up!" Snape smiled at Filch.

' '
Moody approached one level to the store’s leg. He saw Harry
Mody Mody's eyes are on Snap, and behind him, not the weather,
about himself.
Harry's heart gave a frantic thump. Moody can see the absence of the unsure . . . He alone could see the full absurdity of the scene:
Snap in the nightmare, Filch took the white, he, Hari,
They were guilty in the stores behind. Moody’s one-sided voice
Open the door. For a few seconds, he and Harry saw
live in the rest of the other. Sein, Moody remains the
He has broken the lines on Snape again.
“I’ve heard of that, A Snape?” he asked quickly. "one
You blocked your office?”
“It doesn’t matter,” Snape said with a cold.
“On the contrary,” Moody sighed, “it’s very important. w religious
You want to go into pyrouytics?”
“Meaching, I think quickly,” Snape said. Harry wants to see a line that comes out in a clean way on the snap drawing. “It’s happened before.
Point ingredents has gae gone mitsing from my prevalate store cupboard . . . Students are writing marks that are not marks, no doubt. . . .”
“Do you have been behind the steps, yes?” Modi said.
“You don’t find anything else in your office, is you?”
He saw Harry seeing the Snap’s face of Snap and was a bad brick
Chapah, the stone in the stone is more quickly.
"You know I'm not hiding anything, Moody," he said in a low, low voice .
The exclamation point, “The more you searched my office
yourself."
Modi’s face was sick in a picture. “The Worry season, Snap.
Dumbledore said to keep the brain —”

' '
“Dumbledore happens to tell me,” said Snape by .
clenched teeth. “I’m going to go like us that he gave up the pleasure to look at .
The bridge is!”
“ 'Of course, Dumbledore trusts you,'” Moody said quietly. “He is
A confident man, isn’t he? He believes in second chances. But I — I said
there are spots that don't come off, Snape. ⵜⵉⵙⴼⵉⴼⵉⵏ ⵓⵔ ⴷⵜⵜⴰⵙⴻⵏ ⴰⵔⴰ
Get out, d' you know what I'm going to tell you?”
ⵙⵏⴰⴱⵉ ⵜⴳⴰ ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⵉⵣⵉ ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵙⴰ ⵍⵍⵉ ⴱⴰⵀⵔⴰ ⵉⵙⵙⵓⵙⵎⵏ. He seized his left
The forearm taps with his right hand, as if something about
They have held.
Moody laughed. “Get back to the movie, snap.”
“ⵓⵔ ⵖⵓⵔⴽ ⴰⵡⴷ ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⵣⵎⵔⵜ ⴰⴷ ⴰⵢⵉ ⵜⵙⵙⴰⵖⴷ ⴳ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵡⴰⵏⵙⴰ!” snap
ⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⵙⴻⵎ, ⵢⴻⴵⴵⴰ ⴰⴼⵓⵙⵉⵙ ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ ⵢⴻⴼⵖⴻⴷ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵢⵉⵎⴰⵏⵉⵙ. "I have
As dare you attend this school after dark as you do!”
“Prowl away,” said Moody, but his voice was full of menace. "I
look forward to meeting you in a dark corridor some time. . . .
ⵜⴻⵖⵍⵉⴹⴷ ⴽⵔⴰ, ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ. . . .”
In sight of the goods, Harry for the word Moody sing in Macouder
The map, still attached to the sixth row of steps below. ⴰⵎ Snap ⴷ
The two filch turned to look at him, and Harry threw caution to the wind;
Give his hands under Tuesday, he passed away with Modyy.
ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⴷⵉⵊⴻⴱⴱⴻⴷ ⵍⵡⴻⵍⵀⴰⵉⵏⴻⵙ, ⵙ ⵢⵉⵎⵉ “D ⴰⵢⵍⴰⵡ! mine!"
Snape waved his hand at him, the worst expression of the evening.
understanding about his character —
“No carrier!”
The card flew through the air, bounced off of Snape's outstretched fingers, and flew straight into Moody's hand.
“My mistake,” Moody growled. “It's min — Must've
You dropped it early —”

' '
But Snape’s black eyes were sparkling through the egg in Filch’s hands
read the map in Moody's hand, and Harry could tell he had put
two and two together, as only Snape could. . . .
"Potter," he said quietly.
“What’s that?” ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ Moody ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵔⴼⴻⴷ ⵜⴰⴽⴰⵔⴹⴰ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ
With his own pocket.
"ear!" Snape snarled, and he actually turned his head and
ⵜⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍ ⵙⵔⵉⴷ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵡⴻⵎⴽⴰⵏ ⴰⵏⴷⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ Harry, ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ ⵢⴻⵣⵎⴻⵔ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵉⵡⴰⵍⵉ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⴻⵍⵜ. “That eg is Potter's gg. That piece of parchment
It’s the Upoer property. I have sten it beforre, I recogniz it! Potter was Dagi!
Butter, in his control!”
Snape has opened his hands like the return, started
Please out quickly; ⵉⵖⵢ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵙⵙⵉⵡⴹ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⴰⵏⵜⵉⵔⵏⵉⵜ ⵏⵏⵙ ⵓⴳⴳⴰⵔ
They were getting worse, trying to free Harry - trapped, Harry became
We hope, we hope that the snap hands will not be fixed, but some time
now -
“There’s nothing there, snap!” Bark Moody, “But I Will
I’d be happy to tell the principal how quickly your mind jumped
Harry Potter!”
“ⴰⵏⴰⵎⴻⴽⵉⵙ ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ?” Snape turned again to look at Moody, his
Hands still spread, inches from Harry's chest.
“It means that Dumbledore is very interested in knowing who has
ⴷⵉ ⵉ ⵓⵇⵛⵉⵛ ⵏⵏⵉ!” Moody said, tapping the shoulder of
Ladies. “And so am I, Snape . . . very interested. . . .” The silver light shone on his pale face, so that the wrinkles disappeared, and
Chunk missing from his cock, looking deeper and darker than ever.
ⵙⵏⴰⴱ ⴰⵔ ⵉⵥⵕⵕⴰ ⵖⵔ ⵎⵓⴷⵉ, ⵓⵔ ⵉⵣⵎⵉⵔ ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵥⵕ
expression on his face. ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵍⵡⴻⵇⵜ, ⵓⵍⴰⵛ ⵡⵉⵏ ⵉⵃⴻⵔⵣⴻⵏ ⵏⴻⵖ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⵏ ⴽⵔⴰ. ⵙⵢⵉⵏ, Snape ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵔⵙ ⵉⴼⴰⵙⵙⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ.

' '
“I just thought,” Snape said, sounding sympathetic, “if .
Potter ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⵏ ⵜⵙⴰⵄⵜⵉⵏ ⴷⴰⵖⴻⵏ . . . ⴷ ⵍⵄⴰⴷⴰⵉⵏⴻⵙ ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵙⵄⵉ ⵍⵅⵉⵔ. . . ⵉⵍⴰⵇ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵃⴱⴻⵙ. For — for her safety.”
“Oh, I see,” Mody said in a perfect way. “The best Potter’s best features in 2019.
Heart, is it?”
There was a pause. Snape and Moody were still staring at each other
other. Mrs. Norris gave a high pitched shriek, still looking around Filch
Footsteps, exploring Harry's Bubble-Bat bridge.
“I think I’m going back to bed,” Snape said quietly.
"Best idea you had all night," Moody said. “Now, Filch, if
I’ll give it to you even though I’m a queen —.”
"No!" Filch exclaimed, holding the egg as if it were his first born. “Professor Moody, this is a win for the Biffs!”
“It’s the president of who they’ve done,” said Moody.
“In this, for now.”
Snap collapsed in another written and another
word. Filch made a soft nod to Mrs. Norris, who smiled
She stared blankly at Harry for a few more seconds before turning to follow her master. It is still enough by hearing, Harry for Sanape
walking away down the corridor; Filch gave him the mudia ,
disappeared from sight too, muttering to Mrs. Norris. "never
All that, prayer . . . Let’s check Dumblur in the morning. . . tell
ⵖⵓⵔⵙ ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⴱⴻⴷⴷ Peeves. . . .”
The door is installed. Harry kept staring at Moody, who
He threw his backpack on the bottom step and began slowly climbing towards it, a slow hole in every other climb.
“Click sis, butr,” he breathes out.
"Yes . . . I — er . . . thanks," Harry said weakly.

' '
“What is that thing?” Modi said, and he was introduced to Maradar's card
out of his pocket and flipping it.
“The Hogwarts map,” Harry said, hoping Moody would go .
Take it out of the station quickly; ⴰⴹⴰⵔⵉⵙ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⴰⵣⵉⵜ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ.
“Merlin’s girl,” Moody said with a woman’s vision, succeeds on the card, the saints are living with peace. "Ayagi . . . ais is sove map, Potter!”
“Yes, it’s . . . With a lot more silly,” Harry said. The eyes of the eyes began.
Water from the river. “Er — Professor Moody, d'you that you
Can you help me — ?”
"What? Oh! Yes . . . Yes, of course . . ."
Moody took in the hands of Harry, the gods; Harry's foot came.
ⵡⴰⵔ ⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ-ⴷ ⵓⵙⵓⵔⵉⴼ ⵏ ⵜⴽⴻⵕⵕⵓⵙⵜ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵣⴳⴻⵔ-ⴷ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏⵏⵉⴳ-ⵙ. moody
He was still looking at the map.
"ear . . .” He said slowly, “you are not hurt, by any means, .
ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵡⴰⵍⵉⴹ ⴰⵏⵡⴰ ⵉ ⴷⵉⴽⴻⵛⵎⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵍⴱⵉⵔⵓⵡⴰ ⵏ Snape, ⴷ ⴽⴻⵞⵞ ? On this map, I
mean?"
“er . . . Yeah, Given . . .” Harry agreed. “That’s Mr. Crouch.”
Moody's magical eye swept across the entire map.
He looks suddenly confused.
“Crowd?” he said. “You’re — you’re alive, a Potter?”
“It’s good,” Hari said.
“Well, he’s not here,” Moody said, his eyes still wandering .
On the map. “As . . It’s very lucky — a lot. . . .”
Nothing was almost instantly, he still succeeds on the card.
Harry could say that Isalanas have meaning for Moody and
They want so many to see and why. He wondered if
He wanted to ask. Moody scared him a little . . . But Moody has just now
They helped him avoid many terrible problems. . . .

' '
“er . . . Professor Moody . . . Why do you see Mr. Crouch
Does he want to look in Snape’s office?”
Moody’s temple left the card and remains, evolving, on
Harry. She was a full eyes, and Harry had a sight
And that Moody was awesome, thinks if he or
Not, or how much he would tell her.
“Put it this way, Potter,” Moody muttered at last, “they say the old .
Maddy has been the defendants to take the heights. . . ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵏⴻⴽⴽ ⵓⵔ ⵍⵍⵉⵖ ⴷ ⴽⵔⴰ — ⵓⵍⴰⵛ — ⵙ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ ⵏ Barty Crouch.”
He continued to stay on the card. Harry was dying to know
further.
“Master Moody?” He said again. “You think . . . Could this
It has something to do with . . . Maybe Mr. Crouch thinks there’s
Something happening. . . .”
“Like what?” Moody said quietly.
Harrey has questioned several people who can live. Modi doesn’t want to
It’s true that he has a source of information outside Hogarts; that
It could lead to stupid questions about Sirius.
“I don’t know,” Harry murmured, “there are exceptions
Lately, hasn’t it? He was in Everyday Christmas . . . Participatory demand.
The World Cup, and Yimeksawin of Lmut and all. . . .”
The two Moody Types don’t meet the worst.
“You’re a dog quickly, a Potter,” he said. The terrible story has gone back.
Read the Marauder's Map. « Crouch ⵢⴻⵣⵎⴻⵔ ⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⵍⵉ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵅⴻⵎⵎⵉⵎ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵢⵉⴷⵉⵙ ⵏ ⵡⵉⴷ .
The morning he said quickly. “It’s very possible . . . There are some
The amazing challenges that end up the end — Rita Skeeter,
sure. ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⴳⴳⴰ ⴽⵉⴳⴰⵏ ⵏ ⵎⴷⴷⵏ ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⵏⴼⴰⵍⵏ, ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⵏⴰⵖⵖ.” miss
Smile twisted her lopsided mouth. “Oh but there’s one thing I don’t like,”
he said, more to self than Harry, is a serial eye

' '
He was established in the left center of the card, “and the death of the death .
The ones is free. . . .”
Harry stared at him. ⵢⴻⵣⵎⴻⵔ Moody ⴰⴷ ⴷⵢⵉⵏⵉ ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⵉ ⴷ Harry
ⵜⵖⵉⵍⴻⴹ ⵢⴻⴱⵖⴰ ⴰⴷ ⴷⵢⵉⵏⵉ?
“And now I want to remember, A Potter,” Moody said in a
More economies of economies.
ⵓⵍ ⵏ Harry ⵢⴻⵖⵍⵉⴷ; He was thought that this will come. There was Moody
I will go asking the ANIda that Yiddah had the card, which is a lot of concern.
The horrible thing — and a story of how the falling among the hands
Not only was he ordained, but his father, Fred and George
Ossley, and Professor Lupin, the latest defender against the voice .
The art teacher. Moody held the card in front of Harry, who leaned in
Himself —
“ⵣⵎⴻⵔⵖ ⴰⴷ ⵙⵔⴹⴻⵖ ⴰⵢⴰ?”
"Oh!" Harry said.
He is very worried about his card, but on the other hand, he knows very well that Modi doesn't ask where he left it, and
There is no doubt that you find the goodness for Moody.
“Yes, yes.”
“Good boy,” growled Moody. « ⵣⴻⵎⵔⴻⵖ ⴰⴷ ⵙⵙⴻⵇⴷⴻⵛⴻⵖ ⴰⵢⴰ . . .
this might be exactly what I’ve been looking for. . . . right, bed,
Potter, like on, now. . . .”
They all went down to the top of the table, and Modi still looked at the card like he was a hero like himself.
had never seen before. They walked in silence to the door of the
Moody's office, where he stopped, looked at Harry.
“You’ve ever thought about Auror’s life, a Potter?”
“No,” Harry said, disappointed.
“You want her to be satisfied,” said Moody, passing the contact and appearing
at Harry thoughtfollly. “Yes, indeed . . . and inciidently . . . am
You just haven’t just eat the sand back to the behavior?”
“Er — no,” said Harry, grinning. “I have been working on
suggestion."
Modi left him, his lovely eye and goes to Hayer again.
“Nothing like a nighttime stroll to give you ideas, Potter. . . . see
You in the morning. . . .”
He returned to beerways, and was close to that of Marader .
Take again, she closed the door behind her.
Harry joinedly returned to Griffindor’s belt, fell in the thinking
About Snape, and Crouch, and what it all meant. . . . Why was
Crouch goes back and forth, if he wants to lead to Hogwarts.
wen he wind to? What does Snape think is hiding in him
office?
And Moody thought, Harry, he ought to be an Auror! Interesting isa . . . but somehow, Harry thought, and he went quietly into
Ten minutes later, the egg and the chicken safely
He joined in potatoes, thought to see how the remaining
including before he chose it as a profession.

Chapter Twenty-SIX
TAƔEWSA TIS SIN

You said you already did that white debt!” said
Hermione sighed in relief.
“Keep your voice down!” Harry said calmly. “I just need to —
Kind of smells like it, okay?”
He, Ron, and Hermione sat in the back of the
Charms the class with a treat for themselves. They should be
you’re behaving in the wrong way of Communication Practice today — it’s .
Charm of displacement. Because of the possibility of horrible accidents when
Things continued to fly around the room, Professor Flitwick gave
Each student has a set of subjects on which to attempt, theory
Being that these don't harm anyone if they go off target. compliance
Nice theory, but it wasn’t working so well. Nevil’s goal was as follows
Poor guy because he keeps sending very heavy things flying
Across the room — Professor Flitwick, for example.
“Just forget about the egg for a minute, okay?” Harry smiled as Professor Flitwick cautiously walked past them, kneeling on the couch .

of a large cabinet. “I was trying to tell you about Snape and .
moody. . . .”
This class was the perfect cover for a private conversation, as everyone was too excited to pay them any attention. Harry
He had been rattling off his memories of last night in muffled tones for the last half hour.
“Snape said Moody's searching his office too?” Run whined.
His eyes gleamed with excitement as he sucked the pillow away with a sigh.
of her arrow (flew in the air and pierced Parvati’s head).
"So . . . do you think Moody is here to keep an eye on Snape as
The same goes for Karkarof?”
“Well, I don’t know if that’s what Dumbledore asked him to do, but .
Really does it,” Harry said, twirling his thumb without paying much attention, so that his wand made an odd sort of stomach .
flop off the desk. “Moody says that Dumbledur only lets Snape stay .
Here because it gives him a second chance or something. . . .”
"what?" Run said, his eyes widening, his next step looking
High in the air, he picks up the chandelier, and he shoots
Seriously on Flitwick's desk. “Harry . . . Maybe Moody thinks
Snape put your name in the Goblet of Fire!”
“Hey Ron,” Hermione said, shaking her head suspiciously, “we’re .
I think Snape was trying to kill Harry before, and it turned out he was
He was saving Harry’s life, remember?”
She pushed a button, which flew across the room and disappeared.
In the form they were all supposed to hang. Harry looked at the
Hermione, she thought . . . Of course the Snab saved his life.
Once, but most inexplicably, Snape insulted him outright, as
He used to tease Harry's father when they were at school together.
Snape loved getting points from Harry, and he wasn’t

' '
He misses the opportunity to give her a spanking, or even a proposal
that he would be suspended from school.
"I don't care what Moody says," Hermione continued. “Dumbledur wasn’t wrong. He was used to trusting Hagrid and Professor Lupine,
Although many people have never been given jobs, so why
He didn’t have to be nice about Snape, even if Snape was a little —”
“— good,” Ron said quietly. "Come on, Hermione, why are they all
These Dark wizard officials are sleeping in his office, then?”
“Why was Mr. Crouch pretending to be ill?” Hermione said, ignoring Ron. “It’s a little strange, isn’t it, that he couldn’t succeed
Come to the Yule ball, but it could rise here in the middle of
Night when he wants?”
"You just don't like Crouch because of that secret, Winky," he said .
Ron, sent a disk flying into the window.
“You’d just like to think Snape was up to something,” Hermione said, sending her carefully looking wallet across the screen.
“I just want to know what Snape did with his first chance, if it was .
On her second,” Harry said with affection, and a smile, towards his own wife .
Big surprise, he flew straight across the room and landed right on
Hermione's hat.
Fulfilling Sirius' wish to hear about anything odd at Hogwarts, Harry sent him a letter through the brown wizard that night, explaining
All about Mr. Crouch barging into Snape's office, and Moody and
Snape's expression. Then Harry glared hard at the
Biggest problem he faces: how to survive underwater
for one hour on February 24th.
Ron liked the idea of ​​using a call sign very much.
Once again — Harry explained about the AquaLungs, and Ron couldn’t .

' '
See why Harry shouldn't call any of the nearby Muggle
city. Hermione complicates this plan by pointing out that, in the unlikely event that Harry manages to learn how to use the AquaLung within the stipulated limit of one hour, he will most likely be suspended .
Because he broke the International Magical Secrecy Law — he was .
So much for hoping no Muggles see the AquaLung
zoom in on the grounds of Hogwarts.
“Of course, the ideal solution would be to replace
Yourself in a boat or something,” Hermione said. “If only .
We were already doing Human Exchange! But I don’t think we
Start this until sixth year, and it can go bad if you don’t
Know what you are doing. . . .”
“Yeah, I don’t like walking around with a periscope
off my cock,” Harry said. “S'pose I can always bet on someone in front of Moody; He could do it for me. . . .”
“I don’t think he’ll let you choose what you want back .
In, though,” Hermione insisted. “No, I think it’s best
Chance is some kind of magic.”
So Harry, thinking that he’d soon have enough of
library to last a lifetime, he buried himself again among
Dust plates, searching for any spark that might allow a human to survive without oxygen. But, even though he, Ron, and
Hermione slept throughout their lunchtime, dinner, and socializing together
of the weekend — though Harry did ask Professor McGonagall for a note
permission to use the reserved section, and even asked the librarian, Madame Pince, who was anxious and looked like a rattlesnake, for help — they were .
He couldn't find anything that would make Harry spend a
Hours underwater and they lived to tell the tale.
The familiar tinge of panic was beginning to fill Harry now.

' '
And he was having trouble concentrating in class. the
the lake, which Harry had always thought of as nothing but another landscape object, attracted his attention whenever he was near the reading window, a large tub of cold, iron-gray water, with its blue shell .
And the ice floor began to loom as far away as the moon.
As it was before facing Horntail, time flies .
A beeping as if someone had stirred the clocks to go faster. There's a week to go before February twenty-fourth.
(There’s still time) . . . There were five days until he was gone (he was bound
Let’s find something soon) . . . Three days to go (please let me find
some . . . please) . . .
After a couple of days, Harry started leaving again. Only one
The best thing about Sunday dinner is the return of
The brown box he held out to Sirius. He took out the paper.
He flipped it open, and saw the shortest letter Sirius had ever written to
he.
Send the date of next weekend of Hogsmeade back to the bell.
Harry folded the parchment and looked back, hoping to see something else, but it was futile.
“The weekend after next,” whispered Hermione, who had read
a glance over Harry's shoulder. “Here — take off my clothes and deliver this .
owl went straight back.”
Harry wrote the lines on the back of Sirius' letter, closed
placed it on the leg of the dragonfly, and watched it fly away again. what
Was he waiting? Advice on how to survive underwater? have
He had every intention of telling Sirius all about Snape and Moody.
I completely forgot to mention the white privilege.

' '
"What he wants to know about the upcoming Hogsmeade weekend
Oh why?" Run said.
“I don’t know,” Harry said quietly. The happiness of the present moment
it swelled inside him when he saw the monster dead. "series . . .
Protection of magical creatures.”
If Hagrid was trying to get revenge for the Blast-Ended
screwts, or because there were currently only two screwts left, or because he was trying to prove that he could do anything the Professor
Grubbliblank might, unbeknownst to Harry, but Hagrid was
He has continued his lessons on dogs since his return to
work. It turned out that Hagrid knew as much about werewolves as he did about werewolves, though he apparently got
Their lack of venom stings is impressive.
Today he managed to capture two unicorns. Unlike
perfect unicorns, they were pure gold. Parvati and Lavender
He went into overdrive of joy at seeing them, so did Pansy
Parkinson had to work hard to hide how much she loved them.
“It’s easier ter spot the adults,” Hagrid said to the class. "they
They stop fleecing when they are two years old, and grow antlers in
aroun' four. Don't go pure white until they're full, 'front
Seven. They’re a little more resilient when they’re kids . . . Ur
Very attentive guys. . . . Well, retreat a bit, you can catch them if
Yeh wants to . . . Give them some of these sugar cookies. . . .
“Are you okay, Harry?” Hagrid looked, looking slightly to the side,
While most others are worried about baby unicorns.
“Yeah,” Harry said.
“Jus' nervous, yeah?” Hagrid said.
“Bit,” Harry said.
"Harry," Hagrid said, placing a large hand on his shoulder,

' '
As Harry’s legs buckled under his weight, “I’d be worried
Before I saw you catch tha' Horntail, but I know now it can do
Something yeh set yer mind ter. I’m not worried at all. You’re walking
Be positive. Got yer clue done, didn’t you?”
Harry nodded, but nonetheless, there was a stupid urge to agree
That he didn’t have any idea how to survive in the depths of
Lake for an hour came for him. He glanced at Hagrid—maybe he had to go into the lake sometimes, to deal with the monsters in it? looks at everything else on the floor, after
all -
“Yeh you’ll win,” Hagrid said, stepping onto Harry’s shoulders .
Once again, to make Harry aware of himself he lost a couple of inches
Deep in the earth. “I know him. I can feel it. You are going to win,
Harry.”
Harry just couldn't bring himself to quell the pleasure, trusting
The smile fell from Hagrid's face. He pretended to have a crush on young people.
unicorns, forced a smile instead, and stepped forward to pray
Their et al.
By the evening after the second task, Harry felt like he
Trapped in a nightmare of dreams. He was well aware that even if, by some
Miracle, he managed to find the right career, have a real job
She ruled it at night. How could he let that happen? why
Shouldn’t he be working on a simple eggshell? Why didn't he leave
his mind wandered to class — what if the teacher had once mentioned
How do you breathe underwater?
He sat with Hermione and Ron in the library as the sun set outside, feverishly flipping through page after page of spells, hiding .
from the other with the large stacks of books on the desk in front

' '
of each of them. Harry's heart gave a huge leap every time he saw
The word “water” on the same page, but most often, is just
“Take two ounces of water, and half a pound of grated mandrake .
leaves, a stem . . .”
“I don’t think it can be done,” Ron’s voice boomed from
Across the table. “Nothing. nothing. The closest one is
The thing is to dry out vents and ditches, it's a dry spell, but it's
It’s nowhere near powerful enough to empty the ocean.”
“There has to be something,” Hermione said, tightening a .
A candle is nearby. Her eyes are very tired, she stares at the
The Olde and Forgotten Small Edition of Pillows and Pillows with
His nose about an inch from the page. “They didn’t fix things .
It’s impossible to do.”
“They have,” Ron said. “Harry, just go down to the beach tomorrow, of course, put your head down and yell at the locals to pick up .
Whatever they use, and see if they use it. The best you can
Do it, pal.”
“There’s a way to do it!” Hermione said calmly. “There was just
supposed!"
It seems to capture the lack of useful library information.
on that subject as personal slavery; He had never failed her before.
“I know what I’m supposed to do,” Harry said, pouring, face down, into Saucy Tricks for Tricky Sorts. “I need to learn to be a
An animagus like Sirius.”
An animagus was a wizard who could transform into an animal.
“Yes, you can become a goldfish whenever you
They want!" Run said.
“Or the pussy,” Harry said with a chuckle. He was tired.
“It takes years to become an Animagus, and then you have to

' '
Register and all,” Hermione said vaguely, now .
Squinting at the bottom of the Weird and Tsent Wizard Dilemmas poster
solution. “Professor McGonagall told us, remember . . . possess
it’s hard to register for improper use of the Memorandum Office . . .
What animal have you become, and your metrics, so you can’t abuse
it. . . .”
“Hermione, I was joking,” Harry said sadly. “I know I didn’t
He got a chance to become a frog tomorrow morning. . . .”
“Oh that’s no good,” Hermione said, picking up the Witch’s Dilemmas quickly. “Who on earth wants to turn their nose into a bone .
Do they grow into animals?”
“I don’t mind,” said Fred Weasley’s voice. “Be conversational
point, isn’t it?”
Harry, Run, and Hermione looked around. Fred and George just had
they stepped out from behind some bookshelves.
“What are you two doing here?” Run asked.
“Looking for you,” George said. “McGonagall wants you, Ron.
And you, Hermione.”
"why?" Hermione said, looking surprised.
"I don't know . . . It was looking a little tired, though,” Fred said.
"We need to get you to his office," George said.
Ron and Hermione looked at Harry, who felt his stomach drop.
Was Professor McGonagall about to tell Ron and Hermione to leave?
Maybe she knew how much she helped him, when he
Should he be working out how to do the job alone?
“We’ll meet you again in the common room,” Hermione said .
Harry as she got up to walk with Ron — the two of them looked very
anxious. “Bring as many of these books as you can, okay?”
“Of course,” Harry sighed.

' '
By eight o'clock Mrs. Pince turned out all the lights.
And he came to get Harry out of the library. He relaxes under the
Seeing as many books as he could carry, Harry returned to the
Gryffindor in the common room, pulled a hat in one corner and continued to search. There’s nothing in Madcap Magic that’s Wacky .
Guardians . . . Nothing in the Medieval Cosmic Record . . . No one
Mention underwater practices in the 18th-century Anthology of Charms, or in strange ordinary people, or in powers .
You didn’t know you had what to do with them now you have
It's smart.
Crookshanks flew to Harry's window and bent down, growling.
in depth. The common room suddenly disappeared around Harry. people
I kept wishing her a happy, safe morning ahead.
Trials like Hagrid’s apparently convinced them all that it was
He’s about to make another film as good as the one he has
repeated in the first task. Harry couldn't answer them, he just nodded, feeling like there was a golf ball lodged in his throat. by
Ten to midnight, he was alone in the room with Crookshanks. he
They were looking for all the remaining books, and Ron and Hermione were
You're not coming back.
It’s over, he told himself. You can’t do it. You just need to go
Go down to the beach at dawn and tell the marshals. . . .
He sees himself explaining that he can’t do the job. he
She looked up at Bagman's gloomy gaze through blue eyes, through Karkaroff's satisfied, white-toothed grin. He almost heard Fleur Delacour
He said “I know it . . . 'e's too young, 'e's just a little boy.” recognize
Malfoy flaunting his POTTER STINKS secret in front of
crowd, he saw Hagrid's devastated face and couldn't believe it. . . .
Forgetting that Crookshanks was in his lap, Harry stood up .

' '
At the same time very; Crookshanks hissed angrily as he landed on
grounded, gave Harry a confused look, and took off with his gunpowder in the air, but Harry was already hurrying up the flight of stairs to his dormitory. . . . to hold invisible
Cloak and go back to the library, he'd stay there all night if he had
I. . . .
“Lumos,” Harry whispered fifteen minutes after opening .
The library door.
The raccoon descends, climbs onto the bookshelves, pulls down
More books — hexes and charms books, books about merpeople
and water beasts, books about famous witches and wizards, about
magical invention, about anything at all that could conjure up a fleeting hint of life underwater. He took them to a
table, and then set to work, searching for them with his heavy
Wand, occasionally checking his watch. . . .
One in the morning . . . Two in the morning. . . The only way
He could keep telling himself, again and again, the next
book . . . In the next one . . . The next one . . .
The mermaid in the painting in the prefects' lounge was laughing. Harry was swimming like a frog in bath water next to her.
Stone, while she holds her Firebolt over her head.
“Come and get it!” You squealed vainly. “Come on, jump!”
“I can’t,” Harry growled, grabbing the Firebolt, and struggling .
He doesn't fall. “Give it to me!”
But you just stabbed him painfully in the side by the end of
smile, laughed at him.
“This hurts — get out — ouch —”
“Harry Potter must wake up, sir!”

' '
“Stop teasing me —”
“Dobby needs to punish Harry Potter, sir, he needs to wake up!”
Harry opened his eyes. He was still in the library; The invisible cloth came off his head as he slept, and the side of his wife
Face was stuck in the pages of Where there’s a rabbit, there’s a way.
He sat up, straightened his hood, and squinted into the rising daylight.
“Harry Potter needs to try!” shouted Dubby. " second .
practice starts in ten minutes, and Harry Potter —”
“Ten minutes?” Harry shouted. “Ten — ten minutes?”
He looked at his watch. Dobby was right. There was twenty
The past nine. A huge, dead weight seemed to fall from Harry’s chest
In his stomach.
“Hurry, Harry Potter!” yelled Dobby, nipping at Harry's
sleeve. “You must be under the sea with someone else .
of the old ones, sir!”
"It's too late, Dobby," Harry said hopelessly. “I don’t work
work, I don’t know how —”
“Harry Potter will do the job!” shrieked the rabbit. “Dobby knows
Harry couldn’t find the right book, so Dobby made it for him!”
"what?" Harry said. “But you don’t know what a second job is .
is -"
“Dobby knows, sir! Harry Peter had to go to the lake and find
His wheezy —”
“Find out my what?”
“— and he’ll get his Wheezy back from the locals!”
“What’s Wheezy?”
“Your Wheezy, Sir, Your Wheezy — Wheezy who gives .
Dobby his sweater!”

' '
Dobby took off the blue closed jacket he was in now.
He wore on his shorts.
"what?" Harry sighed. “They have . . . They had Ron?”
“Something Harry Potter would be very ashamed of, sir!” shouted Dubby.
“ 'But it's past the hour —' ”
“— 'The scene is black,' ” Harry was saying, looking, terrified, at the
The elf. “ 'Long time, gone, never coming back.' Dobby - What Have I
Do you have to work?”
“You have to eat this, sir!” The cock crowed, and put up his hand
into his trouser pocket and pulled out a ball of what looked like
Slimy, insect droppings. “Just before you enter the ocean, .
Sir — Guild!”
“What did he do?” Harry said, looking at the lightning bolt.
“Let Harry Potter breathe underwater, sir!”
“Dobby,” Harry said excitedly, “listen — you’re worried about .
this?"
He couldn't forget that the last time Dobby tried to
“Help” him, he had ended up boneless in his right hand.
“Dobby is sure, sir!” The boss said seriously. “The bear heard
Things, sir, he's a pet rat, he walks all over the castle as he shines
Fireplace and floor covering. Doby listens to Professor McGonagall
and Professor Moody in the staff room, discussing the following .
task. . . . Dobby would never let Harry Potter lose his Wheezy!”
Harry's doubts faded. He jumped to his feet and pulled
Invisible cup, stuffed in his pocket, holding a rose bush,
and pocketed it, then left the library with Dobby
On his feet.
“Dobby should be in the bathroom, sir!” Dobby yelled.

' '
As they fly down the stairs. “Dobby’s going to miss it — good .
Good, Harry Potter, Sir, good!”
“See you later, Dobby!” Harry shouted, and ran quickly
stairs and down the stairs, three at a time.
The entrance hall included some last-minute engagements, all
They leave the Great Hall after dark and go to
Views of the second bay to see the second work. They look like Harry
He runs through the beam, sending Colin and Dennis Creevey flying as he leaps
Under the stone roof, step out onto the damp ground.
As he cleared the grass he noticed that the debris that had lined the dragon hut in November was now piled high .
Another bench, thriving on shelves filled to bursting
point and reflected in the ocean below. The language of
The crowd cheered into the water as Harry ran faster.
across the beach toward the judge, who sat at another gold-covered table by the water’s edge. Cedric, Fleur,
and Krum were by the judge's table, watching Harry sprint towards them.
"I'm . . . here . . .” Harry sighed, stomping on the floor.
and accidentally staining Fleur's dress.
“Where are you?” A mysterious, dissatisfied voice said. "the
things are about to begin!”
Harry looked to his side. Percy Weasley was sitting at the judges' bench.
Table — Mr. Crouch failed to appear again.
“Now, now, Percy!” Ludo Bagman said, who looked very happy to see Harry. “Let him catch his breath!”
Dumbledore smiled at Harry, but Karkarof and Mrs
Maxime didn’t look at all happy to see him. . . . It was obvious.

' '
From the looks on their faces they thought he wasn't going
It will come out.
Harry bent over, hands on his knees, panting; have
A knot in his side he felt like he had a knife between
Bone, but there was no time to melt it; Ludo Bagman is available now
They moved among the old ones, spacing them out along the bank at ten-foot intervals. There was Harry at the end of the line, near the
Krum, who was wearing a swimsuit and holding his
Prepare the noodles.
“Alright, Harry?” Bagman hissed as Harry moved something
Feet away from Krum. “You know what to do?”
“Yeah,” Harry whispered, licking his lips.
Bagman gave Harry a quick squeeze and turned to
Judges’ Table; He raised his wand to his throat as he did so.
At the World Cup, he said “Sonorus!” And his voice came out in the middle
Boiling water towards the stand.
“Well, all our students are ready for the second task, which is s
It’s going to start with my hair. They have one hour to rest.
What was taken from them. On the count of three, then.
one . . . two . . . three!"
The scent disappeared suddenly into the cold, still air; standing
it ended with screams and shouts; Without looking to see what
The other students were working, and Harry took off his shoes and socks.
He took a handful of gillyweed out of his pocket and put it in his pocket
Because, and went out into the sea.
It was so cold, he felt the skin on his fingers prickle like that.
They are fire, not boiling water. His straw hat weighed him down as he was
He walked on the ground; Now the water was at his feet, and he quickly

' '
Slippery feet were sliding across the sand and slippery, slippery stones. was
He picks at the gillyweed as hard and fast as he can; It felt uncomfortably sticky and papery, like octopus scales. The abdominal cavity in
The cold water stopped, ate, and waited for something to
happen.
He could hear laughter in the crowd and knew he must look silly, walking through the ocean without showing any sign of magic .
health. Part of it was still dry, covered with damp specks; Half submerged in the icy water, a sharp breeze lifted her hair,
Harry began to bite harder. He avoided looking at the dishes;
The laughter was louder, there were giggles and Slytherin giggles. . . .
Then suddenly Harry felt like an invisible pillow
which were wrapped around his mouth and nose. He tried to produce
breath, but he turned his head to move; His towers were empty, and he
Suddenly, he felt dull pain on each side of his head—
Harry took his hands around his neck and felt two large cracks.
Just below his ears, disappearing into the cold air. . . . He had animals. Without stopping to think, he did the only thing that made sense—he .
He leaned forward into the water.
The first cycle of salty sea water felt like a breath of life. his
Head stopped spinning; He took a big gulp of water.
And he felt it pumping gently through his muscles, sending oxygen back to
His brain. He stretched his arms out in front of him, staring at the
them. It looked dark and ghostly underwater, and they
It became webbed. He turned and looked at his nakedness.
The legs — have become elongated and even the knees are thickened:
It’s like the bats have been released.
The water doesn’t even feel like ice . . . On the contrary, he

' '
The anger felt very cool and light. . . . Harry knocked again,
He was amazed at how his feet felt like snails
in the water, and he sees how clear it is, and how
He didn’t seem to need to blush. He never bothered to swim until now.
In the ocean he could not see the bottom. becomes
above him and sunk into his bottom.
Silence choked his ears as he floated across a strange, gray landscape,
A land of dust. He could only see ten feet around him, so as
He wades through the water and new places seem to appear suddenly.
From the darkness that follows: dark beads, an ominous black
long, great sandy plains lined with smooth, shiny boulders. he
He swam deeper and deeper, towards the shore, his
His eyes widened, scanning the murky water around him to
Shadows beyond, where the water became turbulent.
Small fish glided over it like silver spokes. Once or twice he
He thought he saw something big moving in front of him, but when
He got closer and found it to be nothing but a large, black
log, or woody stem. There is no sign of any of the
The other directors, the local people, Ron — even, thankfully, the king .
squid.
Light green grass stretched out in front of him as far as he could see,
Two feet deep, like an overgrown pine tree. There was Harry
He stared blankly in front of him, trying to see the forms
With a smile . . . And then, without warning, some
He touched his body.
Harry turned his window and saw a grindy-low, small,
A horned water demon, emerging from the grass, long fingers
She gripped Harry’s shoulder tightly, her pale nipples exposed —
Harry quickly slips his hand inside his coat and looks

' '
For his ass. By the time he caught up to him, two more grindylows
Rising from the grass, he grabbed the sleeves of Harry's robe,
And they were trying to get away with it.
“Relationship!” Harry yelled, except no sound came out. . . . a
great bubbles came out of his mouth, and his bat, instead of sending vibrations at the grindylows, blew them away with what seemed to be
A jet of hot water, because where it hit them, there were angry red marks
visible on their dark skin. Harry cleared his throat from
Grindylows holds and swims, as fast as possible, sometimes sending
More jets of hot water on his back in slow motion; Every now and
Then he felt one of the grindylows tap his shoulder again, and he
Drowned, violently; Finally, he felt his foot connect to a box
head, and looking back, saw the fallen Grindylow floating away,
With closed eyes, while his friends pressed their arms around Harry and be
Back to the woods.
Harry leaned in slightly and put his wand inside hers
clothes, and looked around and listened again. rotates the circle completely in
Water, the silence claims more than ever on his
Ear tips. He knew he should be deeper in the ocean by now, but
Nothing moved except for the slow motion.
“How are you?”
Harry thought he was having a heart attack. He hit the jail.
And he saw Moaning Myrtle floating brightly in front of him, staring at the
With its soft, pearl necklace.
“Myrtle!” Harry tried to scream — but again, nothing came .
from his mouth but a very large hole. Myrtle looking realistic
She laughed.
“You want to try there!” she said, pointing. "I'm not coming

' '
with you. . . . I don’t like them much, they always follow me around if I
Very close. . . .”
Harry gave him a thumbs up to show his thanks and left.
Once again, be careful to swim a little further up the grass so you don't hit anything
More grindylows can hang out there.
He swam for what felt like at least twenty minutes. was
He passed the great spheres of red sand now, which moved dizzyingly as he skimmed the water. Then, finally, he heard a whistle
of mersong stores.
“Long hours you will have to look,
And to get back what we got . . .”
Harry swam fast and soon saw a large rock sticking out of the
Flood water ahead. It had portraits of local people on it; are
They carry a spear and chase what looks like a giant squid. Harry
Swam across the rock front and follow the mersong.
“. . . Half your time is up, so don't waste time
Maybe what you’re looking for will stay here to disappear. . . .”
A group of immaculate stone houses surrounded by algae
at once from pain on all sides. Here and there in the dark
Looking around, Harry saw faces . . . The faces don't match at all.
to the painting of the mermaid in the prefects' shrine. . . .
Merpeople have brown skin and long, silky, dark red hair.
Their eyes were yellow, like their rotten teeth, and they wore
rows of thickets on their necks. They looked at Harry as

' '
He swam past; One or two of them flew out of their wings into the
See it better, their mighty silverfish tails beat the water,
knives held in their hands.
Harry sped up, looking around, and soon the restaurants became
More than many; There are grassy gardens around some of them.
And he even saw a grindylow beast tied to a post outside a door.
Merpeople were pouring in from all directions now, watching him curiously,
He looks at his hands and arms, they talk behind their hands
For another. Harry suddenly turned a corner and saw a very strange sight.
He met her eyes.
A whole bunch of people were passing out in front of the houses.
which formed what looked like a merversion of the village square. a
the choir of merpeople was singing in the centre, calling the servants to their side, and behind them rose a sort of dreadful procession; a
giant merperson cut from a rock. Four people were bound
Quickly to the stone merperson's lair.
Ron was sandwiched between Hermione and Cho Chang. was
Also a girl who looked no older than eighty, with her silvery clouds .
Her hair made Harry realize he was Fleur Delacour's sister. all
Four of them appeared to be in a very deep sleep. Their heads were
They spin on their feet, and bits of bubble gum keep coming out of their mouths.
Harry hurried over to the hostages, half expecting to
They threw down their spears and attacked him, but they did nothing. the
The grass ropes connecting the prisoners to the statue were thick, thin, and
Very strong. For a second, he thought about the knife Sirius had.
Bought it for Christmas — tucked away in its trunk in the castle a
A quarter of a mile, no use for it at all.
He looked away. A lot of people around them

' '
They were carrying traps. It slowly swam to a seven foot long one.
A merman with a long blue beard and a seashell pattern is
They tried to mime a request to borrow a knife. The merchant laughed.
And he shook his head.
“We won’t help,” he said in a thick, gravelly voice.
"series !" Harry said firmly (but only bubbles came out of
his mouth), and tried to pull the knife away from the mermaid,
But the merman shrugged it off, still shaking its head and laughing.
Harry turned around, looking at her. Something hard. . . anything . . .
There are rocks littering the seabed. fell u
He grabbed one by the throat and went back to the statue.
He began to pry into the connecting ropes Ron, and after a few minutes of hard work, they broke. Ron walked out, unconscious, something
Inches above the ocean floor, teetering slightly on the ocean floor
water.
Harry looked to his side. There was no sign of any other
Champions. What were they playing at? Why didn't they think?
He turned to Hermione, picked up the gemstone, and began stroking the
Hack into his tracks too —
Suddenly, he was grabbed by several pairs of strong blue arms. half of
Dozens of mermaids were pulling away from Hermione, choking
Their heads are red and dark.
“You’re holding yourself hostage,” one of them said. "leave
other . . .”
"no way!" Harry said excitedly — but only two big balls .
He left.
“Your job is to pick up your own best friend . . . Leave the others . . .”
“She’s my friend too!” Harry shouted, turning to Hermione.

' '
A large silver buckle erupted soundlessly from his lips. "and
I don't want them to die either!”
Cho's head was on Hermione's shoulder; The little one with the silver hair
The dress was dark and elegant. Harry tried to fight the
The mermen, but they laughed harder than ever, and stopped him.
Harry looked around furiously. Where are the other quads?
He’ll have time to take Ron ashore and back
Down for Hermione and the others? He will be able to find them
again? He looked at his watch to see what time it was
He left — it had stopped working.
But then, his neighboring countrymen spoke fondly of his
head. Harry looked up and saw Cedric swimming towards them.
There was a large tube in his head, which caused him to
the foliage looks awesome and great and drawn.
"fall!" he said, looking puzzled. “Fluoride is
Krum is coming now!”
Feeling extremely relieved, Harry watched as Cedric pulled a knife
from his pocket and knocked Cho free. He pulled it up and out.
of view.
Harry looked to his side, waiting. Where are Fleur and Krum?
Time was getting shorter, and according to the song, the prisoners
It will be turned off after an hour. . . .
The locals began to shudder wildly. Those who hold
Harry loosened their grip and looked behind them. Harry turned around and
He saw some monster scurrying out of the water beside them:
A human body in lobster-headed swimming trunks. . . . it
There was Krum. He seemed to have changed himself—but badly.
The mermaid swam straight towards Hermione and began to squirm.
And he pinches his knuckles; The problem is that Krum’s new teeth are

' '
innocently because he was feeding on anything smaller than a dolphin, and Harry was pretty sure that if Krum wasn't careful, he'd be
It would rip Hermione in half. Rushing forward, Harry punched Krum
heavily on the shoulder and grabbed the grinding stone. Krum took it
And he began to rip into a free Hermione. In a few seconds, he did;
He grabbed Hermione by the collar, and without backing down
direction, begins to slowly rise with it towards the surface.
Now what? Harry thought bitterly. If only this could have been avoided
Fleur was coming. . . . But still no sign. It doesn’t matter what be
It works except . . .
He grabs the stone, which Krum throws, but
The mermen were now cowering around Ron and the little girl, straining
Heads for her. Harry pulled out his wand.
“Get out of the way!”
Only bubbles came out of his mouth, but he had enough
The feeling that mermen understand it, because they
He suddenly stopped laughing. Their brown eyes stared into the
Harry's wand, and they look scared. There could be a lot more.
There were fewer of them in it, but Harry could tell, his reflections
On their faces, that they know no more magic than a giant squid
did.
“You have until three!” shouted Harry; A huge stream of steam came out of it, but he lifted three fingers to make sure they were
The message was received. "one . . ." (holds up a finger) “Two .” (he
Put second) —
They’re broken up. Harry ran forward and started poking in the
The rope that bound the little girl to the idol was finally free.
He held the little girl in his lap and held Ron's head
clothes, and crawled out from underneath.

' '
It’s very hard work. He cannot use his hands with webbed.
to propel himself forward; He worked his fists in anger, but
Ron and Fleur's sister were like baskets full of potatoes that drew him
Go back downstairs. . . . He raised his eyes to the sky, though he knew he
It must still be very deep, the water above it was very cold. . . .
Merpeople were growing up with him. He could see them moving.
They easily surrounded him and watched him struggle in the water. . . . It will be dragged into the ground when it
Is time up? Maybe they ate people? Harry's legs were aching too hard to keep swimming; His shoulders ached.
confused due to the attraction of Ron and the girl. . . .
He was breathing with great difficulty. He can feel
Pain in the side of his head also . . . He was becoming very anxious.
of how much water was in his mouth . . . It’s still dark.
It’s definitely getting better now . . . He could see the light of day beyond. . . .
He gripped tightly with his thumbs and found that they were
No more feet . . . Water was dripping from his mouth.
In his hands . . . He was starting to feel dizzy, but he recognized the light.
And the air was only ten feet above him . . . He had to get there. . . he
I must . . .
Harry pushed his hips so hard and fast it felt like his muscles were screaming in protest; His mind felt full of water, he
He can’t breathe, he needs oxygen, he has to keep moving, he can
Don’t stop —
And then he felt his head sinking towards the shore; The fresh, cool, clear air was blowing against his wet face; He ate it down,
He felt as if he had never breathed properly before, and, with a sigh, pulled Ron and the little girl with him. All those around him,

' '
The tree-heads, green-skinned were popping out of the water with him,
But they were looking out for him.
The crowds in the stalls were making too much noise; Shouting and screaming, they all seemed to be on their feet; He had Harry
A feeling that they think Run and that little girl might be
He died, but they were wrong . . . Both had their eyes open;
The girl looked scared and confused, but Ron just let out a
A great ball of water, shining in a bright light, turned towards Harry,
And he said, “Wet, this, isn’t it?” Then he saw Fleur's sister. "what
Did you bring her?”
"Fleur didn't show up, I couldn't leave her," Harry whispered.
“Harry, you prat,” Ron said, “you didn’t take that song thing seriously, did you? Dumbledore wouldn’t let any of us drown!”
“The song says—”
“It’s just to make sure you’re back within the time limit!”
Run said. “I hope you don’t waste time down there playing the
artist!"
Harry felt weak and awkward. It was all very well for Ron;
He was asleep and didn't realize how scary the lake was.
They were surrounded by spear-carrying locals who looked more than
It can kill.
“C'mon,” Harry growled, “Help me with her, I don’t think .
She can swim very well.”
They pulled Fleur's sister into the water, back to the bank
Where the judges stood looking on, twenty men joined them
in them like a courtier, singing their horrible songs of deception.
Harry could see Mrs. Pumfrey talking about Hermione, Krum,
Cedric, and Cho, were all wrapped in blankets.

' '
Dumbledore and Lodo Bagman stood looking at Harry and Run
from the bank as they get closer to swimming, but Percy, who looks very
White and suddenly much smaller than before, it came flying
To meet them. Meanwhile, Madame Maxime was trying to stop
Fleur Delacour, who is very smart, fights tooth and nail to
Go back to the water.
“Gabriel! Gabriel! Was she alive? Is she 'urt?”
“She’s good!” Harry tried to tell him, but he was too tired.
He couldn’t speak, let alone scream.
Percy grabbed Ron and was dragging him to the bank (“Gerroff, Percy, I’m fine!”); Dumbledore and Bagman were pulling
Harry stood up straight; Fleur had slipped out of Madame Maxim and was
Her sister embraced.
“It’s ze grind . . . Zey attacked me . . . Hey Gabriel, I
thought . . . I thought. . .”
"Come here, you," Miss Pomfrey said. She took Harry and
He pulled him over to Hermione and the others, holding him like this
Tightly in a pocket that feels like being in a compression stocking,
And he forced a fair amount of hot liquid down her throat. steam
It came out of his ears.
“Harry, you’re doing great!” Hermione cried. “You did it, you got it
How about all by yourself!”
“Well —” Harry said. He’d tell her about Dobby, but
He had just seen Karkaroff watching him. He was just a judge
They didn’t leave the table; The lone judge shows no signs of
The joy and relief that Harry, Ron, and Fleur's sister returned to
Safely. “Yeah, right,” Harry said, raising his voice that little bit .
that Karkaroff could hear him.
“You’ve got a water bug in your hair, Hermownninny,” he said .

' '
Chrome. Harry had the impression that Krum was bringing her back to himself; Maybe to remind him that he was just now
Saved her from the lake, but Hermione kicked the monster out
Impatiently, he said, “You are well outside the time limit, but, .
Harry. . . . It took you ages to find us?”
"No . . . I find you fine. . . .”
Harry's sense of betrayal was growing. Now he was out of
Water, it’s pretty clear that Dumbledore’s safety net doesn’t allow the death of a hostage just because
Their boss didn’t show up. Why doesn’t he just take Run
And walked? He would be the first one back. . . . Cedric and Krum
He didn't waste time thinking about anyone else; They didn’t take
of mersong seriously. . . .
Dumbledore was lounging at the water’s edge, deep in conversation with what seemed to be the great seaman, a man in general .
A woman’s vision of the breastplate and the breastplate. He was doing a kind of
the explosive noises locals make when they’re above water; Turns out, Dumbledore can speak magical. Finally he dusted himself off, turned to his fellow judges and said, “Lecture before .
We found clues, I think.”
The judges went in a huff. Mrs. Pumfrey went to
saving Ron from Percy's grasp; She took him to Harry and
The others, give him a cloth and some Pepperup Potion, and then go
She would bring Fleur and her sister. Fleur had multiple cuts on her face and
Her arms and clothes were ripped off, but she didn’t seem to care, either
She would let Madame Pomfrey clean them up.
“Take care of Gabrielle,” she said, then turned to .
Harry. “You saved 'er,” she yelled. “Although she was
Not your 'hostage.'”

' '
“Yeah,” said Harry, who now heartily wished he could give up altogether .
Three girls were tied to the idol.
Fleur leaned down and kissed Harry twice on each cheek (he felt his
His face burns and he won't be surprised if the bomb is coming
out of his ears again), and then tells Ron, “You too — you .
'He helped —”
“Yeah,” said Ron, looking very hopeful, “yeah, a little —”
Fleur pushed down on him as well and kissed him. Hermione
Just looked funny, but immediately, Ludo Bagman magically
A loud roar sounded next to them, making them all jump,
And with that, the crowds in the stands would go very quiet.
“Ladies and gentlemen, we have reached our decision. Her mercy of Murcus tells us exactly what happened in the middle of
ocean, so we decided to sample the fifty
For each of the measurements, as follows. . . .
“Fleur Delacour, although she demonstrated an excellent use of
Bubblehead Charm, was attacked by the grindylows as she approached her goal, and failed to retrieve her hostage. We gave him an award.
Twenty-five points.”
A voice from the couches.
“I deserve zero,” Fleur said quietly, shaking her huge smile .
head.
“Cedric Diggory, who also uses the steam-head projector, was .
The first to return as his hostage, although he returned a minute
Outside the one-hour time limit.” great singing from the Hufflepuffs in the crowd; Harry saw Cho give Cedric a pointed look.
“We therefore gave him forty-seven points.”
Harry's heart sank. If Cedric existed outside the timeline, he
Of course there is.

' '
“Viktor Krum used an imperfect form of the Reformation,
which was nevertheless important, and was the second he returned with his
Wine. We give him forty points.”
Karkaroff clapped especially hard, looking much higher.
"Harry Potter used manure to great effect," Bagman continued. “It turned out to be last, and well outside the one-hour time limit.
However, the mermaid reminds us that Mr. Potter comes first .
to reach the hostages, and that the delay in his return was due to
His desire to bring all prisoners back to safety, not just his own
own."
Ron and Hermione both gave Harry half-confused, half-confused looks.
“Most of the prison guards,” and here Bagman gives Karkaroff a lot of
nasty look, “I feel that this shows a fiber of consciousness and is worth a high reward.
however . . . Mr. Potter’s score is forty-five points.”
Harry’s stomach bulged — he was now competing for first place with
Cedric. Ron and Hermione, taken by surprise, stared at Harry, then
He laughed and started clapping vigorously with the rest of the crowd.
“Right there, Harry!” Ron yelled at the noise. "you
They’re not stupid after all — you’ve put on a mental fiber!”
Fleur was very annoyed as well, but Krum didn't seem too happy with
all. He tried to engage Hermione in conversation again, but
It was too shocking for Harry to listen.
“The third and final workout will take place on the morning of June 24th,” Bagman continued. “The juniors will be notified of what’s coming a month in advance. thank you
All for your young support.”
It's over, Harry thought nervously, as Mrs. Pomfrey began
They escort officials and prisoners to the castle to enter

' '
Dry clothes. . . it ended, he passed . . . doesn’t have
Advertisement Some now through June 24th. . . .
The next time he was in Hogsmeade, Harry decided as he walked
He returns to the top of the rock to the castle and buys Dobby
One top for each day of the year.

CHAPTER Twenty-Seven
PADFOOT'S RETURN WITH

One of the best things about pursuing a second job
While everyone was very interested in hearing the details of what
It takes place in the lake, which means Ron is getting
You'll share Harry's smile for once. Harry noticed that Ron's perception of events was subtly changing with each passing thought. Initially, he gave
The obvious is true; It fits Hermione’s story, anyway — Dumbledore put all the wizards in a huff .
They search Headmaster McGonagall's office, first assuring them that
He would be safe, and wake up when they came back up
water. But, a week later, Ron was telling an interesting story .
of withdrawals in which one fought single-handedly against fifty heavily armed mercenaries who had to beat him to cover before
You tied it.
“But I’ve hidden my wand over my shoulder,” Padma complained .
Patil, who seemed very protective of Ron now that he was getting a lot of attention and was making a point of talking to him .
O

' '
Every time they pass the streets. “I can take those
Meridize them anytime I want.”
“What are you going to do, snore on them?” Hermione said
with enthusiasm. People were so angry with her because she was a
Something Viktor Krum would appreciate a lot because it’s in the same context
tetchy attitude.
Ron's ears went red and then, he turned back to the enchanted
sleep version of events.
As they entered Mars, the weather turned gray, but drier.
The wind burns their hands and faces every time they step out to
foundation. There are delays in the order because animals are hard
He was moved out of the way. The brown owl that Harry had sent Sirius with the posters for Hogsmeade weekend showed up on Friday morning with half of his body curled up awkwardly .
way; Harry didn't finish Sirius' answer as he flew off,
He seemed afraid of being sent outside again.
Sirius' letter was almost as brief as the previous one.
Be at the end of Hogsmeade Street (past the Dervish and
banges) at two o’clock Saturday afternoon. Get the same
Eat as much as you can.
“He hasn’t returned to Hogsmeade yet?” Ron said in disbelief.
“Looks like him, doesn’t he?” Hermione said.
“I can’t believe it,” Harry groaned, “if he got caught . . .”
“He’s made it this far, though, hasn’t he?” Run said. “And not like
The place can’t be filled with greedy bastards.”
Harry flipped through the letter, thinking. If he was honest with himself, he really wanted to see Sirius again. So close

' '
The last lesson of the evening — double Potions — he feels a lot more excited than he usually does coming down from
steps to stores.
Malfoy, Krabbe, and Guyle were standing in an outdoor restaurant.
A classroom door with Pansy Parkinson's Slytherin Princess.
All of them were staring at something Harry couldn't see and were heartbroken. Pansy's pug-like face glared at her surroundings.
Goyle's frown widened as Harry, Ron, and Hermione approached.
“There they are, there they are!” She laughed, a voice of
The Slytherins were devastated. Harry saw that Pansy had a watch in it.
Hands — Witch of the Week. The picture looking at the front shows a
The dark haired witch who was grinning through her teeth and staring at a large
Sponge cake with its own flavour.
“I guess you’ll find something you like there, Granger!”
Pansy said aloud, and threw the magazine at Hermione, the
He holds it, looking confused. Meanwhile, the prison door
It opened, and Snape guided them all inside.
Hermione, Harry, and Ron walked over to a table behind the
prison as usual. Once Snape turned his back on them for
Write the ingredients of today's medicine on the board.
Hermione quickly glanced at the magazine under the desk. in
Last, on the opposite pages, Hermione finds what they’re looking for
for. Harry and Ron almost grinned. Beautiful picture of Harry
Heading to a short post titled:
Harry Potter Heartbreak
A boy unlike any other, perhaps — still a tortured child .
All the pain of childhood, writes Rita
Skitter. He’s been deprived of love since that tragic death.

' '
of his parents, fourteen-year-old Harry Potter
He thought he found resignation in his fierce girlfriend.
At Hogwarts, it was Hermione Granger who was Muggle-born.
Little did he know that he would soon suffer another emotional blow in a life already full of personal suffering.
Miss Granger, a short but determined girl, shows
You’ll have a taste of the famous wizards that Harry alone
He couldn't be satisfied. Since Arriving at Hogwarts Viktor Krum, The Bulgarian Researcher and the Ultimate Hero
The world champion of Quidditch, Miss Granger played with the passions of both boys. Chrome, wh
Mysteriously caught with the mischievous Mrs. Granger, he has
He had already invited her to visit him in Bulgaria for
summer holidays, and he insists that he “didn’t feel .
So about every other girl.”
However, perhaps it wasn’t Miss Granger’s dubious natural tresses that caught the attention of these unfortunate boys.
“She really messed up,” said a beautiful Pansy Parkinson .
and fourth-year student anxiously, “but she’ll be .
Well until the Love Potion mission, it got a lot of attention.
I think that’s how she did it.”
The love spell is, of course, forbidden at Hogwarts, and there’s no doubt that Albus would want Dumbledore
To validate these claims. Meanwhile, Harry
Those who wish Potter well must hope that, next time, he
He gives his heart to a more deserving candidate.

' '
“I told you!” Ron smiled at Hermione as she looked down at the
article. “I told you not to worry about Rita Skeeter! It pushes you to
Be some kind of — blonde!”
Hermione stopped looking surprised and roared with laughter.
“Black woman?” she repeated, rocking stifled lashes as
She looked at Ron.
“That’s what mom calls them,” Ron muttered, his ears going red .
red.
"If that's the best Rita can do, she's screwed," Hermione said, still giggling, as she dropped the Witch Weekly on the shelf .
A chair next to him. “What an old-fashioned kitchen sink.”
She looked up at Slytherin, they were all supposed to be
Harry approached the other side of the room to see if they were being annoyed by
article. Hermione gave them a mocking smile and a wave, and she,
Harry, and Run started unpacking the ingredients they would need
for their Wit-Sharpening magic.
“There’s something interesting, though,” Hermione said ten minutes .
later, she catches his body suspended from a scarab beetle.
“How could Rita Skeeter know . . . ?”
“Know what?” Ron said quietly. "You weren't paying
Love beads, have you?”
“Don’t be ridiculous,” Hermione whispered and started stroking him .
The doors too. “No, it’s . . . How did she know Viktor asked me?
Will you visit in the summer?”
Hermione blushed as she said this in determination.
You observed Ron’s eyes.
"what?" Ron said, brushing his clothes off with a loud bang.
“He asked me as soon as he pulled me out of the ocean,”

' '
She looked at Hermione. “After he took off his blue collar. madam
Pomfrey handed us two dishes then pulled me away somehow.
from the judges so they wouldn’t listen, and he said, if I don’t do
Something in the summer, I’d like to —”
“What did you say?” Run said, picking up his hat
And he was rolling it on the desk, a good six inches from her balls,
because he was focused on Hermione.
“And he said he didn’t feel the same way about anyone else,”
Hermione continued, going so pale that Harry almost felt
the warmth coming from her, “but how could Rita Skeeter hear .
he? She wasn’t there. . . Or was she? Maybe she had an invisibility cloak; Maybe she snuck out to the ground floor to check out the second job. . . .”
“What did you say?” Run repeated, hitting his wand.
down so hard that the desk shook.
“Well, I was too busy seeing if you and Harry were okay .
I -"
“Fascinating though your social life is undoubtedly, Mrs .
Granger,” a stern voice said directly behind them, and all three of them were .
jump, “I have to ask you not to use it in my class. Ten points
From Gryffindor.”
Snape had rushed over to their desk as they talked. the
The darkness was now facing them; Malfoy took the opportunity to tease POTTER STINKS across the courtyard to Harry.
"Oh . . . Do they read magazines under the table as well?” snap
he added, holding up the copy of Witch Weekly. “Ten more points .
From Gryffindor . . . oh but really . . .” Snape's black eyes sparkled when they landed on Rita Skeeter's article. “Potter needs to move on .
with its media outlets. . . .”

' '
The dungeon roared with Slytherin laughter, and an uncomfortable sneer curved Snape's thin mouth. To Harry’s anger, he started
to read the article aloud.
“ 'The Harry Potter Heartbreak . . . Dear, dear, Potter, what's wrong with you now? 'A boy who doesn't like another, probably . . .' ”
Harry could feel his face burning. Snape was stopping at the end.
of each sentence to leave the Slytherins laughing heartily. article
It looked ten times worse when Snape read it. Even Hermione was
white with hair now.
“ '. . . Those who wish Harry Potter well should hope that next time he gives his heart to a more deserving candidate.' How very touching,”
snapped Snape, pushing the magazine towards the fiery termination of the
Laughter from the Slytherins. “Well, I think it’s better to share .
All three of you, so you can keep your focus on your healings rather
Not about your messy love life. Weasley, stay here. miss
Granger, there, next to Mrs. Parkinson. Potter — the painting in
in front of my desk. walk. now."
Angrily, Harry threw his suitcases and bag into his trunk and pulled across the lobby into the void .
table. Snape followed suit and sat down at his desk, watching Harry unpack his wall. Determined not to look at Snape, Harry became fond of his scarab horns, thinking everyone would
I have Snape's face.
"All this media attention seems to be blowing your already big ass off, Potter," Snape snapped, when the rest of the class
He lies down again.
Harry didn't answer. He knew Snape was trying to distract him;
He had done this before. No doubt, he was waiting for an excuse to
take a short round from Gryffindor before the end of class.

' '
“Perhaps you’re laboring under the mistaken impression that the entire wizarding world is infatuated with you,” Snape said, simply .
No one else could hear him (Harry continued to whisper his
Scarab beetles, although he has already reduced them to a
fine powder), “but I don’t care how many times your picture appears in the papers. To me, Potter, you’re nothing more than a naughty little boy who believes the rules beneath him.”
Harry put the powdered worms into his pot and started.
He plucks his ginger roots. His hands were shaking slightly from
Anger, but he kept his eyes down, as if he couldn't hear what
Snape was listening to him.
“Then I’ll give you fair warning, Potter,” Snape continued in a rhetorical tone .
and a more cheerful tone, “pint-sized celebrity or not — if I catch
You come into my office again—”
“I’m not anywhere near your office!” Harry said angrily.
He forgot his sense of smell.
“Don’t lie to me,” Snape said, his shapeless black eyes piercing .
In Harry's. “The Bumslang Monster. Gillywood. Both come from my
private stores, and I know who rented them.”
Harry glanced at Snape, determined not to stare or frown
guilty. In fact, he didn't steal any of these things from Snape.
Hermione got Boomslang's skin on their second.
year — were needed for the Polyjuice pipeline — and while
Snape was suspicious of Harry at the time, he couldn’t
Show it. Dobby, of course, stole the gillyweed.
“I don’t know what you’re talking about,” Harry lied coldly.
“You got out of bed the night my office was broken into!”
Snape sighed. “I know, Potter! Now, it is possible
They have joined your fan club, but I do not condone your behavior!

' '
One more overnight stay in my office, Potter, would
pay!
“Of course,” Harry grinned, going back to his ginger roots. "sick
Consider that if I ever intend to go in there.”
Snape's eyes widened. He placed his hand on the inside of her wrist.
black dress. For a brief moment, Harry thought Snape was
He was about to draw his wand and impale him—then he saw that
Snape produced a small crystal bottle of a completely clear liquid. Harry stared at her.
“Do you know what that is, Potter?” Snape said, his eyes twinkling dangerously again.
“No,” Harry said, with complete honesty this time.
“It’s the Veritaserum — a Power of Truth so powerful that it’s three dimensional .
Feel free to unleash your inner secret for the rest of this post
You’ll hear,” Snape said mischievously. “Now the use of the pesticide is governed by very strict departmental guidelines. But if you don’t see
Your behavior, you might just find that my hand sweats” — he chuckled .
a little crystal bottle — “exactly about your afternoon tea.
And then, the button . . . Then we will find out if you are in my
office or not.”
Harry didn't say anything. He went back to his ginger roots once.
More, he picked up his knife and started chopping them up again. It didn’t work.
Like the voice of the All-Truth, neither will he let it pass
Snape would whisper something to him. He loses mercy at the thought of
What might come out of his mouth if Snape did it . . . quite
Thanks to landing a lot of people in trouble — Hermione
and Dobby for starters — there were all the other things he was .
hide . . . As in the case of Sirius . . .
And—his insides curling at the thought—how he felt about .

' '
Cu. . . . He puts his ginger roots in the pot as well, and
He wondered if he should take a leaf out of Moody’s book and
Start drinking only from a special hip flask.
There was a knock at the prison door.
“Come in,” Snape said in his usual voice.
The class murmured as the door opened. Professor Karkaroff
He came in. Everyone watched as he walked towards Snape
desk. He was running his finger over his goat’s tail and looking
He was crushed.
“We need to talk,” Karkaroff whispered as he reached 100.
Snap. He seemed so determined that no one would listen to what he had to say.
He was saying that he was about to open his lips; It’s like he
they were a very poor ventriloquist. Harry kept his eyes on his ginger.
Roots, listen hard.
“I’ll talk to you after my lesson, Karkaroff,” Snape shrugged, but .
Karkaroff interrupted.
“I want to talk now, while you cannot make it out, Severus. Are you
You’re hurting me.”
“After the lesson,” Snape said quietly.
Under the pretext of getting a measuring cup to see if
Taking several Armadillo hides, Harry shot a sideways glance
In both of them. Karkaroff looked very shocked, and Snape
She looked angry.
Karkaroff was hovering behind Snape’s desk for as long as
period. He seemed intent on stopping Snape from leaving.
at the end of school. Keen to hear what Karkaroff has to say,
Harry knocked back on his tub of Armadillo soup with
Two minutes to go the distance, which gave him an excuse to jump

' '
back of his car and enjoy it while the rest of the class
She looked enviously at the door.
“What’s going faster?” He heard Snape whispering to Karkaroff.
“This,” Karkaroff said, was Harry, fiddling with the edge of his
coffee, he saw Karkaroff pull the left arm of his apron and
Show Snape something on his inner arm.
"Well?" Karkaroff said, still doing his best not to smile .
yeast. “See? It’s never been that clear, never since —”
“Put it down!” snapped Snape, his black eyes scanning the classroom.
“But you must have noticed —” Karkaroff began with an excited
sound.
“We can talk later, Karkarof!” He pulled out the Snap. "ear! What are you?
did?"
"Clean up my armadillo mess, Professor," Harry whispered, straightening up and showing Snape the rag that was
catching.
Karkaroff spun on his heel and stormed out of the prison. he
She looked both worried and angry. I don’t want to be alone and
An extremely angry Snape, Harry packed his books and luggage back into his trunk and stormed off to tell Ron and
Hermione what he had just made clear.
They left the castle at dawn the next morning to find the faint silver sun.
It shines on the earth. The weather was better than it was.
He had been all year, and when they arrived at Hogsmeade, all
Three of them took off their clothes and threw them on the ground.
Their shoulders. The food Sirius told them to bring was in

' '
Harry’s girlfriend; They brought up twelve legs of chicken, loaf of bread.
and a flask of olive oil from the dinner table.
Login to Gladrags Wizardwear to purchase a ticket for
Dobby, where they were delighted with the best selection of tops
He could find, including two in shining gold and silver
stars, and someone else who screamed loudly when they too became
It has a smell. Then, at half-past four, they made their way to the beach .
The road, past the Dervish and the Banges, climbed into the middle of the
village.
Harry had never been down this road before. The fall
The road was leading them out to the pine village around the
Hogsmeade. Houses are few here, and their gardens
major; They were going down the mountain in
The shadow of Hogsmeade stands. Then they turned the corner and
I only have one style at the end of the aisle. waiting for them, his front paws
On the top bar, there was a very large, furry black dog that
She was carrying some newspapers in her mouth and looking very
familiar. . . .
“Hi, Sirius,” Harry said when they reached him.
The black dog sniffed Harry's bag gently, rubbing his tail once.
and then turned and began trotting past them across the lawn.
a thin layer of ground sticking out to meet the foot of the steep mountain.
Harry, Ron, and Hermione climbed up the stairs and followed them.
Sirius led them to the bottom of the mountain, where the
The ground was covered with rocks and stones. It was easy for him,
On all fours, but Harry, Run, and Hermione soon burst
of breath. They followed Sirius farther and farther up the mountain itself.
For nearly half an hour they climb a steep, steep, and rocky mountain

' '
Road, following Sirius's flickering heel, gliding in the sun, the heels of Harry's sock tickling his fingers.
Then, finally, Sirius was out of sight, and when they arrived
The place where he collapsed, they saw a hard bump in the
rock. They slammed into it and found themselves in a cold, dark
An enchanted cave. Tied at the end of it, one end of its strap around a
Stone, there’s Buckbeak and the woodpecker. Half gray horse, half large bear, Buckbeak's blue eyes widened when he saw them. all
Three of them bowed low to him, and after looking at them dumbfoundedly for a moment, Buckbeak snapped his front paws shyly, letting Hermione rush forward and stroke his feathered neck.
Harry, however, was staring at the black dog, who had just taken
He became a surrogate father.
Sirius was wearing a torn suit of armor; Those are the only
Wore when he got out of Azkaban. Her black hair is more
It was when it went up in smoke, and it wasn’t pretty and
Matted again. It looks very thin.
"chicken!" He said sarcastically as he deleted the old Daily Prophets
from his mouth and tosses them down onto the cave floor.
Harr y opened his bag and pr ovided the bottle of
Chicken legs and bread.
“Thanks,” Sirius said, opening it, grabbing a blanket, and sitting down .
down on the cave floor, and he rips a huge hole with his teeth.
“I was living with animals mostly. I can’t steal much food from
Hogsmeade; I’ll draw attention to myself.”
He smiled at Harry, but Harry replied no the grain
with reluctance.
“What are you doing here, Sirius?” he said.

' '
“I’ll continue my duty as a babyfather,” Sirius said, cracking a smile .
Pork ribs with a very canine appearance. “Don’t worry about it, I’m making a lovable fool of myself.”
He was still smiling, but when he saw the concern on Harry's face, he said
More seriously, “I want to be in that position. Your last letter. . . Well,
Let’s just say things are getting worse. I was stealing the paper.
Every time someone uploads one, and with random quotes, I
He’s not the only one worried.”
He frowned at the Everlasting Prophets that appeared yellow on the cave floor, and .
Ron picked them up and unfolded them. Harry, however, continued to glare at Sirius.
“What if they catch you? What if they see you?”
"You three and Dumbledore are the only ones around here for . . ."
They know I’m an Animagus,” Sirius sighed, and continued .
Eat chicken leg.
Ron shouted at Harry and passed him the Daily Prophecies. there
There are two: the first is titled The Mysterious Disease of Bartemius .
Crouch, secondly, the Women's Ministry is still missing — the Minister of
Magic Now itself.
Harry scanned the story about Crouch. The findings appeared in
Him: hasn’t been seen in public since November . . . The house appears
is created . . . St. John's Hospital; Mungo for magical diseases and injuries
Reject the view . . . The department declined to comment on the protests
disease. . . .
“You’re making it look like he’s dying,” Harry said quietly.
“But he can’t be that sick if he manages to get up here. . . .”
“My brother Crouch’s personal assistant,” Ron said to Sirius.
“He said Crouch was suffering from overwork.”

' '
“Mind you, he looked sick, the last time I saw him up close,” he said
Harry sighed, still reading the story. “The night my name came up .
of cups. . . .”
“He’s going to get his comeuppance for stabbing Winky, isn’t he?” said
Hermione, an edge to her voice. She was teasing Buckbeak, who
He was nibbling on Sirius's pork ribs. “I bet he wishes he hadn’t
He does now — bet he feels the difference now she’s not there as much
Take care of her.”
“Hermione is obsessed with pet pigs,” Ron murmured to Sirius,
shooting Hermione a sideways glance. Sirius, however, seemed interested.
“Crouch cut his house badge?”
“Yeah, at the Quidditch World Cup,” Harry said, and he .
set in the Dark Mark’s evolutionary story, and Winky .
He was found with Harry's wand clutched in his hand, and Mr.
Crouch's anger. When Harry finished, Sirius was on his knees
Once more and began to pace up and down the cave.
“Let me get this straight,” he said after a moment, waving a .
Fresh chicken leg. “You first saw the elf in the Top Box. She was saving Crouch a spot, right?”
“Of course,” Harry, Ron, and Hermione all said.
“But Crouch didn’t come out to the meeting?”
“No,” Harry said. “I think he said he was too busy.”
Sirius walked all through the cave in silence. Then he said, “Harry, .
Did you look in your pockets on your coat after leaving the Summit?
box?"
“Erm . . .” Harry thought hard. “No,” he finally said. "I don't know
We have to use it before we get to the forest. And then I put my hand.
In my pocket, and all that’s there is my Omniocular.” he

' '
She looked at Sirius. “You’re saying Mark’s designer stole .
my potatoes in the Upper Pot?”
"Possibly," Sirius said.
“Winky didn’t steal the cock!” Hermione insisted.
“It wasn’t the only pig in the photo,” Sirius said, grimacing .
furrowed as he continued walking. “Who else was staying behind .
you?"
“A lot of people,” Harry said. “Some Bulgarian ministers . . .
Cornelius Fudge . . . The Malfoys . . .”
“The Malfoys!” Run said suddenly, loud enough to his voice
echoed throughout the cave, and Buckbeak shook his head in confusion. “I bet you’re Lucius Malfoy!”
“Is there anyone else?” Sirius said.
“No one,” Harry said.
“Yeah, there was, there was Ludo the Bagman,” Hermione pointed out .
he.
"Oh . . .”
“I don’t know anything about Bagman except that he used to exist .
Wimbourne’s bastard,” Sirius said, still going. “What is
favourite?"
“It’s no good,” Harry said. “He’s always offering to help me with .
Triwizard Edition.”
“Is he, now?” Sirius said, nodding more slowly. “I ask
Why would he do that?”
“He said he took a liking to me,” Harry said.
“Hmm,” Sirius said, looking at him thoughtfully.
“We spotted him in the forest just before the dark mark,”
Hermione told Sirius. "remember?" She told Harry and Ron.

' '
“Yeah, but he didn’t stay in the forest, did he?” Run said. "the
The moment we told him about the rumor, he left for the bus stop.”
“How did you know?” Hermione shot back. “How do you know
Where did he come from?”
“And from him,” Ron said in disbelief. “If you say you
Do you think Ludo bagman invented the blue mark?”
"It's more likely he did it than Winky," Hermione said .
with the head.
“I told you,” Ron said, looking at Sirius meaningfully, “I told you .
She feels homesick —”
But Sirius raised his hand to silence Ron.
“When the Dark Mark was discovered, and the elf was
He was discovered holding Harry’s wand, what did Crouch do?”
“Go look in the woods,” said Harry, “but there’s no one else there.”
“Of course,” Sirius said, looking up and down, “of course, .
He would want to base it on none other than his elf . . . And then he
did he lose?”
“Yeah,” said Hermione in a quivering voice, “it pissed her off, just because she didn’t stay in her tent and let herself be fucked—”
“Hermione, you’re going to give him a rest with the lord!” Run said.
Sirius shook his head and said, 'She's the size of Crouch .
Better than what you had, Ron. If you want to know what a guy is like,
Watch carefully how he treats those around him, not those around him.”
He ran his hand over his impassive face, clearly thinking hard.
“All this Barty Crouch nonsense . . . He went to trouble.
of ensuring that his home bond will save him a place in Quidditch
World Cup, but he’s not going to get out and watch anymore. It works

' '
It’s pretty hard to pick up a Triwizard edition, and then it stops
Going to that as well. . . . It wasn’t like Crouch. If it takes a day
I was off work due to illness before that, I’d eat Buckbeak.”
“You know Crouch, then?” Harry said.
Sirius' face fell. Suddenly he seemed just as concerned.
There was the night he met Harry for the first time, the night Harry was still
He believed Sirius was a saint.
“Oh I know Crouch so well,” he said quietly. “He was the one .
who ordered me to be sent to Azkaban—without
trial."
"what?" exclaimed Ron and Hermione together.
“You’re kidding!” Harry said.
“No, I’m not,” Sirius said, taking another big bite of milk.
“Crouch used to be the head of the Magical Law Enforcement Bureau, didn’t you know?”
Harry, Run, and Hermione nodded their heads.
"He's expected to be the next minister of magic," Sirius said.
“He is a great wizard, Barty Crouch, a powerful wizard—and .
Hunger for energy. Oh never a Voldemort member,” he said, reading
The look on Harry's face. “No, Barty Crouch always spoke very strongly against the dark side. But then a lot of people are
Against the dark side . . . Well, you don’t understand. . . you
Very small. . . .”
"That's what Dad said at the World Cup," Ron said, with a
A trace of irritation in his voice. “Try us, why don’t you?”
A smile spread across Sirius' pale face.
“All right, I will try you. . . .” He walked once up the cave, back
Again, then he said, “Imagine that Voldemort has the power now. you
She doesn't know who her friends are, she doesn't know who works.

' '
For him he is who we are not; You know he can manipulate people into being
They commit terrible acts without being able to control themselves. you
You fear for yourself, and your family, and your friends. Each week,
The news is coming in with more deaths, more injuries, more deaths . . . The Ministry of Magic is in disarray, they don’t know what
In order to work, they try to hide everything from the Muggles,
But at the same time, Muggles are dying too. Terrorism everywhere . . .
panic . . . confusion . . . That's how it used to be.
“Well, times like this bring out the best in some people and
kindness in others. Crouch’s principles may have been good at first — I don’t know. It was quickly raised by the Ministry,
And he started ordering very harsh measures against Voldemort
The leaders. Aurors were given new powers — the ability to kill .
Rather than being arrested, for example. And I’m not the only one who
It is given directly to victims without charge. Croc fought
committed violence, and authorizes the use of Unforgivable
Lean against the suspects. I would say he became more ruthless and vicious.
Like many on the dark side. He had his advisors, mind you —
Many people thought he was going in the right direction.
And there are a lot of witches and wizards begging him to
Take on the engineering minister. When Voldemort fell, it
It seemed like it was only a matter of time until Crouch got the top job. but
Then something unfortunate happened. . . .” Sirius smiled.
with enthusiasm. “Crouch’s own son was captured with a squad of Death .
Eaters who managed to talk their way out of Azkaban. Apparently they were trying to find Voldemort and bring him back to power.”
“Crouch’s son was taken?” exclaimed Hermione.
“Yeah,” Sirius said, sticking his pig lips to Buckbeak, .
He threw himself down on the ground beside the bread,

' '
And it breaks it in half. “A nice little hug for old Barty, I would think.
He needs to spend a bit more time at home with his family.
Shouldn't I? He has to leave the office early once in a while . . .
He knew his own son.”
He started slicing large pieces of bread.
“Is the son a death row?” Harry said.
“No idea,” Sirius said, still chewing bread. “I was in Azkaban myself when he was transported.
I’ve been out ever since. The boy got really stuck in the kitchen.
The 10 people I’d bet my life on are Death Eaters — but he might have
He was in the wrong place at the wrong time, like a homebody.”
“Did Crouch try to get his son out?” Hermione whispered.
Sirius let out a laugh that was much closer to a whisper.
“Crouch let his son get away? I think you have the equivalent.
Hermione! Anything that can discredit his name has
He will go; He dedicated his entire life to becoming a minister of
Magic. You saw him free a housekeeper who sacrificed herself for fusing him once again with the Dark Mark — that doesn’t tell you what .
He’s like? The affection of Crouch’s father grows too strong to
Give the kid a try, and by all accounts, it’s not too much more
An excuse for Crouch to show how much he hates the boy . . . so
He sent him straight to Azkaban.”
“He gave his son to the poor?” Harry asked suddenly.
“Right,” Sirius said, and he didn’t look remotely pleased .
now. “I’ve seen dementors get it, I see them clearly .
The bars at the entrance of my cell. He couldn’t have been more than nineteen.
They took him to a cell near mine. He was screaming for his.
Mother overnight. It did calm down after a few days, though . . .

' '
They were all silent at the end . . . Only when they shouted in
Their sleep. . . .”
For a moment, the dead look in Sirius' eyes became more .
They’re more aligned than ever, as if the shops are closing behind them.
“So he’s still in Azkaban?” Harry said.
“No,” Sirius said flatly. “No, he was not there. dead
About a year after they took him.”
"dead?"
"He wasn't the only one," Sirius whispered. “Most are mad at
There, and many stop eating at the end. They crave the will to live.
You can always tell when death is coming, because the dwarfs can sense it, they get excited. The boy is beautiful.
He was sick when he arrived. Crouch being a valuable member of the ministry, he and his wife got to visit the morgue. This is the last
Once I saw Barty Crouch, half carrying his wife cross my living room. she
She died herself, apparently, shortly afterwards. grief. It’s just lost.
Like that boy. Crouch didn’t come over for his son’s body. Volunteers
He buried him outside the prison; I watched them do it.”
Sirius set aside the cake he had just lifted to his mouth and
Instead he picked up the flask of soup and drained it.
“So old Crouch lost it all, just when he thought he’d made it,”
He continued, wiping his mouth with the back of his hand. "one
moment, he’s a kid, preparing to become the minister of magic . . . Next, its
The son is dead, his wife is dead, the family name is invalid, and, so I have
They have been listening since I ran away, a big voice in the crowd. Once he had the boy
died, people started to worry a bit more about his son
And he started asking how a nice young boy from a nice family was
It went badly. The conclusion was that his father never cared

' '
So much for him. Well, Cornelius Fudge got the top job, and Crouch
He was sidelined to the Office of International Rescue Cooperation.”
There was a long silence. Harry was thinking about the way.
Crouch's eyes widened as he looked down at his disobedient wife.
house-elf is back in the wild at the Quidditch World Cup. this,
Then it must have been the reason Crouch was angry with Winky because he was
Found under the green mark. He restored the memories of
his son, a former villain, and his fall from grace in the ministry.
“Moody says Crouch is obsessed with capturing Dark wizards,”
Harry told Sirius.
“Yeah, I heard he’s become a bit of a snob with it,” Sirius said, smirking. “If you ask me, he still thinks he can get
ancient ritual by pursuing another Death Eater.”
“And he snuck out here to search Snape’s office!” Ron said triumphantly, looking at Hermione.
"Yeah, and that doesn't make any sense at all," Sirius said.
“Yes, there is!” Ron said excitedly, but Sirius shook his head.
“Listen, if Crouch wants to investigate Snape, why not .
were they coming to dominate the championship? It would be a perfect excuse.
To visit Hogwarts regularly and keep an eye on him.”
“So you think Snape might be on to something, then?” asked
Harry, but Hermione intervened.
“Look, I don’t care what you say, Dumbledore trusts Snape —”
“Oh give him a rest, Hermione,” Ron growled. "I know
Dumbledore is brilliant and all, but that doesn’t mean a true Dark wizard can’t beat him—”
"Why did Snape save Harry's life in first year, then?" why
Didn’t he just let him die?”

' '
“I don’t know—maybe he thought Dumbledore would lose it .
out -"
“What do you think, Sirius?” Harry said loudly, and Ron and
Hermione stopped arguing to listen.
"I think they're both right," Sirius said, looking at Ron and Hermione thoughtfully. “Ever since I found out Snape taught here, I’ve been wondering why Dumbledore had him. Snape always
He was fascinated by the dark arts and was known for it at school.
Slimy, greasy, greasy-haired, he was,” Sirius added, and Harry was .
Ron mumbled between them. “Snape knew more curses when he arrived at the school than half the seventh year children, and he was part of
One group of slytherins turned out to be almost entirely death eaters.”
Sirius shrugged and began shouting names.
“Rosier and Wilkes — they were both killed by Aurors in 1990 .
Before Voldemort fell. The Lestranges — a couple —
They were in Azkaban. Avery — from what I’ve heard he’s made his mistake .
way out of trouble by saying he was acting under Imperius
Thankfully — he’s still in jail. But as far as I know, Snape wasn’t even
He was condemned as death row — not that that makes much sense. quite
Six of them were never caught. And Snape really is protective and strict.
He got to keep himself out of trouble.”
“Snape knew Karkaroff well, but he wanted to keep that to himself .
Quiet,” Ron said.
“Yeah, you should have seen Snape’s face when Karkaroff turned .
Up in Potions yesterday!” Harry said quietly. “Karkaroff wanted to .
She talked to Snape and he said Snape was avoiding him. Karkaroff looked
I was really scared. He showed something to Snape in his hand, but I
He couldn’t see what it was.”
“Did he show Snape anything in his hand?” Sirius said, looking

' '
Honestly they are awesome. He ran his fingers awkwardly through hers
Dirty dancing, then he rubbed his cock again. “Well, I don’t know what that
about . . . But if Karkaroff is really worried, and will
Snape for answers . . .”
Sirius looked at the cave wall, then made a panicked expression.
“There’s still the possibility that Dumbledore trusts Snape, and I know .
Dumbledore trusted where most other people didn’t, but I just
I can’t see him letting Snape teach at Hogwarts if it works
For Voldemort.”
“Why Moody and Crouch are so anxious to get into Snape’s office .
So?" Ron said quietly.
“Well,” Sirius said quietly, “I’m not going to pass Mad-Eye on to .
They said in every single headmaster's office when he arrived at Hogwarts. He vigorously asserts his defense against the dark arts,
moody. I don’t think he trusted anyone, and behind the scenes he was
It is seen, not surprisingly. I would say this to Moody, but, never
He killed if he could help it. He always brought people live where he could. He was powerful, but never stooped to the level of
Death Eaters. Crutch, but . . . He’s a different matter. . . Is he
Is he really sick? If he was, why did he make the effort to pull himself up to
Snape's office? And if it wasn’t . . . What did he have? What was
He performed in the all-important World Cup and didn’t appear in the
The Upper Table? What was he doing when he should have been
fairness of the race?”
Sirius was lost in silence, still staring at the cave wall. Mouth of the Beast
He was rummaging through the rocky depths, looking for bones that could
They got to know. Finally, Sirius looked at Ron.
“You claim to be a spy for Brother Crouch himself? Every opportunity
Can you ask if he’s seen Crouch lately?”

' '
“I can try,” Ron said skeptically. “It’s better not to make it sound like .
I think Crouch was on to something silly, though. Loved Percy
stay."
“And you can try to find out if they have any leads .
About Bertha Jorkins while you’re at it,” Sirius said, pointing to the
The second Christmas of every day.
"Bagman told me they haven't," Harry said.
"Yeah, it's mentioned in the article over there," Sirius said, nodding at .
the paper. “Blustering about how Bertha’s memory has been lost. Well,
She may have changed since I knew her, but the Bertha I knew wasn’t
He forgot all about it—for nothing. She was a little chubby, but she had
best practices for conversations. He was getting her into a lot of trouble; She didn’t know when to keep her mouth shut. I can see it.
taking on a bit of responsibility in the Ministry of Magic . . . Maybe that’s
Why didn't Bagman bother to look for her long ago. . . .”
Sirius heaved a huge sigh and rubbed his shadowed eyes.
“What time is it?”
Harry looked at his watch and then remembered that it hadn't worked since he spent over an hour at the ocean.
“It’s half past five,” Hermione said.
"You'd better get back to school," Sirius said, rising to his feet.
“Now listen . . .” He looked especially serious at Harry. "I don't
Want to sneak out of school to see me, okay? Just send
I have ideas here. I still want to hear about anything odd. but
You weren't going to leave Hogwarts without permission; to be
A good opportunity for someone to challenge you.”
“No one has tried to attack me yet, except a dragon and two humans .
bright blues,” Harry said, but Sirius blinked at him.
“He doesn’t like me . . . I will breathe freely again when this tournament is played

' '
arrived, and that’s not until June. And don’t forget, if you’re calling
For me among you, call me Snuffles, okay?”
He handed Harry the towel and the empty glass and went to grab it.
Goodbye bookbeak. “I’ll walk downtown with you,”
Sirius said, “see if I can squeeze in more paper.”
He became a big black dog after they left the
cave, and followed him to the side of the mountain,
On the rocky ground, and back to the exit. Here
He let each of them pat him on the head, before turning and
set in a walk in the middle of the village. Harry, Run,
And Hermione they made their way back to Hogsmeade, up towards Hogwarts.
“I wonder if Percy knows all that about Crouch?” Run said
As they drove to the castle. “But maybe not .
Try . . . It might just make him love Crouch more.
Yes, Percy liked rules. It would just mean Crouch refused to break
Ten to his own son.”
“Percy wouldn’t throw any of his family to the wizards,”
Hermione said anxiously.
"I don't know," Ron said. “If he thought we were standing in .
The way of his life . . . Percy is really stupid, you know. . . .”
They walked along the stone steps to the gate hall, where the
The smell of a delicious dinner wafted to them from the Great Hall.
“Poor old snuffles,” said Ron, breathing heavily. “It really should be .
Like you, Harry. . . . Imagine having to travel on horseback.”

Chapter Twenty-Eight
CONSTITUTION OF
Sir. ACRUS

Harry, Ron, and Hermione went to the Owler after
Breakfast on Monday to send a letter to Percy, to be asked, as
Sirius had suggested, if he had seen Mr. Crouch lately. they
She used Hedwig, because she hadn't had a job in a long time.
When she was spotted slipping out of sight in the Owlery
window, they went down to the kitchen to give Dobby his
New shirts.
The house helpers responded with great cheers, bowed and
Curt-synging and getting ready for tea again. Dobby was excited about his performance.
“Harry Potter is so much better than Dobby!” He screamed, wiping the big one.
Tears welled up in her wide eyes.
“You saved my life with that squirrel, Dobby, for sure,”
Harry said.
“No need for more of those Clairs, is there?” said Run, who
He was looking at the glowing and squirming domestic pig.
“You just ate breakfast!” Hermione said bitterly, but she's great
the silver display of eclairs was already facing them, supported by four elephants.
“We need to get some stuff to send to Snuffles,” Harry said .
he said.
“That’s a good idea,” Ron said. “Give the pigs something to do. You can’t
Give us a little extra food, will you?” He told the bystanders
elves, and they went wild and took some more.
“Dobby, where’s Winky?” said Hermione, who looked
around.
“Winky’s over there by the fire, lady,” Dobby said quietly, his
The ears droop slightly.
“Dear,” Hermione said as she looked at Winky.
Harry looked at the fire too. Winky was sitting on
Like last time, but she let herself become
She thought so much that she was immediately indistinguishable from
pit of smoke behind him. His clothes were ragged and
It is not washed. She was clutching a rainbow beer bottle and sobbing.
A little away from her chair, staring at the fire. As they see it, she
He gave a big hug.
“Winky goes through six bottles a day now,” Dobby whispered to Harry.
“Well, you’re not strong enough, that,” Harry said.
But Dobby shook his head. “ 'Tis strong for a house-elf, sir,” he said .
said.
Winky came back with a hug. Those bastards who got the Clairs
He gave her disapproving looks when they got back to work.
“Winky is shy, Harry Potter,” Dobby said sadly.
“Winky wants to go home. Winky still thinks Mr. Crouch is her
Master, master, and nothing Dobby says will convince her that Professor Dumbledore is her master now.”
“Hey, Winky,” Harry said, caught off guard, walking over to her and growling, “you don’t know what Master is.
Crouch can be up to, you? because it stopped appearing
They will dominate the Triwizard Championship.”
Winky’s eyes widened. His older pupils focused on Harry.
She blushed slightly again and then said, “M — Mr. and .
Has he stopped — hic — coming?”
“Yeah,” Harry said, “we haven’t seen him since the first job. the
Every day the Prophet says he is sick.”
Winky repeated a few more steps, staring at Harry curiously.
“Master — hic — sick?”
His lower lips began to grow.
"But we don't know if it's true," Hermione whispered.
“Master needs — hic — his Winky!” said the fox.
“A teacher can’t — hic — manage — hic — all by himself. . . .”
“Other people got to do their homework, you know, .
Winky,” Hermione sighed.
“Winky — hic — not only — hic — does housework for .
Mr. Cruz!” Winky yelled angrily, shaking more than
Always a draft beer with its already overcrowded
blouse. “The teacher is — hic — trusting Winky with — hic — n .
The most important — hic — the most important —”
"what?" Harry said.
But Winky shook her head violently and poured more rain beer
Under himself.
“Winky took — hic — her master’s secret,” she murmured, very nervous now, looking at Harry with her .
Eyes closed. “You’re a — hic — squirrel, are you.”
“Winkie shouldn’t have talked to Harry Potter like that!” Dobby said angrily. “Harry Potter is powerful and charming and Harry Potter is not
The nose!
“He was looking — hic — in — hic — my master’s private and .
Mystery — hic — Winkie is a good household member — hic — Winkie takes care
His silence — hic — people trying to — hic — sneak and peck —
good afternoon -"
Winky’s eyes sunk and suddenly, without realizing it, she
She rolled out of her car into the fire, shaking loudly. The cup is empty.
of butterbeer spilled onto the floor with a stone spout. half of
A dozen house elves came rushing forward, looking pained. one
In them they lifted the bottle; The others covered Winky with a
The large tablecloth is balanced and the ends are tucked in nicely, hiding it
From the perspective.
“We’re sorry you had to witness this, ladies and gentlemen!” He shouted
Approaching the elf, he shakes his head and looks very embarrassed. “We hope you don’t judge us all by Winky, ladies and gentlemen!”
“She’s not happy!” Hermione said, excited. “Why don’t you be
Try to cheer her up instead of teasing her?”
“I beg your pardon, ma’am,” the house member said, bowing low .
Also, “but pets don’t have the right to be unhappy when it’s .
the work to be done and the leaders to be hired.”
“Oh for heaven’s sake!” Hermione cried. “Listen to me, all of .
you! You have every right as magicians to be unhappy! possess
You are entitled to pay and holidays and proper clothing, you are not
You’ve got to do everything you’re told—see Dobby!”
“The mistress will keep Dobby out of this,” Dobby smirked,
He looks scared. Tears of joy rolled down the faces of
pets near the living room. At the same time they were looking at
Hermione seems to be possessive and dangerous.
“We’ve got your extra food!” An ox screamed at Harry's shoulder, and
He pulled out a large piece of bread, a dozen cookies, and some fruit in Harry's
considered. "goodbye!"
The pets filled in on Harry, Run, and Hermione
And they started taking them out of the kitchen, lots of little hands
Pressing into the small of their feet.
“Thanks for your hat, Harry Potter!” Dobby called wearily from the fire, where he was standing in front of the
the kitchen that was Winky.
“You can’t keep your mouth shut, can you, Hermione?”
Ron said excitedly as the kitchen door closed behind them.
“They don’t want us to visit them now! We can try to get
More stuff from Winky on Crouch!”
“Oh you seem to like this!” said Hermione. “You just love
down here for the food!”
It was a crappy kind of day after that. Harry was so tired of Run.
and Hermione teasing each other about their homework in
The common room that brought the Sirius kitchen up to the Owlery i
The afternoon on itself.
The pigwidgeon was too small to carry a whole turkey up to
mountain by itself, so Harry enlisted the help of two schools
Peel the potatoes the same way. When they went out into the night, they looked
It’s awkward that he got the big bridge between them, Harry
He leaned against the window, staring at the floor, at the darkness,
the tops of the trees of the forbidden forest, and the glowing
The wall of Durmstrang. The dragon dragon emerged from a puff of smoke.
comes from Hagrid’s bathroom; She went out to the castle, about
of the Owlery, and is incredible. Looking down, he saw Harry Hagrid
He clapped vigorously in front of his pack. Harry wondered what it was
He was working; Looks like he was making fresh vegetables.
patch. As he watched, Madame Maxime got out of the Beauxbatons carriage and walked over to Hagrid. She seemed to be trying to engage him in conversation. Hagrid leaned on his wand.
but he did not seem to wish to extend their conversation, for Madame
Maxime returned to the car shortly after.
He didn't want to go back to Gryffindor Tower and listen to Ron and
Hermione chittered between them, and Harry watched Hagrid dig
Until darkness enveloped him and the fairies around Harry began to fade away, flickering before him into the night.
By breakfast the next day, Ron and Hermione's bad mood was
It filled in, and to Harry’s surprise, Ron’s middle-class signals that
Housewives to send substandard food up to Gryffindor
The painting because Hermione had burned them looked false; potato
eggs, and kippers are as good as ever.
When the post rabbits arrived, Hermione looked pleased; she
He seemed to be waiting for something.
"Percy didn't have time to answer," Ron said. “We just sent
Hedwig yesterday.”
"No, it's not that," Hermione said. “I removed the review
For Christmas every day. I’m sick of finding out everything from
of Slytherin.”
“Good thinking!” Harry said, also turning to the goblins. "Hey,
Hermione, I think you’re lucky —”
A dragonfly was flying down towards Hermione.
"She doesn't have a journal, though," she said, looking puzzled. "is -"
But to his horror, the gray toy collapsed in front of him
plate, followed closely by four barn owls, a barn owl, and a tawny owl.
“How many souls did you take down?” Harry said, grabbing
Hermione's Cup before it was knocked over by a bunch of
The spiders, all of them were crowding around him, trying to get
A letter from myself first.
“What on earth — ?” Hermione said, taking the letter out of the
The gray bear, opening it, began to read. "oh really!" She let out and walked through the red light.
"what's up?" Run said.
“It’s — oh how sad —”
She held out the letter to Harry, who noticed that it wasn't handwritten, but made of curved letters that looked like they had been cut out .
From Everyday Christmas.
You’re a WickEd girl. Harry Potter has no
rather. GO BACK where you came from muggle.
“It’s like all of him!” exclaimed Hermione, opening one letter after another. “ 'Harry Potter can do a lot better than the likes of .
you. . . .' ''You deserve to cook it in a frying pan. . . .' Uh!”
She opened the last envelope, liquid and white green.
The smell of kerosene wafted on his hands, which began to
They float in big yellow bubbles.
“The bubu-tuber network is indestructible!” Run said, picking up the envelope.
With ghosts and his breathing.
“Uh!” Hermione said, tears starting in her eyes as she tried to
His hands were covered with a towel, but his fingers were now
She was covered in wounds so horrible that she looked like she
They both wore thick, thick gloves.
“So you’re going to get up to the hospital wing,” Harry said as the rainbows .
in front of Hermione she took a step. “Let’s tell Professor Sprout where he is .
You're gone. . . .”
“I warned her!” Run said as Hermione stormed out of the Elder
Hall, clasping her hands. “I made sure not to scare Rita Skeeter!
Look at that one . . .” He read one of the letters Hermione had
left behind: “ 'I read in Witch Weekly how you play
Harry Potter is fake and that boy has a lot of problems and I would be
I'll send you a secret party next as soon as I can find a big enough club.' Blimey, she better watch out.”
Hermione didn't show up for Herbology. As Harry and Run left
The treehouse for their magical creature care class, saw
Malfoy, Crabbe, and Goyle are gliding down the stone steps of the castle.
Pansy Parkinson was whispering and giggling behind them with
His group of Slytherin girls. Seeing Harry, Pansy called out,
“Potter, did you break up with your girlfriend? Why are you so sad in the morning?”
Harry ignored her; He didn’t want to give her the satisfaction of
Knowing how much trouble the Witch Weekly article caused.
Hagrid, who told them the previous lesson that they robbed
With a dog, he was waiting for them outside his cell with a new
the supply of open socks at his feet. Harry's heart sank when he saw
Coffee — surely not another screw up? - But when
He leaned in to take a look inside and found himself staring at several tall muscular black figures. Their front paws
They were flat, like needles, and they moved in
of the corner, looking awkwardly shy at all the attention.
"These are inifflers," Hagrid said, as the tribe gathered .
around. “Yeh found 'em under mines mostly. They love the clothes.
stuff. . . . There yeh go, see.”
One of the vigilantes suddenly jumped up and tried to peck.
Pansy Parkinson's watch from her wrist. she screamed and jumped.
back.
“Useful little treasure hunters,” Hagrid said excitedly. "thought
Let’s have some fun with them today. See there?” He recalled
The big groundbreaker loudly turned Harry watched it break through the Owlery's window. “I attached some gold bars. I have
He won a prize fer the longest niffler. Jus' catch
take all that's important, an' choose a niffler, an' get ready ter set 'em
loose."
Harry took off his watch, which he had only worn since
habit, as she never did, and he put it in his pocket.
Then he picked up a niffler. He put his long voice in Harry's ear and
I sniffed happily. It’s actually pretty cool.
“Wait,” Hagrid said, looking down at the carpet, “there’s a
Niffler credits here . . . Who is missing? Where’s Hermione?”
"She should go to the hospital wing," Ron said.
“We’ll explain later,” Harry shrugged; Pansy Parkinson was
listening.
Definitely the best thing they’ve ever had on Care of Magical .
creators. Nifflers dropped in and out of the deep shell like
Despite the water, everyone speeds towards the student with
They take it out and shove gold into their hands. Ron's was especially
efficient; She soon filled his cock with cockroaches.
“Can you buy these as pets, Hagrid?” he asked with the same excitement as hers.
Niffler returns to the floor, flicking his cape.
"Yer mother would be happy, Ron," Hagrid said, smiling.
“They tear down houses, niffler. I think they almost have too many.
Now,” he added, pointing at the ground floor while the nifflers
He kept sinking. “I on'y buried a hundred pounds. Oh you guys,
Hermione!”
Hermione was walking towards them across the bridge. His hands
They were very tightly separated and she looked miserable. Below
Parkinson was watching her with a smile.
“Well, let's see how yeh've done!” Hagrid said. “Consider yer
seconds! An' no use trying to steal anything, Goyle,” he added, his
Their black eyes narrowed. “It’s fake gold. Released after the
A few hours.”
Goyle emptied his pockets, looking very anxious. he turned
It worked out that Ron's niffler was very successful, so Hagrid gave him
A big block of Honeydukes chocolate for a prize. English
They rode ashore for breakfast; The rest of the school went back.
to the castle, but Harry, Run, and Hermione stay behind to help
Hagrid put the niffles back on their plates. Harry saw Mrs.
Maxime watched them from her car window.
“What did you do ter your hands, Hermione?” Hagrid said, looking worried.
Hermione tells him about the hate mail she's received
In the morning, and the shelf is full of beauty-berry juice.
“Aaah, don’t worry,” Hagrid sighed, looking down at her. “I found
Some of those letters an' all, after Rita Skeeter wrote about my mother.
'Yeh're a monster an' yeh must be put down.' 'Yer mother killed an innocent
People an' if you've got any sense you'd jump in a boat.' ”
"No!" Hermione said, looking confused.
“Yeah,” Hagrid said, setting the niffler’s hats on the front of his pocket .
wall. “They are just idiots, Hermione. Don’t open them if you have any
further. Chuck 'em straight into the fire.”
“You’re missing a really good lesson,” Harry said to Hermione as they .
He heads back to the castle. “Good, nifflers, isn’t it, .
Run?”
However, Ron was eyeing the chocolate that Hagrid had given him .
he. He looked good draped over something.
“What’s wrong?” Harry said. “The wrong look?”
“No,” Ron said flatly. “Why didn’t you tell me about
gold?"
“What gold?” Harry said.
"The gold I gave you at the Quidditch World Cup," Ron said.
“The fake gold I gave you for my Omniocular. At the top
box. Why didn’t you tell me she disappeared?”
Harry had to think for a moment before he realized what Ron was .
He was talking about.
"Oh . . ." he said, memory had finally returned to him.
I don't know. . . I didn’t know she was gone. I was more worried about myself.
Wand, aren’t I?”
They trotted to the lobby and entered the
Great room for lunch.
“Should be good,” Ron whispered, as they sat down and .
They started serving themselves baked potatoes and Yorkshire sauce. "I
I have so much money you can't imagine a pocket full of Galleons
It’s lost.”
“Listen, I had other things on my mind that night!” Harry said
with impatience. “We worked together, remember?”
“I’ve never seen the golden leprechaun disappear,” Ron muttered. "I
I think I’m paying you. You don’t have to give me that.
Chudley Cannon’s Christmas special.”
“Forget it, okay?” Harry said.
Ron scooped out the roast beans in the middle of his fork, glaring at her.
Then he said, “I hate being poor.”
Harry and Hermione looked at each other. Neither of them really knew what to say.
“It’s a mess,” Ron said, still staring at his lobster. "I don't
They accuse Fred and George of trying to get some more money. hope
I can. I wish I had a niffler.”
“Well, we know what we’re going to get you next Christmas,” Hermione said cheerfully. Then, as Ron continued to look nervous, she said:
“Come on, Ron, it could be worse. At least your fingers aren’t full
physical." Hermione was having a hard time saving it.
A knife and fork, his fingers were very thick and slender. “I hate this
Skeeter’s wife!” She went out in vain. "I'll take it back on that if
It’s the last thing I’m going to do!”
The hate mail keeps coming to Hermione for the following
week, and even though she followed Hagrid’s advice and stopped
Opening it, many of those who didn't like it fired Howlers, which exploded .
at the Gryffindor table and yelled at him most rudely
Hall to hear. Even those people who don’t read Witch Weekly know .
All about Harry-Krum-Hermione's now supposed darkness.
Harry was sick of telling people that Hermione wasn't his.
girlfriend.
“She’ll die, though,” he told Hermione, “if we just stop .
it. . . . People have from what she wrote about me last
time -"
“I want to know how you listen to private conversations .
When they rebuild it from scratch!” said
Hermione exclaimed angrily.
Hermione falls back in their next defense against the darkness
Art lesson to ask Professor Moody anything. The rest of the school
He was very anxious to leave; Moody gave them such a harsh test.
of hexdeflection that many of them were developing minor injuries.
Harry has a bad case of Twitchy Ears, he has to keep his hands to himself
He bent over them as he walked from class.
“Well, Rita definitely doesn’t use the invisibility cloak!”
Hermione sighed fifteen minutes later, holding Harry and
Ron in the entrance hall and pulled Harry's hand from a
of his moving ears to hear him. “Moody said he didn’t do it .
See her anywhere near the judges’ table in the second act, or anywhere near the beach!”
“Hermione, is there any point in telling you to take this off?” said
run.
"No!" Hermione said suddenly. “I want to know how it
Hear me talking to Viktor! And how did she find out about Hagrid
mom!"
“She probably scared you,” Harry said.
“Lost?” Ron said with a grin. "So . . . put roads on it or
some?"
Harry started explaining about hidden microphones and recording equipment. Run pleaded, but Hermione cut him off.
them.
“You were never going to study at Hogwarts, History?”
“What’s the point?” Run said. “You know it by heart, we can just
I asked you.”
“All those magical exchanges that Muggles use — electricity, computers, and radar, and all that stuff — all go through magic .
Back at Hogwarts, there was too much magic in the air. No, Rita was using magic to hear, she had to be. . . . If I could only find
What is it . . . ooh, if it’s illegal, I’ll have it . . .”
“Don’t we have enough to fight?” Run asked her. "do
Should we start protesting against Rita Skeeter as well?”
“I didn’t ask you to help!” Hermione said. “I’ll do it the day of
Mine!”
She walked up the marble staircase without looking back.
glance. Harry was pretty sure she was going to the library.
“What a bet she’s going to come back with a copy of I Hate Rita .
Skater badges?” Run said.
However, Hermione didn't ask Harry and Ron to help her take the revenge against Rita Skeeter, much to the two's gratitude, as their jobs were getting more and more difficult these days .
Before the Easter holidays. Harry was really surprised that
Hermione can research magical methods of hearing such as
So is everything else they have to do. He was working fast
to get all their homework done, even though he gave one thing
Sending daily baskets of food up to the cave in the mountains i
Sirius; After last summer, Harry would never forget how it felt
He would always be hungry. He shut off the circles to Sirius and told
that nothing unusual had happened, and that they were
He was still waiting for an answer from Percy.
Hedwig didn't return until the end of the Easter break. of Birch
The letter was in a basket of Easter eggs that Mrs. Weasley said
He was sent. Both Harry's and Ron's were the size of dragon eggs and
Filled with homemade toffee. Hermione's, however, was less than
Chicken egg. Her face fell when she saw him.
“Your mother doesn’t read Witch Weekly, by any means, or not,
Run?” she asked quietly.
“Yeah,” Ron said, his mouth full of fat. “He brings it to .
The drink.”
Hermione looked wearily at her little egg.
“Don’t you want to see what Percy wrote?” Harry asked her.
quickly.
Percy's letter was short and crisp.
As I always say to Christmas every day, Mr. Crouch is
You take a well-deserved break. He used to feed the daily animals.
with instructions. No, I haven’t actually seen it, but I think
I can be trusted to know my boss’s handwriting. I
I have enough to do now without trying
Quash this ridiculous claim. Please don’t disappoint me again.
unless it’s important. Happy Easter.
The start of the summer season will usually mean that
Harry had been training hard for the last Quidditch match of the season.
But this year, it’s the third and final task in Triwizard .
A tournament for which he needs to prepare, but he hasn’t yet
They knew what he was going to do. Finally, in the last week of May,
Professor McGonagall caught him in the Changing.
“You have to go down to the Quidditch field at nine tonight .
night, Potter,” she told him. " Sir. Bagman will be there to tell
race on the third task.”
So, at half past eight that night, Harry left Ron and Hermione in
Gryffindor Tower and went downstairs. As he passed the door
hall, Cedric came from the Hufflepuff common room.
“What do you think it will be?” he asked Harry as they
They all went through the stone bridge and went out into the dark night.
“Fleur is constantly running on underground tunnels; She counted
We have to find the treasure.”
“That’s okay,” Harry said, thinking that he would .
Definitely get Hagrid a niftier one to do the job for him.
They walked in the gray heat to the Quidditch stadium.
She turned through a gap in the barn and onto the field.
“What did they do to him?” Cedric said angrily, shocked
dead.
The Quidditch field wasn’t flat and smooth. It looks like
Although someone builds taller ships, smaller than it all
They were twisted and turned in all directions.
“They’re blocks!” Harry said, bending down to see who was approaching
one.
“Hi there!” said an excited voice.
Ludo Bagman was standing in the middle of the field with
Chromium and fluoride. Harry and Cedric made their way over to them,
bears on the back. Fleur stared at Harry as he came
soon. His attitude towards her has completely changed since he
She was saving her sister from the ocean.
“Well, what do you think?” said Bagman excitedly as Harry and
Cedric climbed over the last ledge. “They’re getting better and better, aren’t they?
Give them a moon and Hagrid would have them twenty feet tall.
Don’t worry,” he added, smiling, watching the unhappy ones .
looks on Harry and Cedric’s faces, “you’ll get your Quidditch field back to normal once that thing’s done! Now, I see you
Can you guess what we’re doing here?”
No one spoke for a moment. so -
“Maze,” Krum whispered.
"true!" Bagman said. “Oh goose. The third act is actually quite interesting
through. The Triwizard Cup will be placed in the middle of the
the lobster. The first team to touch it gets full points.”
“We semply 'ave going to get through the boat?” Fleur said.
“There’s going to be problems,” Bagman says cheerfully, tapping on the keyboard .
The balls of his feet. “Hagrid produces a lot of people . . .
Then there will be narratives that need to be broken . . . The whole type
Thing, you know. Now, the teenagers lead the points
He’ll get the head in the neck.” Bagman smiled at Harry and
Cedric. “Then Mr. Krum enters . . . Then Mrs. Delacour. but
You’ll be all in with a fighting chance, depending on how you hav
past the obstacles. Should be exciting, eh?”
Harry, who knew only too well the kind of creatures Hagrid made
He was capable of giving such an event, I thought he could not
There will be some fun together. However, he nodded politely like any other
Champions.
"properly . . . If you don't have any questions, let's head back up
At the castle, we shall think, it is a bit chilly. . . .”
Bagman rushed to Harry's side as they walked
A way out of the growing chaos. Harry has a feeling that Bagman
He starts offering to help again, but just then, Krum
Harry said into his shoulder.
“Can I have a vord?”
“Yeah, well,” Harry said, a little surprised.
“Will you walk with me?”
“Okay,” Harry shrugged.
Bagman looked a little confused.
“I’ll wait for you, Harry, will I?”
“No, it’s okay, Mr. Bagman,” Harry said, relieved, “I .
I think I can find the castle on my own, thanks.”
Harry and Krum leave the arena together, but Krum doesn’t raise
One course for the ship of Durmstrang. Instead, it goes towards the
forest.
“What are we going this way?” Harry said as they passed.
Hagrid's cabin and Beauxbatons' lighted wheelchair.
“They vant to hear you,” Krum said quietly.
When they finally reached a soft patch of ground
Way from the Beauxbatons stables, Krum stopped at the
The shadow of the trees and he turned to face Harry.
“I don’t want to know,” he said, anxiously, “the vote is between you .
and that Hermione.”
Harry, from Krum's secret reaction, had been expecting something far more serious, looked at Krum in surprise.
“No,” he said. But Krum saw him, and Harry,
Somehow it had struck him anew with the way Krum had growled, spellbound. "are
friends. She is not my girlfriend and never will be. That's just
Skeeter the woman gets things done.”
"Hermiownninny talks about you a lot," Krum said,
She looked suspiciously at Harry.
“Yeah,” Harry said, “because we’re friends.”
He couldn’t believe he was talking to
Viktor Krum, a famous international quidditch player. It was like
Although eighteen-year-old Krum thought he, Harry, was
equal — a real villain —
“You don’t have . . . You don’t have . . .”
“No,” Harry said very forcefully.
Krum looked a little happy. He stared at Harry for a few seconds and then said, “You are very bright vell. I votching you in the first job.”
“Thanks,” Harry said, smiling broadly and suddenly feeling .
Much better than himself. “I saw you at the Quidditch World Cup. the
Wronski Feint, you really —”
But someone looked behind Krum in the trees, and it was Harry,
Possessing some knowledge of the type of thing that roamed the forest, he quickly grabbed Krum's arm and pulled him back.
“Vot is he?”
Harry shook his head, staring at the spot where he'd seen movement. He slipped his hand inside her pussy and reached for her pussy.
Suddenly, a man slowly emerged from behind a tall shrub. For a while, Harry didn't know . . . Then he realized it was Master.
Close up.
He looked like he had been drinking for days. toes
his shirts were torn and bloodied, his face mutilated; was
Unrefined and painfully heavy. His hair and beard are clean
which both require washing and shampooing. His strange image,
However, it was nothing for the way he sounded. Movement is
By hand, Mr. Crouch appears to be talking to someone
Only he could see. He vaguely reminded Harry of an old fool he’d reminded
She saw once when she was out shopping with the Dursleys. The man also
He was messing with the air of the air; Aunt Petunia took
Dudley's hand and pulled him across the street to ease him; not
Vernon had then treated the family to a long rant about what he had said .
He wants to work with beggars and orphans.
“Isn’t that the judge?” Krum said, looking at Mr. Crouch. “It’s not him
vith your ministry?”
Harry frowned, hesitated for a moment, then strode over to Mr. Crouch, who did not look at him, but continued speaking .
to a nearby tree.
“. . . And when you do that, Weatherby, send a rodent to
Dumbledore confirms the number of Durmstrang students i
Will participate in the tournament, Karkaroff just sent word
There will be twelve. . . .”
" Sir. Cruiser?” Harry said cautiously.
“. . . And then send another rat to Madame Maxime, because
Maybe she wants to increase the number of students she takes, now
Karkaroff made it a dozen rounds . . . Do that, Weatherby, let
you? Will you? will . . .”
Mr. Crouch's eyes were bulging. He stood looking at the tree.
He watched soundlessly. Then he slumped to the side and fell to the
His feet.
" Sir. Cruiser?” Harry said aloud. “Are you okay?”
Crouch's eyes were rolling into his head. Harry looked at the
Krum, who followed him through the trees, and was looking down
In Crouch at the wedding.
“Vot is that wrong?”
“No idea,” Harry muttered. “Listen, you better go get
one -"
“Drum!” said Mr. Crouch. He reached out and tapped
hand of Harry’s slippers, pulling him closer, though his eyes
they were hovering over Harry's head. “I had to . . . see . . . Dumbledore. . . .”
“Okay,” said Harry, “if you get up, Mr. Crouch, we can go to 100,000.
the -"
"I do . . . stupid . . . purchase . . .” Mr. Crouch sucked in a breath. he
Totally looked. His eyes were drooping and drooping, and a smile
of fat was running down his chin. Every word he said was clear
It would give him violent strength. "I must . . . tell you . . . Dumbledore . . ."
“Get up, Mr. Crouch,” Harry said loud and clear. "get up,
I’ll take you to Dumbledore!”
Mr. Crouch's eyes darted up to Harry.
"Who . . . are you?" Iwessus.
“I’m a student at school,” Harry said, looking at the .
Krum for some help, but Krum was slowing down, looking very anxious.
“You’re not . . . What?” Crouch said, his mouth dropped open.
“No,” Harry said, not knowing what Crouch was .
They talk about.
“Of Dumbledore?”
“Right,” Harry said.
Crouch was pulling him closer; Harry promised to solve Crouch's.
hold on to her clothes, but she was so powerful.
"Announce . . . Dumbledore . . .”
"I'll get Dumbledore if you'll let me," Harry said. “Just let
Go, Mr. Crouch, I'll fetch him. . . .”
“Thank you, Weatherby, and when you do that, I will .
Like a cup of tea. My wife and son will be arriving shortly, we’re at a concert tonight with Mr. and Mrs. Fudge.”
Crouch was now speaking briskly for a tree again, and apparently
He was completely unaware that Harry was there, which surprised Harry
so he didn't notice that Crouch had released him.
“Yeah, my son recently won twelve OWLs, it’s very satisfying, yeah, thank you, yeah, I’m very proud indeed. Now, if you could
Get that note from Andorra’s Minister of Magic, I think
I’ll have time to compose an answer. . . .”
“You stay here with him!” Harry said to Krum. “I’ll get Dumbledore, I’ll call right away, I know where his office is—”
"He's pissed," Krum said doubtfully, looking down at Crouch,
Who is still talking to the tree, apparently satisfied with it
Percy.
“Just stay with it,” Harry said, starting to calm down, but his .
The movement seems to have set in motion another sudden change in Mass.
Crouch, who held him tightly by the shoulders, pulled Harry
He returned to earth.
"You're not going to . . . leave . . . us!" he muttered, his eyes bulging again.
"I . . . fled. . . must insist . . . must have told. . . See Dumblur . . . .
My fault . . All my fault. . . Bertha . . . dead . . . All my fault. . .
son . . . My fault . . Tell us about Dumbledore . . . Harry Potter . . . the
The Dark Lord . . . Stronger . . . Harry Potter . . .”
“I’ll get Dumbledore if you’ll let me go, Mr. Crouch!” Harry said.
He turned angrily to Krum. “Help me, will you?”
Looking utterly confused, Krum continued forward and
kneel down next to Mr. Crouch.
“Just keep him here,” Harry said, pulling away from the Master.
Close up. “I’ll be back with Dumbledore.”
“Hurry up, won’t you?” Krum called after him as Harry ran
away from the forest and up through the flatlands. are
is created; Bagman, Cedric and Fleur had disappeared. Shared Harry
up the stone steps, through the wooden front gates, and out onto the
marble walls, to second floor.
Five minutes later, he was running into a rock chicken.
He stood halfway down an empty street.
“Sher — lemon sherbet!” He smiled at her.
This is Dumbledore's Hidden Chamber Password
office — or at least it was two years ago. The password has
It appears to have changed, though, as the stone gargoyle never appeared
to life and jumped aside, but he stood frozen, staring at Harry
Fortunately.
"walk!" Harry yelled at her. “Come on!”
But nothing at Hogwarts looked just because he
he shouted at her; He knew it was no good. He looked up and down.
The Green Room. Maybe Dumbledore was in the staff room? he
He started running as fast as he could toward the window —
“THE MAN!”
Harry paused and looked around. Snape just had
They exited the hidden stairs behind the stone wall. the
The wall was slowly closing behind him even as he called for Harry to come back.
Beside him.
“What are you doing here, Potter?”
“I need to see Professor Dumbledore!” Harry said, running back.
up the stairs and settling into a seat in front of Snape instead. “That was Mr. Crouch . . . He just came back. . . He was in the forest. . . He was asking —”
“What the fuck is this?” Snape said, his black eyes twinkling.
“What are you talking about?”
" Sir. Everyone!” Harry shouted. “From the Ministry! ill or
Something — he was in the forest, he wanted to see Dumbledore! just
Give me the password until —”
“The Headmaster was busy, Potter,” Snape said, thin-mouthed .
Curling into an uncomfortable smile.
“I must tell Dumbledour!” Harry shouted.
“Can’t you hear me, Potter?”
Harry could tell Snape was having too much fun, fighting Harry whatever he wanted when he was so nervous.
'See,' Harry said angrily, 'Crouch isn't smart—he is—he's .
From his mind—he said he wanted to push—”
The stone wall behind Snape opened up. Dumbledore was standing there, wearing a long green robe and a dazed expression.
“Is there a problem?” He said, looking between Harry and Snape.
"teacher!" Harry said, nudging Snape's side before Snape could
They called, “Mr. Crouch is here — he’s in the forest, wanting
Talk to you!”
Harry expected Dumbledore to ask, but to his surprise,
Dumbledore did nothing of the sort.
“Lead the way,” he said quickly, stepping across the
way behind Harry, leaving Snape standing next to the hero
And it looks twice as bad.
“What did Mr. Crouch say, Harry?” Dumbledore said as they
He walked briskly across the marble pavement.
“He said he wanted to challenge you . . . He said he did something
terrible . . . He mentioned his son . . . and Bertha Jurkins . . .
and — and with Voldemort . . . Something about Voldemort got
Stronger. . . .”
“Sure,” Dumbledore said, easing his way along as they
He quickly disappeared into the darkness.
“He’s not acting right,” Harry said, crouching down next to her .
Dumbledore. “He didn’t seem to know where he was. committed
He sounded like he thought Percy Weasley was there, and then he
He changed, and said he needed to see you. . . . I leave it to Victor Crome.”
“Did you?” Dumbledore said sternly, and began taking
Long strides still, so that Harry would be running to keep up. "do you
Do you know if anyone else has seen Mr. Crouch?”
“No,” Harry said. “Krum and I were talking, Mr. Bagman had
You just finished telling us about the third task, we stayed behind, and
Then we saw Mr. Crouch come out of the forest —”
“Where are they?” Dumbledore said as Bookbatoon's cart
out of the darkness.
“Here,” Harry said, moving ahead of Dumbledore, leading the way between the trees. He couldn't hear Crouch's voice, but he knew where he was going; Not much has happened.
the Beuxbaton car park . . . Somewhere around here. . . .
“Victor?” Harry shouted.
No one answered.
"They're here," Harry told Dumbledore. “They’re definitely somewhere around here. . . .”
"Lumos," Dumbledore said, bringing out his wand and holding it.
Its bright light traveled from black surface to black surface, illuminating the floor. And then she got down on two feet.
Harry and Dumblur hurried forward. The chrome was polished on the
The forest floor. He seemed uncomfortable. There is no evidence in
 All of Mr. Kruch's. Dumbledore leaned over Krum and slowly picked him up.
One of his arms.
“Embarrassing,” he said quietly. Her half-moon glasses sparkled in
wandlight as he peered through the surrounding trees.
“Should I go get one?” Harry said. “Miss Pomfrey?”
“No,” Dumbledore said flatly. “Stay here.”
He raised his wand in the air and pointed it towards the
Hagrid's Room. Harry noticed some silver sticking out of it and
Streak away in the trees like a bird of paradise. Then Dumbledore leaned over to Krum again, showed him his wand, and muttered, "Rennervate."
Krum opened his eyes. He looked confused. When he saw Dumbledore, he tried to sit up, but Dumbledore put a hand on his shoulder and made him stay upright.
“He’s attacking me!” Krum looked and put his hand back in hers
head. “That old fighter attacked me! I look over to see.
vare Potter is gone and attacking from behind!”
“Lie down for a moment,” Dumbledore said.
The sound of heavy footsteps reached them, and Hagrid
He came stumbling back with Fang at his feet. He was getting his
The bomb.
“Professor Dumbledore!” He said, his eyes widening. “ Harry —
What the — ?”
"Hagrid, I need you to fetch Professor Karkaroff," Dumbledore said. “His student was arrested. When you do this,
Please contact Professor Moody —”
"No need, Dumbledore," said a breath of fresh air. "I'm here."
Moody was scooting closer to them, leaning on his belt, his
The stick is flying.
“Bad foot,” he exclaimed. “He’ll be here soon . . .
What happened? Snape said something about Crouch—”
“Crowd?” Hagrid said with a grin.
“Karkaroff, please, Hagrid!” Dumbledore said quietly.
"Oh . . . Of course y'are, Professor . . .” Hagrid said, and he
He turned and disappeared into the dark trees, Fang trailing behind him.
"I don't know where Barty Kruch is," Dumbledore said .
Moody, “but it’s important to find out.”
“I’m on it,” Moody said, drawing his wand and .
wandered off into the forest.
Neither Dumbledore nor Harry spoke again until they heard the
Hagrid's and Fang's incoherent noises returned. Karkaroff was
They hurry after them. He was wearing his beautiful silver hair.
And he looks frantic and depressed.
"what is this?" He screamed when he saw Krum on the ground and
Dumbledore and Harry at his side. “What’s going on?”
“I vos taken!” Krum said, sitting up now and shaking his head.
" Sir. Crouch or butterfly is called —”
“Crouch attacked you? Crouch attacked you? The Triwizard
judge?"
"Igor," Dumbledore began, but Karkaroff corrected himself .
Upstairs, he held his palms at his waist, looking livid.
"justice!" he growled, glaring at Dumbledore. “It's a trap!
You and your Ministry of Magic put me here under lies
She's like, Dumbledore! This is not a friendly competition! First you
Reduce Potter to the ring, even though he's underage! Now one
of your department colleagues tried to get my boss out of
action! I'm silent on double standards and intimidation throughout the whole thing,
And you, Dumbledore, you, with your short international speech

' '
Reconnections, rebuilding old connections, forgetting old differences — here’s what I think of you!”
Karkaroff coughed on the floor at Dumbledore's feet. In a
Moving swiftly, Hagrid stepped in front of Karkaroff's figures, lifting
tossed it into the air and slammed it against a nearby tree.
"apologize!" Hagrid yelled as Karkaroff took a deep breath,
Hagrid's big cock in her ass, her legs dangling in the air.
“Hagrid, no!” Dumbledore shouted, his eyes widening.
Hagrid removed the arm that pushed Karkaroff to the tree, and
Karkaroff completely lost control of the vehicle and suffered a seizure.
in its roots; Some twigs and leaves were piled on his head.
"Please send Harry back to the castle, Hagrid," Dumbledore whispered.
With a deep breath, Hagrid gave Karkaroff a pointed look.
“Maybe it’s better if I stay here, Headmaster. . . .”
"You're going to send Harry back to school, Hagrid," Dumbledore shot back firmly. “Bring him up to Gryffindor Tower. and
Harry — I want you to stay there. Anything you want to do
give — any ornaments you can send — they can wait till
Morning, do you understand me?”
“Er — yes,” Harry said, smiling. How is DumbBlur
It’s interesting that, at that very moment, he was thinking about
By sending Pigwidgeon directly to Sirius, to tell him what he had
happened?
“I’ll leave Fang with yeh, Headmaster,” Hagrid said, smiling .
honestly in Karkaroff, who still lays at the feet of
A tree, produced in the branches and roots of a tree. “Sit down, Fang. Come on, Harry.”
They walked silently past the Beauxbatons carriage and rode .
By the castle.
“How could he,” Hagrid said as they walked along the beach.
“How dare Dumbledore complain. Looks like Dumbledore is going to do something.
Likewise. Just like how Dumbledore wanted you in the tournament of
The first place. worried! I dunno when I've seen Dumbledore get more worried than bin lately. An' you!” Hagrid said suddenly angrily to
Harry, who looked at him, was annoyed. “What were you doing,
running into Krum ruddy? He's from Durmstrang, Harry!
Could have jinxed yeh right there, couldn't he? Modi didn’t teach you
nothing? 'Imagine letting' it lure him off by yourself —”
“Chrome is good!” Harry said as they climbed the stairs to the
The entrance hall. “He wasn’t trying to jinx me, he just wanted to talk .
About Hermione —”
"I'll have a few words with him, and everything," Hagrid said anxiously,
They stepped on the pavement. “The more you can do with these strangers, the happier you’ll be. Yeh can trust one of them.”
“You were getting on so well with Madame Maxime,” Harry .
he said, painfully.
“Don’t talk about it!” Hagrid said, and looked
Very confused for a while. “I got her number now! Have you tried
Ter back in me good books, you try ter tell me what the
comin' in the third work. Ha! You can trust any of them!”
Hagrid was in a bad mood, Harry was very pleased when he said
Goodbye next to the old lady. Released with
The picture window to the partner’s room and rushed straight to the
The corner where Run and Hermione were sitting, so I could tell them
What happened.

Chapter Twenty-Nine
Dream M

It comes down to this,” Hermione said, rubbing her temples.
“Either Mr. Crouch hit Viktor, or someone else held them both while Viktor wasn’t looking.”
“Probably Crouch,” Ron said suddenly. “That’s why he
He was gone when Harry and Dumbledore got there. He did a
Running.”
“I don’t think so,” Harry said, shaking his head. “It seems
Really weird — I don’t think he was up to Disapparating or anything.”
“You can’t misbehave around Hogwarts, I didn’t tell .
Do you have enough times?” Hermione said.
"The curse . . . how's that for a theory," Ron said excitedly. “Chrome
He grabbed Crouch—no, wait for it—and then Stunned himself!”
“And Mr. Crouch is angry, isn’t he?” Hermione said coldly.
"Oh . . .”
I

' '
There is day night. Harry, Ron, and Hermione sneak out of the
Their very early bedrooms and back to the Owlery together.
Address a letter to Sirius. Now they stood staring at the
the ground of the crop. All three were swollen and red-eyed because
They were talking into the evening about Mr. Crouch.
“Just do it again, Harry,” Hermione said. “What did he
Did Mr. Crouch tell the truth?”
"I'm telling you, he wasn't making much sense," Harry said. "he
He said he wanted to warn Dumbledore about something. He briefly mentioned Bertha Jorkins, and it seemed like she was the
dead. He kept saying things were his fault. . . . He mentioned his son.”
"Well, it's his fault," Hermione said quietly.
“He’s out of his mind,” Harry said. “Half the time it seems
He will think that his wife and child are still alive, and he keeps in touch with
Percy for working and giving advice.”
"And . . . Remind me what he said about you know-who?" said
Ron quickly.
“I told you,” Harry answered quietly. “He said he was taking
Stronger.”
There was a pause. Then Ron said in a disgusted tone,
“But it went out of his mind, like you said, so half of it was probably just an obsession. . . .”
“He was most serious when he was trying to talk about Voldemort,”
Harry said, and Ron winced at the sound of the name. " was
I have a real problem putting two words together, but that was
When he seemed to know where he was, and knew what he wanted
It will work. He just kept saying he had to see Dumbledore.”
Harry turned away from the window and looked up at the

' '
Resources. Many of the cars were half-armored; Every now and then,
another owl would creep in from a corner, returning from its nightly hunt with a worm on its head.
“If Snape hadn’t grabbed me,” Harry sighed, “we might have .
He got there in time. 'The Headmaster was busy, Potter . . . What is this?
Injustice, Potter? Why can’t he just get out of the way?”
“Maybe he didn’t want you to get there!” Ron said quietly.
“Perhaps — hang on — how do you think he might get around .
To the forest? You think he might hit you and
Dumbledore over there?”
“It’s not unless he can disguise himself as a hero or something,” he said .
Harry.
“It’s not going to go through,” Ron murmured.
"We need to see Professor Moody," Hermione said. “It should
Find out if Mr. Crouch has been found.”
“If he had a marauder card on it, it would have been easier,”
Harry said.
“If Crouch isn’t already out of jail,” Ron says,
“Because it only shows to the limit, it doesn’t —”
“Chh!” Hermione said suddenly.
Someone was climbing the stairs up to the Owlery. Harry
He could hear two voices arguing, coming closer and closer.
“— it’s a boring one, that is, we can get into a lot of trouble for
that -"
“— We try to be honest; It’s time to play the perpetrator, like him. he
He didn’t like the Medal Ministry to know what he did —”
“I’m telling you, if you put that in writing, it’s abandonment!”
“Yeah, and you won’t complain if we take a nice flight benefit,
Will you?”

' '
The door to the Owlery swung open. Fred and George came on
top, then froze at the sight of Harry, Ron, and Hermione.
“What are you doing here?” Ron and Fred said at the same time.
“Send a letter,” Harry and George said in unison.
“What, at this hour?” They said Hermione and Fred.
Fred grumbled.
“Fine — we won’t ask you what you’re doing, unless you ask .
Us,” he said.
He was holding a sealed envelope in his hands. Harry looked at the
It, but Fred, either accidentally or intentionally, changed his hand
To discard the name on it.
“Well, don’t let us catch you,” Fred said, and made a crossbow .
And he looks at the door.
Ron didn't move. “Who are you attacking?” he said.
The smile left Fred's face. Harry saw George half
She looked at Fred, before smiling at Ron.
"I'm not kidding, I was just joking," he said lightly.
“It didn’t sound like that,” Ron said.
Fred and George looked at each other. Then Fred said suddenly,
“I told you before, Ron, keep your nose clean if you’re up for it .
The form is it. I can’t see why you would do it, but —”
"It's my job if you're yelling at someone," Ron said.
“George is right, you could end up in big trouble for this.”
“I told you, I’m joking,” George said. He walked over to Fred.
He took the letter out of her hands and began to tuck it into her leg.
of coin from the nearest store. “You are starting to sound a bit like our dear .
Big brother, you, Ron. Keep doing this and they will make you a
prefect.”
“No, I won’t!” Ron said calmly.

' '
George lifted the barn mouse to the window and climbed out.
George turned and smiled at Ron.
“Well, stop telling people what to do then. see you soon."
He and Fred left the Owlery. Harry, Ron, and Hermione looked
in the other.
“You don’t think they know anything about all this, do you?”
Hermione whispered. “About Crouch and everything?”
“No,” Harry said. “If it was something serious, they would say
one. They’ll tell Dumbledore.”
However, Ron was looking unbothered.
“What’s wrong?” Hermione asked.
"Well . . ." Ron said quietly, “I dunno if they would .
They like taking money lately, I saw it when I was
You stopped with them — when — you know —”
“We weren’t dating.” Harry finished the sentence for her.
“Yeah, but the shame . . .”
"It was this funny shop idea they had," Ron said. “I thought
They were just saying it to upset my mom, but they really meant it
It, they want to start one. They only had a year left at Hogwarts, and they kept talking about how it was time to think about their romance .
The future, and my father couldn't support them, and they needed gold to get
begin."
Hermione was looking uncomfortable now.
“Yeah, but . . . They are not doing anything against the law to get
gold."
“Won’t they?” Ron said, looking suspicious. "I don't know . . . they
You don’t much like them breaking the rules, do you?”
“Yeah, but that’s the rule,” Hermione said, looking puzzled.
“This is not some silly school rule. . . . They will take a lot more than

' '
Prison for assault! Run . . . Maybe it’s better to say
Percy. . . .”
“Are you leaving?” Run said. “Tell Percy? Maybe Crouch will do
And bring them back.” He glanced at the window from which Fred
And Georges’ base came out, and then he said, “Come on, let’s get some .
breakfast."
“Do you think it’s too early to go see Professor Moody?”
Hermione said as they pressed against the railing.
“Yeah,” Harry said. “He would probably blow us out the door if
refresh it in the morning air; He’ll think we’re trying to catch up.
while he was asleep. We’ll fight it until the end.”
Magic history has rarely moved so quickly. Harry kept looking.
Ron's watch, having finally turned his off, but Ron's was running so slowly he could smell that it had stopped working, too. all
Three of them are so tired they can lay their heads down in pleasure.
down on the sheets and asleep; Not even Hermione would take her
Everyday thoughts, but she sat with her head on her hand and stared at the
Professor Binns eyes were unbelievable.
When the night fell, they hurried out into the streets
to the Dark Arts classroom he found Professor Moody had left. He looked as exhausted as they felt. The normal corner of his eyes
He was blushing, giving his face a more one-sided look
than ever before.
“Master Moody?” Harry called out as they walked to the
to him publicly.
“Hello, Potter,” Moody said softly. His Magic Eye followed a
couple of first years gone, who was tired, looked sorrowful; it
tucked away in the back of Moody’s head, he sees them in the back of the
middle before speaking again.

' '
“Come in here.”
He stood back to let them into his empty classroom, stumbling into
Behind them, and locked the door.
“Did you find him?” Harry asked without preamble. " Sir.
Cruiser?”
“No,” Moody said. He walked over to his desk and sat down,
He drew his wooden handle with a small thumb, and put his foot
The hip flask.
“Did you use a map?” Harry said.
“Right,” Moody said, taking a bite out of his wallet. “He took a
pick from your book, Potter. I called him from my office to
forest. There’s nowhere else there.”
“So he did Disparate?” Run said.
“You can’t shoot him in the mud, Ron!” Hermione said.
“There are other ways he could have gone wrong, aren’t there,
teacher?"
Moody's magic eye twitched as it focused on Hermione. "you
Another one who might be thinking about the Auror career,” he told the
her. “The mind works perfectly, Granger.”
Hermione squealed furiously.
“Well, he wasn’t invisible,” Harry said. “The map shows invisible people. It must have come out of nowhere, then.”
“But under his boot?” Hermione said excitedly, “Or because .
Someone created it?”
“Yeah, someone can — he can pull it on a leash .
And come out with it, can’t they?” Run said quickly, looking
Hopefully in Moody seemed to also want to be told he had the memory of an Auror.
"We can't rule out withdrawal," Moody growled.

' '
“So,” said Ron, “you assume he’s somewhere in Hogsmeade?”
“He could be anywhere,” Moody said, shaking his head. "except
The thing we know for sure is he’s not here.”
He kept quiet often, until his faults were tested, and one side of him
His mouth revealed several missing teeth. Then he said: “Now,
Dumbledore told me you three thought of yourselves as witches.
But there’s nothing you can do for Crouch. The Ministry will look for him now, Dumbledore assured them. Potter, you just finished
mind on the third task.”
"what?" Harry said. "Oh . . .”
He hadn’t even given the boat a thought since he’d left it s
Krum last night.
“Should be right up your alley, that one,” Moody said, smiling .
in front of Harry and rubbing his bruised and sore head. "from
What Dumbledore said, you do pass things like
This many times. Break your way through many problems.
You touched the Sorcerer Stone in your first year, didn’t you?”
“We helped,” Ron said quietly. “Me and Hermione helped.”
Moody chuckled.
“Well, help him through for that one, and I’d be very surprised if .
He didn’t win,” Moody said. “At this time . . . ever vigilant, Potter. Constant care.” He took another long group.
from his chin fur, and his magic eyes stared into the window.
The starboard body of the Durmstrang Ship was visible from it.
“You two,” Moody said, his normal eyes scanning Ron and .
Hermione, “You’re staying close to Potter, okay? I’m keeping my eyes
things, but all the same . . . You can never have too many eyes.”
* * *

' '
Sirius sent their eagle the very next morning. He went downstairs.
Next to Harry the moment a blue orb landed in front of him.
of Hermione, clutching a regular Christmas magazine in her lap. she
He brought a newspaper, pointed to the first few pages, and said, “Ha! She doesn’t have Crouch’s wind!” He then joined Run and Harry in reading
What did Sirius say about the mysterious events of the night before
last.
Harry — what do you think you’re playing, going
of jewelry with Victor Krum? I want you to leave him, s
Become a hedgehog, that you are not going to live with anyone
another at night. There is a very dangerous creature at Hogwarts.
It was clear to me that they wanted to keep Crouch from seeing .
Dumbledore and you were probably knees above them in
Darkness. You can get killed.
Your name didn’t get into the Fire Pit by accident. whether
Someone is trying to attack you, they are at their ultimate best. stay
Closer to Run and Hermione, never leaving Gryffindor Tower
After hours, and save yourself for a third job. Practice counting and challenging. Some hexes don’t run amiss either.
There’s nothing you can do about Crouch. Keep your head
Down and take care. Looking forward to your offer letter.
Me your word you will never break again.
“Who, to lecture me on off-limits sex?” said
Harry slightly annoyed as he tore up Sirius' letter and threw it
inside his pillows. “After all he did at school!”

' '
“He’s worried about you!” Hermione said suddenly. “Just like .
Moody and Hagrid! So listen to them!”
"No one's tried to bully me all year," Harry said. “No one does
Something I have all —”
"Though you put your name in the Goblet of Fire," Hermione said.
“And they must have done that for a reason, Harry. The snuffles are real.
Maybe they were biding their time. Maybe that’s their job
I’ll get you.”
“Look,” Harry growled, “let’s say Sirius is right, and .
Someone scares Krum into kidnapping Crouch. So, they will have
They’re in the trees ahead of us, aren’t they? But they waited until I
get out of the way until they do, won’t they? So it doesn't look like
Am I their target, aren’t I?”
“They couldn’t make it look like an accident if they killed you in the forest!” Hermione said. “But if you die during .
task -"
“They don’t like killing Krum, do they?” Harry said.
“Why didn’t they just fire me at the same time? they
He could have made it look like Krum and I had a duel or something.”
"Harry, I don't get it either," Hermione growled.
“I just knew there were a lot of weird things going on, and I didn’t care .
it. . . . Moody was right—Sirius was right—you should go into training for a third, immediate job. And make sure you type
Go back to Sirius and promise him you're not going to join
Alone again.”
The sky at Hogwarts has never looked more inviting than when
Harry had to stay home. Over the next few days, he spent all his wealth.

' '
Free time both in the library with Hermione and Ron, looking up
Hexes, or at least in fake classes, which they sneak in to
do. Harry was focused on Amazing Writing, which he made
He had never used it before. The problem was that his teaching included
Some cheering on Ron and Hermione's part.
“Can’t we kidnap Mrs. Norris?” Asked Run on Sunday
Lunchtime while sitting on his back in the middle of their Charms
function, since he had just been freaking out and woken up by Harry i
The fifth time in a row. “They’ll stun it a little bit. Or you can use
Dobby, Harry, I'm sure he'd do anything to help you. I’m not complaining or anything” — he rose gracefully to his feet, rubbing his knees .
Backside — “But I’m getting all tired. . . .”
“Well, you keep hanging around the dishes, don’t you!” Hermione said impatiently, trying to organize the box of dishes they use
parting ritual, which flitwick had left in a cabinet. “Just try
And fall back!”
“Once you’re Stunned, you can’t move the target any longer, Hermione!” said
Ron angrily. “Why don’t you take a turn?”
“Well, I think Harry gets it now, anyway,” Hermione said .
quickly. "And we don't have to worry about Disarming, because he's
He has been able to do this for ages. . . . I think we should start with some
of accidents this afternoon.”
She looked at the list they had made at the library.
“I love the look of this one,” she says, “this Impediment Curse.
You need to erase anything that tries to attack you, Harry.
Let’s start with that one.”
The tree fell. They quickly threw the subjects inside
Flitwick the screen and left the classroom.

' '
“See you at dinner!” Hermione said, leaving for Arithmancy, while Harry and Ron walked towards the North Tower, and
literature. Great streaks of bright golden sunlight fell upon
corridor from the upper windows. The sky outside was very bright.
Blue looks like minerals.
“He would be boiling in Trelawney’s room, she wouldn’t breathe .
That fire,” Ron said as they started jumping up and down in the direction of the lamp .
A ladder and a trapdoor.
He was right. The poorly ventilated room was bitterly warm.
The discolored garbage numbers were tastier than ever. Harry’s
His head swam as he made his way towards one of the corridor fences. While Professor Trelawney was looking in the opposite direction, he unscrewed its veil from the flap, opened it an inch or so and .
He sat down in his chintz chair, so that a gentle breeze might play
On his face. She was very excited.
“My dear,” Professor Trelawney said, sitting in .
Winged chair in front of the school and pointing at them
All with eyes widened in shock, “we’re almost done .
work on planetary symmetry. Today, however, would be a special day
Opportunity to evaluate the properties of Mars, because he is more established
Fortunately at this point. If you’re all going to look this way, I’m going to do
Turn off the light. . . .”
She flicked her wand, and the lights came out. The fire was a
Only the light source now. Professor Trelawney bent down and picked up,
From under the chair, a miniature model of the solar system,
they are inside the glass dome. cute; Everyone in the
The moons twinkle in place around the nine planets and
The blazing sun, all wrapped in thin air under the glass. Harry

' '
She watched with a smile as Professor Trelawney began pointing out the magic trick that Mars was making for Neptune. Very interesting
Wash the dust on it, and the wind through the window plays
On his face. He could hear a mouse humming softly somewhere behind the curtain. Her eyes began to well up. . . .
He was riding on the back of a falcon, flying in the
Clear blue sky to an old, thatched house perched on a hill. Up and down they fly, the wind blowing furiously in the
Harry's face, until they reached a dark and broken window in the
upper porch of the house and entered. Now they were flying
Path of grief, to a room at the end . . . by
door they went, into a dark room with its windows closed
up. . . .
Harry left a trail of dragons. . . He was seeing, now, as it was
floating around the room, in a chair with his back to her. . . .
There are two light bulbs on the floor next to the chair . . . both
in which they were migrating. . . .
One was a giant snake . . . The other is male . . . A short, pale man, a man with watery eyes and a thick mustache . . . was
by stirring and stirring on the hot plate. . . .
“You’re lucky, Wormtail,” said a cold, high-pitched voice .
from the back of the chair that the monkey had fallen into. "you
Very luckily indeed. Your indifference does not destroy everything. he
dead."
“My Lord!” said the man on the ground. “My lord, I am . . . I
I'm so grateful. . . And I'm sorry. . . .”
“Nagini,” said the cold voice, “you’re out of luck. I won’t be
She ate Wormtail for you, after all . . . But never, ever
mind . . . There’s still Harry Potter. . . .”

' '
The snake hissed. Harry could see his tongue flicking out.
“Now, Wormtail,” said the cool voice, “perhaps one more thing a little .
Recall why I will not tolerate any more abuse from you. . . .”
“My lord . . . No . . . I beg you . . .”
The tail of a bat peeked out from around the back of the chair. it
He was staring at Wormtail.
“Crucio!” The cold voice said.
Wormtail screamed, screaming like every nerve in his body
were on fire, the sound filled Harry's ears as the fabric on his back writhed in pain; He was screaming too. . . . Bulldemort would be
Hear him, and he'll know he's there. . . .
“Harry! Harry!”
Harry opened his eyes. He had strayed into Professor's territory
Trelawney's room with her hands on her face. Her hair was still on.
He was so angry that his eyes watered. The pain was
genuine. The whole class was standing in front of him, and Ron was sitting next to him, looking confused.
“Are you okay?” he said.
“Of course he wasn’t!” Professor Trelawney said, looking very pleased. His wide eyes focused on Harry, studying him.
"What is it, Potter?" Is it a precaution? Visibility? What did he
You see?”
“No,” Harry confirmed. He sat down. He could feel himself shaking.
He couldn't stop himself from staring, into existence.
Afterwards; Voldemort's voice sounded much closer. . . .
“You were holding your breath!” Professor Trelawney said. "you
They were rolling on the floor, holding your waist! Come now, Potter, I
They have experience in these matters!”
Harry looked at her.

' '
"I should go to the hospital wing, I think," he said. "bad
headache."
“My dear, you are undoubtedly fascinated by the extraordinary smells of my room!” Professor Tilawni said
“If you leave now, you might miss the opportunity to see more of
You don’t have —”
"I don't want to see anything but headache relief," he said .
Harry.
stood. The circle turned back. They all looked unperturbed.
“See you later,” Harry grinned at Ron, picking up .
bag and walked towards the trapdoor, ignoring Professor Trelawney,
Who wears an expression of great anger, as if she
they had only been negated by real trauma.
When Harry got to the bottom of his spell, however, he
He did not emerge into the hospital wing. He has no intention.
of gift there. Sirius told him what to do if he hurt his hair.
One more time, and Harry would keep his promise: He was going to
Straight to Dumbledore's office. He walked the streets,
He thinks about what he saw in the dream . . . It was like evening.
Like the guy who blew up on Privet Drive. . . . ran on
sentences in his mind, trying to remember. . . .
He heard Voldemort accuse Wormtail of committing treachery . . .
But the eagle got good news, the bugs were fixed,
Someone was dead. . . So Wormtail wasn’t going to be eaten for
snake . . . He, Harry, was going to fuck her instead. . . .
Harry unconsciously walked right over the stone ledge guarding the entrance to Dumbledore's office. He opened his eyes,
He looked around, realized what he had done, and got back to his feet,

' '
He stopped in front of her. Then he remembered that he didn’t know .
Password.
“Serbet lemons?” he tried quickly.
The gargoyle didn't move.
“Well,” Harry said, smirking, “A strawberry girl. er — Licorice
rod. Flying Wizby. The drooble of the coconut milk. Bertie
Bott's every flavor of vegetables . . . Oh no, he doesn’t like them, he loves
he? . . . oh just open up, can’t you?” he said angrily. “I really need
Look at it, it’s ugly!”
The gargoyle remained motionless.
Harry pushed at her, achieving nothing but a painful ache in the
His big toe.
“Chocolate skull!” he shouted angrily, standing on one knee. "sugar
Coil! A bunch of shit!”
The gargoyle sprang to life and moved aside. Harry widened his eyes.
“The gang?” he said, surprised. “I was just joking. . . .”
He hurried through the hole in the wall and leapt onto the
The foot of the staircase is of soft stone, which moves slowly upwards as
The doors closed behind him, leading to a sliding tunnel entrance
with a knock on the glass door.
He could hear voices from inside the office. Retrieved from
He scans the wall and pauses, speaking.
"Dumbledore, I'm afraid I don't see the connection, I ever
all!" It was the voice of the Minister of Engineering, Cornelius Fudge.
“Ludo says that Bertha is perfectly capable of sacrificing herself. I agree
We were expecting to find her by now, but all
Likewise, we have no evidence of fraud, Dumbledore, at all. as
Because his disappearance is connected with that of Barty Crouch!”

' '
“And what do you think happened to Barty Crouch, the minister?”
Moody's strangled voice said.
"I see two things, Alastor," Fudge said. “Either Crouch has
Eventually he cracked — more than likely, I’m sure you’ll agree, given his
The history of mankind—losing his mind, and wandering again somewhere—”
“He’s cooling off very quickly, if that, Cornelius,”
Dumbledore said sternly.
“Or else — well . . .” Fudge sounded embarrassed. “Well, I’ll
Keep an account until I see the place where it was found.
But you said he just passed the Beauxbatons car? Dumbledore,
Do you know what that woman is?”
"I reckon she's a very capable headmaster—and a good dancer," Dumbledore snapped.
“Dumbledore, come!” Fudge said angrily. “You don’t think you’re
Could it be calculated in his favor for Hagrid's sake? Not all do
She seemed harmless—unless, of course, you could call Hagrid harmless, s
The damn right has —”
"I don't suspect Madame Maxime any more than I do Hagrid," Dumbledore said, just as quietly. “I think it might have been you .
You’re wrong, Cornelius.”
“Can we have this conversation?” said Mudi.
"Yeah, yeah, let's go down to earth, then," Fudge growled.
"No, that's not it," Moody said, "It's just that Potter wants a
A word with you, Dumbledore. He’s just outside the door.”

CHAPTER TRADE
INSTRUCTION E

The office door opened.
“Hello, Potter,” Moody said. “Come in, then.”
Harry walked inside. He was inside Dumbledore's office.
Once before; It was an incredibly beautiful, green room filled with pictures of past Hogwarts alumni and housewives, all .
Of them they were sleeping, their chests rising and falling wildly.
Cornelius Fudge was standing next to Dumbledore's desk, wearing his dark blue cloak and holding his pink hat .
hat.
“Harry!” Fudge said excitedly, stepping forward. "how are you?"
“Okay,” Harry lied.
“We were just talking about the night Mr. Crouch came of age .
up,” Fudge said. “You found him, he was
Isn’t he?”
“Yeah,” Harry said. Then it felt pointless to pretend
He didn't hear what they were saying and added, "I didn't .
the

' '
See Madame Maxime anywhere, though, she’ll have a job hidden, won’t she?”
Dumbledore smiled at Harry from behind Fudge's back, his eyes
He preaches.
“Yeah, well,” Fudge said, looking sheepish, “we’re almost gone .
For a quick walk through the palace, Harry, if you’ll excuse us . . . Maybe if you just go back to your classes—”
“I’d like to speak to you, Professor,” Harry whispered, smiling .
At Dumbledore, who gave him a quick, searching look.
“Wait here, Harry,” he said. “Our test of
The foundation doesn’t take long.”
They stormed out silently in front of her and closed the door. after
For a minute or so, Harry heard the clicks of Moody's wooden foot
They grow in the lower part. He looked away.
"Hello, Fawkes," he said.
Professor Dumbledore’s pet Fawkes was standing on his
The golden cauldron next to the door. The size of a bug, with magnification
Red and gold hair, he held back his long, curly beard
Kindly to Harry.
Harry sat down in a chair in front of Dumbledore's desk. for
For several minutes, he sat and watched the old lords and maids rummaging through their frames, contemplating his possessions .
They just hear it, and he runs his fingers across her forehead. She had stopped.
It hurt now.
He felt very calm, somehow, now that he was in Dumbledore's office, he knew he wasn't going to tell him about the
dream. Harry looked at the walls behind the desk. The repaired
And the corroded Sorting Hat was standing on a step. glass bowl next to
She holds a large silver sword with large rubies embedded in its hilt,

' '
who recognized Harry as the one he himself had freed from
Sorting Hat in her sophomore year. The sword once belonged to
Goodrick Gryffindor, the founder of Harry's House. He was looking at her,
He recalls how it helped him to think all
Hope fainted, seeing a disk of silver light, dancing and
They shimmered on the glass load. He looked in all directions for the source of
light and saw a glittering white silver orb flickering from
Inside a black cabinet behind her, her door no longer
It fits properly. Harry hesitated, looked at Fawkes, then stood up,
He walked across the office and pulled open a cabinet door.
There is a shallow stone circle there, with unusual intrusions in the middle of the
middle: runes and symbols Harry didn't know. The silver
Light was coming from whatever was in the bowl, like Harry had never seen before. It is impossible to tell whether the substance is a liquid or a gas. She was shiny, white fur, and she was
He moves without ceasing; His floor became undulating like water under the wind, and then, like the clouds, they parted and drifted wildly.
It looks like liquid light — or like howling wind —
Harry couldn't make up his mind.
He wanted to touch it, to find out how it felt, but he barely
A four-year experience in the Wizarding World told him that he would stay
His hand in a basket filled with some unknown substance was very strange.
Booty thing to do. He therefore drew his ring from within.
of his slippers, took a grave look around the office, looked back at the
bail judge, and discharged them.
The surface of the silverware inside the store began to move.
Very quickly.
Harry groaned, his head directly inside the cabinet. The silver
The substance had become transparent; It looks like glass. Look

' '
Down in it, he expected to see the stone floor of the hallway — and .
He saw instead a large chamber underneath the mysterious surface.
thing, a room that seems to be moving s
A circular window in the ceiling.
The room was dimly lit; He thought maybe even underground, since there were no exits, only traps in the shafts .
Like the ones who painted the walls of Hogwarts. Destruction
His face so that his nose was just an inch away from the glass object, Harry noticed that rows and rows of witches and wizards were
They sat against each wall on what appeared to be benches rising in the
levels. An empty chair stood in the middle of the room. there
There was something about the chair that gave Harry a wicked feeling.
Chains surrounded her wrists, as if her captors were usually tied to her.
Where is this place? Surely it wasn't Hogwarts anymore; doesn’t have
See one such room here in the castle. Moreover, the crowd in
There is a secret room at the bottom of the Temple.
Adults, and Harry knew there weren't nearly enough teachers in
Hogwarts. They seemed, he thought, to be waiting for something;
Although he could only see the tops of their hats, all of
The faces seem to look in the same direction, and none of them
They were talking to each other.
The box was dark, and the room he was visiting was huge,
Harry couldn't figure out what was going on in his corners.
He leaned closer and tilted his head, trying to see . . .
The bridge of his nose held the strange stuff he was
He was smiling.
Dumbledore's office flashed a bright smile — Harry was .

' '
He was thrown forward and rammed headfirst into the gap inside the
Table -
But his head never touched rock bottom. He was falling.
with something black and white; He was like sucked.
In a heavy tank —
And suddenly Harry found himself sitting on a bench at the end
of the room within the tobacco, one bench raised high above the others.
He glanced up at the top of the high rock, expecting to see the dark window through which he had just been looking, but he was .
Nothing there but gray, black stone.
Breathing hard and fast, Harry looked up at him. None of the
Wizards and witches in the room (and there are at least two
a hundred of them) was staring at him. None of them are obvious
They noticed that a fourteen-year-old boy had just disappeared from
a ceiling in the middle of them. Harry turned to the Wizard beside him.
on the bench and let out a loud cry of surprise that reminded
In the middle of the silent room.
He was sitting across from Albus Dumbledore.
"teacher!" Harry said in a restrained sort of grin. "am
Sorry — I didn’t mean to — I was just looking at that bacon on you
cabinet — Me — where are we?”
But Dumbledore didn't move or speak. Harry stopped completely. Like every other wizard on the boards, he was looking at
The middle of the room, where the door is.
Harry looked, unmoving, at Dumbledore, then at the
The crowd murmured in silence, and then it was back to Dumbledore. And then
She found out about it. . . .
Once before, Harry had found himself where no one

' '
He can see it or hear it. That time, he fell off a page in
One rolled up newspaper, right in the other’s throat . . . and
If he didn’t fall too long, something of the sort happened again. . . .
Harry raised his right hand, hesitated, then waved it powerfully in front of Dumbledore's face. Dumbledore didn't blink,
Look at Harry, or really look at all. And this, in Harry
opinion, solves the issue. Dumbledore wouldn’t ignore it as
that. It exists within memory, and this is not the present .
Dumbledore. But it couldn’t have been that long ago . . . Dumbledore
He sat next to her now he had silver hair, just like today's
Dumbledore. But what is this place? What are all these magicians
Are you waiting?
Harry looked more somber. The room, as he suspected when he saw it from above, was almost subterranean—more of a dressing-room than a room, he thought. was
the air of grace and dignity about the place; There are no pictures.
In the schools, there are no equipment at all; Only these connected rods of
The benches, rising in tiers on either side of the room, are all positioned so
the chair with chains on the arms could be clearly seen.
Before Harry could come to any conclusions about the position in
they were, he heard footsteps. The door at the corner of the
The hatch opened, and in walked three people—or at least one man, .
included two female surrogates.
Harry's insides went cold. The dementors — tall, hooded beings whose faces were hidden — were flying low towards the
The chair in the middle of the room, each occupying one of the man's
armed with their dead hands and looking stupid. The man between
They looked like he was about to melt down, and Harry couldn't

' '
Government . . . He knew the fighters couldn’t touch him inside.
reasonable, but he remembered their strength only too well. the
The crowd watched as the mob put the man down a bit
in the chained chair and stormed out of the room. gate
Swing closed behind them.
Harry looked down at the man now sitting in the chair and saw
that it was Karkaroff.
Unlike Dumbledur, Karkaroff looked much younger; Her hair
And the goat skin was black. He wasn't wearing thick, but thin, clothes.
and torn clothes. He was getting worse. Even though he was seeing Harry,
The chains on the arms of the chair suddenly glowed gold and snake
Their way up to Karkaroff, they tied him up there.
"Igor Karkaroff," said a soft voice to Harry's left. Harry looked
ahead and saw Mr. Crouch standing in the middle of the
the bench next to it. Crouch's hair was blond, his face very small
Lined, he looks neat and smart. “You were brought from Azkaban to show evidence to the Ministry of Metallurgy. You give
To understand that you have important information for us.”
Karkaroff straightened as best he could, clinging tightly to the
chair.
“I have, sir,” he said, and though he sounded very frightened,
Harry could still hear the familiar slight rumble in him. “I hope to be
of service to the department. I hope I helped. I — I know that the department
He’s trying to — rounding up the last of the Dark Lord’s supporters. I
Am wanting to help in any way I can. . . .”
There was a pause in the middle of the banks. Some of the magicians
And the wizards were frantically visiting Karkaroff, the others s
expressing distrust. Then Harry heard, by chance, from
The other side of Dumbledore, a familiar, growling voice said, “Shit.”

' '
Harry leaned forward to stare past Dumbledore.
Madeye Moody was sitting there — except there was a .
A noticeable difference in her appearance. He didn’t have his magic eyes, but a pair of normal eyes. Both were looking down.
Karkaroff, and the two were hardened in disappointment.
“Crouch is going to let it out,” Moody confided to .
Dumbledore. “He made a deal with her. It took me six months to
Follow him, and Crouch will let him go if he has
New names needed. Let’s hear his news, I thought, and jump
Straight to the victims.”
Dumbledore made a small noise of acknowledgment with his long drawl,
Crooked nose.
“Oh, I had forgotten . . . You don’t like idiots, do you,
Albus?” Moody said with a sardonic grin.
'No,' said Dumbledore grimly, 'I'm afraid I won't. I have a long
I feel that the department is not good if it associates with such professionals.”
“But for such risks . . .” Moody said quietly.
"You say you've got names for us, Karkaroff," said Mr. Crouch.
“Let’s hear them, please.”
“You must understand,” Karkaroff said quietly, “that He-Who-Must-Not-Be-Named always operates with great secrecy. . . .
He preferred that we — I mean, his supporters — and I regret now, very deeply, that I ever counted myself among them —”
“Keep at it,” Moody whispered.
“— we do not know the names of any of our friends — He .
Alone he knows well who we all are—”
“Which was a smart move, wasn’t it, because it stopped someone like
You, Karkaroff, from serving them all,” Moody murmured.
“But you said you had any names for us?” Mr. Kruch said.

' '
“I — I do,” Karkaroff whispered. “And these were important leaders, recall. People I saw with my own eyes do its
gift. I give this information as a declaration that I completely and utterly deny it, and that I am filled with such profound regret that I dare not —”
“What are these names?” Mr. Crouch said suddenly.
Karkaroff drew a deep breath.
“There’s Antonin Dolohov,” he says. “I — I saw him torture .
Countless Muggles are — and those who aren’t Dark Lord allies.”
“And they helped him do it,” smiles Moody.
"We've already captured Dolohov," Crouch said. " was
It was taken some time after yourself.”
"Really?" Karkaroff said, his eyes wide. “I’m — I’m so glad to hear it!”
But he didn’t look at it. Harry could tell the news had come.
Like a real treat for her. One of his names is irrelevant.
“Any others?” Crouch said coldly.
“Why, yes . . . There’s Rosier,” Karkaroff said matter-of-factly. “Ivan
Rosier.”
"Rosier is dead," Crouch said. “He was taken shortly after you .
There are also. He preferred to fight rather than come quietly and was
Killed in battle.”
“He took a little bit of me with him, though,” Moody quipped .
Harry was right. Harry looked at him again, and saw
with a wide-eyed nod poking out of his head at Dumbledore.
“No—nothing more than Rosier deserves!” Karkarof said, of course
a hint of panic in his voice now. Harry knew he had started.
He will worry that none of his information is useful to
Ministry. Karkaroff’s eyes flicked to the door in the corner, behind which the patrons still stood undoubtedly, waiting.

' '
"anymore?" Crouch said.
"Yes!" Karkaroff said. “There was Travers — he helped with the murder .
McKinnon's! Mulciber — famous at the Imperius festival,
They forced countless people to do horrible things! Rockwood, who was
One guard, and he passed that one shouldn’t be appointed useful information from within the ministry itself!”
Harry could tell that, this time, Karkaroff had struck gold. the
They could see the crowd were all moving together.
“Rockwood?” Mr. Crouch said, nodding at a nurse sitting in the
in front of him, who started tearing at his paper jacket.
“Augustus Rockwood of the Department of Mysteries?”
“Exactly,” Karkaroff enthused. “I believe he tapped into a well-established network of advisors, both within the department and outside, to
Gather information —”
"But Travers and Mulciber we have," said Mr. Crouch. "very
Alright, Karkaroff, if that’s all you’ll be sent back to Azkaban while
We mean —”
"still!" shouted Karkaroff, looking at her anxiously. “Wait, I have
further!"
Harry could see him blinking in the fluorescent light, his white skin
It contrasted sharply with the black of his hair and beard.
“Snap!” he shouted. “Cyberus Snap!”
"Snape was let down by this council," Crouch said menacingly. “He was ordered by Albus Dumbledore.”
"No!" shouted Karkaroff, straining at the chains that bound him.
to the chair. “I assure you! Severus Snape is a deathtrap!”
Dumbledore had gotten to his feet.
“I have already given evidence on this point,” he said solemnly.
“Severus Snape was indeed a Death Eater. However, he rejoined

' '
Our side before the fall of Lord Voldemort and he became powerful over us, in
adult anxiety. He’s now no more death row than I am.”
Harry turned to look at MadEye Moody. He was wearing a look.
a deep look behind Dumbledore's nose.
“Very well, Karkaroff,” Crouch said coldly, “you were an aid. I will examine your case. You’ll be back in Azkaban in
At that moment. . . .”
Mr. Crouch's voice disappeared. Harry looked around; prison
It was billowing like it was made of smoke; Everything was
It flies; He only saw her body — everything else moved
Darkness. . . .
And then the storm came again. Harry was sitting in another seat.
height, still on the opposite bench, but now to the Master's left side.
Close up. The atmosphere seemed very different: relaxed, even
cheerful. The witches and wizards around the walls were talking
For another, it’s almost like they’re into some sort of sport
event. Harry spotted a fairy halfway up the far banks. She had short blonde hair, was wearing pink stockings, and
He had smelled the end of a green jug of acid. He was, undoubtedly, a
Junior Rita Skeeter. Harry looked around; Dumbledore was sitting next to him again, dressed differently. Mr. Crouch looked
More painful and somehow, gaunter. . . . Harry understood. it
It was a different memory, a different day . . . A different attempt.
The front door opens, and Ludo Bagman enters .
The room.
This, however, is not Ludo Bagman gone to seed, but Ludo .
Bagman who was clearly at the peak of his Quidditch playing skills. He did not now cut off his nose; He was tall and thin and smart. Bagman looked confused as he sat in the chained chair.

' '
But she didn't lock him in there the way Karkaroff did, and Bagman, perhaps taking heart from this, glanced at the watching crowd, nodded at a couple of them, and managed a small smile.
“Ludo Bagman, you were brought here in front of .
Magical Law Council to Answer Allegations Related to Activities
death eaters,” Mr. Crouch said. “We have heard the evidence .
against you, and we are about to reach our destiny. Do you have anything to add to your testimony before we judge?”
Harry couldn't believe his ears. Is Ludo Bagman a Death Eater?
“No,” said Bagman, looking sorrowful, “fine—I know I have .
He was a little weird —”
One or two wizards and witches in the surrounding seats looked
with insult. Mr. Crouch did not seem to share their feelings. he
He was staring at Ludo Bagman's expression with awe and indifference.
“You didn’t say a real word, kid,” someone blurted out to .
Dumbledore behind Harry's back. He looked to his side and saw Moody.
They stayed there again. “If I hadn’t known he was always a jerk, I would have
He says some of those Bludgers have permanently affected his .
brain. . . .”
“Ludovic Bagman, you were caught passing information to the Lord .
Voldemort’s supporters,” Mr. Crouch said. “For this, I recommend a
a sentence in Azkaban that goes no less than —”
But there was a shout of anger from the benches nearby.
Several of the little ones and little ones in the front of the schools came out and bent their heads, and even their shoulders, towards Mr. Crouch.
“But I told you, I had no idea!” Bagman spoke highly of
sea ​​of ​​people, his dark blue eyes wide. “Not at all! ancient
Rookwood was a friend of my father’s . . . It never occurred to me he

' '
He was in and you know-who! I thought I was gathering information for our side! And Rookwood kept talking about getting me a
service in the ministry later . . . When my Quidditch days are over,
You know . . . Well, I can’t keep getting attacked by Bludgers for
The rest of my life, can I?”
There were stares from the crowd.
"He will be put on hold," Mr. Crouch said coldly. he turned
to the right side of the courtyard. “The court will answer in the affirmative .
Their hands . . . Those who love prison . . .”
Harry looked to the right side of the table. not
One person raised his hand. Many witches and wizards
the front of the walls began to close. One of the witches on the jury
stood.
"Yes?" said Kruch.
“We just want to thank Mr Bagman for his excellent performance for England in the Quidditch match against Turkey last year.
Saturday,” the woman whispered.
Mr. Crouch looked at her gravely. The bathroom was smelling horrible now. Bagman gets to his feet and rolls over, glowing.
“Fool,” Mr. Crouch sneered at Dumbledore, sitting down as if to .
Bagman breaks free. “Rookwood got him a real job. . . . The day Ludo Bagman joins us will be a sad day indeed
For the ministry. . . .”
And the lock dissolved again. When he returned, Harry
He looked around. He and Dumbledore were still sitting next to the Master.
Crouch, but the mood couldn’t be more different.
There was absolute silence, broken only by the dry whistles of a deranged creature,
Witches smiling wickedly in the parking lot next to Mr. Crouch. She was
She held the cheek to her mouth with trembling hands.

' '
Harry looked at Crouch and saw that he looked bored and
It’s darker than ever. A nerve was twitching in his throat.
“Bring them,” he said, and his voice carried through the conversation .
prison.
The door in the corner opened again. Six volunteers enter
This time, with an average of a four-person crew. Harry saw those people in
The crowd murmured at Mr. Crouch. Some of them are quiet.
For another.
The prisoners put each of the four people into four chairs
with interlocked hands who now stood on the prison floor. was
a muscular man who stares blankly at Crouch; Thin and
A more somber looking man, his eyes fixed on the
crowd; A woman with blonde, shiny hair and a heavy ass
Allen, who was sitting in a chair chained like a
control; and a boy in his late teens, who looked nothing but
He turned to stone. He was grinning, brown colored hair all over his face.
Her beautiful clothes are milky white. The Little Witch of the Witch alongside Crouch
She began to rock back and forth in her seat, rubbing in
His almond.
Crouch stood up. He looked down at the four in front of the
at him, and there was pure hatred on his face.
“You were brought here in front of the Magician Council .
law,” he says plainly, “to judge you, because a
Injustice is so dangerous —”
“Dad,” the short-haired boy said. "father . . .
please . . .”
“— that we have rarely heard such within this court,”
Crouch said, speaking even louder, drowning out his son's forehead.

' '
“We have heard the evidence against you. The four of you stand
charged with the arrest of an Auror — Frank Longbuttom — and the .
set him up for the honor of the Cruciatus, believing him to have
knowledge of where your imprisoned master now lies, HeWhither Must Not Be Named —”
“Dad, I didn’t!” yelled the kid in chains below. “I don’t know, I
Do it, Father, don’t bring me to the savages—”
“You are further accused,” said Mr. Crouch grimly, “of using .
The Cruciatus is a martyrdom on the wife of Frank Lungbutum, when he would not
I'll give you the news. You plan to return He-Who-Must-Not-Be-Appointed to power, and continue the life of violence you imagined while he was strong. I now question the jury—”
"mother!" yelled the boy downstairs, a little witch
Next to Crouch he began to stir, rocking back and forth.
“Mom, stop it Mom, I didn’t do it, it’s not me!”
“I now ask the jury,” Mr. Crouch shouted, “to raise their hands .
If they believe, as I do, that these crimes deserve a life sentence in
Azkaban!”
In one sense, witches and wizards on the right side of
They raised their hands. The crowd around the walls began to
They would grin as they did for Bagman, their faces filled with wild triumph. the
The child began to scream.
"No! Mother, no! I didn't, I didn't, I don't know!"
Don’t send me there, don’t give up!”
Dementors were falling into the room. Three children
The comrades rose abruptly from their seats; The woman s
Heavy-lidded eyes turned to Crouch and spoke, “Lord of Darkness .
It'll rise again, Crouch! put us in Azkaban; Let's wait! he

' '
He will rise and come for us, and give us the highest praise
of his other bosses! We are the only loyal ones! We are the only ones trying
Find him!”
But the boy was trying to resist the temptations, though
Harry could see their cool, numbing energy beginning to affect him.
The crowd was jeering, some of them on their feet, as the woman .
Freed from custody, the boy continued to fight.
“I’m your son!” He yelled at Crouch. “I’m your son!”
“You are not my son!” cried Mr. Crouch, his eyes
evidence at once. “I don’t have a son!”
The witch witch next to him gave a huge sigh and sank into the
His chair. She fell. Crouch seemed unimpressed.
“Take them off!” Crouch shouted at the rebels, smiles flying
from his mouth. “Take them off, they’ll rot there!”
"Daddy! Daddy, I'm not into it! No! No! Daddy, please!”
"I think, Harry, it's time for me to go back to my office," a quiet person said .
A voice in Harry's ear.
Harry began. He looked away. Then he looked at his other
appearance.
There was an Albus Dumbledore sitting on his right, looking
Crouch’s son was drawn to the movers — and there he was .
There was a figure of Albus Dumbledore to his left, looking authoritatively at him.
“Come,” Dumbledore to his left said, raising his hand .
Under Harry's nose. Harry felt himself soaring into the air; the prison melted around him; For a moment, everything is black, and
Then he felt as if he had taken a swift leap, and suddenly fell to his knees, in what seemed like a bright light .
of Dumbledore's sunlit office. The stone mask was burning in the

' '
The cabinet next to it, with Albus Dumbledore standing
Beside him.
"Headmaster," Harry said quietly, "I know I shouldn't—I didn't . . ."
I mean — the cabinet door was like open and —”
"I understand perfectly well," Dumbledore said. He picked up the blanket, carried it to his desk, placed it on the tilted top, and sat down .
Down in the chair behind him. He instructed Harry to sit down.
Accept it.
Harry did so, staring at the stone tablet. The wrinkles returned to their original state, silvery white, twinkling and glowing
under his guidance.
“What is it?” Harry asked hesitantly.
"This? It’s called a Pensiv,” said Dumbledore. “I sometimes
Find out, and I’m sure you know the feeling, that I have too
Many memories and memories stick in my mind.”
“Er,” Harry said, he couldn’t really say that he didn’t feel .
Something of the sort.
"In these times," Dumbledore said, pointing to the stone statue,
“I use the Pensive. One just keeps extra memories from
Someone’s brain, dissolving them in cheese, and looking at them in his mind
leisure. It becomes easier to see patterns and information, you understand, when it’s in this form.”
“You mean . . . That thing is your mind?” Harry said, looking at the
white substance moving about in the potatoes.
"Certainly," Dumbledore said. “Let me show you.”
Dumbledore produced his wand from inside his robes and
He rubbed his thumb through her silver hair, next to her dress. When the
He takes off the shirt, and the hair seems to curl around him — but then

' '
Harry saw that it was actually a shiny fragment of a ghost.
The white silver that filled the Pensieve. Dumbledore added
This new thought for the pony, and Harry, to his surprise, saw his
The face swims over the top of the bottle. He puts Dumbledore
His long arms ran on either side of the Pensieve and unfurled her, quickly
Just like a prospector finds gold nuggets . . . and
Harry watched her face change gracefully to Snape's, the open
His mouth moved to the ceiling again, his voice trembling slightly.
“She’ll be back . . . Even Karkaroff . . . Stronger and clearer
More than ever . . .”
“A connection I can make without help,” Dumbledore said quietly, “but it won’t hurt.” He stared through the top of his half-moon glasses at Harry, who was staring into Snape's face, i
He was going back and forth on the bottle. “I was using the Pensieve .
When Mr. Fudge arrived at our meeting and blew it off quite
quickly. Undoubtedly I did not close the cabinet door properly.
Surely it would have attracted your attention.”
“I’m sorry,” Harry mumbled.
Dumbledur shook his head. “Anxiety is not a sin,” he said.
“But we have to be careful with our emotions . . . Yes, absolutely . . .”
He frowned slightly and took out the memories inside the closet
With a flick of his wrist. Instantly a figure came out of him, a leper,
A pretty girl of about sixteen, who started moving slowly, s
His feet were still in the bathtub. She felt nothing for Harry.
Or Professor Dumbledore. When she spoke, her voice came back like
Snape's did, it seemed to come from the depths of
The stone bowl. “He put the hook back on me, Professor Dumbledore, and I .

' '
He was just tearing it up, sir. I just told him I saw him kissing Florence
After the garden last Thursday. . . .”
"But why, Berta," Dumbledore said sadly, looking at the
Now silently staring at the girl, “Why do you have to follow in
First place?”
“Bertha?” Harry whispered and looked down at her. “That’s it — it was .
The Bertha Jorkins ?”
“Yes,” Dumbledore said, pressing the clues in the tobacco .
again; Bertha lost them, they became ashes and
opaque again. “That’s the Bertha I remember from school.”
Pensieve’s silver light illuminated Dumbledore’s lamp
face, and it struck Harry suddenly how big he looked.
He knew, of course, that Dumbledore was getting older over the years,
But somehow he never really thought of Dumbledore as old
man.
"Okay, Harry," Dumbledore said quietly. “Before you fall into
My thoughts, you want to tell me something.”
“Yeah,” Harry said. “Master — I’m in Divination right now, .
And — er — I fell asleep.”
He hesitated here, wondering if a hug was coming, but .
Dumbledore simply said, 'Very understandable. continue."
“Well, I had a dream,” Harry said. “A dream about Lord Voldemort. He was torturing Wormtail . . . You know who the hero is —”
“I know,” Dumbledore said quietly. “Please continue.”
“Voldemort got a letter from a hero. He said something like,
Wormtail's blunder had been fixed. He said someone had died.
Then he says, Wormtail is not edible to the snake — it is .
The snake beside his chair. He said — he said he would feed me to him,

' '
instead. Then he performed a cruciatus sign on the crossbow — which was mine .
Scar hurt,” Harry said. “It woke me up, it hurt so much.”
Dumbledore just looked at him.
“Er — that’s all,” Harry said.
"I see," Dumbledore said quietly. "I see. Now, your gem is broken
At any other time this year, except for the time you’re discharged
Summer?”
“No, I—how did you know you woke me up in the summer?”
Harry said, surprised.
"You're not just a messenger for Sirius," Dumbledore said. "I
They were also in touch with him since he last left Hogwarts
year. It was me who suggested the mountain side cave was the safest.
A place to stay.”
Dumbledore got up and started walking up and down after his.
desk. Every now and then, he pressed the tip of his forefinger to his forehead and took out another shiny silver thought and added it to the Pensieve. The thoughts inside began to spin so fast that Harry couldn't
Make something obvious: It’s just so beautiful.
"teacher?" He said quietly, after a few minutes.
Dumbledore stopped walking and looked at Harry.
“I’m sorry,” he whispered. He sat down at his desk again.
“D'you — d'you know why my throat hurts?”
Dumbledore looked very hard at Harry for a moment, and
Then he said, “I have a theory, no more than that. . . . It's my area.
that your senses ache both when Lord Voldemort is nearby and
When he feels a particularly strong need.”
"But . . . for what?"
“Because you’re both full of useless crap,” he said .
Dumbledore. “That’s not a normal line.”

' '
“So you assume . . . The dream. . . Did it really happen?”
"It's possible," Dumbledore said. “I mean — it’s possible.
Harry—have you seen Voldemort?”
“No,” Harry said. “Just the back of his chair. But — there
Wasn’t there anything to see, there? I mean, he didn't have
He’s got a body, has he? but . . . But then how can he take
potato?" Harry said quietly.
“How exactly?” Dumblur exclaimed. “How exactly . . .”
Neither Dumbledore nor Harry spoke for a while. Dumbledore
He was looking around the room, and, every so often, putting his
A pair of earrings to his outfit and adds another shiny silver thought to
fireworks inside the Pensieve.
“Master,” Harry finally said, “you think he gets .
Stronger?”
"Voldeath?" Dumbledore said, looking at Harry over the Pensieve. It was Dumbledore's showing, dark look.
It was granted on other occasions, and it always made Harry feel like
Although Dumbledore was fairly certain of him in a way
Even Moody's eyes couldn't. “Once again, Harry, I can only .
Give you my complaint.”
Dumbledore grew quiet again, and looked old, and tired,
More than ever.
"The years of Voldemort's rise to power," he said, "were
marked by rituals. Berta Jurkins Disappears Without
The text in the place where Voldemort was definitely known was the killer.
Mr. Crouch also disappeared . . . Within this particular zone.
And there is a third neglect, which the Department, I regret to say, does not consider serious, as it relates to a
Muggle. His name was Frank Bryce, and he lived in the village where

' '
Voldemort’s father has grown old, and hasn’t been seen since the last year
august. You see, I read Muggle newspapers, unlike most of my
Friends of the ministry.”
Dumbledore looked very seriously at Harry.
“These crimes seem to me to be related. department
Not satisfied — as you probably heard, while waiting outside the
office."
Harry nodded his head. Silence fell between them again, Dumbledore
Removing thoughts every time. Harry felt like he
He should have gone, but his anxiety kept him in his chair.
"teacher?" He said again.
“Yes, Harry?” Dumbledore said.
“er . . . Can I ask you about . . . The trial thing I was in . . .
In Pensiv?”
“You can,” Dumbledore insisted. “I promised him a lot .
times, but some things come to me more clearly than others . . . Especially now. . . .”
"You know—you know the court where you found me?" one
With Crouch's son? Well . . . They were talking about Neville
parents?"
Dumbledore gave Harry a quick look. “It wasn’t Neville .
Did he tell you why his grandmother sent him away?” he
said.
Harry shook his head, wondering, as he did this, how he could
They couldn't ask Neville that, in his nearly four years of experience.
"Yeah, we were talking about Neville's parents," Dumbledore said. “His father, Frank, was an Auror like Professor Moody.
He and his wife were tortured for information about Voldemort
Where he was after he lost his powers, as you heard.”

' '
“So they’re dead?” Harry said quietly.
“No,” Dumbledore said, his voice filled with the same concern that Harry had .
I’d never heard there before. “They are stupid. They were both in St. Louis.
Mungo Hospital for the Magical Sick and Wounded. I believe
Neville visits them, and his grandmother, during the holidays.
They don’t know him.”
Harry sat there, stupefied. He didn’t know . . . never,
Within four years, he tried to find . .
"The Longbots were very nice," Dumbledore said.
“Attacks on them came after Voldemort fell from power, only
When everyone thought they were safe. Those crimes led to
a wave of anger like the one I don’t know. The department is under
tremendous pressure to catch the perpetrators. Unfortunately,
The Longbottoms’ evidence was — given their circumstances — none .
reliable."
“So maybe Mr. Crouch’s son isn’t involved?” said
Harry quickly said.
Dumbledur shook his head.
“As for that, I have no idea.”
Harry sat in silence once more, watching the contents of the
Observation thinks. There were two other questions he was hesitant about.
ask . . . But they speak of the wrongs of the living. . . .
“Er,” he said, “Mr. Bagman . . .”
“. . . He’s never been accused of any Dark activity since,” he said
Dumbledore sighed.
"Of course," Harry said quietly, glancing at the contents of the Pensieve, which looked more detailed now that Dumbledore had stopped adding notes. "and . . . to . . ."
But Pensieve seemed to be asking his own question about it.

' '
Snape's face was swimming across the surface again. Dumbledore
She glanced down at him and then back at Harry.
"He wouldn't have Professor Snape," he said.
Harry looked into Dumbledore's blue eyes, and that thing
He really wanted to know it came out of his mouth before he could
Stop it.
“What makes you think he actually stopped supporting Voldemort, Professor?”
Dumbledore held Harry's gaze for a few seconds and then said,
“That, Harry, is a matter between Professor Snape and myself.”
Harry knew the interview was over; Dumbledore didn’t
She looked angry, but there was an edge to her voice that told Harry that it was
Time to go. He stood, and so did Dumbledore.
“Harry,” he said as Harry reached the door. “Please don’t talk
About Neville's parents for everyone else. He has a right to let people know, when he’s ready.”
“Yes, Professor,” Harry said, and turned to go.
"and -"
Harry looked back. Dumbledore was standing above the Pensiv.
His face glowed from below with its shards of silver light, looking old
More than ever. He stared at Harry for a moment, then said, "Okay . . ."
Good luck with the third job.”

CHAPTER ONE - THE FIRST
PART K THIRD

Dumbledore is whispering you know who is getting more powerful
Also like that?” Run whined.
Everyone saw Harry in the Pensieve, almost everyone
Dumbledore told him and pointed to his back, he was now
shared with Ron and Hermione—and, of course, with Sirius, to .
To whom Harry sent an owl the moment he left Dumbledore's office. Harry, Ron, and Hermione spent the afternoon at home
room again that night, talking about it all up to Harry’s head
He was intrigued, until he realized what Dumbledore meant
over a head so full of ideas that it’s
A pleasure to siphon them off.
Ron looked at the fireplace of the common room. Harry thought he knew
Ron shivered slightly, despite the heat of the evening.
“And he trusts Snape?” Run said. “He really trusts Snape, even .
Even though he knew he was deadly serious?”
“Yeah,” Harry said.
is

' '
Hermione didn't speak for ten minutes. She was staying with
His chin in his hands, staring at his feet. Harry thought about it.
Even it sounds like it could work with the Pensieve.
“Rita Skiter,” she said with a finality.
“How dare you blame her now?” Run said, speaking
disbelief.
“I don’t mind,” Hermione said to her feet. "am
I was just thinking . . . Remember what she told me at three
Fireballs? 'I know stuff about Ludo Bagman that would regenerate .
Your hair is broken.' That’s what she meant, isn’t it? She announced her
court, she learned that he had passed information to the Death Eaters. and
Winky too, remember . . . — Ludo the Bad Wizard Sir.
Crouch would be furious if he lost, he would talk
about it at home.”
“Yeah, but Bagman didn’t pass the information along, did he?”
Hermione waved her hand.
“And Fudge thinks Madame Maxime is attacking Crouch?” run
He said, turning to Harry.
“Yes,” said Harry, “but he’s only saying that because Crouch .
He landed next to the Beauxbatons boat.”
“We didn’t think of it, did we?” Ron said quietly. "mind
You, of course she has great blood, and she doesn’t want to admit
it -"
“Of course she doesn’t,” Hermione said quietly, looking up.
“Look what happened to Hagrid when Rita found out about his
mother. Look at Fudge, jumping to conclusions about him, just because he's a fucking figure. Who needs that kind of protection? I might say I have big bones if I knew that’s what I was going to get because I told i
truth."

' '
Hermione looked at her watch. “We don’t do any work!” She said, looking confused. “We were going to do a Delayed Crossing! We should really stop by tomorrow! come
on, Harry, you need to get some sleep.”
Harry and Ron walked slowly back to their dorm room. as
Harry pulled on his pajamas and looked over at Neville's bed. true
About his word to Dumbledore, he didn't tell Ron and Hermione
About Neville’s parents. As Harry took off his glasses and went up
In four posts, he imagines what it must feel like to lose a parent
He’s still alive but he can’t know you. He always found mercy.
From aliens because he was an orphan, but as he heard from Neville .
He snorted, thinking that Neville deserved it more than he did. lying
In the darkness, Harry felt a mixture of anger and disgust towards the people who had sexually assaulted Mr. and Mrs. Longbottom. . . . He remembers the public performances as the son of Crouch and his friends .
they were dragged out of court by prosecutors. . . . He understands how they feel. . . . Then he remembered the milk egg
The boy's pleading face and he realized with a jolt that he was dead.
A year later. . . .
It was Voldemort, Harry thought, squinting at his wand .
The bed in the darkness, it all came back to Voldemort. . . . He was a
Someone who has torn these families apart, who has ruined all these
living. . . .
Run and Hermione have to study for their exams.
which ends on the third working day, but there are
They put most of their effort into helping Harry get ready.
“Don’t worry about it,” Hermione said moments after Harry pulled away .
He reminds them of that and says it’s not worth yelling at his gun.

' '
itself for a while, “at least we’ll get top marks in Defense Against the
The dark arts. We’re not going to find out about all these hybrids in
class."
“Nice training for when we’re all Aurors,” Ron said excitedly, .
They tried to pull the Impediment over a twisted nose
the room and let him hang dead in mid-air.
The atmosphere in the castle as they entered June became eerie and
She tensed up again. Everyone was waiting for the third task, which
It will be held the week before the end of term. Harry was practicing hexes at every available moment. He feels more secure about
these tasks than any of the others. But it’s hard and dangerous.
It would be without a doubt, Moody was right: Harry managed to
He had found his way past dangerous creatures and dismantled barriers before now, and this time he had some perspective, some opportunity to prepare for what lay ahead.
I'm tired of walking on Harry, Hermione, and Ron throughout the
School, Professor McGonagall gave them permission to use
the empty reading of the Transfiguration at lunchtime. He had Harry
He soon mastered the Impediment Curse, an item to paralyze and immobilize attackers; of Reductor, which will allow it to
Move coarse objects out of its path; and Four-Point Writing, which is useful
discovering Hermione would make his wand point
north, which is why he made sure to walk in
good visibility inside the hood. He still has problems with
of the Charm of the Shield, though. This was supposed to drop a field,
An invisible ship upon itself that obscures the small chaos; Hermione manages to paralyze her with a Jelly-Legs Jinx instead, and
Harry looks around the room ten minutes later before
She was looking up at the controller.

' '
“You’re still doing really well, though,” Hermione said encouragingly, looking down at her list and crossing out the notes they had .
He's already learned. “Some of them are bound to come in handy.”
“Come and see this,” said Ron, who was standing next to .
window. He was looking down at the ground. "What is Malfoy
did?"
Harry and Hermione went to see. Malfoy, the Crab, and Guyle were
He stood in the shade of a low tree. Crab and Guyle look like
Be careful of the look; They were both looking. Malfoy was stroking his
hand to his mouth and speaking into it.
"He looks like he's using a walkie-talkie," Harry muttered curiously.
"Impossible," Hermione said, "I told you, that kind of
Things are not perfect around Hogwarts. Come on, Harry,” she added
Quickly, he turned away from the window and back to the
across the room, “let’s try that Shield Charm again.”
Sirius was feeding chickens every day now. Like Hermione, it seems like
I wanted to focus on getting Harry through the last task before
They think about something else. Harry reminded
In each letter everything possible outside the walls of
Hogwarts wasn’t Harry’s destiny, nor was he within it
The strength to follow through.
If Voldemort really is getting stronger, he wrote, my
The first step is to ensure your safety. He cannot hope to lay his hands on
on you while under Dumbledore’s protection, but all
On the contrary, don't take risks: Focus on getting through this
Laberyne safely, and then we can turn our attention to the others
issues.

' '
Harry's nerves grew as June twenty-fourth approached,
But they weren’t as bad as the ones he felt before the first and second jobs. For one thing, he was confident that, this time, he had
He did everything he could to prepare himself for the task. For another,
This is the ultimate test, and regardless of the good or bad, the tournament will eventually be over, which will be a huge loss.
Yesterday was a very noisy affair at the Gryffindor table around
The morning of the third task. The mysterious doll appears and brings Harry
Sirius’ treasure card. There is only one piece of paper,
He fell and had a muddy footprint on his front, but Harry
Appreciate it all the same. An alarmed owl arrived for Hermione.
She got her usual Christmas Eve shopping as usual. She unfolded the paper, turned to the first page, and poured a mouthful of sticky juice all over it.
"what?" Harry and Ron all said, looking at her.
“No,” Hermione gasped, trying to push the paper away .
He doesn't expect it, but Ron catches him. He weighed in on the subject and said,
"No way. Not today. That old cow.”
"what?" Harry said. “Rita Skeeter again?”
“No,” Ron said, and like Hermione, tried to push .
the paper out of sight.
“It’s about me, isn’t it?” Harry said.
“No,” Ron said, sounding completely unconvinced.
But before Harry could ask to see the paper, Draco Malfoy
he shouted across the Great Hall from the Slytherin table.
“Hi, Peter! plate! How is your hair? Do you feel good? sure
Aren’t you going to break it for us?”
Malfoy had kept a regular Christmas newsletter too. Slytherin

' '
Up and down the table they were fidgeting, turning in their seats to see
Harry's answer.
“Let me see,” Harry said to Ron. “Give it here.”
Reluctantly, Ron handed over the newspaper. Harry turned around.
ended up finding himself looking at his reflection, under the
Banner title:
Harry Potter
“ACCOUNTABLE AND ACCOUNTABLE”
The boy who won He-Who-Must-Not-Be-Named is unstable and potentially dangerous, writes
Rita Skeeter, Medical Director. Shocking evidence has recently emerged about Harry Potter’s strange behavior, raising doubts about his parentage .
A case for competing in a demanding competition
Like the Triwizard Tournament, or even to join
Hogwarts School.
Potter, the Everlasting Christmas can only prove,
He yells all the time at school, and they often hear
Complaints of pain in the hair on his penis (relic
of the suffering with which he tried-you-know-who
to kill him). Last Monday, in the middle of a
Cooking lesson, your daily Christmas chef
He saw Potter coming out of the classroom and said
That his gymnastics is too painful to continue.
studying.
It’s possible, according to leading experts at St. Mary’s Hospital. Mungo for the sick and injured sadly, that Potter's brain was affected by the attack on him .

' '
by you-know-who, and that his insistence
That the gem is still close speaks for itself.
deep panic.
“Maybe he was pretending, too,” one doctor said. “This may be a case for attention.”
The Everlasting Prophet, however, issued
Interesting Fact About Harry Potter That Albus
Dumbledore, the Headmaster of Hogwarts, carefully hides from the wizarding world.
“Potter can speak in Parsel language,” Draco revealed .
Malfoy, a fourth year at Hogwarts. “There are a lot of
assaults on students two years ago, and
A lot of people thought Potter was behind them after
They saw him fall into a racing club and
Put the snake on another child. All was quiet,
though. But he made friends with wolves and
The heavens are too. We think it would do something with a little bit of
health."
Parseltongue, the ability to communicate with snakes,
It has long been considered abstract art. true,
The most famous parselmouth of our time no
other than you-know-whoself. A member of the
The hardcore defense union, which wants to
Remain unnamed, he said he would consider some
A magician who can speak in Parseltongue “as worthy .
investigation. Personally, I would be very suspicious of anyone who can talk to snakes.
As rights are often used in a bad kind of
Dark Magic, and have been historically associated with

' '
Workers of the devil.” Similarly, “he that seeks
A bunch of crazy people like foxes
and the heavens would appear to have a fascination for
violence."
Albus Dumbledore should really think
Should such a child be allowed to
They compete in the Triwizard Cup. Some fear
Potter will be able to step up to the dark arts in his bid to win the championship, the third task of
which takes place this afternoon.
“You got on me a little, didn’t you?” Harry said lightly, and picked up
paper.
At the Slytherin table, there were Malfoy, the Crab, and Guyle
They laugh at him, bang their heads with their fingers, pull
Silly faces, and they move their tongues like deer.
“How did she know your nerves were hurt in Divination?” Run said.
“There’s no way she’s in there, there’s no way she can hear —”
“The window was open,” Harry said. “I opened it to breathe.”
“You’re at the top of the North Tower!” Hermione said. "your
sound can’t carry all the way to the ground!”
“Well, you are the one who should be looking for magic .
steam tables!” Harry said. “Tell me how she did it!”
“I was dreaming!” Hermione said. “But I . . . but . . .”
An odd, dreamy expression suddenly came over Hermione's face.
She slowly raised a hand and ran her fingers through his hair.
“Are you okay?” said Ron, nodding.
“Yes,” Hermione whispered. She ran her fingers through the
Her hair too, and then she held her hand to her mouth, as if

' '
she spoke into an invisible walkie-talkie. Harry and Ron looked at the
each other.
“I have an idea,” Hermione said, staring off into space. “I think I
know . . . because then no one can see . . . also
moody . . . And she could have gotten in the window
Ledge . . . But she was not abandoned. . . She wasn’t really feared. . . I
I thought we had it! Just give me a couple of seconds in the library — just
To be sure!”
With that, Hermione grabbed her school bag and stormed out of the
The great room.
“Oh!” Ron called after her. “We have our magic history .
Exam in ten minutes! Blimey,” he said, turning to Harry, “she .
You have to really hate that Skeeter woman to miss the first episode of a
test. What are you going to do in Binns’ class—read again?”
Exempt from end-of-season trials as Triwizard boss,
Harry had sat in the back of every exam class so far, looking
up new hexes for the third task.
“S'pose so,” said Harry to Ron; But just then, Professor McGonagall came walking towards the Gryffindor dungeons next to him.
"Potter, the servants are meeting in the side room of the
Hall after lunch,” she said.
“But the job isn’t until tonight!” Harry said, blushing in defeat.
Crack the eggs down in front of him, afraid of getting lost in time.
"I know that, Potter," she said. “Champion Families
They’re expected to see the latest work, you know. This is just a simple
right to teach them.”
It's far away. Harry repeated after him.
“She wasn’t expecting the Dursleys to show up, was she?” he asked
Ron furiously.

' '
“I don’t know,” Ron said. "Harry, I better hurry, I'm going to be late
For Binns. see you soon."
Harry finished his breakfast in the empty Great Hall. recognize
Flor Delacour got up from the Ravenclaw table and joined Cedric as
He runs to the next room and enters. Chrome went out to
Joining them shortly afterwards. Harry stayed where he was. He really
He didn’t want to go into the room. He has no family — no family
Whoever comes out sees him risk his life, whoever it is. But as he
He was getting up and thinking he could go to the library.
And do one more spot hex search, the door to the side room
It opened, and Cedric stuck his head out.
“Harry, come, they’re waiting for you!”
Completely confused, Harry woke up. Neither could the Dursleys.
They’ll be here, can they? He walked across the hall and opened
The door into the room.
Cedric and his parents were just inside the door. Victor Krum
He was in the same corner, talking to his dark haired mother and
My father speaks fluent Bulgarian. He had restored his father’s broken nose.
Across the room, Fleur was scratching at
French for his mother. Fleur’s younger sister, Gabrielle, was holding her
My mother's hand. She waved at Harry, who waved back, grinning.
Then he saw Mrs. Weasley and Bill standing in front of the fireplace, staring at him.
"surprise!" Mrs. Weasley said excitedly as he smiled broadly and
He walked up to them. “Thought we’d come see you, Harry!”
She leaned in and kissed him on the cheek.
“Are you okay?” Bill said, looking at Harry and lowering his
hand. “Charlie wanted to come, but he couldn’t get time off. he
He says you’re no match for Horntail.”

' '
Fleur Delacour, Harry noticed, was looking at Bill with great interest over his mother's shoulder. Harry could tell she didn't have any need for long hair or curls with feathers on them.
“That’s really nice of you,” Harry grinned at Mrs. Weasley. "I
Think for a moment—the Dursleys—”
“Hmm,” Mrs. Weasley said, licking her lips. She had always refrained from criticizing the Dursleys in front of Harry, but her eyes .
They light up every time they’re mentioned.
"It's great to be back here," Bill says, looking around the room (Violet, the Fat Lady's best friend, peers out of her frame).
“I haven’t seen this place for five years. Is the picture of the doctor
Is he still a knight? Mr. Cadogan?”
“Oh yes,” said Harry, who had met Sir Cadogan the previous day .
year.
“And Mrs. Fat?” Bill said.
"She was here in my time," Mrs. Weasley said. “She gave me
Like these stories one night when I came back to the orphanage for
Wednesday afternoon —”
“What were you doing from your dorm at 4 a.m. in
morning?" Bill said, looking proudly at his mother.
Mrs. Weasley sighed, her eyes tearing up.
“Your father and I were having a party one night,” she said. "he
He was shot by Apollyon Pringle — he was the protagonist in those .
days — of your father still had a brand.”
“Would you like to pay us a visit, Harry?” Bill said.
“Yeah, okay,” Harry said, and they made their way towards the
The entrance to the Great Hall. As they passed Amos Digguri, he
He looked around.
“There you are, right?” He said, looking Harry up and down.

' '
“Bet you’re not feeling so good about yourself now Cedric’s taken .
You cheated on points, did you?”
"what?" Harry said.
“Don’t leave him,” Cedric said in a low voice to Harry, ducking his head behind his father. “He’s been flying around since Rita Skeeter’s article .
About the Triwizard League — you know, when it was released .
You’re the only Headmaster of Hogwarts.”
“Not enough to fix her, though, is it?” Amos Diggory said, loud enough for Harry to hear as he began to unwind from the .
door with Mrs. Weasley and Bill. "Still . . . you show him,
Saturday. You beat him once before, didn’t you?”
“Rita Skeeter went out of her way to cause trouble, Amos!” madam.
Wesley said angrily. “I would think you would know that,
Work in the ministry!”
Mr. Diggory looked like he was going to say something
He was angry, but his wife put her hand on his arm, and he just shrugged
And he turned.
Harry had a lovely afternoon walking around the sun.
Earth with Bill and Mrs. Weasley, he showed them the Beauxbatons carriage and the Durmstrang ship. Mrs. Wesley was
preferred by the Whomping Willow, which was planted after
She dropped out of school, and talked a lot about fan of games
next to Hagrid, a man called Ogg.
“How’s Percy?” Harry asked as they walked through the wooden houses.
“It was bad,” Bill says.
“He’s very sad,” Mrs. Weasley said, lowering her voice and .
Looking around. “The Ministry wants to keep quiet about Mr. Crouch’s death, but Percy has been dragged in for questioning on

' '
orders which Mr. Crouch sends.
She thinks there’s a good chance he didn’t actually write them.
Percy was under a lot of pressure. They don’t let it burn
Mr. Crouch is the fifth judge tonight. Cornelius Fudge goes to
Be doing it.”
Return to the castle for lunch.
“Mom — Bill!” Ron said, looking puzzled, as he entered the
The Gryffindor table. “What are you doing here?”
“Come see Harry on the last job!” Mrs. Wesley said
With the morning. “I have to say, it makes a lovely substitute, not having to cook.
How was your exam?”
"Oh . . . well," said Ron. "I can't remember all the bullshit
Rebel names, so I made some up. That’s right,” he said, helping .
himself to a Cornish potpourri, while Mrs. Weasley watched sorrowfully,
“They all called them things like Bodrod the squirrel and the urg the squirrel; It wasn’t hard.”
Fred, George, and Ginny came to sit next to them as well, and
Harry was having a good time, he felt almost like he
They had returned to the Burrow; He forgot to worry about that.
shift, and not until Hermione showed up, halfway through
lunch, he remembers she has a crush on Rita
Skitter.
“Are you going to tell us — ?”
Hermione shook her head thoughtfully and looked at the Lady.
Wesley.
“Hello, Hermione,” Mrs. Weasley said, sooner than
usual.
“Hello,” Hermione said, her gaze flickering in the cold look on Mrs. Weasley’s face.

' '
Harry looked between them and then said, “Mrs. Weasley, you wouldn't believe that crap that Rita Skeeter wrote in the Witch Weekly, would you?
Because Hermione isn’t my girlfriend.”
"Oh!" said Mrs. Weasley. “No — I really don’t!”
But she became very warm towards Hermione after the
that.
Harry, Bill, and Mrs. Weasley spent the evening with a
A long walk around the castle, then back to the main hall
for the evening meal. Lodo Bagman and Cornelius Fudge had
He joined the staff table now. Bagman looks quite pleased, but Cornelius Fudge, who is sitting next to Madame Maxime, looks
Stern and wasn’t joking. Madame Maxim was in charge of
His apron, and Harry thought his eyes looked red. He grabbed Hagrid
Glancing at her across the table.
There were more courses than usual, but Harry, who was starting to feel really hungry now, didn't eat much. as a marginalized
The roof above his head began to glow from gray to gray, and Dumbledore rose to his feet at the staff table, and silence fell.
“Sir and sir, in fifteen minutes, I will ask
You make your way to the Quidditch pitch for Day Three
and the final tasks of the Triwizard Cup. There will be champions.
Please follow Mr. Bagman down the hill now.”
Harry got up. All the Gryffindors around the table were cheering; The Wesleys and Hermione wish him all the best,
And he headed out of the great hall with Cedric, Fleur, and .
Victor.
“Are you feeling alright, Harry?” Bagman asked when they
The stone steps on the ground. "confident?"
“I’m fine,” Harry said. It’s kind of true; He was gone, but

' '
He continued to run over all the hooks and swings he had been using.
In his mind as they walked, and knowing he could
Remember they all made him feel better.
They walked to the Quidditch pitch, which was now completely unrecognizable. A twenty-foot-high wall runs all the way
On the edge of it. There is a bridge in front of them:
giving a big thumbs up. The street above looks dark and
creepy.
Five minutes later, the stores began to fill up; There was air saturated with
Excited voices and footsteps as hundreds of students
fill in their seats. The sky was a deep, clear blue now, and
The first stars began to appear. Hagrid, Professor Moody, Professor McGonagall, and Professor Flitwick came walking through the stadium, approaching Bagman and the elders. are
They wore big, red, glowing stars on their hats, all but Hagrid,
who had his on the back of his touch screen.
“We’re going to do drills outside the park,” he said .
Professor McGonagall for the pirates. “If you get in trouble,
And they want to be saved, send red arrows in the air, and one of us
He’s coming to get you, do you understand?”
The ancients shook their heads.
“Off you go, then!” Bagman said grinning at the four spies.
“Good morning, Harry,” Hagrid whispered, and the four .
They went separate ways, to settle around
the lobster. Bagman now points his wand to his forehead, smirking,
“Sonorus,” and his magically amplified voice goes on in .
stood.
“Lord and master, the third and final task of the Triwizard

' '
The tournament is about to start! Let me remind you how the points
Standing up now! They are tied for first place, with five and eight points each —
Mr. Cedric Diggory and Mr. Harry Potter, both of Hogwarts
school!" Festivals and parties drove birds out of respect
The forest floated in the billowing sky. “In the second place, s
Eight hundred — Mr. Viktor Krum, of the Durmstrang Institute!”
More fun. “And in third place — Mrs. Fleur Delacour,
Beckbatoon Academy!”
Harry could just make out Mrs. Weasley, Bill, Ron, and Hermione politely praising Fleur, halfway down the stairs. He held out his hand.
to them, and they are accustomed to it, and worship it.
"Okay . . . on my watch, Harry and Cedric!” Bagman said.
“Three — two — one —”
He gave a blast of his wand, and Harry and Cedric dashed forward in the orbit.
Tall pipes cast dark shadows on the road, and,
Either because they were too tall and heavy or because they had
He was moved, the muffled screams of the surrounding crowd
the moment they went into orbit. Harry felt almost as if he
They are underwater as well. He draws his wand, looks on,
“Lumos,” and he heard Cedric do the same thing right behind him.
After traveling about fifty yards, they came to a clearing. They looked at each
other.
“See you,” Harry said, and took the one on the left, while Cedric
He took the right.
Harry heard Bagman's roar for the second time. Chrome has
He entered the abyss. He ran past Harry quickly. His chosen path appears to be absolutely deserted. He turned to the right, and sped up, grabbing his

' '
a high box over his head, trying to see as far ahead as possible. still,
Nothing in sight.
Bagman's body launched into the distance for a third time. All of the
There are now old ones inside.
Harry kept looking behind him. The old feeling that he was being watched was upon him. The flower was getting greener with
Every minute that passed as the sky above his head grew darker and darker into the blue of the sea. he
He reached the second fork.
“Show me,” he whispered, holding it softly in his hand.
The voice turned once and pointed to her right, towards
a solid wall. The trail was north, and he knew he had to go
Northwest for the center of the pillar. The best he can do is
take the left brake and go to the right as quickly as possible.
The road ahead was empty as well, when Harry turned right
He turned and took it, again finding his way unobstructed. Harry didn't
They knew why, but the lack of trouble was frustrating. Of course he
Should something meet now? It feels like a boat
luring him into a false sense of security. Then he heard movement.
Right after. He drew his bow and prepared to strike, but
the arrow fell just short of Cedric, who darted out of the way on
right side. Cedric looked at her worriedly. The time of
His clothes were falling apart.
“Hagrid’s flaming screws!” He's silent. “They’re great — I just left!”
He shook his head and disappeared from sight, in the opposite direction.
Keen to put a lot of space between it and the screws,
Harry rushed back. Then, as he rounded a corner, he saw . . . a
the dementor rolls to his side. Twelve feet tall, his face hidden by

' '
The basket, its gnarled, wrinkled arms stretched out, continued, sighing
His way is blind to it. Harry could hear his breath hitching; he
I could feel the cold of the chill stealing away from him, but he knew what he had to do
do. . . .
Summoning the happiest thought he could, he focused
with all his might at the thought of getting off the boat and
He celebrates with Run and Hermione, raises his wand, and cries,
“Wait Patronom!”
A silver tooth emerged from the end of Harry's wand and darted away.
Next to the dementor, who fell back and landed on the edge of the
his clothes. . . . Harry had never seen a dementor lurk.
“Wait!” He shouted, staring at his silver back.
executive. “You are an idiot! Ridiculous!”
There was a loud crack, and the shapeshifter exploded in a window
of smoke. The silverback is out of sight. Harry hoped he could
sitting, could use some company . . . But he moved
On, as quickly and quietly as he could, he listened intently, his stick drawn
Expensive again.
left . . . right . . . He leaves again. . . Twice he found himself dealing with
Dead doors. He did the four-dot check again and found that he
He was going too far east. He turned back, took a right turn, and saw
An indescribable golden dust floated in front of him.
Harry approached her cautiously and pointed at the lightsaber.
This seems like some sort of spell. he asked himself.
If he can get it out of the way.
“Reductor!” he said.
The needle sucked right into the needle, leaving it intact. he
She thinks he should know better; The discount rate is for

' '
Long things. What would happen if he walked through the fog?
Is it worth the risk, or does it have to be doubled back?
He was still recovering when a scream broke the silence.
“Fluor?” Harry shouted.
There was silence. He looks in all directions. What happened to him? Her scream seemed to come from somewhere.
ahead. He took a deep breath and ran through the exposed snow.
The world turned on its head. Harry was hanging in the
the floor, with her hair on top, her teeth dangling from her nose,
threatening to fall into the bottomless sky. He took them to
The tip of his nose and he sat there, stunned. It felt like her legs
they were attached to the tree, which has now become the roof. below
to it dark skies, with stars hanging endlessly. It feels like
Even if he tried to move one of his legs, he would fall off the
the whole floor.
Think, he told himself, as all the blood rushed to his head,
mind . . .
But none of the rings he designed were designed to .
conflict and the sudden displacement of earth and sky. Is he able to move his
foot? He could hear the blood pounding in his ears. has two
Choices — Try to look, or blink the green arrows, and they will be delivered
And he was fired from that job.
He closed his eyes, so as not to see the view of the endless ground below him, and drew his right leg back as far as he could .
away from the thatched roof.
Immediately, the world rights itself. Harry fell forward onto his
His feet on wonderfully solid ground. He felt disabled for a moment.
With shame. He took a deep breath, concentrated, then got up again.

' '
and rushed forward, looking back over his shoulder as he fled
From the golden arrow, which glittered brightly about him in the
Moonlight.
He stopped at a two-way junction and looked in the opposite direction.
Some sign of Fleur. He was sure she had screamed.
What did she encounter? Was she okay? There was no sign of red.
sparks — whether that means she got herself out of trouble, or was
Is she in such trouble that she can’t reach her toilet? Harry got
side branch with increasing cracked sensation . . . But in
the same time, he couldn't help but think, One captain down . . .
The box is somewhere nearby, and it looks like
Fleur was no longer in the audience. It’s gotten that far, hasn’t it?
What if he actually wins? Simply, and for the first
Since he found himself president, he's seen that picture again
of himself, raising the Triwizard Cup in front of the rest of the
school. . . .
He didn't meet anything for ten minutes, but he kept running towards the dead
It's over. Twice he took the same wrong turn. Finally, he found a
A new path and began to stroll across it, the bright light of it moving, casting its shadow to flicker and bounce across the wooden walls. Then he
He turned another corner and came face to face with a Blast-Ended .
Screw.
Cedric was right—an adult. Ten feet tall, looking
it depends on the bigger picture more than anything. His long voice broke.
on his back. His heavy armor shimmered in Harry's light
Wand, he reminded her.
“Stop!”
The needle hit the screw hole and added; Harry lost

' '
just in time, but he can smell stained lips; She was singing the top of
his head. The Skrew let out a blast of fire from around him and flew forward towards him.
“A fool!” Harry shouted. The spike hit the screw order.
Once again it ricocheted off; Harry took a few steps back and collapsed.
over. “RUGGLE!”
The screwdriver was inches from him when he swung — managing to hit his fleshy, unshelled underside. With a sigh, Harry
He pushed himself out of it and ran, gallantly, in the opposite direction—the Refugee was not permanent; Screw
He would be coming back using his legs at any moment.
He took a left turn down a dead end, a right turn and turned down another;
Forcing himself to stop, heart pounding, he did the Four-Point Tick again, turned back, and selected the direction to take .
It has northwest.
He was yelling in the new direction a few minutes ago.
When he hears something on the street running parallel to his
That’s why he stopped dying.
"what are you doing?" exclaimed Cedric. “What the hell
D'you think you do?”
And then Harry heard Krum's voice.
“Crucio!”
Suddenly, the air was filled with Cedric's screams. Confused, Harry started to look in his direction, trying to find a way to Cedric's. when
No one came out and tried the Curse Reducer again. It wasn’t very serious, but it burned a small hole in the window with which
Harry pushed his foot, stepping on heavy roots and branches.
Until they break down and make a purchase; fought in it,

' '
Clenching his jaw, and looking to his right, he saw Cedric shaking and
He writhed on the floor, Krum standing over him.
Harry pulled away and pointed his wand at Krum just as
Krum looked up. Krum turned and started running.
“Stop!” Harry shouted.
Salt hit Krum in the back; He stopped dead in his tracks,
He sank forward, and lay motionless, face down in the grass. Harry
He reached for Cedric, who stopped shaking and was leaning
There he pants, his hands on his face.
“Are you okay?” Harry said sternly, grabbing Cedric's arm.
“Yeah,” Cedric sighed. "Yeah . . . I don't believe it. . . He passed
Behind me. . . . I heard him and turned around and he had his
A stick on me. . . .”
Cedric stood up. It’s still fascinating. He and Harry looked down.
in Chrome.
“I can’t believe this . . . I think it’s good,” Harry said,
He looks at Krum.
“Me too,” Cedric said.
“Did you hear Fleur whispering earlier?” Harry said.
“Yeah,” Cedric said. “Don’t you think Krum took her too?”
“I don’t know,” Harry said quietly.
“Should we leave him here?” Cedric muttered.
“No,” Harry said. “I think we should send red flags.
Someone will come and join him . . . Otherwise, it will probably be
It’s eaten with a screwdriver.”
“He’ll deserve it,” Cedric murmured, but all the same, he shrugged .
his wand and fired a trail of red sparks into the air, which floated high above Krum, marking the spot where he was sitting.

' '
Harry and Cedric stood there in the dark for a moment,
They look at them. Then Cedric said, “Well . . . I think we will
You better move on. . . .”
"what?" Harry said. "Oh . . . yes . . . right . . ."
It was an incredible moment. He and Cedric had been together for a while.
against Krum — now the fact that they were rivals is back .
For Harry. The two walked down the dark street without
He spoke, then Harry turned to the left, and Cedric to the right. Cedric's legs soon died.
Harry continued, continuing to use the Four Dots pointer, making sure he was moving in the right direction. It includes
and Cedric now. His desire to reach the top first was now burning
Stronger than ever, but he couldn't believe what he'd just seen
Krum did. Using the Unforgivable Curse on the other person was synonymous with a life time in Azkaban, that's what Moody said
them. Krom couldn’t possibly want the Triwizard’s Cup for
In a bad way. . . . He ran past Harry quickly.
Each time he stumbled upon more nonsense, but the growing darkness made him feel closer and closer to the heart of the dragon.
Then, as he walked down the long, straight road, he noticed movement
Another time, and his bright light fell upon an extraordinary creature, whom he had only seen in the form of an image, in his beast .
The Book of Animals.
He was a sphinx. He has the body of a very large horse: he has huge antlers
body and a long white tail ending in a tuft of gray. His head, however, is that of a woman. She rolled her long almond-shaped eyes.
at Harry as he approached. He raised his wand, sighing. she
He wasn’t crouching like he was going to get out, but looking from side to side of the
way, it stops its growth. Then she spoke, in a deep, soothing voice.

' '
“Very close to your target. The road quickly crossed my mind.”
"So . . . So will you look, please?” Harry said, knowing what the
The answer was going to be.
“No,” she said, walking away. “Not unless you can give birth .
My voice. Answer to your first comment — I let you pass. answer
Wrong — I insist. Stay quiet — I’ll let you go from
Nothing happened to me.”
Harry's stomach went through many twists and turns. It was Hermione who
He was good at this sort of thing, wasn’t he. He has exceeded his capabilities. whether
The voice is so terrible, he can breathe, get out of
The Sphinx is unharmed, and try to find another path to the center.
“Okay,” he said. “Can I hear the bell?”
The sphinx sits on her hind legs, in the middle of the
method, and reads:
“Think first of a man alive with a smile,
who works openly and speaks nothing but lies.
Next, let me know what is the last thing I would fix,
The middle of the middle and the end of the end?
And finally give me the sound I hear all the time.
During the search for a difficult word to find.
Now combine them and answer me like this:
What person would you not want to kiss?”
Harry stared at her.
“I could have it again . . . More quickly?” He asked quietly.
She rolled her eyes at him, smiled, and repeated the spell.
“All memories add up to one person I don’t want to kiss?”
Harry asked.

' '
She just smiled with her mysterious smile. Harry took this for a
"Yes." Harry focused in the corner. There are many animals in it.
He didn’t want to kiss; His immediate thought was BlastEnded
Screw it, but something tells him that's not the answer. will have
To try to work out ideas. . . .
“An enchanted person,” Harry muttered, looking at her, “who .
lies . . . er . . . That would be a — a director. No, not my thoughts!
A — a guard? I’ll come back to that . . . Can you give me the following
Clue again, please?”
She repeated the next lines of the poem.
“ 'The last thing they would fix,' ” Harry replied. “er . . . No idea. . .
The 'middle class' . . . Can I have the last piece again?”
She gave him the last four digits.
“ 'The music I often hear during the search for a hard-to-find problem .
Word,' ” Harry said. “er . . . That will be it. . . er . . . Hold — 'er'! on
One voice!”
The Sphinx smiled at her.
“Pushing . . . er . . . guard . . . er . . .” Harry said, looking up and down.
“The Creator I don’t want to kiss . . . Spiders!”
Sphinxes smiled more deeply. She got up and stretched out in front of him.
fingers, then stepped aside for him to pass.
"thank you!" Harry said, and, surprised at his own cleverness, he
He rushed forward.
It should be close by now, it should be. . . . His wand was talking
He is bang on the road; As long as he also didn’t meet anything
luxury, he might have a chance. . . .
Harry broke into a run. He had a choice of streets ahead.
“Show me!” He kissed his wand again, and it turned

' '
And he showed him the one on the right hand. He took that one out and
He saw a light ahead.
The Triwizard Cup was glowing on a pole a hundred yards away.
away. Suddenly, a dark figure dashed out onto the street in front of the
he.
Cedric would get there first. Cedric was running as fast as
He could next to the cup, and Harry knew he wouldn't touch,
Cedric is much taller, with very long legs —
Then Harry noticed something big on a ledge to his left.
He moves rapidly in a direction parallel to his own; compliance
He looks so fast Cedric almost runs into him, and Cedric, his eyes
On the coffee, he didn’t see it —
“Cedric!” Harry shouted. “On your left!”
Cedric looked just in time to run himself over the object.
And be careful they meet him, but in his haste, he disappeared. He saw Harry
Cedric's wand slipped out of his hand as a giant spider swooped in
way and began to lose Cedric.
“Stop!” cried Harry; The politicians descended upon the large, hairy spider.
Black body, but for all the good it does, it might as well have
They threw a stone at him; The spider reared, turned, and ran to
Harry instead.
“Stop! A fool! You’re right!”
But it was no use — the spider was either too big, or too magical,
that the spells do nothing but destroy it. He had Harry
A stunning sight of eight glowing black eyes and a
pincers before he was on it.
He is suspended in the air on his front legs; They fight with hell,
He tried to dismiss it; His foot stuck to the stirrups and forward

' '
moment was in excruciating pain. He could hear Cedric shouting.
“Stop!” Him too, but his smile was no more important than Harry's —
Harry lifted his wand as the spider opened his curtains again.
and shouted “Expelliarmus!”
It worked — the disarming method made the spider disappear,
But that meant Harry fell twelve feet over his already injured one.
foot, which crunched under him. Without stopping to think, he
He reached down into the belly of the spider, just like he did with
Screw it, and yell “Stupe!” Just as Cedric screamed the same way.
Together, the two pieces did something one would never do alone: ​​Spit sliced ​​aside, knocked out a nearby wall, and exploded .
A path with a trail of snow-covered feet.
“Harry!” He heard Cedric shout. “Are you okay? It fell on
you?"
“No,” Harry replied, panting. He looked at his foot.
She was bleeding freely. He could see some sort of dark brown fungus on his torn orbs. He tried to get up,
But his leg was getting bad and he didn’t want to help hers.
weight. He leaned against the wall, gasped for breath, and
He looked around.
Cedric was standing his feet from the Triwizard Cup, which was
It shimmers afterwards.
“Take it, then,” Harry whispered to Cedric. “Go on, take it. you
there."
But Cedric didn't move. He just stood there, staring at
Harry. Then he turned to look at the sofa. Harry saw the shock.
looking at his face in its golden light. Cedric looked into the
So did Harry, who was currently grabbing the stairs to support himself. Cedric took a deep breath.

' '
“You took it. You have to win. That’s twice you saved my ass
here."
"That's not how it's supposed to work," Harry said. He felt angry; His leg was hurting so much, he was breaking everything trying to
Throw the spider away, and despite all his efforts, Cedric loses it
To him, just as he had beaten Harry to begging Cho to the ball. " witch .
Whoever gets to the top first gets the points. are you. I'm saying
You, I’m not going to win any races on this back.”
Cedric moved a few steps closer to the Stunned spider, away from
cup, shaking her head.
“No,” he said.
“Stop being so nice,” Harry growled. “Just take it, then we .
He can get out of here.”
Cedric watched as Harry took care of himself, digging into the
wall.
"You told me about the dragons," Cedric said. “I’m going
Down in the first job if you hadn’t told me what was coming.”
“I had help with that, too,” Harry whispered, trying to clear his throat .
A trail of blood with his blows. “You helped me with the egg — we .
square."
“I had help on the egg in the first place,” Cedric said.
“We’re still squares,” Harry said, testing his footing gently; passed
hard as he threw weight at her; He lost his leg when
Spider put it down.
"You should have more points on the second task," Cedric said .
With knowledge. “You stay behind to get all the prisoners. I should have
He did that.”
“I was the only one tough enough to take that song seriously!” Harry said calmly. “Just take the cup!”

' '
“No,” Cedric said.
Past the missing spider legs to join Harry, who
Look at him. Cedric was right. He was walking away from
The kind of excitement that Hufflepuff House hadn't had in centuries.
“Go on,” Cedric said. It looks like that’s what’s ruined it.
Every ounce of brain he had, but his face was fixed, his hands were
fold, he seemed to decide.
Harry looked from Cedric to the cup. For one shining moment,
He saw himself jumping out of the boat and grabbed it. He looked at himself .
He held the Triwizard Cup up, listened to the roar of the crowd, saw
Cho’s face lights up with amusement, clearer than ever
I've seen it before. . . Then the picture collapsed and he found himself
She looked into Cedric's pale face, determined.
“Both of us,” Harry said.
"what?"
“Let’s take it at a time. It was still a Hogwarts victory. Well
Close on it.”
Cedric looked at Harry. He spread his hands.
“You — sure?”
“Yeah,” Harry said. "Yeah . . . we help each other out.
Aren’t we? We both got here. Let’s just take it all together.”
For a moment, Cedric looked like he couldn't believe his
ears; Then he blasted his face into the kiss.
“You’re on,” he said. "come here."
He took Harry's hand under his shoulder and helped Harry.
limp to the edge where the cup is. When they had
Reaching for it, they both reached out for one of the shiny cup handles.

' '
“Three o’clock, right?” Harry said. “One — two — three —”
He and Cedric both grabbed the same arm.
Instantly, Harry felt a nudge somewhere behind his back. His feet
He had left Earth. He couldn't loosen the handle that held
the Triwizard Cup; She was pulling him forward in a gust of wind and
the blue color, Cedric at his side.

CHAPTER TRADE - TWO
FLESH, BLOOD, AND BONE

Harry felt his feet hit the ground; His injured leg gave
road, and fell forward; His hand left the Triwizard
A trophy at the end. He raised his head.
“Where are we?” he said.
Cedric shook his head. He stood up, pulled Harry to his feet, and
They looked around.
They were out of Hogwarts grounds altogether; They had obviously traveled miles — perhaps hundreds of miles — because even .
The mountains surrounding the castle were gone. They were standing
Instead in a mature graveyard; The black line of a
a small church looms above a large oak tree to their right. a
The mountain rose above them on their left. Harry could only guess
the sight of a fine old house on the hillside.
Cedric looked down at the Triwizard Cup, then up at Harry.
“Did anyone tell you that cup was a Portkey?” he asked.
h

' '
“Nope,” Harry said. He was looking at the cemetery. it
He was completely quiet and a little shy. “If this is supposed to be a
of those things?”
“I don’t know,” Cedric said. He looks a little shocked. "feet
out, d'you think?”
“Yeah,” Harry said, glad that Cedric had made the suggestion .
Nor him.
They stuck their fingers out. Harry kept staring at her.
He had, also, the strange feeling that they were
observe.
“There’s someone coming,” he said quietly.
They peer longingly into the darkness and see that face
Closer, he walked slowly towards them among the graves.
Harry couldn't see a face, but from the way he walked
And holding her in his arms, he could tell she had something.
Anyway, he's short, and he wears a button-down shirt
up over his head to obscure his face. and — how many feet nearer,
The gap between them closed all the time—Harry noticed that
The object in the person’s arms looked like a child. . . Or was it just a
A leather box?
Harry lowered his wand slightly and looked sideways at Cedric.
Cedric gave him a curious look. They both turned back to watch.
the nearest percentage.
She stopped beside a high marble pillar, only six feet
Six of them. For a second, Harry and Cedric and that short character
They quickly glared at each other.
And then, without warning, Harry's body convulsed painfully. it
There was pain such as he had never felt in his entire life; His wand fell.

' '
from his knees as he laid his hands on his face; Her legs were crossed; He was on the ground not seeing anything at all; his head
He was about to explode.
From a distance, above his head, he heard a high, cold voice say:
“Kill the right.”
The vowel is the second vowel, which shouts the words
into the night: “Avada Kedavra!”
A blue light flashed in Harry's eyes, and he
He heard something hard fall to the floor beside him; Pain in
his strength rose to the point of dizziness, and then decreased; Scared of what he was about to see, he opened his window
eyes.
Cedric was lying sprawled out on the floor beside her. he
He was dead.
For the second time in forever, Harry looked into the
Cedric’s face, in his open blue eyes, was as pale and expressionless as
The windows of an empty house, in its half-open mouth, i
She looked a little surprised. And then, before Harry's mind could accept what he was seeing, before he could feel anything but arousal .
Unbelievably, he felt himself being pulled to his feet.
The short guy in the suit dropped his bottle and knocked his
Wand, and was dragging Harry towards the marble headstone.
Harry watched the name on it flicker in the dim light before
He was forced to turn around and stepped on it.
QLJ=fail=
The robed man was now resting thick hips on Harry,
connected from head to toe to headstone. Harry could hear

' '
deep, quick flight from the base of the hoop; He was struggling,
And the man hit him — he hit him with a hand that had a missing finger. And Harry realized who was under the blanket. It’s Wormtail.
"you!" He's silent.
But Wormtail, who had continued throwing stones, made no reply; He was focused on tracing the neural network, his fingers
He grows uncontrollably, looking over things. When you realize that
Harry was pinned so tightly against the Mind Stone that he could barely move.
One inch, Wormtail pulled a length of some black material from
inside his cock and shoved it deep into Harry's mouth; so,
Without a word, he turned from Harry and hurried away. Harry
He couldn't make a sound, nor could he see where Wormtail had gone;
He couldn’t turn his head to see beyond the tombstone; He can see
Only what’s in front of it.
Cedric’s body lay about twenty feet away. Some way above, shimmering in the starlight, was the Triwizard Cup. Harry’s
The Wand was on the ground at Cedric's feet. The bag of clothes
Harry had thought there was a lightning bolt nearby, at the foot of the tomb.
She seemed to be shaking with pleasure. Harry saw it, and his total
Seared crunchy too . . . And suddenly he realized that he didn't know
I wanted to know what was in those boxes . . . He didn't want the ring.
open. . . .
He could hear voices at his feet. He looked down and saw a
Big snake moving through the grass, crawling around the headstone
where it is attached. Wormtail's fast, steady breathing was getting faster.
Loudly too. He seemed to be forcing something hard.
On the ground. Then it’s back inside Harry’s class of
glance, and Harry saw him push the stone wall to the leg
of the grave. It was filled with what appeared to be water — Harry could .

' '
I heard it roar — and it was bigger than any ship
Harry had used it; A huge stone belly big enough for a grown man to sit on.
The thing inside the leather belt on the floor was fascinating.
More subtly, she seems to be trying to free herself. Now Wormtail was holding himself in the basement with a
A stick. Suddenly there were flames crackling underneath. Great
The snake disappeared into the darkness.
The liquid in the tank seemed to heat up very quickly. The quantity
It begins not only to vaporize, but to send off sparks, as if
They were on fire. Steam was rising, lighting Wormtail's wheels keeping the fire going. The spaces under the boxes became
More fun. And Harry heard the high, cold voice again.
"hurry!"
The entire surface of the water was bursting with bubbles now. it
It must have been coated in mud.
“It’s ready, sir.”
"now . . ." The cold voice said.
Wormtail pulls the suit on the floor, revealing what
He was inside them, and Harry let out a choked scream in the
Wad of thing keeps his mouth shut.
It’s like Wormtail knocking over a rock and exposing
ⴽⵔⴰ ⵢⴻⵛⵎⴻⵜ, ⴷ ⴰⵥⵉⴹⴰⵏ, ⴷ ⴰⴷⴻⵔⵖⴰⵍ — ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵉⵅⵓⵚⵚⴻⵏ, ⵎⴻⵢⵢⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⴰⵍ
bad. ⵜⴰⵖⴰⵡⵙⴰⵏⵏⵉ ⴰⵢ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴰⵡⵉ Wormtail ⵜⴻⵙⵄⴰ ⵜⴰⵍⵖⴰ ⵏ
He faced a human child, except Harry saw nothing
Down like a child. ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵓⵔ ⵜⴻⵙⵄⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⵛⴻⴱⴱⵓⴱ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⴱⴰⵏⴷ ⴰⵎ ⵜⴼⴻⴽⴽⴰ, ⴷ ⵜⴰⴱⴻⵔⴽⴰⵏⵜ, ⴷ ⵜⴰⵃⴻⵔⴼⵉⵜ, ⴷ ⵜⴰⴱⴻⵔⴽⴰⵏⵜ. His hands and feet were stiff and stiff, his face —
ⵓⵍⴰⵛ ⴰⵖⵔⵓⴷ ⵢⴻⴷⴷⵔⴻⵏ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵓⴷⴻⵎ ⴰⵎ ⵡⴰ — ⴷ ⴰⵃⵍⴰⵡⴰⵏ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⴰⵎ ⵓⵣⵔⴻⵎ, ⵙ
ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏ ⵜⵉⵣⴻⴳⵣⴰⵡⵉⵏ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵛⴻⵔⵛⵓⵔⴻⵏ.

' '
The thing seemed almost helpless; He lifted his thin hands and
to them on Wormtail's back, and Wormtail picked him up. ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵉ ⵢⴻⵅⴷⴻⵎ ⴰⴽⴽⴰ,
ⵜⵖⴻⵍⵍⵉⴷ ⵜⵇⴰⵛⵓⵛⵜⵉⵙ ⵖⴻⵔ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ Harry ⵉⵡⴰⵍⴰ ⵜⴰⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ ⵏ ⵜⴽⴻⵔⴽⴰⵙ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵡⵓⴷⴻⵎ ⵏ Wormtail ⵉⵅⵓⵚⵚⴻⵏ, ⵉⵅⵓⵚⵚⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⴰⴼⴰⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵙ ⵎⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵡⵡⵉ ⴰⵎⴷⴰⵏⵏⵏⵉ ⵖⴻⵔ
Rim of the vehicle. ⵉ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⴻⵙⵡⵉⵄⵜ, ⵉⵡⴰⵍⴰ Hari ⵓⴷⴻⵎⵏⵏⵉ ⵏ ⴷⵉⵔⵉ, ⴷ ⴰⵃⵍⴰⵡⴰⵏ.
ⵜⴼⴻⵀⵀⴻⵎ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵉⵏ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵛⴻⴹⵃⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⴼⴻⴽⴽⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ. and
ⵙⵢⵉⵏ Wormtail ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵔⵙⴷ ⴰⵎⴷⴰⵏⵏⵏⵉ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⴽⴻⵕⵕⵓⵙⵜ; There is a
ⵀⵉⵙⵙ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵜⴻⴼⴼⴻⵖⴷ ⴷⴷⴰⵡ ⵏ ⵜⵎⵓⵔⵜ; ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵉ ⵢⴻⵙⵍⴰ ⵉ ⵜⴼⴻⴽⴽⴰⵙ ⵜⴰⵃⴻⵔⴼⵉⵜ.
He hit the bottom with a lightning bolt.
ⴻⴵⴵⵉⵜ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵖⵔⴻⵇ, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵡⵓⵍⵉⵙ Harry, ⵍⵃⵉⵔⴼⴰⵙ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵇⴻⵔⵔⵉⴱ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵣⴳⴻⵔ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ, ⵄⴰⴼⴰⴽ . . . Let it sink. . . .
Wormtail ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⴻⵙⵍⴰⵢ. ⵜⴰⵖⴻⵛⵜⵉⵙ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵏⴻⵔⵏⵉ; He looked scared.
beyond his comprehension. ⵢⴻⵔⴼⴻⴷ ⵜⴰⵄⴻⴽⴽⴰⵣⵜⵉⵙ, ⵉⵇⵇⴻⵏ ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏⵉⵙ, ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴰⵡⴻⵍ ⵉ
That night.
“ⵉⵖⴻⵙ ⵏ ⴱⴰⴱⴰ, ⵡⴰⵔ ⵎⴰ ⵜⴻⵥⵔⵉⴹ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵓⵏⴻⴼⴽ, ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵙⵏⴻⴼⵍⵉⴹ ⵎⵎⵉⴽ!”
ⵜⴰⴳⵎⵓⴹⵜ ⵏ ⵓⵥⴻⴽⴽⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵙⴷⴰⵜ ⵢⵉⴹⴰⵔⵔⴻⵏ ⵏ Harry ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵛⴻⵔⵛⵓⵔ. ⵢⴻⵡⵡⴻⴹ, Hari
ⵜⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍ ⴰⵎⴻⴽ ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⴼⴼⴻⵖ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⴳⴻⵏⵏⵉ ⵙ ⵍⴻⵡⵚⴰⵢⴰⵜ ⵏ Wormtail, ⵜⴻⵖⵍⵉⴷ ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⴽⴻⵕⵕⵓⵙⵜ. ⵜⴰⵊⵎⵉⵍⵜ ⵏ ⵍⴱⴻⵔⵎⴰⵏ ⵏ
The water is rough and anxious; ⵢⵓⵣⴻⵏⴷ ⵉⵛⴻⵟⵟⵉⴹⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵢⴰⵍ ⵜⴰⵎⴰ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵣⵣⵉⴷ
ⴷ ⴰⵥⴰⵡⴰⵏ ⵢⴻⴷⴷⵔⴻⵏ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⴻⵏ ⴰⵎ ⵙⵙⴻⵎ.
ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵜⵓⵔⴰ Wormtail ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⴻⵎⵎⵉⵍ. ⵉⵊⴻⴱⴱⴻⴷⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⵣⵣⵉⴼⴻⵏ, ⴰⵔⵇⵉⵇⴻⵏ,
ⵍⴼⴻⵟⵟⴰ ⵏ ⵍⴼⴻⵟⵟⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵛⴻⵔⵛⵓⵔⴻⵏ ⵙⴻⴳ ⴷⴰⵅⴻⵍ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⴱⴻⵔⵜⵉⵙ. ⵜⴰⵖⴻⵛⵜⵉⵙ ⵜⴻⵖⵍⵉ ⴷⴻⴳ
Stonely silent.
“ⴰⴽⵙⵓⵎ — ⵏ ⵓⵎⵙⴻⵅⵅⴰⵔ — ⵙ ⵍⴻⴱⵖⵉⵙ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵜⵜⵓⵏⴻⴼⴽⴻⵏ — ⴰⴷ — .
Shout—your master.”
ⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⴼⴻⵖⴷ ⴰⴼⵓⵙⵉⵙ ⴰⵢⴻⴼⴼⵓⵙ ⵣⴷⴰⵜⵙ — ⴰⴼⵓⵙ .
ⵙ ⵓⴹⴰⴷⵏⵏⵉ ⵉⵅⵓⵚⵚⴻⵏ. He gripped the cane tightly in his hand.
ⴰⴼⵓⵙ ⴰⵣⴻⵍⵎⴰⴹ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⴼⴻⴹⵉⵜ ⵙ ⴰⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓ.
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⴼⵀⴻⵎ ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⵉ ⵢⴻⴱⵖⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵅⴷⴻⵎ Wormtail ⵜⴰⵙⵡⵉⵄⵜ ⵓⵇⴱⴻⵍⵉⵙ

' '
ⵢⴻⴹⵔⴰⴷ — ⵢⴻⵇⵇⴻⵏ ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵉⵣⴻⵎⵔ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵢⴻⵣⵎⴻⵔ
ⵓⵔ ⵜⵃⴻⴱⴱⵙⴻⴹ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵙⵙⵓⵖⵓ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵙⵏⴻⴽⵔⴻⵏ ⵉⴹ, ⵉ ⵢⴻⵣⵔⵉⵏ
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⴹⴹⴻⴼ ⵙ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ. he
I'm to something he fell to Al-QaAa, I heard for your children of you
ⵙ ⵓⵙⵏⵓⴼⴼⴻⵙ, ⵙⵢⵉⵏ ⴷ ⴰⵄⴻⵇⵇⴰ ⵢⵓⴹⵏⴻⵏ, ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ ⴷ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵖⵍⵉⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ
The trophy. ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵣⵎⵉⵔ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵉⴱⴻⴷⴷ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍ . . . ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⴷⴷⵡⴰⵏⵏⵉ ⵜⴻⵙⵄⴰ
ⵢⵓⵖⴰⵍ ⴷ ⴰⵣⴻⴳⴳⴰⵖ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵇⴻⵔⵔⵉⴱⴻⵏ; ⵜⴰⴼⴰⵜⵉⵙ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⴼⴻⴵⴵⵉⴵ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⵅⵅⴰⵎ ⵏ Harry ⵉⵇⵇⵏⴻⵏ.
Eyes. . . .
Wormtail ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⵓⵍⴼⵓ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⵓⵍⴼⵓ ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⴼ. Not until
Harry felt Wormtail breathe into his face, did he realize
Wormtailnni ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵣⴷⴰⵜⵙ ⴽⴰⵏ.
“Enemy bidamen . . . ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵟⵟⴻⴼ ⵙ ⵍⵃⴻⵕⵙ . . . ⴰⴷ ⵜⴳⴻⴹ . . . ⵃⵢⵓ
Your enemy.”
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵣⵎⵉⵔ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵅⴷⴻⵎ ⴽⵔⴰ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵜⵢⴻⵃⴱⴻⵙ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵇⵇⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵍⴵⴻⵀⴷ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ. . . .
He moves down, kills without hopes about the brain for the relationship, he
He saw the glittering silver orb wedged into the remaining Wormtail
hand. He felt the point of it enter the back of his right hand and
Blood dripped from his tattered clothes. The fox's voice, still
Hissing in pain, he reaches into his pocket for a glass bottle and takes a sip.
to Harry's forehead, so that a trickle of blood fell into it.
He rushed back to the van with Harry's blood. he
He poured it inside. The liquid inside became, instantly, black
white. Wormtail, his task complete, kneels beside the
coffee, then rolled aside and sat on the floor, whispering
the skin of his hand dripping, shaking and throbbing.
The ball was exploding, sending its grains of sand throughout the
The windows, so bright it made everything else canvas
red. Nothing happened. . . .
Let him drown, Harry thought, let him go for good. . . .

' '
And then all of a sudden, the bodies come out of the cup
They are lost. The tail of the white vapor blares heavily from the
The coffee instead, wiped everything out in front of Harry, as
He couldn't see Wormtail or Cedric or anything but the gun hanging in the air. . . . It worked out for the best, he thought . . . He drowned. . .
please . . . Please let him die. . . .
But then, through the mist before him, he saw, through an icy
scary stripe, black band of male, long and thin in plumage,
growing slowly from inside the box.
“Dress for me,” said the high, cold voice from behind the bubble, and .
Wormtail, crying and wailing, still clutching his severed arm,
He reached his
Legs, he reached up and pulled them with one hand on his owner's .
head.
The blonde man stepped out of the car, glaring at Harry . . .
And Harry glanced back at the face that had haunted his nightmares for three years. whiter than the head, with shorter red
Eyes and nose which are flat like those of a snake with bony ridges . . .
Lord Voldemort had risen again.

CHAPTER THREE - THREE
DEATH MEMORY S

Voldemort glanced at Harry and began to smirk
Her body. His hands were like big, thin swords; His long
white streaks engulf his chest, his shoulders, his face; blue eyes,
His pupils were round, cat-like, glistening still brighter
With darkness. He raised his hands and snapped his fingers.
his rapt and happy expression. No one gave the slightest glimpse of
Wormtail, who remains convulsing and bleeding on the floor, also
The huge snake, which had turned around and was circling Harry again, hisses. Voldemort shoved one of the unnaturally long-fingered hands into a deep pocket and pulled out a
A stick. He hugged her gently too; Then he picked it up, and pointed
It at Wormtail, which was lifted off the ground, was thrown against .
the tombstone where Harry was bound; He fell on his back and fell asleep
There, they squatted and wept. Voldemort rolled his red eyes.
At Harry, he laughed a long, cold, unhappy laugh.
V
IMETTEN ⵏ LMUTT
' '
Wormtail's claws glistened with blood now; ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵖⵍⵉⴷ
ⵍⵇⴻⵛⵛ ⵏ ⵢⵉⴼⴰⵙⵙⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⴷⴻⴳⵙⴻⵏ.
“My lord . . .” He paused, “My lord . . . ⵜⵄⵓⵀⴷⴻⴹⴷ. . . you
test . . .”
“Hold out your hand,” Voldemort growled.
“ⴰ Mass . . . Thank you for Mass . . .”
He moved the bloodhound, but Voldemort laughed again.
“The other hand, the beast.”
“Sir, please . . . please . . .”
Voldemort ⵉⵇⵓⴱⴻⵍⴷ ⵉⵎⴰⵏⵉⵙ, ⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⴼⴻⵖⴷ ⴰⴼⵓⵙ ⴰⵣⴻⵍⵎⴰⴹ ⵏ Wormtail; he
ⵉⵃⴻⵜⵜⴻⵎⴷ ⵍⵇⴻⵛⵛ ⵏ Wormtail ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵣⴳⴻⵔ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⵖⴻⵔⵖⴻⵔⵜⵉⵙ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ Harry
ⵉⵡⴰⵍⴰ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⴼⴻⴽⴽⴰ ⴷⵉⵏⵏⴰ, ⴽⵔⴰ ⴰⵎ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⵜⴰⴱⴻⵔⴽⴰⵏⵜ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⴼⴼⵖⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜⵉⵙ — ⴷ ⴰⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢ ⵙ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵣⵔⴻⵎ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⴼⴼⵖⴻⵏ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵎⵉⵙ — ⵜⵓⴳⵏⴰ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⴼⴼⵖⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⴳⴻⵏⵏⵉ ⴷⵉ Teqbuct ⵏ ⵓⵎⴰⴹⴰⵍ ⵏ Quidditch : ⴷ .
Hard Mark. Voldemort ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⴼⵇⴻⴷⵉⵜ ⵙ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ, ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵃⴱⵉⵙ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵡⵉⵏ ⵏ Wormtail .
ⵜⵜⵔⵓⵏ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵃⴻⴱⵙⴻⵏ ⴰⵔⴰ.
ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ- ⵢⴰⵙ ⵙ ⵚⵚⵓⵜ ⵄⵍⴰⵢⴻⵏ: “ⵜⵓⵖⴰⵍ- ⴻⴷ, ⴰⴷ ⵜⵜⵉⴷ- ⵃⴻⵙⴱⴻⵏ ⴰⴽⴽ . . . and
Now, we will see . . . Strengthening will be aware of . . .”
ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵔⵙ ⴰⴹⴰⴷⵉⵙ ⴰⵎⴻⵍⵍⴰⵍ ⵖⴻⵣⵣⵉⴼⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⵎⴰⵔⴽⴰ ⵏ Wormtail
arm.
ⵜⴰⵖⴻⵛⵜ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢ ⵏ Harry ⵜⴻⵙⵙⴻⵔⵖⴷ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⴻⵍⵜ ⵏⵏⵉⴹⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵍⴻⵇⵕⵉⵃ ⴷ ⴰⵎⴻⵇⵇⵔⴰⵏ, ⵓ
Wormtail breathed a new sigh of relief; Voldemort ⵢⴻⴽⴽⴻⵙ ⵉⴹⵓⴹⴰⵏⵉⵙ ⵙⴻⴳ
ⵜⴰⴳⵎⵓⴹⵜ ⵏ Wormtail, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ Harry ⵉⵡⴰⵍⴰ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⵜⵓⵖⴰⵍ ⴷ ⵜⴰⴱⴻⵔⴽⴰⵏⵜ ⵏ ⵊⴻⵜ.
A look of dark satisfaction on his face, Voldemort straightened
ⵙ ⴰⴼⴻⵍⵍⴰ, ⵢⴻⵔⵔⴰ ⴰⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢⵉⵙ ⵖⴻⵔ ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⴱⴻⵔⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵍⴻⵎⵎⴰⵙⵜ.
“ⴰⵛⵃⴰⵍ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⵓⵏ ⵜⴰⴱⵖⴻⵙⵜ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⴷⵓⵖⴰⵍⴻⵏ ⵎⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵜⵃⵓⵍⴼⵓⵏ?”
» ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ ⵙ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ, ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⵜⵉⵣⴻⴳⵣⴰⵡⵉⵏ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵛⴻⵔⵛⵓⵔⴻⵏ ⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⴻⵏⵜ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵜⵔⴰⵏ. “ⵓ ⴰⵎⴻⴽ .
ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵢⵉⵍⵉⵏ ⴷ ⵉⵄⴻⵡⵡⵉⵇⴻⵏ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵇⵇⵉⵎⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵍⴱⴻⵄⴷ?”

' '
ⵢⴻⴱⴷⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⵙ ⴰⴼⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵡⴰⴷⴷⴰ ⵣⴷⴰⵜ ⵏ Harry ⴷ Wormtail, ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏ
ⵙ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⴱⴻⵔⵜ ⴰⴽⴽ ⵍⴰⵡⴰⵏⵏⵏⵉ. ⵙⴻⵏⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⴻⴷⵇⵉⵇⵜ ⵏⴻⵖ ⴰⵣⴰⵍⵉⵙ, ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ
ⵉⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍ ⵖⴻⵔ Harry ⵜⵉⴽⴽⴻⵍⵜ ⵏⵏⵉⴹⴻⵏ, ⵜⴰⴹⵙⴰ ⵏ ⵍⴱⴰⵟⴻⵍ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⴱⴻⴷⴷⵉⵍⴻⵏ ⴰⵎ ⵓⵣⵔⴻⵎ
face.
“ⵜⴻⴱⴷⴻⴷ, ⴰ Hari Potter, ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵙⵉⵡⵉⵏ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎⴻⵏ ⵙⴻⴳ ⴱⴰⴱⴰ ⴰⵎⴻⵕⵃⵓⵎ,”
He calmed down quickly. “ⴰ Muggle ⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵄⴻⵡⵡⵉⵇ . . . Like so much your dear.
mother. But they both have their advantages, don’t they? ⵢⴻⵎⵎⴰⴽ
ⵢⴻⵎⵎⵓⵜ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⴽⵉⵃⵓⴷⴷ ⴷ ⴰⵎⴻⵥⵢⴰⵏ . . . ⵏⴻⴽⴽ ⵏⵖⵉⵖ ⴱⴰⴱⴰ, ⵓ ⵥⵔⵉⵖ
How useful he had proved himself to be, in death. . . .”
Voldemort laughed again. Up and down he went, looking all
ⵣⵣⵉⵏⴰⵙ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵉⵜⴻⴷⴷⵓ, ⵓ ⴰⵣⵔⴻⵎ ⵉⴽⴻⵎⵎⴻⵍ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⴷⴻⴳ
grass.
« ⵜⵡⴰⵍⴰⴹ ⴰⵅⵅⴰⵎⵏⵏⵉ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⵍⴻⵎⵎⴰⵙⵜ ⵏ ⵡⴻⴷⵔⴰⵔ, ⴰ Potter? ⴱⴰⴱⴰ ⵢⴻⴷⴷⴻⵔ
there. My mother, a witch who lives here in this village, fell in love
with him. ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵢⴻⴵⴵⴰⵜⵜ ⵎⵉ ⵙⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⵉ ⵜⴻⵅⴷⴻⵎ
was. . . . ⵓⵔ ⵉⵃⴻⵎⵎⴻⵍ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵙⵃⵓⵔ, ⴰ ⴱⴰⴱⴰ . . .
« ⵢⴻⴵⴵⴰⵜⵜ, ⵢⵓⵖⴰⵍ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵉⵎⴰⵡⵍⴰⵏⵉⵙ ⵏ Muggle ⵓⵇⴱⴻⵍ ⴰⴷ ⵙⵄⵓⵖ .
ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰⵜ ⵜⵍⵓⵍⴷ, Potter, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵜⴻⵎⵎⵓⵜ ⵜⵍⵓⵍⵉⵢⵉⴷ, ⵜⴻⴵⴵⴰⵢⵉ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵍⵉⵖ
ⵜⵉⴷⵢⴻⵙⵏⵓⵍⴼⴰⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵅⵅⴰⵎ ⵏ ⵢⵉⴳⵓⵔⴷⴰⵏ ⵏ Muggle . . . ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵙⵙⴰⵡⴹⴻⵖ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴰⴼⴻⵖ . . . ⵏⴻⴽⴽ ⵔⵔⵉⵖⴷ ⵉⵎⴰⵏⵉⵡ ⴼⴻⵍⵍⴰⵙ, ⴷ ⴰⵄⴻⵡⵡⵉⵇⵏⵏⵉ ⵉ ⵢⵉⴷ-ⵢⴻⴼⴽⴰⵏ ⵉⵙⴻⵎⵉⵙ . . . ⵜⵓⵎ
sound. . . .”
ⵎⴰⵣⴰⵍⵉⵜ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴽⴻⵎⵎⵉⵍ, ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⵜⵉⵣⴻⴳⵣⴰⵡⵉⵏ ⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⴻⵏⵜ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵓⵥⴻⴽⴽⴰ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵡⴰⵢⴻⴹ.
“ⵙⵍⴻⴹ- ⵉⵢⵉ- ⴷ, ⵜⵃⴻⵎⵎⵍⴻⴹ ⴰⵎⴻⵣⵔⵓⵢ ⵏ ⵜⵡⴰⵛⵓⵍⵜ . . .” ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ ⵙ ⵚⵚⵓⵜ ⵄⵍⴰⵢⴻⵏ, “ⴰⵛⵓⵖⴻⵔ,
I’m getting nervous. . . . But look, Harry! My real family is back. . . .”
Suddenly, the air was filled with a thick stench. between
The tombs, behind the oak tree, in every shadowy corner, were witches
A fragment. All of them were in black and white. And one by one
They went ahead. . . Slowly, carefully, as if they could

' '
They almost couldn’t believe their eyes. Voldemort stood in silence, waiting
them. Then one of the Death Eaters dropped to his knees, bent down next to Voldemort, and kissed the neck of his black gowns.
"Master . . . Master . . .” he said.
The Death Eaters behind him did the same; They each approached Voldemort on their knees and kissed his coat, before .
She looked back and stood up, making a silent noise, which echoed through the grave of Tom Riddle, Harry, Voldemort, and the screams and
piece of the puzzle that was Wormtail. But they left holes in the circuit,
He seems to be waiting for more people. Voldemort, however, did not
They seem to be waiting for more. He looked at the faces with masks, and
Although there was no wind, a sensation seemed to run through the window, as if it were dark.
“Welcome, Death Eaters,” Voldemort said softly. "thirteen
years . . . Thirteen years since we last met. But you answered my call as
even though it was yesterday. . . . We are still united under the darkness
Mark, okay! Or are we?”
He put on his weary face and smiled, his eyebrows like straws
Expansion.
“I lost control,” he said. “There was a smell of justice in the air.”
A second winding passes around the circle, as if each member of the
She is tempted, but cannot, to turn back.
“I’m taking you all, whole and healthy, with your strength intact —
such sharp views! — And I asked myself . . . Why did he do that?
A group of wizards never comes to the aid of their master, whose
Ask for eternal indulgence?”
No one spoke. No one moved except for Wormtail, who was on
the ground, still clutching his bleeding arm.
“And I answer,” Voldemort said quietly, “they must have .

' '
They believed I was broke, they thought I wasn’t. They slid back.
Among my enemies, who seek justice, and ignorance,
and sorcery. . . .
“And then I wondered, but how can they believe me
Didn’t he wake up again? They, who know the steps I took, long ago, to
Protect myself against the death of death? They, who have seen evidence of
My greatest strength at the time I was older than
Any living Wizard?
“And I answer to myself, maybe they believe in a greater power .
Could be, someone who could even defeat Lord Voldemort . . . Maybe now they’re making amends for each other . . . Maybe that manager
of the nobles, of the Blood of Muggles and Muggles, Albus Dumbledore?”
At the mention of Dumbledore's name, the circle members shuddered, some muttering and shaking their heads. Foldemort
He didn't leave them.
“That’s what hurts me . . . I confess myself terribly. . . .”
One of the men suddenly threw himself forward and broke
circle. Trembling from head to toe, he descended towards Voldemort
feet.
"teacher!" He cried out, “Lord, forgive me! Forgive us all!”
Voldemort started laughing. He raised his wand.
“Crucio!”
The Death Eater on the ground roared and roared; Harry
Was sure the sound must have carried to the neighboring houses. . . . Let
The police are coming, he thought worriedly . . . anyone . . . anything . . .
Voldemort raised his wand. The tortured death monster remained conscious.
Deep down, he sighs.
"Get up, Avery," Voldemort growled softly. “Stand. You ask

' '
Pardon? I will not forgive. I won't forget. Thirteen in length
years . . . I want three decades of retirement before I forgive you.
Wormtail here has already paid some of his debt, hasn’t he,
A fox’s voice?”
He glanced at Wormtail and continued to thrash.
“You returned to me, not out of guilt, but out of fear of .
Old friends. You deserve this pain, Wormtail. You know that, don't
you?"
“Yes, sir,” Wormtail said, “please, sir . . . please . . .”
“But you helped bring me back to my senses,” Voldemort sneered, .
They watched Wormtail lounging on the ground. “He’s worthless and deceptive .
As you are, you have helped me . . . And Mr. Voldemort pays his respects
Helpers. . . .”
Voldemort raised his wand again and swung it in the air.
A line of what looks like molten silver is kept shining in the
Wand. For a while it had no shape, it crumbled and then it was done
Its self was a glowing human handprint, glowing like moonlight, that swooped down and rested itself on Wormtail 's arm.
A hand bleeding.
A quick Wormtail hatch. His breathing is harsh and
He cracked, raised his head and looked incredulously at the silver
hand, now comfortably wrapped around his wrist, seemed to
He wore dazzling gloves. He snapped glowing fingers, then,
Trembling, he picked up a small tissue from the floor and touched it
In the powder.
“My Lord,” he whispered. "Master . . . beautiful. . . Thank you
you . . . thank you. . . .”
He shifted forward on his knees and kissed the lip of Voldemort's kisses.

' '
“May your loyalty never waver, Wormtail,” he said .
Voldemort.
“No, Lord . . . Never, Lord . . .”
Wormtail stood up, taking his place in the circle, glaring at his .
A strong new hand, her face still wet with tears. Foldemort
Now approach the guy to Wormtail's right.
“Lucius, my flying friend,” he whispered, stopping in front of her.
“I am told that you have not forsaken the old ways, though to .
The world you have put forth a respectful face. Are you still ready to take
Lead into a Muggletorture setting, I presume? But you never tried to
Find me, Lucius. . . . Your bets on the Quidditch World Cup
They were happy, I think . . . But perhaps your energies are not best directed at finding your master and helping him?”
“Your Majesty, I’m always on the lookout,” came Lucius Malfoy .
A quick shout from under the stairs. “If only there were some proof .
From you, any sense of where you are from, I would have been in
Tamak you immediately, nothing can stop me —”
“And yet you fled from my mark, when a true Death Eater .
He sent him to heaven last summer?” Voldemort said sarcastically, and Master.
Malfoy abruptly stopped talking. “Yes, I know all about that, Lucius. . . . You spoiled me. . . . I look forward to more faithful service in the future.”
“Of course, Lord, of course. . . . You are awesome, thank you
you. . . .”
Voldemort continued, and he paused, looking at the castle — huge .
He got two people—that separated Malfoy from the next guy.
"The Lestranges should have stood here," Voldemort growled.
“But they are buried in Azkaban. They were faithful. they
They went to Azkaban rather than disown me. . . . When Azkaban

' '
broken, the Lestranges would suffer beyond their wildest dreams.
The dementors will join us . . . They are our digital colleagues . . . we
It will notify the discarded agents . . . I will restore to myself all my devout servants, and an army of the most dreaded creatures. . . .”
He walked forward. Some Death Eaters nodded in silence, .
But he stopped in front of the others and spoke to them.
“McNair . . . The loss of extinct animals to the Department of
Magic now, Wormtail said? You will have better decisions than
That doesn’t hurt, McNair. Mr. Voldemort would provide. . . .”
“Thank you, Master . . . Thank you,” Macnair said.
“And here” — Voldemort moved towards two large rooms with hammocks .
figures — “we have Crabbe . . . You will do better this time, you will
Aren’t you, Crab? What about you, Goyle?”
They broke closer, looking closer.
“Yes, sir . . .”
“We will, sir. . . .”
“Same to you, Nott,” Voldemort said quietly as he .
He walked past a figure standing in the corner of Mr. Goyle.
“I bow before you, my lord, your greatest .
faithful -"
“That’s what he’ll do,” Voldemort said.
He reached the highest prison, and stood staring at it
Through his blue eyes, he seemed to see people standing
there.
“And here we have six corrupt Death Eaters . . . Three deaths in
My service. One, he’s too stupid to come back . . . He will pay. One, who
I think he left me forever . . . He will be killed, of course . . . and
one, which remains my local server, and already has
He joined my ministry again.”

' '
The Death Eaters nodded, and Harry saw their eyes flicker to the sides
in the other with their masks.
“He was at Hogwarts, the loyal servant, and through him .
efforts that got our young friend here tonight. . . .
“Yes,” Voldemort said, grinning and wiping his toothless mouth as he did so .
Circle eyes flicked to Harry's direction. “Harry Potter has
Luckily they joined us for my birthday party. One can go as far as
Call him my guest of honor.”
There was a silence. Then the death hound on Wormtail's right surged forward, and Lucius Malfoy's voice called out from below .
The mask.
“Sir, we want to know . . . We ask you to let us know . . . How do you
They have achieved this . . . A miracle . . . How did you manage to become
to us. . . .”
"Oh, what a story that is, Lucius," Voldemort said. “And he
It starts — and ends — with my little friend here.”
He limped over to stand next to Harry, so that the eyes of the
The whole line was about both of them. The snake continued.
to turn.
“You know, of course, that this child was called my downfall?” Voldemort said softly, his eyes glowing over Harry, his
He began to thrash so hard that he almost screamed in pain. “You’re all
Knowing that on the night I lost my strength and weight, I tried to kill
he. His mother died in her attempt to save him — and inadvertently gave him the protection I admit I’ve never seen. . . . I can’t take care of that boy.”
Voldemort raised one of his long white fingers and made it very
close to Harry's nose.
“His mother left him records of her wedding. . . . this is

' '
Ancient magic, I must remember, I was too stupid to believe
it . . . But there was nothing. I can take care of him now.”
Harry felt the cool tip of a long white finger touch him, and
He thought his head would split open in pain. Buldemort chuckled.
quickly into his ear, then he removed the finger and continued speaking to the Death Eaters.
“I miscalculated, my friends, I admit it. My invitation was granted.
With the screaming of the nurse, and turned on myself.
Aaah . . . Pain beyond pain, my friends; Nothing could have prepared me for it. I was ripped from my body, I was down spiritually,
Under the great paradise . . . But still, I was alive. What I am,
I don’t know either . . . I, who went further than anyone
on the path that leads to immortality. You know my goal — to
Overcome death. And now, I’m diagnosed, and it seems that one or .
More of my experiments were working . . . for I am not killed,
even though she must do the opposite. But, I was as helpless as the weakest person alive, and had no means to help
ego . . . Because I don’t have a body, and every emotion I might have
They helped me need the use of a hair dryer. . . .
“I just remember forcing myself, sleeplessly, endlessly, second
With the second, it would be. . . . I lived in a remote place, in a forest, and
I waited. . . . Surely one of my Death Eaters would try to
Find me . . . One of them will come and do magic
He can’t, he’ll send me back to the body . . . But I waited in vain. . . .”
The harlot crosses Death’s hearing circle again
The food. Voldemort let the silence stretch awkwardly before he continued.
“Only one possibility for me. I can have those bodies.
of others. But I can’t go where there are too many other people,
For I knew that the Aurors were still out there, looking for me.

' '
Sometimes I sleep animals — snakes, of course, that’s my favorite — but I’m a little better inside them than as a pure spirit,
Because their souls are not allowed to practice magic . . . And my riches have shortened their days; Neither of them lasted long. . . .
"So . . . four years ago. . . my return table
Guaranteed. The wizard — young, mischievous, and resilient — spends
across my path in the forest I’ve made my home. Oh, obviously
the exact right I was looking for . . . Because he was a professor at
Dumblur School . . . It was easy to gauge my intentions . . . he
He brought me to this land, and after a while I took possession of his body, to watch him closely as he obeyed my commands. But my plan failed. I dare not steal the Wizard's possessions.
stone. I was not to be guaranteed immortality. I’m lost . . .
Inspired, once again, by Harry Potter. . . .”
Silence again; Nothing moves, not even the leaves
A pine tree. The Death Eaters didn't move at all, those gleaming eyes in their masks focused on Voldemort, and Harry.
“The servant died when I left his body, and I became as helpless as
I used to be,” Voldemort continued. “I went back to my body .
Remote place, and they don’t pretend to you that I’m not scared
So that I don’t lose my strength. . . . Yeah, maybe mine
The Pink Hour . . I can’t hope they send me another one.
The magician will have . . . And I’ve lost hope, now, that any of them
The Death Eaters cared what happened to me. . . .”
One or two of the masked wizards in the circle looked uncomfortable, but Voldemort paid no mind.
“And then, even a year ago, when I almost quit .
Hopefully, it’s finally happening . . . A servant came back to me. The voice of the fox
Here, the one who faked his own murder to escape justice was hanged

' '
of hiding from those he once considered friends, and determined to return to his master. He looked for me in the country where she spent a lot of time
They were saying that I was hiding . . . Aided, of course, by the rats he
They met on the road. Wormtail has a bond with rats, making
Aren't you, beast? His dirty little friends told him he was
A place, deep in the Albanian forest, that they hate, where little
Animals like them meet their death with green shade
He has them. . . .
"But his journey back to me wasn't pretty, was it, Wormtail?"
Because, he got hungry one night, in the middle of the forest where he
Hoping to find me, he stood by the bottle at a creek to eat some food . . .
And whom would he meet there, but one Bertha Jorkins, a witch .
From the Ministry of Magic.
“Now look at how well he handled Lord Voldemort. This can
they were the end of Wormtail, and my last hope for regeneration. But Wormtail — he shows a presence of mind that I don’t mind .
They escape from him — convince Bertha Jorkins to accompany him on a night hunt. He defeated her . . . received
She is to me. And Bertha Jorkins, who could totally absorb, proved .
Instead it will be a gift beyond my wildest dreams . . . because — with a little imagination — it becomes a veritable mine of information.
“She told me that the Triwizard Tournament would be on
Hogwarts this year. She told me that she knew real death.
The little one who would just be willing to help me, if I could only
visit with him. She told me many things . . . But the tools I use
Brought the memory belt on him they were powerful, and when I
I extracted all useful information from her, in her mind and body.
they were both damaged beyond repair. She had now served her purpose. I can’t have it. I lost it.”

' '
Voldemort smiled his crooked smile, his blue eyes black and
He has no mercy.
“Wormtail’s body, of course, was feeling nice to the woman, as the whole
Presumably dead, and it would attract a lot of attention if
noticed. Still, he was the contractor I needed, and,
Despite being a poor wizard, Wormtail can follow the orders I give him, which would turn me into an incompetent, weakling
My body, a body I can inhabit while I wait
the steps necessary for true birth . . . A tip or two from me
The proposal itself . . . A little help from my dear Nagini,” Voldemort’s
Dark eyes fell on the snake that was constantly lurking, “a poison distilled from the blood of an animal, and the poison of the snake given by Nagini . . . I soon returned to near-human form, and
strong enough to succeed.
“There is no hope of stealing the Sorcerer’s Stone, for
I knew that Dumbledore would see to it if it was destroyed. But I was far from enjoying mortal life again, before I pursued immortality. I set my eyes down . . . I’ll be content with my old one.
the body returned, and my old strength.
“I knew that to achieve this — an ancient form of Dark Magic,
The pills that keep me up tonight — I’m going to need three stronger ones
ingredients. Well, one of them is already in hand, isn’t it,
The howl of the wolf? Meat is provided by a waiter. . . .
“My father’s guts, naturally, meant that we should come
Here, where he is buried. But the blood of an enemy . . . The voice of the fox
You're going to let me use some Magic, aren't you, Wormtail? any
The wizard who hates me . . . as many of them still do. But I
Know the one I should use, if I were to get up, which is stronger than
I was when I fell. I want Harry Potter blood.

' '
I want the blood of the man who took power from me thirteen years ago . . . For the protection his mother once left
It allowed him to then inhabit my intestines as well. . . .
“But how do we get to Harry Potter? Because he’s been handled more than I think even he knows, he’s been handled in ways that are unique .
Dumbledore earlier, when it fell to him to arrange the boy's future. Dumbledore invoked ancient magic, to ensure the boy
dignity as long as he is in control of his relationships. I can't either.
Hold it there. . . . Then, of course, there’s Quidditch .
The World Cup. . . . I think his defense might be weak there,
Apart from his relations with Dumbledore, but I wasn’t strong
got to try and kidnap in the middle of a bunch of ministry wizards. And then the boy would return to Hogwarts, where he was under the twisted spell of the Muggle-loving rogue from dawn .
Until nightfall. So how do I get it?
"To which . . . using Bertha Jorkins' information, of course. Use
My one true Death Eater, stationed at Hogwarts, to ensure that
The boy’s name was entered into the Goblet of Fire. Use my death
eater to ensure that the kid won the championship — that he
He touched the Triwizard Cup first — the cup containing my Death Eater .
He had become the Portkey, which would lead him here, beyond the
Dumbledore's help and protection had arrived, and in my waiting arms. And he . . . The child you all believe is mine.
The fall. . . .”
Voldemort lunged forward and turned to face Harry. he
He raised his wand.
“Crucio!”
It was pain beyond anything Harry had ever experienced; his
Many of the bones were in flames; His head actually floats around his shoulder;

' '
His eyes rolled wildly in his head; He wants to finish . . . I
It's black. . . He will die . .
And then he left. He was lying gently on the ropes that bound him to Voldemort's father's tombstone, looking up at the .
Those beautiful blue eyes kind of smiled. The night was calling.
to the sound of the Death Eaters' laughter.
“You see, I think, how wonderful it is that this boy
Could he ever be stronger than I am,” Voldemort said. “But I
I want there to be no mistake in anyone’s mind. Harry Potter has escaped me for good. And I'm going to now show
Power through His defeat, here and now, before you all, when the
No Dumbledore to help him, no mother to die for. will
Give him his chance. He will be allowed to fight, and you will be
There is no longer any doubt as to which of us is stronger. Just a little longer,
Nagini,” he whispered, and the snake darted away in a hurry .
fall to where the Death Eaters stood watching.
“Now untie him, Wormtail, and put his trunk back on.”

CHAPTER Three - Four
PRIOR ENCHANCE M

Wormtail approached Harry, who scrambled to find his
The arms, to support his weight before the flaps were untied. Wormtail raised his new silver arm and pulled out a wad of
thing gagging Harry, and then, with a snap, he cut into
links connecting Harry to the grave.
There was a split second, perhaps, when Harry might have considered running away from her, but his injured leg stopped beneath him when he was .
Standing on the overgrown grave, as the Death Eaters approach,
She formed a tight circle about him and Voldemort, so that
Gaps are filled where missing Death Eaters should have stood.
Wormtail leaves the circle to the spot where Cedric’s body is
He sat down and retrieved Harry's wand, which he had tucked firmly into his
Harry's hand without looking. Then Wormtail repeats his words
place in the Death Eaters’ circle of vision.
“Did they teach you how to skate, Harry Potter?” Voldemort said softly, his blue eyes shining in the darkness.
W

' '
At these words, Harry remembered, as if from his old life,
The rivalry club at Hogwarts which he attended for two years
early. . . . All he learned there was the discharge spell, “Expelliarmus” . . . What good would it do to deprive Voldemort of his
bats, even if he could, when the Death Eaters surrounded him,
over by at least thirty to one? He didn't learn anything that might help him for that. He knew he was facing
The thing that Moody always insisted . . . Avada Kedavra’s unstoppable curse—and Voldemort was right—his
My mother isn’t here to die for it this time. . . . It was very
It is not preserved. . . .
“We’re facing each other, Harry,” Voldemort said, frowning slightly,
But he keeps his face like a raised snake at Harry. “Come on, a
Niceties should be observed. . . . Dumbledore wants you to show
Traditions. . . . Roll to death, Harry. . . .”
The Death Eaters were laughing again. Buldemurt is boneless
Because he was moving. Harry didn't disagree. He wasn’t going to let
Voldemort plays with him before killing him . . . He wasn’t going
To give her that satisfaction. . . .
“I said, retreat,” Voldemort said, raising his wand—and Harry felt .
His spine creaked as if a large invisible hand had clenched
Mercifully forward, and the Death Eaters laughed harder than ever.
“So much,” Voldemort said quietly, and as he raised his wand .
The pressure that hit Harry lifted as well. “And now you .
My face, like a man . . . Straight footed and proud, your way
My father died. . . .
“And now — let’s duel.”
Voldemort raised his wand, and before Harry could do anything
To defend himself, before he could even move, he was hit again

' '
by the Virgin of Crusiatus. The pain was so intense, all-consuming.
that he did not know where he was. . . . Dry, white teeth are
He licks every inch of his skin, his head is sure to explode
Painfully, he was yelling louder than when he had screamed in
His life —
And then he stopped. Harry rolled to his feet;
He was barking nonstop like Wormtail did when he came out
The hand had been cut off; He ran sideways to the wall of
They see the Death Eaters, and make it out, heading towards the
Voldemort.
“A little rest,” Voldemort said, his muscles rising like a frown .
Surprisingly, “a little pause . . . That’s disgusting, isn’t it, Harry? you
You don’t want me to do that again, do you?”
Harry didn't answer. He would die like Cedric, those merciless blue eyes telling him so . . . He was going to die, and there
There was nothing he could do about it. . . But he wasn’t going to play
along. He wasn't going to obey Voldemort's word . . . He wasn’t going to go
request. . . .
"I asked if you wanted me to do that again," Voldemort growled. “Answer me! Empire!”
And Harry felt, for the third time in his life, that feeling that
his mind cleared of all thought. . . . Ah, there is happiness, not for
Think, as if he was awake, dreaming . . . Just answer
No . . . Say no . . . Just answer no. . . .
I won't, said a strong voice, in his head, I won't
answer. . . .
Just answer no. . . .
I don’t do it, I don’t say it. . . .
Just answer no. . . .

' '
“I AM NOT OK!”
And these words came out of Harry's mouth; They added
slowly, and the dream state is categorized as
Despite getting cold water dumped on her — soon afterwards
the pain left by the cruciatus blow all over his body — back .
Simply noticing where he was, and what he was dealing with. . . .
“You didn’t?” Voldemort said flatly, and the Death Eaters were .
She's not laughing now. “You won’t say no? Harry, wind and shit.
I must teach you before you die. . . . Maybe another little treat
of suffering?”
Voldemort raised his wand, but this time Harry was ready; with
emotions born from his Quidditch training, he laid himself sideways on the ground; surrounded behind the marble headstone of
Voldemort's father, and he heard him scream as the spell wore off.
"We don't play hide and seek, Harry," Voldemort whispered,
a cold, piercing voice, as the Death Eaters laughed. “You can’t hide from me. Does this mean you are tired of our Duel? it
Does this mean that you’d rather I go on now, Harry? come
Get out, Harry . . . Go out and play, then . . . It will be soon. . . it
It may even be painless . . . I don't want to know. . . I don’t have
dead. . . .”
Harry sat behind the headstone and knew the end had
come. There is no hope . . . No help will be available. And as he heard
Voldemort got closer and closer, he knew only one thing, and it was beyond fear or reason: He wasn't going to die cowering here like a
The child plays hide and seek; He wasn’t going to die on his feet
The Footsteps of Voldemort . . . He was to die a righteous man like his father, and
He was going to die trying to defend himself, even though there was no defendant
can. . . .

' '
Relute to Voldemore to take a face as a distance on the angle of
Headstone, Harry stood up . . . He held his wand tightly in it.
hand, he held out in front of him, and leaned against the back of the
The Head Stone, right in front of Voldemort.
Voldemort was ready. As Harry shouted, “Expelliarmus!” Voldemurt shouted, "Avada Kedavra!"
The beam of blue light shot out of Voldemort's nose like a
A red light erupted from Harry's — they met in mid-air — and suddenly Harry's cock was throbbing as if it was electrically charged .
surging through him; His hand clutched at his throat; He cannot have
He released it if he wished—and a thin thread of light connected the two objects, neither black nor blue, but bright, deep gold.
Harry, following the ring with his puzzled gaze, noticed that
Voldemort’s long white fingers even held a wand that was
It’s fascinating and exciting.
And then — nothing could have prepared Harry for this — he .
He felt his feet lift off the ground. He and Buldemurt are both
They were lifted into the air, their teams still connected by that thread
of flickering golden light. They slipped out of Voldemort’s father’s grave and then came to rest on a pile of
The ground is clear and free of weeds. . . . Death Eaters
They were cheering; they were asking Voldemort for advice; they
They were grinning, clearing Harry's and Voldemort's forehead,
The snake coils in their paws, some of them pulling
Wands -
the golden thread connecting Harry and Voldemort failed;
Even if the fangs remained connected, a thousand more sparks
They swarmed around Harry and Voldemort, facing every direction
in them, until they are trapped in a golden, dome-shaped web, a

' '
a cage of light, above which the death-eaters prowl like dogs,
their lines were terribly numb now. . . .
“Do nothing!” Voldemort yelled at the Death Eaters, and
Harry watched his blue eyes widen in shock at what was happening, saw him struggle to break free of the light cord still connecting his wand to Harry's; Harry gripped his wand tighter.
with both hands, and the golden glow remained unmistakable. "do
and I have not commanded thee. Voldemort yelled at Death
The food.
And then an unearthly and strange sound filled the air. . . . it
It was coming from any web cable illuminated with a vibrating light
in front of Harry and Voldemort. It was a voice Harry knew.
although he had only heard it once before in his life: the song of the phoenix.
It was a voice of hope for Harry . . . The most beautiful is
the worst thing he had ever heard in his life. . . . It feels like
The song exists within it instead of just around it. . . . He was a
A sound connected to Dumbledore, and almost like
though a friend whispers in his ear. . . .
Do not break the connection.
I know, Harry said to the musician, I know I shouldn't . . . But only
As soon as I thought about it, the task became very difficult
do. His blade began to vibrate more powerfully than ever . . . and
Now even the spark between him and Voldemort changed . . . compliance
It’s like giant beams of light shooting up and down the wire
Connection of the lips — Harry felt his lips give a low vibration
his hand as beams of light began to faster and faster shoot his arm
way. . . . The direction of the wave motion is now next to
He, from Voldemort, and he felt his throat tightening with anger. . . .
As the nearest beam of light pierced the tip of Harry's wand,

' '
The wood beneath his fingers was so hot he was afraid it would explode.
in the fire. The tighter the wand, the bigger Harry’s shield
He was destroyed; He was sure that his taxes would not depend on his thinking;
It felt like it was about to burst underfoot—
He used every last bit of his brain on pushing the
Back to Voldemort, his ears filled with the song of the phoenix, his eyes
He was angry, deployed . . . And slowly, very slowly, the symptoms get bigger until a
They stopped, and then, just as quickly, started moving the other way . . .
And it was Voldemort’s wand that was throbbing hard now . . .
Voldemort who looked confused, and almost scared. . . .
One of the beams of light was weakening, meters from the center of the
Voldemort's wand. Harry didn't understand why he did it.
He never knew what he could achieve . . . But he now disguised himself as
They did not worked in life on the sanctioning of the seeds of light straight forward.
In Voldemort's magic spell . . . And quickly . . . Very quickly. . . He looked.
On the Golden Ring . . . She tensed up for a while. . . And then
match. . . .
Suddenly, Voldemort’s wand starts emitting waves of
pain . . . Then — Voldemort’s blue eyes widened in shock — a .
A thin, fiery hand slipped from his shoulder and disappeared . . . the
The type of hand that Wormtail made . . . More sound than
pain . . . Then something very large started radiating from the
Voldemort’s wand brim, a big, blue thing that looks like
even though it is made of the strongest, most concentrated smoke. . . . He was a
head . . . Now the chest and arms . . . the body of Cedric Diggory.
If Harry had ever been able to blow his wand out of jealousy, he would
They were then, but excitement made him grip his stick tighter,
To keep the light of the golden light is not supposed, though
Cedric Diggory’s Black Hell (Is Hell? It looks like this

' '
solid) fully emerged from the end of Voldemort’s wand, as
Although she was dangling herself from a very heavy pole . . . and
This shadow of Cedric is awake, looking up and down the gold
wire of light, and spoke.
“Stop, Harry,” she said.
His voice was distant and steady. Harry looked at Voldemort . . . Her big blue eyes were still shocked . . . It has no more
They waited for this more than Harry had . . . And, with a great whisper, Harry heard the
Screaming in terror of the Death Eaters, they crept along the edges of the
The Golden Cup. . . .
More cries of pain from the surgery . . . And then some
Sel came out of the plant . . . The second half,
immediately followed by arthritis and diarrhea . . . An old man sees Harry
Only in a dream does he free himself from the end of
The Wand just like Cedric did . . . It’s his ghost, or shadow, or
Anyway, he landed next to Cedric's, and checked on Harry and
Voldemort, and the golden web, and the bound fingers, s
Feebly, he leaned on his walking stick. . . .
“He was a real wizard, then?” The old man said, his eyes on
Voldemort. “Killed me, that one did. . . . You fought with it, baby. . . .”
But now, there was another head . . . And this head,
They were drunk like the fire of tribute, was one of a woman. . . . Harry, both hands shaking now as he struggled to keep his grip on, watched her fall to
flat and straight as the others, they looked. . . .
The Birth Burkins verified warriors in front of the
Black eyes.
“Don’t leave, now!” she yelled, and her voice was as vibrant as Cedric's
It seems from so far away. “It doesn’t allow you, Aari —
Don’t let him go!”

' '
She and the other two shadow figures start walking around the
The inner walls of the web are golden, while the Death Eaters flare
outside of it . . . There is a deadly activists in the dead.
They sold for those who help, I sought the instructions of development for
Harry, and whispered words Harry couldn't hear to Voldemort.
And now another head was emerging from the corner of Voldemort's forehead . . . And Harry knew when he saw him who he was going to
be . . . He saw, the likes of the likelihood of the day
When Cderiic came from ear . . . She knew, because
The woman he thought about more than anyone else.
tonight . . .
The smoky shadow of a young woman with long hair fell on the
ground as Bertha did, she straightened herself and looked at him . . .
And yerayy, his hands are conservatives with Layer now, the false backward backwards.
The face of his mother.
“Your father is coming . . .” She said quietly. “Don’t care for yourself .
father . . . Everything will be alright. . . catch. . . .”
He came . . . First his head, then his body . . . long and
Hairless like Harry, a smoking version of James Potter, a shadow
It slipped off the end of Voldemort's wand and fell to the ground,
And he’s as straight as his wife. He walked closer to Harry, looking
Show, and called a terrible voice, which is similar
Others, but quickly, as Voldemort, the face now sought with
Afraid that as his victims try, they won’t be able to hear. . . .
“When he wrapped up, we will just stay some degrees . . . But we will give you the time. . . You need to get to
Portkey, it will take you back to Hogwarts . . . understand,
Harry?”

' '
“Yeah,” Harry said excitedly, struggling now to hold in his grin,
which was crumbling and crumbling under his feet.
“Harry . . .” A Cedric’s body, “Reaching the body, .
Will you? Take my body back to my parents. . . .”
“I will,” Harry said, his face flushed with the intensity of the lightning bolt.
“Come now,” her father she said in ears, “dex headquarters to live . . .
Do it now. . . .”
"now!" cried Harry; He doesn’t think he can take until
Another time so it was abandoned — the Jamazis slaughter by one by one
the armor, and the golden thread broken; Cage of Light
Removing, the Fenx song — but the texts of the .
Voldemort prisoners failed to leave — they were close to 2012.
About Voldemort, protecting Harry from his thoughts —
And Harry ran as fast as he had ever run in his life, losing two .
He shocked the Death Eaters aside as he passed; He looked behind the tombstones, felt their cruelty following him, heard them hitting the
Headstones — he was shouting curses and graves, jumping to
Cedric’s body, no longer focused on the pain in his shoulder, his entire body focused on what he needed to do—
“Stunned!” He heard Voldemort shout.
Ten feet away from Cedric, Harry ducked behind the marble angel to
Watch out for the red light pockets and notice the tip of its wings curling as
Wisdom beat him. He gripped his cane tighter and stormed out of
After the angel —
“A fool!” He shouted, pointing his wand gently at hers.
hordes of Death Eaters running around him.
From a choked voice, he thought he had stopped at least one of the
them, but there was no time to stop and look; He jumped on

' '
liver and grunted as he heard more loud thuds behind him; More than one
of light flashed over his head as he fell, he reached out to grab
Cedric’s hand —
“Stand aside! I'll kill him! He’s mine!” yelled Voldemort.
Harry's hand was closed around Cedric's shoulder; A tomb stands
Between him and Voldemort, but Cedric is too heavy to carry,
And the cup was out of his reach—
Voldemort's blue eyes glowed in the darkness. Harry saw his
His mouth clamped shut and he watched him raise his wand.
“Action!” Harry shouted, pointing his wand at the Triwizard Cup.
She flew into the air and flew towards him. Harry caught it.
The hand —
He heard Voldemort’s angry yell at the exact moment he
He felt the tug on the back of his neck, which meant Portkey had
It worked — he was whipping it up in a whirl of wind and beauty,
and Cedric along with him. . . . They were going back.

CHAPTER THREE - FIVE
VERITASERU M

Harry felt himself being pinned to the floor; His face was
Forced into the grass; Her scent filled his nose. he
He closed his eyes as the Portkey sent him away, and sat down
They are closed now. He didn't move. The whole breath seemed to have
He was driven from it; His head was swimming badly, he felt
It was as if the ground beneath him trembled like the top of a
ship. To steady himself, he tightened his grip on both
Things he was still holding onto: the Triwizard Cup's handle and Cedric's body. He felt like he was going to fall.
away in the darkness gathering in the corners of his mind if he let
go of one of them. Heat and pressure keep it in motion
The earth, emitting the smell of grass, waits . . . I’m waiting.
Someone’s going to do something. . . Something will happen. . . and all
Whereas, his breath burns his throat. . . .
The sound stream disoriented and confused him; are
Noises everywhere, footsteps, screams. . . . He stayed where he was.
He was, his face cracked against the noise, as if
Night a dream that will pass. . . .
Then two hands grabbed him roughly and lifted him up.
“Harry! Harry!”
He opened his eyes.
He was looking up at the starry sky, and Albus Dumbledore was
She faced on it. The harsh shadows of a group of people prevent
In their midst, they press close; Harry felt the ground beneath him
The mind communicates through their fingers.
He returned to the center of the beam. He can see
standing towering above it, human forms moving around, and
Stars above.
Harry let go of the cup, but he held Cedric to him nonetheless
more seriously. He raised his free hand and grabbed Dumbledore's arm .
hand, while Dumbledore's face swam in and out of sight.
“He’s back,” Harry whispered. “He came back. Vuldimurt.”
"What's going on?" What happened?”
Cornelius Fudge's face appeared upside down on Harry;
It is a white, was banished.
“Oh my God — dig me!” Iwessus. “Dumbledore—he’s dead!”
Word repeats, shadow texts insist on
They passed it on to those around them . . . And then the others screamed
It — called him — into the night — “He is dead!” "dead!"
“Cedric Diggory! dead!"
“Harrey, release,” said Fudge, and Iowa .
The fingers try to pry it out of Cedric’s limp body, but Harry
He wouldn’t let him go. Then Dumbledore's face, which still
Blurred and misted, he approached.
“Harry, you can’t help it now. It's over. Let him go.”

' '
“He wants me to,” Harry smirked — it .
It seems important to clarify this. “He wanted me to take
He returned to parents. . . .”
“That’s right, Harry . . . Just leave he now. . . .”
Dumbledore growled, and with unusual force for a
An old, gray man picked Harry up off the ground and placed him on
His feet. Harry arrived. His head was throbbing. His injured leg
It's not going to support its weight. The crowds around them were agitated,
They struggle to get closer, pushing him down the middle — “What happened?” “What happened to him?” “Diggory is dead!”
“He’ll need to go to the hospital wing!” Fudge was talking louder.
“Sick, injured—Dumbledore, Diggory’s parents, and .
Here, they are in stores. . . .”
“I’ll take Harry, Dumbledore, I’ll —”
“No, I like —”
"Dumbledore, Amos Diguri is running . . ." . . It's coming. . . .
You don’t have to sin — before he sees —?”
“Harry, stay here —”
The girls were cheering and cheering wildly. . . . The scene flashed horribly before Harry's eyes. . . .
“It’s okay, baby, I got you . . . series . . . Hospital wing . .”
“Dumbledore says sit down,” Harry said quietly, his eyebrows raised .
Scraser allowed the likes of the likes of him almost instant; The view has grown more than before.
“You should sleep. . . . Come now. . . .”
Someone bigger and stronger than her was half attractive, half
He led him into the frightened crowd. Harry hears people
He pants, screams, screams like the guy who helped him

' '
He forced a path through them and took it back to the castle. across
Stop, across the lake and Durmstrang wall, Harry heard
Nothing but the man’s heavy breathing helped him walk.
“What happened, Harry?” The man asked the end after they had done.
Harry climbed onto the top of the stone. Clunk. Clunk. Clunk. She was an eyesore.
moody.
“Cup was a Portkey,” Harry said as they passed through the door .
hall. “He took me and Cedric to a cemetery . . . and Buldeemurt was
there . . . King Vuldimurt . . .”
Clunk. Clunk. Clunk. up the marble steps . . .
“Condoring the middle is there? And what happens?
“Killed Cedric . . . They killed Cedric. . . .”
“And then?”
Clunk. Clunk. Clunk. In the driveway . . .
“He made a dish . . . He came back flying. . . .”
“The Dark Lord has recovered? Is he back?”
“And the Death Eaters came . . . And then we dueled. . . .”
“Do you work with the Mass of Telemast?”
“It’s over . . . bare . . He did something amazing. . . . I saw my
Mom and Dad. . . they came out of his throat. . . .”
“Here, Harry . . . Dagi, stay. . . . You’ll be ok
now . . . Drink this. . . .”
Harry heard a key scratch in the wood and felt the cup being thrown
In his hands.
“Drink- it . . . You’ll feel better. . . Come on, now, Harry, I need
to know what really happened. . . .”
Moody helped slide the blankets around Harry's back; It sucks, a
A peppery taste clouded his throat. Moody’s office came up short

' '
focus, as did Moody himself. . . . He looks white like Fudge.
She looked, and both of her eyes focused not on Harry's
face.
“Has Voldemort returned, Harry? Are you sure he’s back? How it worked
Did he do it?”
“He took stuff from his father’s grave, and from Wormtail, and .
I am,” Harry said. His mind felt clearer; His hair didn't hurt that much.
badly; He could now see Moody’s face clearly, though
The office was dark. He could still hear the moaning and groaning from
the distant Quidditch Country.
“What did the Dark Lord take away from you?” Modi said.
“Blood,” Harry said, raising his hand. His hand was torn.
Where Wormtail's tail had torn him.
Moody let out his breath with a long, low sigh.
“Are they death eaters? Are they back?”
“Yeah,” Harry said. “That of the-n. . .”
“How does he do them?” Moody asked suddenly. “Does he forgive .
them?"
But Harry suddenly remembered. they should be prosecuted
Dumbledore, he should have said it straight away —
“There is a Death Eater at Hogwarts! There’s a Death Eater
Here — they put my name in the Goblet of Fire, guaranteed me
It got to the end —”
Harry tried to get up, but Moody pulled him back down.
“I know who the Death Eagle is,” he said quietly.
“Carkaroff?” Harry said calmly. “Where is he? Do you have it?
Was he shocked?”
“Carkaroff?” Moody said with helpless laughter. “Karkaroff has fled .
Tonight, when he felt a stinging sensation twitch around his arm. he

' '
It makes many faithful followers of the Green Lord want to
Meet them . . . But I doubt it will get far. The Dark Lord Has Ways
of pursuing his enemies.”
“Doesn’t Karkaroff exist? flee? But then — he didn’t put mine
Name on the board?”
“No,” Moody said flatly. “No, it hasn’t. I’m the one who did this.”
Harry listened, but didn't believe it.
“No, you don’t,” he said. “You didn’t do that . . . You can’t have
done . . .”
“I assure you that I did,” Moody said, and his magical eyes twinkled .
front and leaned against the door, and Harry knew he did
the very fact that there is none outside of it. At the same time, Moody
He pulled out his wand and pointed it at Harry.
“Did he forgive them, then?” he said. “The Death Eaters Gone .
free? The one who escaped from Azkaban?”
"what?" Harry said.
He was looking at the kitchen that Moody had pointed out to him. this
It was a bad joke, it had to be.
“I ask you,” Moody snapped, “whether he forgives iniquity .
The one we didn’t even go looking for. Those who work
Who doesn’t even want Azkaban for it. Those who have no faith are irrelevant
Bits of shit who were brave enough to use masks at the Quidditch World Cup, but ran away when they saw the Dark Mark when I
They threw him up in heaven.”
“You released . . . What are you talking about? . . ?”
“I told you, Harry . . . I told you. If there’s one thing I dislike more
Above the other, a death whale that went free. turn
their devotion to my master when he needed them most. I’m waiting.
to him to punish them. I expect him to punish them. Tell me he

' '
Try them out, Harry. . . .” Moody's face suddenly contorted into a look of contempt. “Say he told them that I, I alone remained faithful . . . He was prepared to risk everything to accomplish one thing for her.
He wants above all else . . . you."
“You didn’t . . . It — can’t be you. . . .”
“Who put your name in the Goblet of Fire, under the name of one .
Different school? I did it. Which scares every person I wonder
Could he try to hurt you or stop you from winning the tournament? I did it. Who hired Hagrid to show you the walls? I
did. Who helped you visualize just how to defeat the monster?
I made it.”
Moody's Magic Eye now disappeared from the portal. was set to
Harry. His one-sided mouth moved more than usual.
“It wasn’t easy, Harry, guiding you through this task .
Without arousing suspicion. I had to use every ounce of toughness I had, so that my hand wouldn't be palpable in your hand
success. Dumbledore would have been very suspicious if you had
She made everything so easy. As long as you go down that path,
luckily with a good head—then, I know, I’ll have a
The opportunity to steal from other students and leave your own
clear. But I also had to deal with your honesty. second
task . . . That was when I was so afraid we would fail. I was protecting you, Potter. I know you didn't make an egg.
Clue, so I had to give you another option—”
“She didn’t,” Harry whispered. “Cedric gave me a hint—”
“Who told Cedric to open it underwater? I did it. I trust him.
It will send you notifications. Good people are so easy.
It's going to work, Potter. I imagine that Cedric would like to answer you.
Because he told him about the dragons, and so he did. But even then,

' '
Potter, you sound like you've failed, too. I was watching all
time . . . All those hours in the library. Don't you realize that
Was the book you needed in your dorm the entire time? I planted it there.
Word, I gave it to Longbottom's boy, don't you remember?
Aquatic Plants of the Mediterranean. He would have told you
All you need to know about gillyweed. I’m waiting for you to ask
Anyone and everyone you can help. It will have long-buttom
He told you at the same time. But you didn’t . . . You didn't. . . . you
They have a spark of pride and independence that can destroy all.
“So what do I do? Feed you information from another neutral source. You told me at the Yule Ball a houseguest called Dobby
He gave you a Christmas present. I called Ulf to the staff room.
They will collect some litter for cleaning. I arranged a loud conversation.
and Professor McGonagall about the bullies being
taken, and whether Potter would consider using gillyweed. And your
The little pig friend ran straight into Snape's office and then dodged to
I'll find you. . . .”
Moody's wand was still staring directly at Harry's heart. over
His shoulders, spiral forms were staring at Foe-Glass on
wall.
“You were so long in that ocean, Potter, I thought you had
He drowned. But luckily, Dumbledore took your stupidity seriously,
And he reminded you deeply of him. I breathed out again.
“You had an easier time than you should have on that dick .
Tonight, for sure,” Moody said. “I was searching around him, I could .
See from outdoor streams, it can mask a lot of problems from
Your way. I was shocked by Fleur Delacour as she passed. I put Imperius’ blame on Krum, so that Diggory will end up leaving
Your way to the coffee shop is clear.”

' '
Harry glared at Moody. He just didn’t see how that could be. . . .
Dumbledore's best friend, the famous Auror . . . who has
He captured several Death Eaters . . . It doesn’t make sense . . . No sense in
all. . . .
The fog rounds in FoeGlass were getting bigger and bigger, they became
It's more varied. Harry could see the outlines of three people on
Moody's voice, coming closer and closer. But Modi was not
They see them. His magical gaze was on Harry.
"The dark prince didn't get to kill you, Potter, and he so
He wants to,” Moody said quietly. “Imagine how good he’ll make me .
When he finds out I did it to him. I give you ias — and
The thing he needed above all to create — and then I killed you for .
he. I will be honored above all other Death Eaters. I will be his.
Beloved, his closest supporter . . . He’s closer than his son. . . .”
Moody's eyes were bright, magic eyes staring at him
Harry. The door was closed, and Harry knew he wouldn't get
His baggage on time. . . .
“I’m the Dark Lord,” Moody said, and looked completely
Insane now, he towers over Harry, looking down at him, “have a lot .
In partner. Both of us, for instance, have very interesting
Fathers . . . It hurts a lot indeed. We’re both guilty, Harry, of being in the name of those fathers. And we both
He enjoyed it. . . Very great joy . . . kill
the fathers to ensure the continued rise of democratic rule!”
“You’re so horny,” Harry said—unable to stop himself—“You’re .
mad!"
“Mad, is that me?” Moody said, his voice growing uncontrollable. "Well
see! Let’s see who’s out, now that Mr. Dark is back,

' '
With me by his side! It’s back, Harry Potter, you’re invincible
He — and now — I’ve got you!”
Moody raised his wand and opened his mouth; Harry lost
His hand in his sleeve —
“Stop!” There was a flash of red light, and with a
A big slip and fall, Moody’s office door was
They boiled down to one —
Moody was thrown backwards onto the office floor. Harry, still
She looked over to where Moody's face was and saw Albus Dumbledore, Professor Snape, and Professor McGonagall staring back .
Includes from FoeGlass. He looked over and saw the three.
Of them standing in the doorway, Dumbledore in front, his wand
He was dismissed.
In that moment, Harry understood for the first time exactly why
People said Dumbledur was the only wizard Voldemort ever had.
They were afraid. The look on Dumbledore’s face as he stared down at the
Mad-Eye Moody’s unruly form was more terrifying than
Harry could imagine someday. There was no harmful laugh about it.
Dumbledore's face, no twinkle in eye behind the smile.
There was cold joy in every feature of the old man's face; The feeling of
Power radiated from Dumbledore as if giving
Searing heat.
He walked into the office and put his foot down at Moody's .
An unconscious body, and kicked him on the leg, so that he
The face was clear. Snape followed him, staring at the enemy's back,
Where his own face was still visible, he looked around the room. Headmaster McGonagall walked straight to Harry.
“Come on, Potter,” she whispered. His thin voice

' '
Her mouth was twitching like she was about to cry. "come
along . . . Hospital wing . .”
"No," Dumbledore said flatly.
“Dumbledore, he should — look at him — have passed .
Enough for tonight —”
"He will stay, Minerva, because he must understand," he said .
Dumbledore snapped. “Understanding is the first step towards acceptance,
And only through acceptance can there be progress. He should know.
Which drove him in the tragedy that happened tonight, and
why."
“Mody,” Harry said. It’s still in a completely broken state. “How could it be Moody?”
"This is no Alastor Moody," Dumbledore said sharply. "you
They didn’t know Alastair Moody. The real Moody had no
He took you out of my sight after what happened tonight. The moment he took you, I knew—and I followed.”
Dumbledore knocked over Moody’s weakened form and put a
A hand inside her pussy. He pulls out Moody’s flask and a set of
The keys on a bug. Then he turned to Professors McGonagall and .
Snap.
“Severus, please give me the strongest Seal of Truth you have,
Then go down to the cemetery and release the pet rabbit called
Winky. Minerva, please go down to Hagrid's apartment, where you can have
Find a large black dog sitting in the kitchen sink. Get the dog.
to my office, tell her I'll be with her in a bit and then I'll be back
here."
If Snape or McGonagall found this advice absurd,
They hid their confusion. They both turned simultaneously and left the office.
Dumbledore walked over to the Seven Wings and threw

' '
The first one was in the kitchen, and he opened it. There was a mass of comic books in it. Dumbledore closed the box and put the second key in the
a second opening, and he opened the box again. The comic books were long gone; This time it contains an assortment of broken Sneakoscopes, some cards and sticks, and what looks like silverware .
The Invisible Cup. Harry watched, surprised, as Dumbledore
They put the third, fourth, fifth, and sixth keys in each of them
clothes, they compare babies again, and point out different things each time. Then he put the seventh key in the lock, threw open
The lid, and Harry let out a yelp of surprise.
He was looking down into a sort of tunnel, an underground chamber,
and lying on the ground about ten feet below, appeared to be fast asleep,
Thin and starved in appearance, he was a veritable Mad-Eye Moody. his
The wooden leg is out, the ring should hold a wizard
Eye looking blank beneath his head, and the dark strands of his hair
They were missing. Harry stares, caught by thunder, between sleep
Moody in the bathtub and an unconscious Moody lying on the floor.
office.
Dumbledore walked out into the bathroom, stretched himself out, disappeared
With his back on the floor next to the sleeping Moody. He wrote about
he.
“Shocking — controlled by the Imperius Curse — very weak,”
he said. “Of course, they would have needed to keep him alive.
Harry, throw away the diver button — it’s freezing. madam
Pomfrey would need to see him, but it seemed he wouldn't be in a moment
hazard."
Harry did as he was told; Dumbledore begged Moody in
The box, he threw it to her, and got out of the bag
again. Then he picked up the box of pillows that stood on the desk,

' '
He unpacked it, and put it back. Diluted solid liquid
On the office floor.
"The power of Polyjus, Harry," Dumbledore said. “You see the simplicity of it, and the innocence of it. Because Moody only drinks
From his chin flask, he is well known for it. Compiler needs, n
Of course, to keep the real Moody nearby, to keep
He did the campaign. You see her hair. . .” Dumbledore looked down.
About Moody in the car. “The director was cutting it all out .
year, see where it’s uneven? But I think, in tonight’s joy,
Our fake moody can forget to take it often as he
It must work . . . In an hour . . . Every hour. . . . We’ll see.”
Dumbledore moved the chair at the desk and sat down on it.
It, his eyes fixed on the unconscious Moody on the ground. Harry
She looked at him too. Minutes passed in silence. . . .
Then, right before Harry's eyes, the face of the man on the ground
It started to change. The feet were swollen, the body was tense; The broken nose became whole and began to heal.
The long strand of curly gray hair was pulling itself into the head
and the perception of the color of the sand. Suddenly, with a loud bang,
The wooden floor collapsed as the original floor snapped back into place; The next moment, the magic glint in those eyes vanished from the man’s face as if it were real
The Eye changed him; He dropped to the ground and continued
Looked around.
Harry noticed a man sitting in front of him, a thin, slightly pale complexion with a mess of gray hair. He knows who he is. He looked at it
In Dumbledore's Pensieve, he had witnessed him being banished from
trial by the detractors, trying to convince Mr. Crouch that the
innocent . . . But he had rolled his eyes now and looked
Very old. . . .

' '
There were literal footsteps outside in the hallway. Snap has
He came back with Winky in his shoes. Professor Mcgunagall was right.
Behind them.
“Cream!” Snape said, stopping dead in the doorway. “Barty
Everyone!”
“Good heavens,” Professor McGonagall said, stopping dead and .
She looked at the man on the ground.
Thinking, thinking, Winky stared at Snape's shoulders. her
Her mouth opened wide and she let out a strangled scream.
“Mr. Barty, Mr. Barty, what are you doing here?”
She threw herself forward on the young man's chest.
“You were killed! You were killed! You killed Master’s son!”
"That's just a disappointment, Winky," Dumbledore said. “I push aside,
please. Severus, do you have the hat?”
Snape handed Dumbledore a small glass bottle completely
Obvious Protection : The Veritaserum with which Harry threatened
At school. Dumbledore stood up, lunged at the man on the floor, and
He pulled him into a sitting position against the wall under the
The Foe-Glass, which contains visions of Dumbledore, the Snap, and
McGonagall still glared at them all. Winky sat on her knees, trembling, her hands on her face. Dumbledore forced the man's mouth open and gave him three kisses.
Inside it. Then he pointed his wand at the man's chest and said:
“Renervated.”
Crouch's son opened his eyes. His face was serious, his gaze unwavering. Dumbledore sat down next to him, so that their faces were level.
“Can you hear me?” Dumbledore asked bluntly.
The man’s eyes widened.
“Yeah,” he nodded.

' '
“I want you to tell us,” Dumbledore snapped, “how I .
He came to be here. How did you escape Azkaban?”
Crouch took a deep, steadying breath, then began speaking in
A blank, wordless voice.
“My mother saved me. She knew she was dying. She was satisfied.
My father to save me was the ultimate favor for him. He loves her just the way he is
She doesn’t like me. accept. They came to see me. They gave me a
Draft a Polyjuice Potion that contains one of my mother’s hairs. she
He received a Polyjuice Potion scroll that contained one of my hairs. we
He took the form of another.”
Winky was shaking her head and trembling.
“I didn’t say, A Mass Barty, not say so much, you’re feeling with .
Daddy’s in trouble!”
But Crouch took another breath and continued on .
One voice above.
“The victims are blind. They felt a healthy, another dying
A person entering Azkaban. They sense someone powerful, someone dying has abandoned her. My dad let out a breath and left as my
Mom, in case there are any inmates peeking through their windows.
“Mother died a while later at Azkaban. She was
Avoid drinking the Polyjuice Powder until the end. She is buried under my name and bears my image. Everyone believed her
Be me.”
The man’s eyes widened.
“What doth your father, when you were with you.
Akhm?” Duumbldur said quickly.
“Staged my mother’s death. A quiet, private funeral. The grave
blank. The house elf nursed me back to health. Then I should be
is hidden. They should judge me. Dad should use the number

' '
The scenes of the viewed me. Being back to the power, we
I was just thinking about finding my master . . . of returning to his work.”
“How did your father raise you?” Dumbledore said.
"Imperius' curse," Crouch said. “I was under my father .
control. I was required to wear an invisibility patch day and night. I
He’s always been the secret of the house. She was my advocate and supporter.
It hurts me. She accepted my Father to give me a skirts.
Heals. A reward for my good behavior.”
“Oh Mass Barry, Mass Barrty,” Winky said with hands.
“You don’t have to tell them, we were in trouble. . . .”
“It was that of Deovan that you are still alive?” Dumbledore said quietly. “If the one who knows Annagarh father and .
House elf?”
“Yeah,” Crouch said, his eyes lighting up again. “Based in me .
Dad’s office. Bertha Jorkins. She came home with the paper.
In memory of my father. He wasn’t home. Winkie showed him
Inside and back to the kitchen, to me. But Bertha jurkins heard
Wine you are talking. It has to use a investigation. heard what should be for
Guess who’s hiding under the cloak of invisibility. My father came home. Obtoon. He inherited a very strong Memory.
Sharam on to forget what it is found. Very strong. He said he had lost the death forever.”
“Why do you interfere in my master’s private business?”
he told Winki. “Why didn’t she let us be?”
"Tell me about the Quidditch World Cup," Dumbledore said.
“Wink of the Father in him,” Crouch said, still in a .
Critical voice. “It took months to convince him. I don’t have
They left home many years ago. I absolutely love Quidditch. Let him go, she
said. It'll be in the neck of the unclear. He could see. leave

' '
Smell the fresh air for once. My mother said she would like it.
She told my father that my mother had died to set me free.
It didn’t save me for a lifetime of prison. He agreed in
eventually.
“It was carefully planned. My dad took me and Winky up to
Top Box early in the day. Winky was going to say that she was listening to a
A chair for my father. I was supposed to stay there, invisible. When everyone was
They left the key, let's get out. Winky will appear to be alone.
Nobody can know.
“But Winky doesn’t know I’m getting stronger. I started fighting my father's Imperius Curse. There were times when I
It was almost myself again. There were brief moments when I watched
Outside of his control. It happened, there, in the Top Box. It was like
waking up from a deep sleep. I found myself out in the crowd, in the middle of a meeting, and I saw, in front of me, a hole sticking out of
The boy's pocket. I haven’t been awarded a prison sentence since before Azkaban. I stole it. Winky didn't know. Winky is afraid of heights.
She was hiding her face.”
“Professor Barty, you bad boy!” Winky said, tears healing
Between his fingers.
“So you took the wand,” Dumbledore said, “what did you .
Done with it?”
"We're going back to the tent," Crouch said. “Then we heard them.
We hear the Death Eaters. Those who weren’t were in Azkaban. Those who do not love my master. They had
They turned their backs on him. They weren’t slaves, like me. they
they were free to seek it, but they did not. They were just doin
Muggle sports. The sound of their voices woke me up. My mind
It looked better than it had in years. I'm angry. I have the ring.

' '
I wanted to punish them for their disobedience to my master. my
Dad came out of the tent; He had gone to free the Muggles. Winkie
He was afraid to see me so angry. She used her brand of magic to
Connect me to it. She pulled me out of the tent and dragged me to
The forest, away from the Death Eaters. I tried to stop her. I
He wanted to go back to camp. I wanted to show that Death
eaten what it truly means to the Dark Lord, is to punish them
for their lack of it. I used the stolen stick to throw the hard pointer.
in heaven.
“Department inspectors arrived. They shot out Stunning Spells everywhere. One of the signs came from the trees where Winky and .
I stand. The bond that connected us was broken. We were both
wonder.
“When Winky was discovered, my dad knew I had to be a .
across. He searched the woods where he was found and felt
I’m sitting there. He waited until the rest of the department
He came out of the forest. He put me under Imperius’s tribute and took
My home. He released Winky. She had failed him. She left me
Get a stick. It almost made me escape.”
Winky let out a sigh of relief.
“Now it’s just me and Dad, alone at home. And then . . .
And then . . .” Crouch's head slumped against his own, a mocking smile
spread across his face. “My Lord came for me.
“He arrived at our house late one night in the arms of his boss .
The voice of the fox. My master has discovered that I am still alive. have
Bertha Jorkins was arrested in Albania. He was torturing her. She said
He has a lot. She told him about the Triwizard Tournament.
She told the old Auror, Moody, to teach at Hogwarts. He delays it until he breaks the spell

' '
Dad put on it. She tells him I ran away from
Azkaban. She told him my dad kept me in jail to stop
I am from my master's quest. And so my master knew that I was still
His faithful servant—perhaps the most faithful of all. My lord.
He made a plan, according to information provided by Bertha
he. He needed me. He arrived at our house around midnight. my
Dad answered the door.”
A smile spread wider across Crouch's face, as if reminding
the sweetest memory of his life. Winky’s blue eyes were
She showed up with her legs. She seemed too frightened to speak.
“It was very quick. My father was placed under Imperius .
Swear by my lord. Now it was my father who was charged and convicted. My master forced him to go about his business as usual, so
She acted like nothing was wrong. And I let out. I woke up. I was
Myself again, I lived as I hadn’t in years.
“What did Mr. Voldemort ask you to do?” Dumbledore said.
“He asked me if I had planned everything for him. I
He was ready. It was my dream, my greatest desire, to serve him, to
I introduced myself to him. He told me he had to put in a loyal servant at Hogwarts. The Servant Who Will Guide Harry Potter
with the triwizard race without appearing to do that. a
A servant who would look after Harry Potter. Make sure it reaches
The Triwizard Cup. Make that key a Portkey, which will hold the
The first person to touch my master. But first —”
"You need Alastor Moody," Dumbledore said. Her blue eyes
they were getting better, though his voice remained calm.
“Wormtail and I did it. We prepared the Polyjuice Pie
before. We arrived at his house. Moody put up a menu.

' '
There was confusion. We managed to grow it just in time.
Forcing him into a compartment of his magic container. took
Some of her hair and added it to the ponytail. I drank it; I became
Moody is both. I removed his leg and eye. I was ready to face it.
Arthur Weasley when he arrived to treat the Muggles who had
I heard the commotion. I had trash monitors moving around the yard. I
I told Arthur Weasley I heard intruders in my yard, who
off the waste bins. Then I used Moody and Dark clothes
guns, put them in the boat with Moody, and set off for Hogwarts. I kept him alive, under Imperius' curse. I want to be
He could ask him. To know its past, learn its habits, so
that I could even outsmart Dumbledore. I also need her hair to make
the Polish. The other ingredients were easy. I stole boomslang outfits from the dungeons. When the drinking teacher found me
In his office, I told him I was under orders to look for him.”
“What happened to Wormtail after you beat Moody?” said
Dumbledore.
“The sparrow has returned to keep my lord, in my father’s house, .
and to take care of my father.”
"But your father escaped," Dumbledore said.
"Yes. After a while he started fighting the Imperius Curse as I
did. There were times when he knew what was going on.
My boss decided that it wasn’t safe for my dad to leave
house. He was forced to send letters to the Ministry instead. he
He made him write and say he was sick. But Wormtail stopped his
duty. He wasn’t as aggressive as he should have been. My father ran away. My lord.
She assumed he was going to Hogwarts. My father was going to
Tell Dumbledore everything, so he can remember. He was going to agree
that he had rescued me from Azkaban.

' '
“My master sent me word about my father’s flight. He told me to
Stop it at all costs. So I waited and watched. I used the map I had.
Taken from Harry Potter. The card almost missed her
everything."
“A map?” Dumblur said quietly. “What is this card?”
“The Potter Map of Hogwarts. Potter saw me over. Potter saw me.
They steal more ingredients for the Polyjuice formula from Snape's office in one night. He thought I was the father. We have a first
name. I took a card from Potter that night. I said , Father
They hate cruel witches. Potter believed that my father was after Snape.
“I have been waiting for my father to arrive at Hogwarts for weeks. Finally, the
One afternoon, the map shows my father entering the gym. I
I pulled my Invisibility Shield and went down to meet him. he
He was walking in the middle of the forest. Then came Butter, and
Chrome. I waited. I couldn't blame Potter; My master needs it.
Butter ran to get the Dumbledore. ⵙⵜⴻⵀⵣⴰⵖ Krum. ⵏⴻⴽⴽ ⵏⵖⵉⵖ ⴱⴰⴱⴰ.”
"No!" exclaimed Winky. “Mr. Barty, Mr. Barty, what is .
You said?”
“You killed your father,” Dumbledore said, with that same smug smile .
sound. “What did you do with that body?”
“He took her to the forest. Cover him with a blanket of invisibility.
I had a map. I watched Potter run towards the castle. he
He met Snap. Dumbledore joined them. I saw Butter get
Dumbledore left the castle. Walking back through the forest, I snuck up behind them and went to meet them. I said to Dumbledore.
Snape told me where to come.
“Dumbledore told me to go look for my father. I became
to my father’s body. I looked at the map. When everyone else left, I
My father’s body was changed. He became bone . . . I buried her.

' '
while wearing an invisibility cloak, in freshly excavated soil in
in front of Hagrid’s cabin.”
There was complete silence now, except for a perfect Winky .
cry. Then Dumbledore said, 'And tonight . . .”
"I asked to move the Triwizard's Cup to the counter before dinner," Barty Crouch snapped. « ⵢⴻⵔⵔⴰⵜⵜ ⴷ Portkey. My master’s plan worked. returned to power and would honor me with
He is beyond magicians’ dreams.”
That goofy smile graced his features again, and his frown
He fell to his knees as Winky smiled and leaned back beside him.

CHAPTER TRADE - SIX
SELECTION of
roads

Dumbledore stood up. He glanced at Barty Kruch for a
moment with disbelief on his face. Then he raised his wand.
Another time and out of him came the fangs, the fangs stroking themselves
in front of Barty Crouch, hugging him tightly. He turned to the teacher.
McGonagall.
“Minerva, may I ask you to stand here and watch while I get Harry .
Upstairs?”
"Of course," Professor McGonagall said. She looked a little.
ⵜⵃⴻⵎⵎⴻⵍ, ⴰⵎⵣⵓⵏ ⵜⴻⵥⵔⴰ ⴽⴰⵏ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵢⵓⴹⴻⵏ.
But, drawing his wand, he pointed it at Barty .
Crouch, his hand was up.
“Severus” — Dumbledore ⵢⴻⵣⵣⵉⴷ ⵖⴻⵔ Snape — “ⵄⴰⴼⴰⴽ ⵉⵏⵉⴷ ⵉ Massa .
Pomfrey will descend here; We need to get Alastor Moody to
hospital wing. ⵙⵢⵉⵏ ⵃⵍⵓ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵍⵇⴰⵄⴰ, ⴰⴼⴷ Kurnilyus .
Fudge, and report him to this office. Would no doubt want to
He would ask Crouch himself. Tell him I'll be in the hospital wafer.
In half an hour if he needs me.”
Snape nodded silently and stormed out of the room.
“Harry?” Dumbledore said sternly.
Harry woke up and rushed back; ⵍⴻⵇⵕⵉⵃ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⴹⴰⵔⵉⵙ, ⵉ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⴰ
ⵓⵔ ⵜⵉⴷⵢⴻⵙⵎⴻⴽⵜⴰ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴽⴽ ⵍⵡⴻⵇⵜ ⵉⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵍⵎⴰⴷ ⵉ Crouch, ⵜⵓⵔⴰ ⵢⵓⵖⴰⵍⴷ ⵙ ⵍⵇⵉⴷⴰⵔⵉⵙ ⴰⴽⴽ. He also realized he was shaking. Dumbledore took the arms, helping to come out to the average average shop.
“I want you to come to my office first, Harry,” he whispered .
ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⴱⵔⵉⴷ ⵏ ⵜⴽⴻⵔⵔⵓⵙⵜ. “ⵙⵉⵔⵉⵓⵙ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵔⴰⴵⵓⴰⵖ ⴷⵉⵏⵏⴰ.”
Harry nodded his head. ⵚⵚⴻⵏⴼ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⴷ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ ⵏ ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜⵜ ⵙ ⵍⴻⴽⵎⴰⵍⵉⵙ ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⴼⴻⵍⵍⴰⵙ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵓⵔ ⵜⵉⵃⴻⵎⵎⴻⵍ ⴰⵔⴰ; ⵢⴻⴼⵔⴻⵃ ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ ⵢⵉⵙⵙ.
He didn't want to think about anything that happened
Ever since he first held the Triwizard Cup. won't
We have to look for ideas, as abstract and vivid as pictures,
ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴼⴻⴳⴳⵉⴹ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵡⴰⵍⵍⴰⵖⵉⵙ. Maid Moody, inside
content. Wormtail, ⵢⴻⵖⵍⵉⴷ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵍⵇⴰⵄⴰ, ⵢⴻⵟⵟⴻⴼ ⴰⵖⴻⵔⵙⵉⵡⵉⵙ ⵏ
arm. Voldemort, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵏⴻⵔⵏⵉ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵍⵇⴰⵀⵡⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴼⴻⴳⴳⵉⴹⴻⵏ. ⵙⵉⴷⵔⵉⴽ . . .
dead . . . ⵛⴻⴷⵔⵉⵛ, ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵙⵓⵜⵜⵓⵔ ⴰⴷ ⴷⵢⴻⵔⵔ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵉⵎⴰⵡⵍⴰⵏⵉⵙ. . . .
“Headmaster,” Harry said with a frown, “where are Mr. and Mrs.
Digiging?”
« ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⴷ ⵓⵙⴻⵍⵎⴰⴷ Sprout », ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Dumbledore. His voice,
ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⴷ ⴰⵃⵏⵉⵏ ⴰⴽⴽ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⵙⵙⵜⴻⵇⵙⵉ ⵏ Barti
Crouch, very slowly for the first time. « ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷ Aqerru ⵏ
Cedric’s home, and he knows him very well.”
ⵡⵡⴹⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⵖⴻⵔⵖⴻⵔⵜ ⵏ ⵡⴻⵥⵔⵓ. gave Doumbldur
password, he stepped aside, and he and Harry quickly ran
spiral ⵙ ⵜⴻⵡⵡⵓⵔⵜ ⵏ ⵍⴱⴰⵟⴰⵟⴰ. ⴷⵓⵎⴱⵍⴷⵓⵔ ⵉⴹⴻⴳⴳⴻⵔⵉⵜⵜ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵍⴷⵉ. Sirius
He was standing there. His face was as white and pale as ever.
When he left Azkaban. ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⴻⵙⵡⵉⵄⵜ ⵙ ⵍⴻⵎⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ, ⵢⴻⵙⵄⴰ
ⵢⴻⵣⴳⴻⵔ ⵜⴻⵅⵅⴰⵎⵜ.
“Harry, are you alright? I know it — I know something like
That — what happened?”
His hands shook as he helped Harry into a chair in front of the
desk.
"what happened?" He asked more quietly.
ⵢⴻⴱⴷⴰ Dumbldur ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵎⴻⵙⵍⴰⵢⴰⵙ ⵉ Sirius ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⴰⴽⴽ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⴰ Barti Kruch
said. ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴽⴰⵏ ⴰⵣⴳⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵙⵍⵉⵡⵜ. So tired every muscle in his body
It was aching, he wanted nothing more than to stay here, unmoved,
For hours and hours, until he fell asleep and didn’t have to think or
I felt great.
There was a rustling of wings. Fawkes, the Phoenix, left his estate.
prech, ended up by the bureaucrat, fell on Harry’s angle.
“ 'Oh Fawkes,’ Harry said quietly. He cooled the phoenix
ⵍⴼⴻⵟⵟⴰ ⵉⵛⴻⴱⵃⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⴷ ⵡⵓⵔⴻⵖ. Fawkes sighed peacefully
had. ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵉ ⵜⵢⴻⵙⴼⴻⴹⵃⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵍⵇⵉⵙⵉⵙ ⵉⵃⴻⵎⵎⵍⴻⵏ.
Dumbledur stopped talking. He sat down in front of Harry, behind his desk. He was staring at Harry, who was avoiding his eyes.
Dumbledore was going to ask him. He was going to do
Harry reversed everything.
“I need to know what happened after you touched the Portkey .
On board, Harry,” Dumbledor said.
“We can leave that until morning, can’t we, Dumbledore?” said
Sirius groaned in annoyance. He put a hand on Harry's shoulder. “Leave it .
Have sleep. Let him rest.”
Harry felt grateful towards Sirius, but Dumbledore
He ignored Sirius' words. He leaned forward towards Harry.
Not wanting much, Harry lifted his head and looked at the green
eyes.
“If I think I can help you,” Dumbledore snapped, “by .
It will put you into an enchanted sleep and make you ignore
The times you have to think about what happened tonight, I will. But I know better. Pain relief
For a while it will be intimidating when you finally notice it. possess
He showed courage beyond anything I could have expected of you. I asked.
You to show your courage again. I asked you to tell
Us what happened.”
The phoenix let out a soft, stirring noise. jumped in
air, and Harry felt as if a drop of hot pressure had fallen
his cock in his stomach, healing it, and strengthening it.
He took a deep breath and started talking to them. As he spoke, visions of everything that had passed that night seemed to resurface before .
his eyes; He saw the glowing face of the resurrected drug
Voldemort; He saw death eaters appearing among the graves
in front of them; He saw Cedric's body, lying on the ground beside the
cup.
Once or twice, Sirius made a noise as if he wanted to say something, his hand still wrapped around Harry's shoulder, but Dumbledore
He raised a hand to stop him, and Harry was glad about it, because
It was easier to keep going now he had started. That was even fantasy; he
I felt like some poison had been removed.
from him. He was sacrificing to her every moment of desire he had to do.
He kept talking, but he felt that when it was over, he would feel
rather.
When Harry said about Wormtail cutting his arm with wax,
However, Sirius let out a loud sigh and Dumbledore
He stood so still that Harry started. Dumbledore turned around.
the office and told Harry to reach out. Harry showed them
Both the place where his clothes were torn and the clothes underneath them.
“He said my blood would make him stronger than if he used
of someone else,” Harry said to Dumbledore. “He said protection .
My — my mother left in me — would have it too. And he was
Of course — he could take care of me without hurting himself, taking
My face.”
For a fleeting moment, Harry thought he saw the glint of something like triumph in Dumbledore's eyes. But the next second, Harry
He was sure he had thought of it, because when Dumbledore returned
to his seat behind the desk, looking as old and tired as Harry
He didn't see it.
“All right,” he said, and sat down. “Voldemort survived the curse himself. Harry, go on, please.”
Harry continued; It explains how Voldemort got out of
coffee, he told them everything he could remember about Voldemort's .
A word to the Death Eaters. He then told how Voldemort had distracted him, put his wand back on, and prepared to fight.
But when he reached the place where the golden streak of light was .
He had connected his wand with Voldemort's and found that his wand was twitching. He tried to continue speaking, but the memories of what had
coming out of Voldemort's spell were flashing through his mind. he
He could see Cedric appearing, he could see the old man, Berta Jorkins . . . his
father . . . His mother . .
He was glad when Sirius broke the silence.
“Feet connected?” He said, looking from Harry to Dumbledore. "why?"
Harry looked back at Dumbledore, on whose face was
A held view.
"Priori Incantatem," he said with a smile.
His eyes stared into Harry's and it was almost as if an invisible beam of understanding surged between them.
“The Order of the Will?” Sirius said quietly.
“Exactly,” Dumbledore said. “Harry’s wand belongs to Voldemort .
Wand divide the nuts. Each of them has a feather from the head of
A phoenix. This Phoenix, actually,” he added, pointing .
In the purple and gold bird, it rested peacefully on Harry's shoulder.
“My tail ric comes from Fawkes?” Harry said, surprised.
“Yes,” Dumbledore said. " Sir. Olivander wrote to tell me
I bought a second shirt, when you left his fourth stock
years ago.”
“So what happens when a spider meets her brother?” Sirius said.
"They don't work well against each other," Dumbledore said. “If, however, the dragon-owners compel the dragons to .
Make a fight . . . Experiencing an effect is extremely rare. One of the rings
He’ll force someone else to unravel the spells he’s performed — reciprocally. The first and last . . . And then the predecessors
it. . . .”
He looked at Harry questioningly, and Harry nodded.
“What does it mean,” Dumbledore said quietly, his eyes on Harry’s .
Face, “that some sort of Cedric must have shown up again.”
Harry nodded again.
“Didgory come back to life?” Sirius said quietly.
"No spell can bring the dead back to life," Dumbledore said sternly. "all
What happens is kind of a snowball effect. attendance
A living Cedric will emerge from the ashes . . . Am I right, Harry?”
“He called me,” Harry said. He was suddenly thrilling again.
"T . . . the ghost Cedric, or whatever, has spoken.”
“A spell,” Dumbledore said, “which held the shape and form of Cedric. I believe other such forms have emerged . . .
Voldemort's lethal weakness. . . .”
“Old man,” Harry said, his brow still bowed. “Bertha
Jurkins. and . . .”
“Your parents?” Dumbledore said quietly.
“Yeah,” Harry said.
Sirius' lips on Harry's back were now too tight.
“The last crimes committed by the wand,” Dumbledore said,
s head. “In the context of the process. More to come, of course,
If you maintain a connection. All right, Harry, these
echos, these answers . . . What did they do?”
Harry explains how the resulting figures from
The wand was piercing the edges of the golden web, how Voldemort
He seemed afraid of them, how Harry’s father’s shadow was
He told him what to do, how Cedric had fulfilled his last request.
At this point, Harry found it impossible to proceed. Look
in front of Sirius and saw that he had his face in his hands.
Harry suddenly realized that Fawkes had left his paw. the
the phoenix was flying to the ground. It was resting on her beautiful head.
Against Harry's injured shoulder, hard, coral-like tears were falling from
His eyes on the wound left by the kiss. The pain went away. the
The skin is exfoliated. His leg was repaired.
“I’ll say it again,” Dumbledore said as the phoenix rose to the
air and perched himself on the ledge beside the door. "you
I have shown courage beyond anything I could expect of you.
Tonight, Harry. You showed courage He walked with the dead .
He fights Voldemort at the peak of his power. You took on the crown of a great wizard and found yourself respecting him —
And you have now given us all we have a right to expect. will
Come with me to the hospital wing. I don’t want you to go back to
Tonight's youth center. A Potion of Sleep, and Some Peace . . . Sirius, do you want to stay with her?”
Sirius nodded and stood up. He returned to the elder.
The black dog and took off with Harry and Dumbledore from the office, accompanied them to the hospital
wings.
When Dumbledore pushed open the door, Harry saw the Lady.
Weasley, Bill, Run, and Hermione gathered around a concerned-looking Pumfri. It looked like they were asking to see
Where Harry was and what happened to him. All of them
With a chuckle as Harry, Dumbledore and the black dog walked in, Mrs. Weasley let out a kind of chuckle.
“Harry! Harry!”
She started to run towards him, but Dumbledore stepped between them.
“Molly,” he said, raising his hand, “please listen to a .
moment. Harry went through a terrible ordeal tonight. contains
You just have to answer for me. What he needs now is sleep, peace,
And they were silent. If he wants you all to stay together,” he added,
She looked at Ron, Hermione, and Bill as well, “you can do that.
But I don’t want you to ask him until he answers.
And certainly not this evening.”
Mrs. Weasley nodded. She was very white. She turned on Run,
Hermione, and Bill seemed to be making noise, and smiled,
“Did you hear? He needs silence!”
“Headmaster,” Madame Pomfrey said, looking at the big black .
The dog that was Sirius, “may I ask what — ?”
"This dog will stay with Harry for a while," Dumbledore said quietly. “I assure you, he is highly trained.
Harry — I’ll wait while you get into bed.”
Harry felt an odd thank you for Dumbledore.
Because he asked others not to question him. It’s not like he
He didn’t want there; ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⴰⵅⴻⵎⵎⴻⵎ ⵏ ⵓⵙⴻⴼⵀⴻⵎⵉⵙ ⴰⴽⴽ
Once again, the idea of ​​resuming her life again was more than possible
stand.
« ⴰⴷ ⴷⵓⵖⴰⵍⴻⵖ ⴰⴷ ⴽⵥⵔⴻⵖ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴽⴰⵏ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵎⵍⵉⵍⴻⵖ ⴷ Fudge, .
Harry,” Dumbledore said. “I want you to stay here tomorrow until I call the school.” He left.
As Massa Pumfrey Harry brought to a closerup, he took the vision
The real Moody's lying motionless on the bed in the middle of the
room. His wooden leg and Magic Eye were lying on the side of the bed.
table.
“Is he okay?” Harry asked.
"It'll be fine," Mrs. Pomfrey said, handing Harry some pajamas and pulling the screens on him. He took off his clothes and pulled
On pajamas, and got into bed. Run, Hermione, Bill, Msgr.
Weasley, and the black dog came over the fence and sat
themselves in the chairs on either side of him. Ron and Hermione were
She looked at him almost menacingly, like she was afraid of him.
“I’m fine,” he told them. “I’m just tired.”
The Massa Weseverayy and Tamazight when she exploits to Palestinians of Losh without a porch, without a pcompat pumer.
Madam Pomfrey, who had stormed off to her office, returned
He was holding a small bottle of some broth and a cup of coffee.
"You're going to need to drink all of this, Harry," she said. “It’s a drug
For a dreamless sleep.”
Harry took the cup and drank a few sips. He felt himself grow weak all of a sudden. Everything around him became
long; The lights around the wings of the hospital seemed to focus on the
smiling friendly at the blanket around his bed; Her body
I felt like he was sinking deeper into the warmth of the feather.
Mattress. Before he could finish the dish, before he could say another word, his exhaustion drove him to sleep.
Harry woke up, so warm, so sleepy, that he wouldn't open his lid
Eyes, wanting to shoot again. The room was still dimly lit; was
Surely it was still night and he had a feeling he couldn’t have
He slept for a long time.
Then he heard whispers around him.
“They’ll be fine if they don’t shut up!”
“What’s what they’re hanging? Nothing else could happen, or to it?”
Harry opened his eyes in a blur Someone had taken his
glasses. He could see the vague outlines of Mrs. Weasley and Bill.
soon. Mrs. Weasley was on her knees.
“It’s Fudge’s voice,” she whispered. “And that’s Minerva .
McGonagall's, isn't it? But what are they fighting for?”
Now even Harry could hear them: people screaming and running .
towards the hospital exit.
“Embarrassing, but all the same, Minerva —” Cornelius Fudge .
He was speaking out loud.
“You’re not supposed to take it inside the castle!” Professor McGonagall yelled. “When Dumbledore finds out—”
Harry heard the hospital doors slide open. Not seen by any of them
The people around her bed, all looking at the door as
Bill pulled on his glasses and Harry sat down and put on his glasses.
Fudge came running up to the ward. Professors McGonagall and
Snape was on his knees.
“Where’s Dumbledore?” Fudge pleaded with Mrs. Weasley.
“He’s not here,” Mrs. Wesley said angrily. “This is a hospital
Wing, Minister, don’t you think you’d do well to —”
But the door opened, and in came Dumbledore pulling out the lock of
Ward.
“What happened?” Dumbledore said softly, looking from
Fudge to Professor McGonagall. “Why are you breaking these .
people? Minerva, I am surprised at you—please stand
Homage to Barty Crouch —”
“No need to stand guard over him, Dumbledore!” she screamed. “The minister saw that!”
Harry didn’t see Professor McGonagall lose control of him as
this. There were glimmers of the color of anger in his eyes, and her
The hands are divided into claws; She was getting angrier.
“When we told Mr. Fudge we had caught the Death Rat .
An expert on tonight’s events,” Snape said, voice low, “he .
He seemed to feel his personal safety was at stake. He insists on
A dementor is summoned to accompany him to the castle. he
He brought him into the office where Barty Crouch—”
“I told you not to agree, Dumbledore!” teacher
McGonagall was furious. “I told him you don’t give in to bullies .
to set foot within the castle, but —”
“My dear wife!” yelled Fudge, even looking more angry
Beyond Harry seeing it, “As Minister of Dentistry, it’s my decision if I want to bring protection with me when I’m treating a potentially dangerous client —”
But Professor McGonagall's voice drowned out Fudge's.
“That scene — that thing entered the room,” she said .
he yelled, looking at Fudge, trembling all over, "she's lost . . ."
About Crouch and — and —”
Harry felt a tightening in his stomach as Professor McGonagall struggled to find the words to describe what was happening. He doesn’t need
to her to finish her sentence. He knew what the stranger had to have.
done. She had given her dying kiss to Barty Crouch. have
He breathed his soul through his mouth. He was worse than death.
“By all accounts, it wasn’t pretty!” exclaimed Fudge. “It seems to have
He was responsible for too many deaths!”
"But it is impossible now to give testimony, Cornelius," said Dumbledore. He was staring hard at Fudge, like he was slowly
For the first time. “He could not provide evidence as to why he killed .
Those people.”
“Why did he kill them? Well, that’s not a secret, is it?” off
Fudge. “He was a shy alcoholic! From what Minerva and Severus said
I’m told, he seemed to think he was doing it all on the advice of YouKnow-Who!”
“Lord Voldemort has been giving him warnings, Cornelius,”
Dumbledore said. “The deaths of those people were just side products .
of a plan to restore Voldemort to his full health again. The plan succeeded. Voldemort has regained consciousness.”
Fudge looked like he had just pulled a heavy weight.
In his face. He paused and stared, glancing at Dumbledore as if
Unless he could quite believe what he had just heard. begin
Instinctively, he was still staring at Dumbledore.
“You knowWho . . . Is he back? That’s just nonsense. Come now, Dumblur . . .”
"As Minerva and Severus have undoubtedly told you," Dumbledore said, "we have heard Barry Crouch confess. We have heard of Barry Crouch confessing." under the influence of
Veritaserum, tells us how he was smuggled out of Azkaban, and
How Voldemort — learned about his continued survival from Bertha
Jorkins — went to free him from his father and used him to capture Harry. The plan works, I tell you. Crouch helped bring Voldemort back.”
"Look here, Dumbledore," Fudge said, and Harry was surprised .
You could see the blush creep across his face, “You — you can’t seriously believe that. You knowWho — later? Come now, come
now . . . Indeed, Crouch may have believed himself acting
on the advice of You KnowWho — but you’ll take an idiot’s word for it .
Similarly, Dumblur . . .”
"When Harry touched the Triwizard Cup tonight, he was immediately transported to Voldemort," Dumbledore snapped. “He witnessed the birth of Lord Voldemort. I’ll explain it all if you
He’ll drive it to my office.”
Dumbledore glanced at Harry and saw that he was
He got up, but shook his head and said, “I’m afraid I can’t afford to .
You interrogate Harry tonight.”
Fudge's mental smile remained. He too looked at Harry, then
She looked at Dumbledore and said, "You're — er — getting ready ."
You’ll take Harry’s word on that, will you, Dumbledore?”
There was a moment of silence, which Sirius broke .
He roars. His arms were removed, and he was baring his teeth in
Fudge.
"Sure, I believe Harry," Dumbledore said. His eyes were
It’s on fire now. “I heard Crouch’s confession, and I heard Harry’s confession about what happened after he touched the Triwizard Cup; the
Two stories make sense, explaining everything that happened
Ever since Bertha Jorkins disappeared last summer.”
Fudge still had that strange smile on his face. Once again, he
She looked at Harry before answering.
“Are you prepared to believe that Lord Voldemort has returned,
According to a female employee, it was a boy who . . . Well . . .”
Fudge threw another look at Harry, and Harry suddenly understood.
"You're reading Rita Skeeter, Mr. Fudge," he snapped.
Ron, Hermione, Mrs. Weasley, and Bill all jumped up. None of the
They had realized that Harry was awake.
Fudge blushed slightly, but a look of confusion and hardness came
On his face.
“And if I have?” He said, looking at Dumbledore. “If I find out that you’ve been holding some pressure on the boy for too long .
quiet? A Parselmouth, eh? And you’ll have hints of humor throughout
place -"
“I thought you were talking about the pain Harry was feeling in his throat?” Dumbledore said sarcastically.
“You agree he was having this much trouble, then?” Fudge said
quickly. “Headache? Nightmares? Could it be — emotions?”
"Listen to me, Cornelius," Dumbledore said, taking a step towards Fudge, who once again seemed to be spewing the nonsense .
The feeling of power Harry felt after stopping Dumbledore
Young Cruch. “Harry is as smart as you or me.
The darkness never left his mind. The fight is affecting when
Ord Voldemort almost, or feels especially a journalist.”
Fudge took a half step back from Dumbledore, but he .
It’s not too dry.
“You’ll forgive me, Dumbledore, but I don’t hear a curse .
Scar acts as a sign of prior trauma. . . .”
“Mo, I’m Voldemort’s!” Harry shouted. He tried to
they got out of bed again, but Mrs. Weasley insisted he return. “I saw
Death Eaters! I can give their names! Lucius Malfoy—”
Snape made a sudden movement, but when Harry looked at him,
Snape's eyes flew to Fudge.
“Malfoy has been fired!” Fudge said, looking offended. “Very old .
Family — donations to good causes —”
“McNair!” he continued Hari.
“Also dismissed! Now he works for the ministry!”
“Averi — Nut — Krab — Guyle —”
“You just remember the names of those arrested because they were teenages of waist twelve years ago!” Fudge said angrily.
“You can find those names in the old court reports! for
For heaven’s sake, Dumbledore — that boy is full of some shit
story at the end of last year too — his stories are getting better, and
You’re still feeding them—that kid can talk to snakes, Dumbledore, and you still think he’s reliable?”
“You fool!” Professor McGonagall cried. “Cedric Diggory! Sir.
Come closer! This death wasn’t the stupid act of a fool!”
“I don’t see evidence to the contrary!” Fudge said, now facing his anger,
His face was pale. “It seems to me that all of you .
We are determined to start a panic that will burn everything we own.
Worked for the last three years!”
Harry couldn't believe what he was hearing. He always had
Think of Fudge as a nice character, a bit of a jerk, a bit
opombos, but with a good slap. But now it's short, angry
The magician stood before him and refused, stubbornly, to acquiesce
experiencing disruption in its world of excitement and order — read
They believe that Voldemort might be resurrected.
"Voldemort has returned," Dumbledore replied. “If you agree .
The facts are straightforward, Fudge, and take the necessary steps, we
He may still be able to salvage the situation. The first and most important
step is to remove Azkaban from control of the insane —”
“That’s bullshit!” Fudge shouted again. “Let you out of illegals?
I’m going to get fired for suggesting it! Half of us just feel safe.
In us at night because we see the prisoners standing
Order in Azkaban!”
“The rest of us are restless in our beds, Cornelius, you know you put Lord Voldemort’s worst henchmen at the mercy of the people who would join him the moment he asked .
them!" said Dumblur. "they are no longer faithful to you, .
Fudge! Voldemort can do much more for their abilities and happiness than you can! With fighters behind
to him, and returned by his former supporters, you would prevent him from regaining the kind of power Thirteen had .
Years ago!”
Fudge had his mouth open and closed as if there were no words.
He could express his feelings.
“The second step you must take—and at once,” Dumbledore .
she insists, “and sending messengers to the heavens.”
“Apostles to the Heavens?” Fudge, he found insane
again. “And what is the greatness?”
“Reach out to them, now, before it’s too late,”
Dumbledore said, "Or Voldemort will convince them, as he once did, that he alone among wizards will give them their rights and
their freedom!”
“You — you can’t be right!” Fudge sighed and shook his head.
And it goes even further than Dumbledore. “If the magical community gets wind that I’m close to the heroes — people hate
There are, Dumbledore—the end of my career—”
“You’re blind,” Dumbledore said, his voice rising now, .
The powerful aura around him became clearer, his eyes glowed once more,
“For love of the office you hold, Cornelius! You put too much
value, and you always have, on the so-called purity of
bold! Don’t you know that it doesn’t matter what one is.
born, but what they grow up to be! Your dementor just destroyed
The last remaining pureblood family member is as old as any —
And look what that guy chose to do with his life! I’ll tell you now —
Take the steps I have suggested, and you will be remembered, in
office or outside, as one of the bravest and noblest ministers of magic
We don't know. You can’t do — and history will remember you
Like the guy who stepped aside and left Voldemort the second
duty to destroy the world we are trying to build!”
“Insane,” Fudge muttered, still backing away. "mad . . ."
And then there was silence. Mrs. Bumfrey was standing.
She floated down at the foot of Harry's bed, her hands over her mouth. madam.
Weasley was still standing over Harry, his arm around his shoulders to
They forced to come back. Bill, Run, and Hermiun were simultaneously.
Fudge.
“If your determination to close your eyes takes you up to
This, Cornelius,” said Dumbledore, “we have reached the division of
The bars. You should do as you see fit. And I — I will do as I see fit
fit."
Dombledore’s voice has no idea of ​​the tragic; It looks like a
Just word, but Fudge is similar to Dumbledre
She continued on him with a smile.
"Now, look here, Dumbledore," he said, holding out a threatening finger. “I gave you freedom, always. I have a lot of respect for
you. Perhaps I didn’t accept any lrance, but I accept
He's silent. There aren’t many who will let you serve the wolves.
Or keep hagrid, or decide what to teach your students without referring to the Ministry. But if you’re going to work against me—”
'The only one I intend to work for,' Dumbledore said, 'is Lord Voldemort. If you are against, yes,
Cornelius, on one side.”
You seem to like Foodge cannot give the answer to this. passed
Back and forth on his little toes for a while and he kicked his ass
bowler in his hands. Eventually, he says, with a sense of relief in .
Voice, “He can’t come back, Dumbledore, he just can’t be . . .”
Snape leaned forward, leaned over Dumbledore, and pulled the left
his clothes as he walked. He held out his hand and showed
It to Fudge, who regained consciousness.
“There,” Snape said sternly. "There. Dark Mark. It's not like
It looks like it did an hour or so ago, when it burned black, but you can
I still believe. Every Death Eater has a match burned into them by
The Dark Lord. is a means of distinguishing one from another, and his
a means of reminding us to him. When Mark touched the
Every Death Eater, we must change, stand up, instantly,
Beside him. This brand is growing more and more all year round. of Karkaroff
also. Why do you think Karkaroff ran away tonight? We both feel
Mark burned. We both knew he was back. Karkaroff fears
The shepherd of the Lord. Many of his friends died
Feeders to be satisfied with the return to the fold.”
Fudge came back from the snap too. He was shaking his head.
He didn't seem to take Snape's words to heart. On sees,
Obviously he's going back and forth with the bad picture on Snap's hand, and he's going back and forth
in front of Dumbledore and smiled, "I don't know what you are . . ."
Your friends are playing, Dumbledore, but I've learned a lot. I
have no more to add. I'll talk to you tomorrow, Dumbledore, to discuss the work of this school. I have to go back to
Ministry.”
He almost reached the door when he stood up. he turned
ahead, back to the inn, and stopping at Harry's
bed.
“Your terrorists,” he said slowly, producing a large gold box .
of his bag and placed it on Harry's bedside table. "one
Thousand Galleons. There should be a rehearsal, but on occasion . . .”
He pulled his football cap over his head and got out of the car.
room, slamming the door behind him. The moment he left, Dumbledore turned to look at the group around Harry .
bed.
"There's an operation to get," he said. “Mullie . . . Am I right in the
I suppose I might recognize you as Arthur?”
“Of course you can,” Ms. Weasley said. She was white to
Sorry, but she saw the stream. “We know what fudj is. It’s Arthur’s
concern for muggles that kept him from returning to the Ministry at all
these years. Fudge thinks he doesn’t have the proper magic wand.”
"Then I need to deliver a message to Arthur," Dumbledore said.
“All those we can identify really need to be contacted immediately, and he’s in a good position to contact those in the department .
Who doesn't deserve it like Cornelius?”
“I’m going to my dad,” Bill said, standing up. “I'll go now.”
“Axil,” Dumbledore said. “They tell him if it happens. tell
I want to be in direct contact with him for a while. He would have to, though. If Fodge thinks I’m interfering with the Ministry —.”
"Leave me alone," Bill said.
He wrapped his arm around Harry's shoulder and kissed his mother for
lipstick, pulls on his coat, and storms out of the room.
“Minerva,” said Duumbldur, and visits Makgunagall, .
“I want to see Hagrid on my field as soon as possible. Also — if
She will decide to goat — Madame Maxime.”
Professor McGonagal has been standing out without the word.
"Poppy," Dumbledore said to Mrs. Pumfrey, "you will be . . ."
They are very careful and attended Professure Moody bureaucracy, where I think
Would you find a handful of that Wenki in a great snake? do
what you can for her, and take her back to the kitchens. I think
He’ll keep Dupi about us.”
“With a lot — very much,” Madam Bumfrey said, it’s smooth, and
She also left.
Dumbledore guaranteed that the door was banished, and this
Madam Bumfrey died, before speaking again.
“And noow,” he said, “it is temporal tw of no no neumber to recognize each other for what the ary. Sirius . . . If you can go down
your usual form.”
The large black dog looked at Dumbledore, and then suddenly turned into a man.
Mrs. Wisley runs away and returns from the movie.
“Black Sirius!” she exclaimed, looking at him.
“Mom, shut up!” Run shouted. "It's okay!"
Snape didn't scream or jump back, but that look on his
The face was the joy and silly joy.
"he!" he said, looking at Sirius, his face showing size
You don’t care. “What do Dagie work?”
“He is here at my invitation,” Dumbledore said, looking between them, “as are you, Severus. I trust you both. ⵡⴰ ⵉ ⵛⴻⴽ
To put the old lease to the side and you will ensure another.”
Harry thought Dumbledore was asking for a near miracle. Sirius
And Snap looks one another by great movement.
“I’ll stand up, during the short period,” Dumpedrere, said in the ear .
Without his voice, “for the lack of open murder. You will keep.
sleeve. You are writing on one side. The time was the short, and if
Desrus in us who knows really didn’t stand with, no hope
For each and every one of us.”
Luckily — but they still are still in the same as each .
It wouldn’t have been recommended for anyone other than the patient—Sirius and Snape moved in the direction of .
One another and agreed. Please show up quickly.
“It’s going to work with,” Dumbledore said, he laughs .
Between the other times. “Now, I have a job for everyone in you.
Fudge’s odds, even if it’s undesirable, but it changed everything. Sirius, I need you to set off at once. Remember you’ll need for Remus Lupin,
Arabella Figg, Mundgus Fleetcher — Old Ilchi. Scroll down at
Lupins for a few times; I’ll get there.”
“But —” Harry said.
He wanted Sirius to stay. He never meant to say it again so quickly.
“He’ll see me so much, Harry,” Sirius said, and he responded. "I
Your words. But I have to do my best, you understand, not
you?"
“Yeah,” Harry said. "Yes . . . I sure do.”
Siruss sats his hand with a short time, and he replaced Dombdore, again with the black slave, and runs the room length .
At the door, he turned his hand with a smile. Then there’s
gone.
"Severus," Dumbledore said, turning to Snape, "You know what . . ."
I have to ask you to work. mk you want. . . If you are preparing yourself . . .”
“I am,” Snape said.
He looked a bit worse than usual, and his cold, black eyes gleamed dangerously.
“Then please,” Dumbledore said, and watched, with a
A look of horror on his face, as Snape wordlessly shrugged after
Sirius.
It was several minutes before Dumbledore spoke again.
“I’ve got to go downstairs,” he said at last. “I must know the Diggroys.
Harry — Take what's left of your example. I will sound all of you later.”
Harry leaned back on the pillows as Dumbledore left.
Hermione, Ron, and Mrs. Weasley were all staring at the
he. None of theam spoke for a fy loong tempine.
“You should get on with your novel, Harry”, Ms. Wisley
He said finally. Her hand squeezed the gold bracelet on her bedside drawer as she reached for the tub and glass. “You’re lucky .
A long sleep. Try to eat a little more time . . .
Think about what you can buy with your winnings!”
“I don’t want the gold,” Harry said in a wordless voice.
“You have. Anyone can have it. I don’t have to win it. it
It must be Cedric’s.”
The thing against which he was constantly fighting
From that point on, he was determined to conquer.
he. He could feel the straining, twitching in the inner corners.
of his eyes. Ibby looks and looks in the cold.
"It wasn't your fault, Harry," Mrs. Weasley whispered.
“I told him to take the cup with me,” Harry said.
Now, the passing regret is set in his stone as well. He wants Ron
Will see.
Mrs. Weasley placed the dish on the bedside table and knelt
Down, she put her arms around Harry. He has no memory of any time.
He was loved like that, like a mother. the
Everything he saw that night seemed to hit him like
Mrs. Weisley catches her. His mother's face, his father's words,
The sight of Cedric, dead on the floor all started to focus on his mind
his head until he couldn’t take it anymore, until he was smearing his face
Against the background of pain struggling to break out of it.
There was a loud noise, and it was Mrs. Weasley and Harry
Share the pump. Hermione was standing by the window. She was hoding amething tight in hand.
“I’m sorry,” she whispered.
“Your advice, Harry,” Mrs. Weasley whispered, waving her off .
The eyes on the back of his hand.
Harry did it in a gulp. The effect was instantaneous. heavy,
unbearable waves of dreamless sleep rolled over him; He fell back.
on his plates and think nothing else.

CHAPTER SEVEN
AZWARU

When he looked back, even a month later, Harry found
It only has separate memories in the coming days. compliance
Like he went too far to get anything else. the
The ideas that they have are a lot of clothes. The fact that, perhaps,
and a meeting with the Diggorys happening later today
morning.
They did not tell him what had happened; On the contrary, they both thanked him for returning Cedric's body to them. Sir.
It is used in most conversations. Ms. Diggory
He really thinks he's beyond tears.
“He was a little angry then,” she said, when Harry told her .
How Cedric died. “And afterward, Amos . . . He died just after
He had won the championship. He is clean.”
When they got to their feet, she looked at Harry and said,
“Look after yourself, now.”
Harry grabbed the golden wand on the bed table.
W

' '
“You took that,” he smiled. “It must be Cedric's,
He gets there first, and you take him —”
But she stood up for him.
“Oh no, it’s yours, sweetheart, I can’t . . . You caught him.”
Harry returned to Gryffindor Tower the following evening. from
What Hermione and Run told him, Dumbledore called the
School that morning around noon. He had just asked for this
They leave Harry alone, no one will question him or he's a monster
He would tell her the story of what happened on the boat. Most people, he observed, crowded around him in the streets, threatening him .
eyes. Some whispered behind their hands as he passed. decided
that many of them believed Rita Skeeter’s article about how
It is misleading and possibly dangerous. Maybe they were making up their own theories about how Cedric died. Found
he didn't care very much. He loved very much when he was Run
And Hermione and them talk about other things, or at least let him sit in silence while they play chess. It feels like all
Three of them reached an understanding they didn’t need
put into words; That everyone was waiting for some sign, some word, of
What’s going on outside of Hogwarts—and it’s of no use to
They think about what might be coming until they see something
About righteousness. Just time in which they were sought about the library was when
Ron told Harry about a meeting Mrs. Weasley had had with Dumbledore before she returned home.
“She went to ask if you could come straight to us this summer,” he said. “But he wants you to go back to the Dursleys, at least .
In the beginning.”
"why?" Harry said.

' '
"She said that Dumbledore had his reasons," Ron said, shaking his hand .
A head of it. “I guess we should trust him, right?”
The only person other than Ron and Hermione is that Harry is cheating.
We can talk to Hagrid. As soon as the defense is no longer versus
The Dark Arts teacher, they have those lessons free. They use
one on a Thursday evening to stop by and visit Hagrid at his apartment
The cabin. It was a bright and sunny day; Fang walked out of the opening
door as close as possible, hovering and wagging his tail gently.
“Who is this?” Hagrid said, coming to the door. “Harry!”
He stormed out to meet them, pulling Harry into an arm
Hog, tough, said, “Lxir ste Yeh, my son. Good ter
See the preparation.”
They saw two Book-Skate-Ski and Early on the wooden table
in front of the fireplace when they entered Hagrid's cabin.
"Bin has a boat with Olympe," Hagrid said. “You just stayed.”
"who?" Ron said with a wry smile.
“Miss Maxim, of course!” Hagrid said.
“You’re a couple, or not?” Run said.
“I don’t know what you’re talking about,” Hagrid growled, getting
More cups from the kitchen. When Lattai made a handful of
On a trash can, he leaned back in his chair and
Harry squeezed closely with his black puppy-like eyes.
“Are you okay?” said that by allegedly.
“Yeah,” Harry said.
"No, yeh're not," said Hagrid. “ 'Course yeh' ur. But yeh to
be."
Harry didn't say anything.
“He knows he’s coming back,” said Hagrid, and Harry,

' '
Ron, and Hermiee magazine, slaughtered with sluff. “Known it for
Years, Harry. Nyo is out there, biding his time. It was ter happening. So, now he has, An' to Jos' to get the Get by. Well
fight. Megha' can stop before getting good guidance. This
Dumbledur's plan, whatever it was. Great man, Dumblur. 's long
We made it, I’m not too worried.”
Hagrid raised his dark eyebrows at those words in disbelief.
for their faces.
“No good sittin' worryin' about it,” he said. “The next thing to
come, an' we'll meet it when it does. Dumbledore told me where'
It worked, Harry.”
Hagrid's chest tightened as he looked at Harry.
“Yeh did the same as your father would, an' I could' give you
No. The wages are less than that.”
Harry smiled back at her. It was the first time he smiled in
days. “What Doumbledore will ask you to work, A Hagrid?” he asked.
“He has sent Professor McGonagall to interrogate you and Madame Maxime .
He’ll meet him—that night.”
“Got a little job fer me over the summer,” said Hagrid. "private,
though. I'm not s'pposed ter tal apo' it, no, no ne ter you ot.
Olympe — Madame Maksim is stolen — can follow with
we. I think she woll. Think I’ve got it fixed.”
“Is that about Voldemort?”
Hagrid flinched at the word name.
“Well’ Eli,” he said really. "Trawn
Visit me today? I was talking—talking!” increase
Indeed, when we look at the comments on their face.
* * *

' '
With a heavy heart Harry packed his bag in the
dominory on thenight beforre his return to Prevert Drive. was
They dread the launch party, which is usually a cause for celebration, when the winner of the championship among the households
He warned. He had avoided being in the Great Hall when he .
Full ever since he left the hospital wing, he chose to eat when
It was almost impossible to avoid seeing his fellow students.
When he, Ron, and Hermione entered the hall, they saw about
Once these previous risks did not exist. The Green Hall was
normally decorated with the colors of the Husband coming for the Leave Party. Tonight, however, there were strange cars on the wall.
After the teachers' table. Harry knew at once that they were
There it was a sign of respect for Cedric.
The real Madeye Moody is now on the staff table, her clone
leg and his magical eye back in place. He was very friendly,
It’s about every time you’re talking about. Harry couldn't wait
he; ⵜⵉⴳⴷⵉ ⵏ Moody ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵏⵖⵉⵡⵜ ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵜⵃⴻⵜⵜⴻⵎⴷ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴻⵔⵏⵓ ⵙ 100.000.
his sentence of ten months in his prison. Professor Karkaroff's chair was empty. Harry wondered, as he sat down with the
Other Gryffindor, where Karkaroff was currently, and whether Voldemort had captured him.
ⵎⴰⴷⴰⵎⴰ Maksim ⵎⴰⵣⴰⵍⵉⵜⵜ ⴷⵉⵏ. She was sitting next to Hagrid.
They are talking quietly in a way with someone. In addition to the length of the table, the board
As a teacher Makgunagall, there is Snape. His yes lingered on
Harry momentarily as Harry looked at him. His word was
It’s the time to read. It appears that the worship and he doesn't satisfa like every time. Harry
He continued to glare at him, long after Snape had looked away.
However, Snape has done by Doumbledre, and
That night is Duymort? And why . . . why . . . was

' '
Dumbledore ⵢⴻⵇⵏⴻⵄ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ Snape ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵜⴰⵎⴰⵏⵙⴻⵏ ? he
ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷ ⴰⵄⴻⵙⵙⴰⵙⵏⵙⴻⵏ, Dumbledore ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ ⴰⴽⴽⴰ ⴷⴻⴳ Pensieve. snap
He had become a guard against Voldemort, “that’s greatness of the man.” was
that the job he had taken up again? If Ti
Death Eaters, perhaps? Pretend he was never really gone
For Dumbledur, it was, like Voldemort with masculinity,
Was he biding his time?
The Harry’s thought was given by Professor Dumbledore, for
He stands to the staff. The main room, which is at each time
He was a luxury slave as every time at the tournament, returned
They’re very happy.
“The Empire,” said Dumbledore, all of them, “n .
Another year.”
He paused and his eyes fell on the Hufflepuff table. Arts
He was a value at and the valuable arrive to her legs,
And their are still the hottest and weirdest faces in the House.
“I have so much to say to you all tonight ,” he said .
Dumbledore, “but I must first assess the loss of a very
The people, he had to stay silent,” which is in the vision of Hufflepffs, “Ohs our wedding with us. I would love you all, please, to
Stand, Ref eds, for Cedric Digory.”
They did it, all of them; ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵇⴻⵔⴹⴻⵏ ⵢⵉⴱⴻⵏⴽⴰⵏ ⴰⵎ ⵢⴰⵍ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ
Hall stood up, raised their hats, and shouted, in a high, gravelly voice,
With the ears of the ear, “Sedrik Digiuri.”
Harry cagught a glimpse of Cho through the croded. are
ⵉⵎⴻⵟⵟⴰⵡⴻⵏ ⵜⵜⴼⴻⴳⴳⵉⴹⴻⵏⴷ ⵙ ⵜⵙⵓⵙⵎⵉ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵡⵓⴷⴻⵎⵉⵙ. He looked at the table.
As they remain all over again.
“Chedrich was a patient who gave the example of many things that come .
breaking up the Hufflepuff house,” Dumbledore continued. “It was a

' '
good and loyal friend, a hard worker, he valued fair play. His death
Has affected you all, whether knew him l l not. I think that
You have right, yes, ATS check out how it comes back to.”
Harry raised an eyebrow and looked at Dumbledore.
“Sdrek Diguri kills Mass Vuldemert.”
One story of silver has sought the thoroughness. People were staring at
Dumbledre in the Head of Music, in Khuf. It looks like it’s well.
They were seen looking at themselves in silence.
“The Ministry of Visuals,” for Dembledre, “Not .
wich me to tell you hass. Some of the parents can
They are accused of doing this — also because they don’t believe that Lord Voldemort is back, or because they think he
shouldn't tell you so, young as you are. It’s myself, though,
that truth is generally distinguishable from falsehood, and that any attempt to
It is said that Sidrik died as a result of a sanction, or any kind
of sake of humans, a young sand.”
With good and delightful to each place in the hall it go to the capital of
Dumbledore Now . . . or almost very face. Ofver at the Slyingrin
The group, Harry saw Drako Malfoy and was asking something to Crabp and
Goyle. Harry felt a surge of hot, sick anger in his stomach. he
He forced himself to look at Dumbledore.
“There is another one worth mentioning regarding
With Cedric’s death,” Dumbledore went on. “I'm talking, obviously.
On Harry Potter.”
A kind of anger passed over the Great Hall when there were no heads in the 1970s.
A picture of Harry before he turned back to face Dumbledore.
"Harry Potter managed to escape from Lord Voldemort," Dumbledore said. “He puts his life in the half to rest the Cedric’s body to Hogarts. He confirmed, in each sector, the finance is called Dros Dross

' '
They are very proud of the authorities in following Lord Fuldimore, and therefore, I
It’s by weapon.”
Dumbledore returned in a happy manner to Harry collecting his certificate once more.
further. Almost everyone in the main hall followed the sign. They honored his name, when they were Cedric, and gathered to
he. But with one half of the vertical sheets, Harry saw that the
Malfoy, the Crab, Guyle, and several other Slytherins had
and they have been in the bleass of their, and holy abundance. Dumbledore, who didn't have a magical eye after all, didn't see them.
While everyone else once again, Dumbledore continued to say, “Isi’s Isi’s Isi’s Isi of Triwszad’s basketball was that they’ll get a lot .
ⴷ ⴰⵙⵎⵖⵔ ⵏ ⵓⵔⵎⴰⵙ ⴰⵙⴽⵍⴰⵏ. In light of what has happened — of Lord Voldemort’s return — such relationships are more important than ever.”
Doumblimore from Massa Makhsim, to
Floor Delachor and colleagues of Biouxbatts, to Victor
Crum and Dormstrang at the Stleinine table. Crum, Harry
He looked, turning around, almost angry, as if he was trying to get Dumbledore to say something horrible.
"Every guest in this hall," Dumbledore said, his eyes fixed on the students of Durmstrang, "will be treated .
Here at any time, if they want to come. I will tell you all, at once .
Also — on the Laurd Voldemort light, we just were like .
Strong as we are united, weak as we are divided. Lord Voldemort visits for the development of pool and very great trauma. we can
Fight for it only by showing a strong bond of friendship as well as
trust. Labor and Language variations are not anything at all if
The goals are similar to our hearts open.
“It is my belief — and I never so hope that I am wrong-

' '
Taken — that we all face dark times and hardships. Some of the
You in this cell are already suffering directly from the hands of the Lord
Voldemort. Many of your families have been torn apart. week
Previously, a student from our class was arrested.
“Remember Cedric. Remember, if the time should come when
You have to make a choice between what is right and what is easy.
Remember what happened to a boy who was kind, gentle, and
I want, because it’s out of the Lord Voldert Road. Kty Cedric Digur.”
Harry's cup was full; Hedwig is back in her cage on top of the
it. He, Run, and Hermione were waiting in the crowded entrance.
pool with the rest of the 4th years for vehicles to
Take them back to the Hogsmeade mansion. She is another beautiful girl.
a summer day. Thought Privet Drive would be hot and
The leaves, its flowers and a riot of color, when he got there
evening. The thought gave him no pleasure at all.
" 'comfort!"
He looked away. Flur Delakur was quick to move the stone.
Footsteps in the castle. Above him, far above the ground, Harry
He wanted to see Hagrid bring Madame Maxim to change two of the older horses in their arms. The Beauxbatons trailer was approx.
to remove.
"We'll see each user again, I 'ope," Fleur said as she arrived .
At her, she held out her hand. “I'm 'oping' to find a job 'ere, to improve my English.”
“It’s great,” Run said through a dedicated channel.
Fleur smiled at him; Hermione whispered.

' '
“Good-bye, 'Arry,” Fleur said, turning to go. “It’s nice to meet you!”
Harry's spirits couldn't help but lift a little as he watched Fleur
Quickly, back across the grass to Madame Maxime, the pebble-haired
Please in the sunlight.
"Remember how the Scholars of Durmstrang become," he said
run. “Do you do you can hear the vessels without Karkaroff?”
“Karkaroff didn’t move,” said a low voice. “He stayed in the house .
Cabin and let’s do vork.”
Krum came over to say goodbye to Hermione.
“Can I have a vord?” he asked her.
"Ah . . . Yes . . . all right,” sad Hermion, looking slightly, and following Krugh the crod and ot of Saturday.
“You better hurry!” Ron called out after her. “The carriages'll be here in a minute!”
He let Harry take a hit on the wheels, though, and spent
The next few minutes were played with his side on the crowd to turn to watch
What Krum and Hermione could handle. They retourund quite
soon. Ron stared at Hermione, but her face was quite impassive.
“I love Diggory,” Krum often told Harry. “He vos alvays
With respect to me. Alvays. Although I am writing from Durmstrang — s
Karkaroff,” he added, with a smile.
“Have you found a new manager yet?” Harry said.
Krum shrugged. He elld tut hand as Fleur had done, shook
Harry's hand, and the run's. Ron looked like he was suffering some sort of painful internal struggle. Chrome has already started
You walked away as Ron walked out, “Can I have your autograph?”
Hermione looked around, looking at the horseless carriages that

' '
 They were now running towards them up the car, as Krum, looking
Surprised but relieved, he signed a piece of paper to Ron.
The weather could not have been more different on the trip.
They returned to King's Cross as he was on their way to Hogwarts
October was passed. There wasn't a single cloud in the sky. Harry,
Ron, and Hermione got an apartment for themselves. Pigwidgeon was once again hidden under Ron's dress robes
to stop him from hooting continuously; Hedwig was asleep, she
His head was under his wing, and Crookshanks was locked in a squat
sitting like a giant, fluffy gingerbread. Harry, Ron, and Hermione
They spoke more completely and freely than they had all week as the train sped up.
of them to the south. Harry felt like Dumbledore's words in
Fist River didn't care, in any form. It was less painful to
discuss what is happening now. They broke off their conversation
About what action Dumbledore could take, even now, to stop
Voldemort only when the morning car arrived.
When Hermione returned from the car, she put her money
Reaching back into her school bag, she pulled out a copy of the Daily Prophet .
that she was taking there. Harry looked at her, unsure.
Did he really want to know what she might mean, but Hermione, seeing him stare at her, said sternly, 'There's nothing in .
there. You can look for yourself, but nothing at all. I was
Check daily. A small portion even the day after the third task
They say she won the championship. They didn't even mention Cedric.
Nothing about any of them. Whether you’re asking, Fodge forces them to
Shut up.”
“He’ll never keep Rita quiet,” Harry said. “Not about the story as
this."

' '
“Oh, Rita hasn’t posted anything at all since the third wave,” she said .
Permion in an oddly constrained voce. “ⴰⵎ ⵡⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴷ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ,” ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ .
She added, her voice now a little quivering, “Rita Skeeter isn’t going to .
You would have written anything at all for a while. Not unless she wants me to
Spill the beans on him.”
“What are you talking about?” Run said.
“I found out how she listened to private conversations .
When she wasn’t coming onto the floor,” she said .
Hermione was in a daze.
Harry had a hunch that Hermione was dying to tell
They had that for days, but that she held her own in the light of
Everything else followed.
“ⴰⵎⴻⴽ ⵉ ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⴳⴻⵏ?” Harry said suddenly.
“How did you get it?” Ron said, looking at her.
"Well, it was you, of course, who gave me the idea, Harry," she said.
“Did I?” said Harry, confused. "how?"
“Bugg,” Hermione said excitedly.
“But she said they didn’t—”
“Oh not electronic bugs,” said Hermione. “No, you see . . . Rita
Skeeter” — Hermione’s voice rises with quiet triumph — “is a
unregistered Animagus. She can turn —”
Hermione pulled out of her pocket a small sealed glass container.
“— To a doll.”
“You’re kidding,” Ron said. “You don’t have . . . It's not her. . .”
“Oh yes,” Hermione said happily, and he’s in .
them.
Inside there are some cuts and wings and a large piece of meat, meatballs.
“That’s not—you’re kidding—” Ron sneered, picking up .
Between the eyes.

' '
“ⵓⵀⵓ, ⵓⵔ ⵍⵍⵉⵖ, ⵓⵔ ⵍⵍⵉⵖ”, ⵉⵏⵏⴰ ⵀⵉⵔⵎⵉⵓⵏ, ⴰⵔ ⵉⵜⵜⴱⴱⵉ. “I caught her in
The table in the hospital hand. Modern well, you shall be found that the monument fortifying goods in the stone
The cards she wears.”
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵉⵎⵓⵇⴻⵍⴷ, ⵉⵡⴰⵍⴰ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵙ ⵍⵃⴻⵇⵇ. He also remembered.
“There was a pain in the celebration on the night we heard Hagarde .
Madame Maxim is talking about her mother!”
“Exactly,” Hermione said. “And Viktor has accomplished a luck from .
The network after we had our conversation with the lake. And if I'm not
Very closer, Rita is on the portal of .
The letter of consonant in the day to day that does not contain your word. On the basis of
For the best of all year.”
“When we see Malfoy under the answers. . .” Ron said quietly.
“He was talking about, in the phosphate,” said Hermione. "recognize,
sure. That’s for all the sights of the beautiful stories with the Slitherin family. They don’t care if you do
Anything illegal, as long as they were giving her dangerous stuff
On us and Hagrid.”
Harmiee removed the gas vessel from Run, the length of
Betel, theatre vehicles have against gas.
"I told her I'd release it when we got back to London," he said .
Hermione. « ⵙⵙⴻⵅⴷⴰⵎⴻⵖ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ Charm ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⴽⴽⴻⵙ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⴱⴻⵔⵜ, ⵜⵡⴰⵍⴰⴹ, ⵉⵀⵉ .
She cannot change. And I've told her she's going to keep her quill to herself for a whole year. See if she can’t break the habit of writing horrible lies about people.”
She hath accompanied by Lhir, Hermiee Ternkh you do to shipping you in it
father.
The cabin door creaked open.

' '
“It’s a lot, A Graanger,” Draku Malfoy said.
Crabbe and Goyle were standing behind him. all
ⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⴻⵏ ⵜⵜⴼⴻⵔⵃⴻⵏ ⵓⴳⴰⵔ ⵙ ⵢⵉⵎⴰⵏⵏⵙⴻⵏ, ⵜⵜⴽⵓⴽⵔⵓⵏ ⵓⴳⴰⵔ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵜⵜⴽⵓⴽⵔⵓⵏ ⵓⴳⴰⵔ
Shorts, besides what Harry hasn’t done.
“Yes,” said Malfoy quickly, gradually snacks to the car and smoothly, quickly, singing in the ear .
yeast. “You caught some sensitive reporter, Dumbledore’s favorite Potter boy again. The Great Strategy.”
Smirikis Ennah. ⴽⵔⴰⴱⴱ ⴷ ⴳⵓⵢⵍ ⴰⵔ ⵜⵜⴰⵍⵙⵏ.
“Trying not to that about it, are we?” Malloy said in a simple way, and he sees all three. “You will try to truthfulness the sensitivity of the unfamiliarly.
happened?"
“For,” Hari said.
He hadn't been this close to Malfoy since he'd seen him
It looks to Crabpe and Guil in Dombledore speech
XF Cedric. He could feel a sort of ringing in his ears. His hand
He occupies in the evening.
“You choose the side to the worst, A Potter ! I honor you! I say
You have to choose your company more carefully, remember?
When we met on the train, the first day at Hogwarts? I do not say with you not
Return with Revphf as this!” He made himself in Ron and
Hermione. “They’re so much now, Butter! They will be the first to go, now
ⴷⴰⵕⴽ ⵙⵉⴷⵉ ⵖⵔ ⴷⴼⴼⵉⵔ! Mudblods are those who love Mugle first! So — second — Diggory was a f —”
As somebody broke up a snack of snacks
Inside the company. Blinded by the heat of those rays
From all sides, it is used in a series of ways,
Harrey has moved with shine,, and reiterated to the ground.
Malfoy, Krabbe, and Goyle were all unsaturated in

' '
gate. HE, Ron, and Hermione were on the forest, all three of
them because they use different hex. Nor were they the only ones to
Working together.
“Thought we’d see what those three were up to,” said Fred matterof-factly, stepping onto Goyle and into the compartment. have
His wand disappeared, as did George, who was careful to step on Malfoy as he followed Fred inside.
“ⴰⵙⴻⴹⵔⵓ”, ⵉ ⴷ-ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ ⵊⴻⵓⵔⵊ, ⵎⵉ ⴷ-ⵢⴻⵥⵔⴰ ⴽⵔⴰⴱ.
“Where uses Corncos Corss?”
“I,” Harry said.
“Nonsense,” George said lightly. “I use JiliLegs. It looks like
those two shouldn't be mixed. So what has been derived with the ears of the stones in his face. Well, let's not leave them here, they don't
ⵔⵏⵓ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⵉ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⴱⴻⵔⵜ.”
Ron, Harry, and George have gone down, and snapped, banking Maloy, Crabbie, and Goel — each of them really sought for the jeans' snack they are
Essentials — I left the road, both back to the shop
And it comes to the door.
“Exploding Snap, Anyone?” Fred said, he was discovered by a
Cards.
They were in their fifth-hand half-shaped game when he asked Harry to sing.
“You Going to tell, then?” He told George. “That’s for
It’s afraid?”
“Oh,” George said darkly. "that."
“It doesn’t matter,” Fred said, shaking his head ruefully. "it
wasn't anything important. Man are then, that's good.”
“Now hand,” George said, with a woman’s view.

' '
But Hari, Run, and Hermiyun continues to have, end, Fred .
ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ: “Akken ⵉⵍⴰⵇ, ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵉⵍⴰⵇ, ⵎⴰ ⵜⴻⴱⵖⵉⴹ ⵙ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ ⴰⵜⵙ- ⵜⵙⴻⵥⵔⴻⴹ . . . Louou
Bagman.”
“Abagman?” Harry said quietly. “You are saying he was involved .
in -"
“Nah,” George said gloomily. “Nothing like this. At Ahgusani. he
He has no mental.”
“How, what’s yes?” Run said.
Fred paused, then said, “You remember that bet we had with .
him at the Quidditch World Cup? ⵖⴻⴼ ⵡⴰⵎⴻⴽ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵜⴻⵔⴱⴻⵃ Irland,
But will Krum get the Snitch?”
“Yeah,” Harry and Ron said quietly.
“Ah yes, Git is good with the gold gold goldon from
Irish mascot.”
"so?"
“Yes,” said France said with lecture, "Do I out, Isy, Isy all? far far
Bridge, there is a village!”
“But — it’s important to be smoking, so you all?” Hermione said.
ⵊⵓⵔⵊ ⵉⴷⴷⴰ ⵙ ⵢⴰⵜ ⵜⵖⴰⵔⴰⵙⵜ ⴱⴰⵀⵔⴰ ⵉⵥⵉⵍⵏ.
“Yes, it’s something we think, at first. We thought if only
Written by, said he worked strong and knows.
But he doesn't do anything. She kept our letter. We stayed back to talk with it
So in Hogarts, but there is always some reason
To leave us.”
ⴼⵔⴻⴷ ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ: “Di ⵜⴰⴳⴳⴰⵔⴰ, ⵢⵓⵖⴰⵍ ⴷ ⴰⵄⴻⵡⵡⵉⵇ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ. “He told us we were
Too young to gamble, and it didn’t cost us anything.”
“Yes we need to get our money,” George said with happiness.
“He didn't refuse!” exclaimed Hermione.
“You should in one,” Fred said.

' '
“But that’s just good for you!” Run said.
“Tell me about it,” George said. “ 'Course, e tood ot whaat
He was guilty in the end. Lee Jordan’s father had a bit of a problem.
gets money from Bagman as well. He was clearly in big trouble.
With the dogs. They escaped the golden prison. Group
hit the grass after the World Cup and took all
I gold had, and he still didn’t give up all the money. they
followed him all the way to Hogwarts to keep an eye on him. he
He lost everything with the monk. He didn't have two Galleons to spare.
And do you know how the fox tried to get the animals back?”
"how?" Harry said.
“He put a bet on you, mate,” said Fred. “Place big bets on you to .
They won the tournament. Beth vs. grass.”
“ⵉⵀⵉ ⴷ ⴰⵢⴰ ⵉ ⵜⵢⴻⴵⴵⴰⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵄⵔⴻⴹ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵢⵉⵉⵄⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵔⴻⴱⵃⴻⵖ!” Harry said.
"Well—I won, didn't I?" So he can with the Order!”
“Nope,” George said, shaking his head. “Animals play like .
A fool like him. ⵏⵏⴰⵏⴷ ⵜⴻⵙⵙⴻⴽⵏⴻⴹⴷ ⴷ Diggory, ⵎⴰ ⴷ Bagman ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ
beting you'd wein tuit. So Bagman has to run for it. did
Sprinkled on him right after task three.”
George smiled broadly and began sorting the cards again.
The rest of the trip passed merrily; Harry hopes
It could go on all summer, in fact, and it wouldn’t be
rrive at King's Cross . . . But as he learned the hard way.
year, time does not rush when something unpleasant
ahead, and slowly, the Hogwarts Express was pulling along at
platform nine and three quarters. ⴰⵔⵡⴰⵢ ⴷ ⵍⵃⴻⵙⵙ ⵏ ⵢⴰⵍ ⴰⵙⵙ
flilled the curidors as the stadents began to diseembark. Run d
Hermione tried to study Malafuy, Krab, and Guyle, holding
Their pockets. Harry, however, remains in place.

' '
“For — Georg — Rhou a little.”
The enemies are Ezard. Harry died in the Atlantic Ministry and stood up.
Triwizard of Victory.
“Modern,” he said, and he reacted in the hands of George.
"what?" said Fred, looking flabbergased.
“Take it,” Harry repeated formly. “I don’t want.”
“You’ve got a mind,” George said, trying to bring it back to Harry.
“No, I'm not,” said Harry. “You take it, and get inventing. is
ⵉ ⵜⵃⴰⵏⵓⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⴷⵢⴰⵣⵜ.”
“It’s a knowledge of the knowledge,” Fred Stot is almost impossible.
“ⵙⵍⴻⴹ,” ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Harry ⵙ ⵍⴵⴻⵀⴷ. “If you don’t take, I’m lying .
Underwater. I don’t want I don’t like it. But I can do
With some laughter. We could all do with a few laughs. I have a feeling we’re going to need them more than ever before it’s too late.”
“Harry,” George said in annoyance, staring at the bag of money on his shoulder .
Hands, “there must be a thousand Gauls here.”
“Yeah,” Harry said, smirking. “Think how many canary creams .
that is."
The twins looked at him.
“I don’t even tell your mother where you put it . . . Even if she
Maybe you are not interested in joining the ministry, come
Will think about it. . . .”
“Harry,” Fred started, but Harry drew his wand.
“Look,” he said flatly, “take it, or I’ll hex you. I know something good.
One now. Just do me a favor, okay? Buy Ron some different dress
Rubs say they’re from you.”
He left the room before they could say another word,
turned on Malfoy, Crabbe, and Goyle, who were still kicking over the
floor, covered with coins.
Uncle Vernon was waiting beyond the barrier. Mrs. Wesley was
Close to him. She hugged Harry very tightly when she saw him and
he whispered in her ear, "I thought Dumbledore would let you come to us ."
later in the summer. Keep in touch, Harry.”
“See you, Harry,” Ron said, putting an arm around his neck.
“ 'Bye, Harry!” Hermione said, doing something she had
He had never done it before, and he kissed him on the cheek.
“Harry — thanks,” George mumbled, while Fred nodded excitedly in his direction.
Harry looked at them, turned to Uncle Vernon, and followed
He is silenced by the officer. There was no point in worrying, he
he said to himself, as he got into the head of the Dursley's car.
As Hagrid had said, what would come, would come . . . And he
He’ll meet him when he meets him.


Harry Potter
AND PHOENIX STADIUM

CHAPTER ONE
DUDLEY FAILED

The hottest day of the summer so far was drawing to a close and
There is a sleepy silence about the big square houses of Privet
drive. Cars that were usually shiny stood dusty in their tracks and
crops that were once emerald green were shriveled and yellow; apply
Twenty-five hosepipes were blocked because of the flooding. Forbidden from their custom
Car Wash and Lawn Mowing, Privet Residents
Drive out into the shadow of their cool houses, windows
He threw high in hopes of surfing in a wind that wasn’t. the
The only person left outside was a little boy who had crossed himself.
Back in a flower bed outside number four.
He was a thin boy, with black hair, eyes that had
pinched, slightly unhealthy look of someone who has grown too much into a
Short time frame. His jeans were torn and dirty, his T-shirt had a bag.
And he swelled up, and his trainers arms were twitching from the upper posts. Harry Butter’s appearance doesn’t impress the neighborhood.
They were the sort of people who thought scruffiness should be punished by law, but as he hid himself behind a giant thydrangea
Bush this afternoon was largely invisible to passersby. In fact, only
How to determine if Uncle Vernon or Aunt Petunia
Stick their heads out of the living room window and stare straight ahead.
Down in the flower bed below.
In particular, Harry thought that a tribute should be paid to
The idea is hidden here. He wasn’t, perhaps, very comfortable sitting on
The earth is hot and heavy, but on the other hand, no one looks into it
He, they grit their teeth so hard that he can’t hear the news, or
Shooting pointless questions, as happened whenever there was
I tried sitting in the living room and watching TV with her hand in hand.
Uncle and aunt.
Almost as if this thought came out of the open window, Vernon Dursley, Harry's uncle, suddenly spoke. “I’m glad to see
boy's stopped trying to enter. Where is he anyway?”
“I don’t know,” Aunt Petunia said indifferently. “Not in .
house."
Uncle Vernon shouted.
“You’ll see the news . . .” He said calmly. “I want to know what
He's really up to. It was like being a normal kid who cared about what was on the news — Dudley had no clue what was going on, doubt he knew who Prime was .
Minister d! Anyway, it’s not like there would be anything about her right in
Our news —”
“Vernon, shh!” Aunt Petunia said. “The window is open!”
“Oh — yes — I’m sorry, dear . . .”
The Dursleys sighed. Harry heard a chant about Fruit 'N .
Bran's breakfast while watching Mrs. Figg, a cat lover.
An elderly woman from nearby Wisteria Walk, amble briskly past. She was
She looked and smiled to herself. Harry was so glad he was
hiding behind bushes; Ms. Figg has recently begun to ask
turning to tea whenever she met him in the street. She has
He turned the corner and disappeared from sight in front of Uncle Vernon
The voice left the window again.

' 3 '
“Dudders out for tea?”
"To the Polkisses' house," said Aunt Petunia excitedly. “He’s got a lot of little friends, he’s very popular . . .”
Harry choked out a breath with difficulty. The Dursleys were indeed strangely cruel to their son, Dudley; They bought all his stuff.
Awkward lies about drinking tea with one of his other team members
every winter holiday night. Harry knew that very well
Dudley wasn't going to tea anywhere; He and his team spent every
In the afternoons they litter the playground, smoke on street corners, and
They threw rocks at cars and passing children. Harry saw them in
it on its morning walk on Whinging beach; He had spent
Most holidays they wander the streets, burning newspapers
from tables in the street.
Musical opening notes reminiscent of seven p.m.
The news reached Harry's ears and his stomach turned. might
Tonight — after a month of waiting — would be the night —
“Numbers of stranded tourists have filled airports as well as
Spanish dockworkers strike reaches its second week —”
“Give them a siesta of a lifetime, I’ll do it,” Uncle Vernon said over the
End of newsreader list, but nothing is there: Out in the flowers
The bed, Harry's stomach seemed to swell. If something had happened,
Sure it will be first thing on the news; Mortality and decline were more likely to occur in festival survivors. . . .
He let out a long, slow breath and looked up at the beautiful blue sky.
Every day this summer has been the same: anxiety, depression, anxiety, and then increasing anxiety again . . . and
Always, deeper and deeper all the time, the question of why nothing has been done yet. . . .
He kept listening, just in case there was the slightest movement, which the Muggles wouldn't really recognize — it was a blur .
overflowing, perhaps, or some serious accident . . . but

' 4 '
Strike by baggage handlers followed by reports of drought in
Southeast (“I hope he’s listening by the door!” Uncle Vernon yelled,
“with his guns at three in the morning!”); Then a helicopter
He nearly collapses in a field in Surrey, and then an older woman divorces her famous husband (“as if we’re worried about their incest
matters,” said Aunt Petunia, who followed the case carefully .
At any point she can lay her bony hands on it).
Harry closed his eyes on the twinkling evening sky now as
The newsreader said, “And finally, Bungy the budgie got a novel .
A way to keep out the cold this winter. Bungy, who lives at Five Feathers in Barnsley, has learned to surf! Marie Durkins went to find
They came out more. . . .”
Harry opened his eyes again. If they got to water polo
Budgerigars, nothing else is worth hearing. He turned cautiously on his front, and raised himself on his elbows and knees,
He prepares to climb out from under the bridge.
He was moving about two inches when several things happened in
Definitely very librarian.
A loud, resonant crack broke the sleepy silence like an explosion; cat
Streaked out from under the parked car and out of sight; Shouting, a
he declared firmly, and the creaking sound of china came from the Dursley's living room, and Harry seemed to have been waiting for that .
Signal, leapt to his feet and at the same time pulled from the waistband of his jeans a heavy wooden stake as if to clear a
sword. But before he could pull himself up to his full height, the top of the
His muzzle matched the Dursleys open window, hence the
Crash made Aunt Petunia scream even more.
Harry felt like his head was splitting in two; Eyes sharpening, he
Swaying, trying to focus on the road and identify the source of the noise,
But he was about to right himself when a pair of huge bears appeared
He reached his hands out of the open window and they were clasped tightly to the side.
His voice.

' 5 '
“Put—it—away!” Uncle Vernon whispered in Harry's ear. "now!
Let — someone — see!”
“Get — off — me!” Harry yelled; For a few seconds they struggled, Harry pulled his uncle's sausage-like fingers with his left
hand, his right gripping his raised fist tightly. Then, as
The pain at the top of Harry's cock gave a pretty intense throb, Uncle Vernon screamed and pushed Harry away like he'd gotten a
electric shock — some invisible force seems to emanate through
his nephew, so that he could not hold.
Sighing, Harry slumped forward against the hydrangea bush and straightened up
forward, and looking around. There was no indication as to what was causing the loud noise.
Terrible tone, but there are a lot of smiling faces in a lot of faces
Close windows. Harry put his wand slowly back on his jeans.
And he tried to be innocent.
“Lovely evening!” shouted Uncle Vernon, looking at Mrs. Number .
Seven, who peers from behind her net curtains. “Did you hear
Is the car running right now? It gives me and Petunia a lot of inspiration!”
He kept moving in a weird, sly way until all the curious
Neighbors fell from their separate windows, then laughter
It turned into angry rage at the thought of Harry coming back to her.
Harry took a few steps closer, careful to avoid just about
the point at which Uncle Vernon’s withered hands could resume their work
A knock.
“What the hell do you mean by that, kid?” he asked Uncle Vernon in a
a crackling sound that gets more and more frantic.
“What do I mean by how much?” Harry said coldly. He kept looking to the left.
And right down the road, he’s still hoping to see the person who made
The sound of crackling.
“Make a racket like a starter kit right outside of —our.”
“I didn’t make that noise,” Harry insisted.
Aunt Petunia's pale, lion-like face now appeared next to Uncle Vernon's pale, pale one. She looks young.

' 6 '
“Why were you sleeping under our window?”
"Yes—yes, good sense, Petunia!" What are you doing under our
The window, boy?”
“I heard the news,” Harry said in a tired voice.
His aunt and uncle exchanged looks of sadness.
“Listening to the news! again?"
"Well, it changes every day, you see," Harry said.
“Don't mess with me, kid! I want to know what you really think — and don’t give me any more of this news conference .
Tush! You know very well that your rights . . .”
“Be careful, Vernon!” Aunt Petunia said, and Uncle Vernon lowered his voice so Harry could almost hear him, “. . . That your part
Don’t interfere with our information!”
“That’s all you know,” Harry said.
The Dursleys stare at him for a few seconds, then Aunt Petunia .
“You’re a dirty little liar,” he said. What are all those —” she too shook .
his voice so Harry had to lip-read the next words, “— monsters —
do you if you don’t get the news?”
"go ahead!" Uncle Vernon said with a triumphant grin. “Get out of this .
One, boy! Like we didn’t know you get all your information from those damn birds!”
Harry hesitated for a moment. He paid her anything to tell her
The truth this time, though her aunt and uncle couldn’t
They knew how Harry felt when he admitted it.
"animal . . . I don’t get the news,” Harry said tonelessly.
“I don’t believe it,” Aunt Petunia suddenly said.
“No I swear,” Uncle Vernon insisted.
"We knew you had something interesting," Aunt Petunia said.
"We're not stupid, you know," Uncle Vernon said.
“Well, that’s news to me,” Harry said, his calm, and before .
The Dursleys could call him, he was driving around, he passed

' 7 '
front side, went over the blue garden fence, and was riding up
way.
ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵡⵓⴳⵓⵔⴻⵏ ⵜⵓⵔⴰ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵥⵔⴰⵜ. ⵉⵍⴰⵇ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵇⴰⴱⴻⵍ ⵡⵉⵏⵉⵙ
Uncle and aunt later and paid the price for his infidelity, but he didn’t
Just practice a lot at the moment; He had a lot of troubling issues on his mind.
Harry was sure the cracking noise had been made by someone.
Aparating or Disparating. It was Dobby's voice.
house-elf did when he flew into thin air. enable
Is Dobby here on Privet Road? Dobby may be following it right
Right at this moment? As this thought occurred, he wheeled around and
It looked back at Privet Drive, but it seemed completely deserted again and Harry was sure that Dobby didn't know how .
He became invisible. . . .
He went, not knowing which way he was going, for he had
You’ve been working these ways so often lately that his own fingers are going back to his favorite places. Every few steps he looks back on his heel
shoulder. Someone magical was nearby as he sat among his uncle
Petunias was eating beyond, he was angry about it. Why didn’t they call
To her, why didn’t they make a relationship, why are they breaking up now?
And then, when her sense of loss reached a peak, her guilt kicked in
away.
Maybe it wasn’t the sound of magic after all. Maybe it was so
He feels the slightest sign of disconnection from the world to him
belonged that he was just experiencing the noise of the universe altogether.
Could it be that it wasn’t the sound of something breaking inside her neighbor’s house?
Harry felt a strange, sinking feeling in his stomach, before he
He watched it, the worst feeling of trouble he'd had all summer
pushed up against him again. . . .
Tomorrow morning the alarm will be on at five.

' 8 '
hour to pay for the animal delivered by the Daily
Christmas — but is there any point in continuing to stick around? Harry
Just glance at the first page before setting it aside these days;
When the idiots who made the document realized that Voldemort was
Back it would be headlines, and that’s just Harry’s style
He cared about.
If he was lucky, there would also be animals carrying letters from
Best friends, Ron and Hermione, though something was waiting
that their letters would bring him news, long ago lost.
“We can’t say much about you-know-what, obviously. . . .” “We were
They told him they wouldn’t say anything important if our letters got published. . . .”
“We are very busy but I can’t give you details here. . . .” “There is an exhibition
Low number, we will tell you everything when we see you. . . .”
But when will they see him? Nobody seems to be too bothered by the date really. Hermione had scrawled, “I look forward to seeing you soon” inside her birthday card, but how soon is it? as
As far as Harry could tell from the vague notes in their letters, Hermione
and Ron were in the same place, probably at Ron's parents' house.
He couldn't think of the two of them having fun in
Burrow when he was occupied on Privet Drive. In fact, he was very aware of
That he dropped them two birthday presents from the Honeydukes
The chocolates were unopened, although he regretted that after eating
A delicious salad that Aunt Petunia gave us for dinner that night.
And what were Ron and Hermione up to? Why not,
Harry, are you okay? If he hadn’t shown up he could have cared a lot
More of them? Had they forgotten everything he had done? There was no
If he’s the one who goes into the tomb and sees Cedric becoming
He was killed and bound to that grave and was about to be killed . . . ?
Don’t think about that, Harry told himself seriously for the hundredth time
time that summer. It’s bad enough that he’s constantly moving around in his nightmares, without sitting on it in his waking hours .
also.

' 9 '
He turned a corner to Magnolia Bridge; Halfway through
He crossed the narrow path next to a garage where he was
First she catches eyes on her stepfather. Sirius, at least, seemed to understand how Harry was feeling; Surely his letters were empty
the same valid information as Ron and Hermione, but at least they include
Words of warning and comfort instead of negative comments:
“I know this must make you nervous. . . .” “Keep your nose clean
And everything will be okay. . . .” “Be careful, don’t do anything .
rash. . . .”
So, Harry thought, after crossing Magnolia Valley, he became a
Magnolia Street, and walked towards the dilapidated playground, having
(mostly) did as Sirius said; Otherwise, he resisted the temptation to tie his leash to his slingshot and left for the Burrow .
By himself. In fact, Harry thought his behavior was pretty good.
Considering how frustrated and angry he felt about staying in Privet
Make this long, cut back to hiding in flower pots hoping to hear something that might confirm what Lord Voldemort is doing.
However, it was very annoying when a guy told her not to worry
who served twelve years in the wizard prison, Azkaban, escaped,
He tried to commit the crime he was accused of in
First place, then went on a ride with a stolen hippogriff. . . .
Harry pushed past the closed park gate and stepped out onto the
Dry grass. The park was as empty as the surrounding streets.
When he reached the pillows, he knocked on the only one that Dudley
And his friends couldn't break away, they used one hand
chains, and looks anxiously at the ground. He cannot
hidden in the Dursleys' basement again. Tomorrow he had to
Think of some new way of listening to the news. Meanwhile, he
He had nothing to look forward to but another restless, horrible night,
because even after escaping the nightmares about Cedric he had unsettling dreams about long dark passageways, all ending in dangerous passages and
The doors are closed, which he says have something to do with

' 10 '
the possessed feeling he had while awake. Often, old wounds containing
His last one was knocked unconscious, but he didn't delude himself like that
Ron or Hermione or Sirius would find that very amusing. . . . In the past, his prognosis insisted that Voldemort was
They’re growing again, but now that Voldemort is back they’ll
Maybe she’ll remind him that his constant anxiety was just a premonition. . . . Nothing to worry about . . . Old news. . .
All that guilt bubbled up inside him until he wanted to scream .
With anger. If it wasn’t for him, no one would know
Voldemort is back! And the result was that he stayed in Little Whinging for four solid weeks, completely cut off from the magical world,
He reduced him to huddles among dying begonias so he could hear
About waterfowl hummingbirds! How could Dumbledore have forgotten him so easily? Why did Run and Hermione get together regardless of
Have you even tried? How long does he have to endure
Sirius tells him to sit back and be a good boy; Or face the temptation of writing for the silly Everyday Christmas and pointing out that Voldemort is back? This happy thought focuses on Harry
his head, and his insides clenched furiously as a fiery, picture-perfect night
Around him, the air was thick with the smell of warm, dry grass and the same
The sound of a road trip resting above the respite
Forests.
He didn't know how long he stayed on the pillow before
The sound of voices interrupted his musings and he looked up. Street lights from surrounding streets were casting a strong light.
You have to show a group of people making their way around
park. One of them was singing a loud, brutal song. Others were
laughing. The ticking line came from several expensive competitions.
The bike they were looking for.
Harry knew who those people were. The figure in front of him was, without a doubt, his cousin, Dudley Dursley, walking his way home, accompanied by his band of magicians.

' 11 '
Dudley was as big as ever, but a year of strict dieting and the discovery of a new skill had made a dramatic change in his physique. as
Uncle Vernon proudly told anyone who would listen, Dudley had
He recently became the Southeastern Intercollegiate Soccer Coach. The “fun sport,” as Uncle Vernon called it,
He made Dudley even more of a jerk than he seemed to Harry
Back in primary school days when he was Dudley’s first
The Ball of the Monster. Harry wasn't afraid of his nephew.
But he still didn't think Dudley had learned to curse harder and
More accurately it was cause for celebration. All the neighborhood kids
They were terribly afraid of him — more so than they were of him .
The “Potter Boy,” the infamous “Potter Boy,” was a hooligan who was active in the St. John’s Security Center.
children.
Harry watched the hardened faces against the grass and wondered
Who they were dropping tonight. Looking around, he found Harry
His mind thinks as he sees them. series . . . Look around . . . am
They sit here alone. . . . Come and have it early. . . .
If Dudley's friends saw him sitting here, they would surely notice
Make a beeline for him, what's Dudley going to do then? he
He didn’t want to lose face in front of the team, but he’d be afraid
She teased Harry. . . . It would be really interesting to see Dudley
problem; Worrying about him, seeing him, with him not having the ability to react
. . . And if any of the others tried to hit Harry, Harry was ready—he .
He has his wand. . . Let them try. . . He’d love to take some of his frustration out on the kids who once made his life hell —
But they didn’t turn around, they didn’t see him, they were too close to the window. Harry knew the itch to call after them.
. . . The search for war has never been better. . . . It is not necessary to use
Magic. . . . He will be aching to be expelled again. . . .
Dudley's exclamations died down; They don’t see them, they go
Magnolia Street.

' 12 '
There you go, Sirius, Harry said with a grin. Nothing mattered. Keep me
Clean nose. Quite the opposite of what you’re going to do . . .
He got to his feet and strained. Aunt Petunia and Uncle Vernon
It seemed to me that I felt that whenever Dudley showed up it was the right time to
He would be home, and anytime after that was a long time. Uncle Vernon had
He threatened to lock Harry in the cellar if he came home after Dudley
Once more, then, with a smile still grinning, Harry set off towards the park
gate.
Magnolia Road, like Privet Drive, is filled with large, square houses .
With well-maintained lawns, all have large, square parents
who drove very clean cars like Uncle Vernon's. Harry nodded.
Little Whinging at night, when the ball wheels work
of beautiful colors like a rose in the dark and pose no hearing hazard
disapproving looks for his “hostile” attitude when
The householders passed by. He walked faster, until halfway
Magnolia Road Dudley's gang comes back into view; They were saying
their façade at the entrance to Magnolia Crescent. Harry picked up.
In the shade of a large lilac tree and waited.
“. . . As close as a pig, isn’t it?” Malcolm was calling, for the party.
from others.
“Good hunter, Big D,” Piers said.
“Is tomorrow the same time?” Dudley said.
“Round at my place, my parents are out,” Gordon said.
“See you then,” Dudley said.
“Bye Dud!”
“You’ll see, It’s Great!”
Harry waited for the rest of the group to move on before he left.
again. When their voices died down again, he turned his head
corner at Magnolia Crescent and with a brisk walk soon
He came into the corner of Dudley, who was rummaging through his
Easily, it warms up noiselessly.
“Hey, Great!”

' 13 '
Dudley turned around.
“Oh,” he whispered. "are you."
“How long have you been with 'Big D' then?” Harry said.
“Shut it,” Dudley said, turning away again.
“Cool name,” Harry said, smirking and sinking into level next to hers .
cousin. “But you’ll always be the Ickle Diddykins to me.”
“I said, GO!” said Dudley, who clenched his fists like clams
In the hands.
“Don’t the kids know your mom calls you that?”
“Swipe your face.”
“Don’t tell her to cover her face. What about 'popkin' and
'Dinki Diddydums,' can I use them then?”
Dudley said nothing. Efforts to protect himself from collapsing
Harry seemed to demand all of his loyalty.
“So who are you sleeping with tonight?” Harry asked, his smile
It's flying. “Another ten-year-old? I know you did for Mark Evans two nights.
early -"
“He was begging for it,” Dudley growled.
“Oh yeah?”
“It blew me away.”
"Yeah? He said you looked like a pig that was trained to walk on it?
His back legs? 'Cause it's not the ring, Dud, it's the truth . . .”
A muscle was twitching in Dudley's palm. He gave Harry a lot.
the crew would know how dumb Dudley was; It feels like
Although he was reserving his interest in his cousin,
Only the prison he had.
Turn right into the dark alley where Harry is
The first time he saw Sirius was leading the shortcut between Magnolia
The behavior of the flow and the flow. It was empty and paler than
Roads closed because there are no street signs. Their feet
They were sandwiched between the garage walls on one side and a high wall about
another.

' 14 '
“You thought the old man took that thing, didn’t you?” Dudley
He said after a few seconds.
“What the hell?”
“That’s — that’s what you’re hiding.”
Harry smiled again.
“Not as stupid as you think, are you, Dud? But I guess if you were,
You can’t walk and talk at the same time. . . .”
Harry pulled out his wand. He saw Dudley looking sideways at her.
“You don’t have to,” Dudley said suddenly. “I know you are not.
You’re going to get kicked out of that fucking school you went to.”
“How do you know they haven’t changed the rules, Big D?”
“They didn’t,” Dudley said, though he didn’t sound at all .
convince. Harry laughed nervously.
“You don’t have the guts to catch me without that thing, you have
You?" Dudley shouted.
“Whereas you only need four allies behind you before you can beat him .
to one decade. You know that football title you keep insisting on
about? How much does your opponent have? Seven? eight?"
“He was sixteen for your information,” Dudley growled, “and he had .
I came out cold for twenty minutes after I was done with him and he was
Twice as hard as you. Just wait until I tell Dad you got the thing.
out -"
“Run to my father now, will you? Was his ickle football head scared of dirty Harry’s magic?”
“You’re not this brave at night, are you?” said Dudley.
“It’s tonight, Diddikins. That’s what we call him when he goes all
Such funny.”
“I mean when you’re in bed!” Dudley shouted.
He had stopped walking. Harry stopped as well, staring at his cousin.
From what he could see of Dudley's huge face, he was wearing a
A terrible look of victory.
“What do you mean, I’m not brave in bed?” Harry said, completely

' 15 '
It is not added. “What — should I be afraid of needles or .
some?"
“I heard you yesterday,” Dudley whispered. “Speaking in your own .
sleep. He’s moving.”
“What do you mean?” Harry said again, but there was a chill, growling in his stomach. He returned to the tomb last night.
In his dreams.
Dudley gave an ugly bark of laughter then grabbed a high ponytail,
The voice of triumph. “ 'Don't kill Cedric! Don't kill Cedric! who
Cedric — is that your husband?”
“I — you’re lying —” Harry muttered to himself. But his mouth had
He went dry. He knew Dudley wasn't lying—how else would he know .
About Cedric?
" 'ⴱⴰⴱⴰ! ⵄⵉⵡⴻⵏⵉⵢⵉ ⴰ ⴱⴰⴱⴰ! ⴰⴷ ⵉⵢⵉⵉⵏⴻⵖ ⴰ ⴱⴰⴱⴰ! ⴱⵓⵀⵓ!' ”
“Shut up,” Harry growled. “Shut up, Dudley, I’m warning you!”
“ ‘ⴰⵙⴷ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵢⵉⵜⵄⵉⵡⵏⴻⴹ, ⴰ ⴱⴰⴱⴰ! ⴰ ⵢⴻⵎⵎⴰ, ⴰⵙⵙ-ⴷ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵢⵉⵜⵄⵉⵡⵏⴻⴹ! ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵏⵖⴰ
Cedric! Father, help me! You will —' You didn't show the thing to .
we!"
Dudley backed up into the far wall. Harry was staring daggers straight at Dudley's heart. Harry could feel the embarrassment of being fourteen
Dudley squirming in his veins — what would he not give to hit now, .
To jinx Dudley enough to have to go home like an animal,
Struck paralyzed, growing emotions —
“Don’t talk about this again,” Harry snapped. “Do you understand me?”
“Point that thing somewhere else!”
“I said, do you understand me?”
“Point it somewhere else!”
“UNDERSTAND ME?”
“TAKE THAT THING OFF —”
Dudley gave an awkward, shaking breath, like he was
doused in boiling water.

' 16 '
Something happened overnight. An indigo sky filled with stars
It was at once black and devoid of light—the stars, the moon,
The lamp posts on either side of the corridor were off. The distant
The noise from the cars and the noise from the trees went away. Balmy Afternoon
He was suddenly shivering, shivering with cold. They are surrounded by a collective,
The darkness was impenetrable, silent, as if some great hand had
He threw a thick layer of frost, ice, all over the floor of the barn and set them on fire.
For a split second, Harry thought he had performed magic without
It meant that, although he was arguing as fiercely as he
He might — then his reason caught up with her feelings — not have
The power to illuminate the stars. He turned his head this way and that,
He tries to see something, but the darkness holds his eyes like a
a weightless wall.
Dudley's panicked voice cut into Harry's ear.
“What are you doing? Stop it!”
“I didn’t do anything! Shut up, don’t move!”
“I can’t see! I was blindsided! I -"
“I said shut up!”
Harry stood abruptly, rolling his unseeing eyes left and right. the
The cold was so intense that it was tingling all over his body; Bone Strings
He stepped out with his arms outstretched, and the hairs on the back of his neck stood up — he opened his eyes fully, staring blankly .
In the district, he doesn’t see . . .
It was impossible. . . . They can’t be here. . . . Not in small
Retention . . . He pricked his ears. . . . He'd hear them before.
He saw them. . . .
“I’ll tell my dad!” Dudley yelled. “Where are you? What
You doing — ?”
“Will you shut up?” Harry smiled, “I’m trying to lis —”
But he was silent. He just listened to what was
horror.
There’s some in the way of darkness intended for themselves, some-

' 17 '
The thing that was drawing long, steady, steady breaths. Harry felt a surge of dread as he stood shivering in the frigid air.
“Cut it out! Stop doing it! I’m going to beat you, I swear I’m going to beat him!”
“Doddly, stop —”
WHAT!
A fist hit the side of Harry's head, knocking Harry out
His feet. A small white light flashed before Harry's eyes; For the second time in an hour he felt like his head was being smashed in
two; The next moment he hit the ground hard, his stick
It was out of his reach.
“You fool, Dudley!” Harry screamed, his eyes watering in pain, as
He got on his hands and knees and now revels in the
The red one. I heard Dudley cursing, hitting the road
wall, drifts.
“DUDLEY, COME BACK! YOU RUNNING TO
it!"
There was a ceremonial kissing ceremony, and Dudley’s feet
He stopped. At the same time, Harry felt a chill creeping up his back
This can mean only one thing. There’s more than one.
“DUDLEY, HOLD ON YOUR BAG! Whatever YOU
GRAB YOUR BACKET! rod!" Harry groaned in pleasure, his hands splayed across the floor like fists. “Where’s the — bacon .
— Call — Lumos!”
said the figure himself, longing for a light to aid him in
His search — and to his disbelieving surprise, the light inches from his
Right hand — the buttonhole was burning. Harry gripped it, snapped his fingers, and turned around.
Her stomach turned.
A tall, bearded figure was steadily walking towards her.
She crawls on the ground, no legs or face visible under her clothes,
They were silent in the night as he came.
Stumbling back, Harry raised his wand.

' 18 '
“Wait Patronom!”
A beam of silvery light shot out of the spell and the dementor stopped, but the spell malfunctioned; He steps on his
Feet, Harry took a step back as the warrior pushed him away,
Panic clouded his mind—cooled—
Two shiny, slimy, beautiful hands emerged from within the figure
clothes, reached him. A faint noise filled Harry's ears.
“Wait Patronom!”
His voice sounded low and distant. . . . Another silver lining
Smoke, worse than the last, came out of the saddle — it couldn’t do
He couldn’t do the trick —
There was a laughter inside his head, a low, wild laugh. . . . He could smell the breath of the dead goddess filling his nostrils, drowning him — Think . . . Some happiness. . . .
But there was no joy in it. . . . Dementor Ice Fists
They were teasing his voice—high-pitched laughter was getting louder
aloud, and a voice said inside his head — “Prepare for death,
Harry. . . . It may even be painless. . . . I don't want to know. . . . I have
He's not dead. . . .”
He wasn’t going to see Ron and Hermione again —
And their faces flashed clearly in his mind as he struggled for
breath -
“WAIT THE PRESIDENT!”
A large silver eagle flew out of the corner of Harry's nose; is
The animals hold the prisoner in the place where the heart should have
was; Cast back, weightless like darkness, like a fog
Charged, the dementor took off, bat-like and was defeated.
“WAY!” Harry yelled at the woman. Turning around, he
Hurrying down the street, he held the painted stick to the ground. “BABY?
DUCK!”
He had barely skipped twelve subjects when he reached them: Dudley .
He was curled up on the floor, his hands clasped over his face; The second

' 19 '
His teacher was scowling at him, holding his hands in her lap.
Hands, prizing them slowly, affectionately close to each other, he shook his head
His head was up to Dudley's face as if he was about to kiss him. . . .
“LISTEN!” Harry yelled, and in a raspy, raspy voice,
The silver foil he was carrying came rushing towards him. The eyeless dementor's face was barely an inch away from Dudley's when the flash went off .
The flies seized her; The object was thrown into the air and, like his
mate, she’s gone too far and she’s stranded in the dark. The bull
It cantered to the end of the alley and dissolved into silvery glitter.
The moon, stars, and streetlights burst into life. Hot air
He cleared the way. Trees rustled in the gardens around them and the mundane traffic sound of Magnolia Crescent filled the air again. Harry
He stood quickly, all his senses on fire, feeling a quick return to
of the law. After a while he became aware that his t-shirt was covering him; He was covered in sweat.
He couldn't believe what had just happened. Dementors here, in the
Small stop . . .
Dudley curled up on the floor, humming and shaking.
Harry bent down to make sure he was in good enough shape to stand, but
Then he heard her loudly, with running feet after her; Face-to-face development
His baby too, turned on his heel to face the newcomer.
Mrs. Figg, their batty old neighbor, came by with a smile on her face. her
Dark brown hair was escaping from his hairbrush, it was rock
The shopping bag was dangling from her hand, and her fingers were halfway
From his tartan cardigan slippers. Harry made to drop his wand quickly out of sight, but —
“Don’t you, silly boy!” she screamed. “What if there were .
More of them around? Oh, I’m going to kill Mundungus Fletcher!”

CHAPTER TWO
A PECK N OWL S

What?" Harry said with a frown.
“He’s gone!” said Mrs. Figg, wringing her hands. “It remains to be seen .
Something about a bag of cookies falling through the chimney!
I told him I’d flay him alive if he went, and now look! Leaders! is
Good thing I put Mr. Tibbies on the case! But we don’t have time to
Stand forward! Hurry, now, we must get you back! Oh, the problem.
This would be the reason! I will kill him!”
"but -"
The revelation that the cat-obsessed ex-neighbor knew what
dementors were almost as big a shock to Harry as meeting two of
of them on the way. “You — a magician?”
“I am a Squib, as far as Mundungus knows full well, so how on earth was he .
Should I help you fight bullies? He leaves you all
Without reason when I warned him—”
“This Mundungus guy was following me? Hold on — she
It was him! He jumped out of the front of my house!”
“Yes, yes, yes, but well I put Mr. Tibbies just under the bus .
If, and Mr. Tibbies came, he warned me, but by the time I had taken
W

To your house you go—and now—oh, what will Dumbledore say? You!" she shouted at Dudley, who was still lying on the cellar floor.
“Get your fly top off the ground, quick!”
“Do you know Dumbledore?” Harry said, looking at her.
"Of course I know Dumbledore, who doesn't know Dumbledore?"
But come on — I’ll be no help if they come back, I don’t have much
As A teapot is replaced —”
She bent down, took one of Dudley's large hands in her outstretched hands, and leaned against him.
“Get up, you useless bastard, get up!”
But Dudley either couldn't or didn't want to move. Still in
ground, trembling and horse-faced, mouth hanging very tightly shut.
“I’ll do it.” Harry grabbed Dudley's arm and said, "With a
a tremendous effort with which he managed to lift Dudley to his feet. Dudley
He looked as if he were about to faint: His little eyes fixed on the
their clothes and sweat were staining his face; By the time he let Harry go
From which he feels better.
"hurry up!" said Mrs. Figg sympathetically.
Harry pulled one of Dudley's larger arms around his shoulders and pulled him towards the road, rolling slightly under his arms .
weight. Mrs. Figg crouched before them, looking sorrowfully
In the middle of the corner.
“Keep your wand out,” she told Harry, as they entered the Wisteria .
walk. “Never mind the secret deal now, there will be hell .
We’ll pay anyway, we can hang on to a guinea pig like an egg. talk
On controlling underage psychology . . . This was
Exactly what Dumbledore feared — what was that at the end of
way? Oh, and just Mr. Prentice. . . . Don't put your wand back, kid.
Don’t I keep telling you I’m useless?”
Wasn’t it easy to keep a tight stick and take Dudley with you in the
At the same time. Harry gave his cousin an impatient peck on the lips, but
Dudley seemed to have lost all desire for free movement. he

' 22 '
He had fallen on Harry’s shoulder, his broad paws dragging on
soil.
“Why didn’t you tell me you were a Squib?” Harry asked Mrs. Figg.
Strongly motivated to keep going. “All those times I came up short .
Your house—why didn’t you say anything?”
“Dumbledur's scrolls. I should have protected you but I wouldn’t have said anything, you were so young. I’m sorry for giving you such a terrible time.
But the Dursleys wouldn’t let you come if they thought you
Love it. It wasn’t easy, you know. . . . But oh my word,” she said
Sadly, she wrings her hands again, “when Dumbledore heard .
therefore — how could Mundungus have left, it must have been .
At work until midnight — where is he? How can I tell Dumbledore what happened, I can’t Apparate —”
“I’ve got an umbrella, you can borrow it,” Harry said, thinking .
Was his knee going to buckle under Dudley's weight.
“Harry, you don’t understand! Dumbledore would need to act as
As quickly as possible, the Ministry has its own ways of detecting the presence of minors, they would already know, you mark my word —”
“But I was getting away from bandits, I had to use magic—they were
He’d be more interested in what the dementors are doing they’re flying
Wisteria Going, really?”
“My dear, I wish it were so but I’m afraid — MUNDUNGUS .
FLETCHER, I’M GOING TO KILL YOU!”
There was an overwhelming scene and a strong smell of alcohol mixed with
Aged tobacco filled the air like a hairless, beardless man in a tattered, sagging suit right in front of them. He has short, long legs
curly ginger hair, and bloodshot eyes that gave him the sad look of a basset hound; He was also holding a silver chain
Harry recognized him at once as the cloak of invisibility.
“ 'S' forward, Daughter?” He said, looking from Mrs. Figg to Harry and Dudley. “What's up with staying anonymous?”

' 23 '
“I’ll give you the secret!” said Mrs. Figg. “Leaders, you useless,
skiving you thief!”
“Prisoners?” replied Mundungus, sternly. “The followers here?”
“Yeah, here, you worthless pussycat, here!” He shouted
Mrs. Figg. “The Dementors are attacking the boy on your watch!”
“Blimey,” said Mundungus in disgust, looking from Mrs. Figg to .
Harry is back. “Blimey, I’m . . .”
“And you off selling stolen boxes! Didn't I tell you not to go?
Wasn’t it me?”
“I — well, I —” Mundungus looked at him uncomfortably. "it . . .
It was a very good business opportunity, see . . .”
Mrs. Figg lifted a hand from him grabbing her duffel bag and
He struck Mundungus on the face and back with it; judging by
The low noise he made was filled with cat litter.
“Uch — gerf — gerf, you stupid old turkey! Someone should say
Dumbledore!”
“Yes — they — have!” cried Mrs. Figg, still lugging the bag of
cat litter in every part of Mundungus she could reach. “And — and — .
It was — better — to — be — you — and — you — could — tell — him —
Why — weren’t you — there — to — help!”
“Keep your 'airnet!” said Mundungus, his hands on his head,
reading. “I’m going, I’m going!”
And with another thud, he was gone.
“I hope Dumbledore will kill him!” exclaimed Mrs. Figg excitedly. "now
Come on, Harry, what are you waiting for?”
Harry decided not to waste his remaining breath reminiscing
that he could barely fit under Dudley's boot. He gave the half-conscious Dudley a nod and stormed forward.
"I'll take you to the door," said Mrs. Figg, as they transformed into Privet .
drive. “If only there were more of them around. . . . Oh my word!
What the hell . . . And you have to deal with them yourself . . . and

' 24 '
Dumbledore said we will stop you from practicing magic at any cost.
. . . Well, you shouldn’t be crying over chewing gum, I guess . . . but
The cat is among the dogs now. . .”
“So,” Harry said quietly, “it’s Dumbledore . . . He had . . . we
follow?”
“Of course he has,” said Mrs. Figg solemnly. “You wait
have him to keep you wandering yourself after what happened in
june? Good Lord, boy, I’ve been told you’re crazy. . . . right
. . . Get in and stay there,” she said when they reached number four. "I
Wait for someone to contact you soon.”
“What are you going to do?” Harry asked suddenly.
“I’m going straight home,” said Mrs. Figg, looking around the corner .
Way and counting. “I will need to wait for more instructions. just
Stay at home. goodnight."
“Stop, don’t go! I want to know—”
But Mrs. Figg had already driven off, bike chains flying,
The fabric of the shop.
"wait!" Harry shouted after her; He has a million questions to ask.
Everyone who was talking to Dumbledore; But within seconds
Mrs. Figg was consumed by darkness. Smirking, Harry turned his
Dudley over his shoulder and made his slow, painful way back to number 10.
Four garden road.
The hall light was on. Harry tucked his wand inside the waistband of his jeans, rang the bell, and saw Aunt Petunia 's profile.
They were getting louder and louder, more and more terrifying with gas leaking into the
The front door.
“Didi! For a long time, too, I was very — very — obsessed with Diddy,
What’s the problem?”
Harry looked sideways at Dudley and crawled out from under his blanket.
Just an arm in time. Dudley froze for a moment on the spot, his face
a dark blue, then he finally opened his mouth and swallowed all in
The door to the door.

' 25 '
“DIDI! Diddy, what’s wrong with you? Vernon? Vernon!”
Harry's uncle stormed out of the living room, walrus fur flying here and there like it always did when disturbed.
He rushes forward to help Aunt Petunia negotiate a limp
Dudley on the couch while avoiding jumping into the patients' pool.
“Sick, Vernon!”
“What is it, baby? What happened? Did Mrs. Pulkiss give you
Anything foreign to her?”
“Why are you all covered in dirt, sweetheart? You were falling on
floor?"
“Hold on — they didn’t hurt you, did they?”
Aunt Petunia shouted.
“Call the police, Vernon! Call the police! Diddy, dear, speak up.
For Mom! What did they do to you?”
In all the kerfuffle, no one seemed to notice Harry, who
It complemented her well. He managed to get inside just before Uncle Vernon slammed the door and while the Dursleys were making their noise .
Continuing down the hall to the kitchen, Harry looked down and
Quickly to the exit.
“Who did it, son? Give us names. We’ll get them, don’t worry.”
“Ch! He's trying to say something, Vernon! What is it, Diddy? tell
Mom!”
Harry's foot was on the bottom heel when Dudley found his
sound.
"he."
Harry froze, his back on the counter, his face burning, braced for
A brooch.
"Boy! Come here!"
Feeling a mixture of dread and anger, Harry removed his eyebrow
hurried down the stairs and turned to follow the Dursleys.
The clean kitchen unfortunately has a wrong color behind the
It’s dark outside. Aunt Petunia was snuggling with Dudley in a chair; he

' 26 '
Still very green and delicious looking. Uncle Vernon was standing
in front of the draining box, staring at Harry with small, narrowed eyes.
“What did you do to my son?” He said with a menacing grin.
“No,” Harry said, well aware that Uncle Vernon .
Don't believe it.
“What did he do to you, Diddy?” Aunt Petunia said sarcastically
A voice, now booming sickly from the front of Dudley's leather jacket.
“If — if you know-what, darling? He used — his thing?”
Slowly, quietly, Dudley nodded.
"I don't know!" Harry said firmly, as Aunt Petunia took out a hug and
Uncle Vernon shrugged. “I didn’t do anything to him, he wasn’t
Me, there was —”
But at the same moment, a violent thunderstorm entered.
Kitchen window. quickly losing Uncle Vernon’s head, and
He reached the kitchen and threw a large paper envelope at her.
He was taking in his mouth to Harry's breasts, and turned gracefully, his hips
of its wings just brushes the top of the refrigerator, then wipes the outside
Once again u went out on the garden.
“THINGS!” Uncle Vernon said, his well-groomed nose in his forehead throbbing furiously as he flipped the kitchen window. “THINGS
again! I DON'T HAVE ANY OTHER PIECES ON ME
house!"
But Harry was already ripping the envelope and pulling it out.
The note inside, her heart pounding somewhere in her vicinity
Adam's apple.
Hi Mr. Peter,
We are confident that you did the Patronus Spell at twenty-three minutes past nine this evening
In an area inhabited by Muggles and right next to a Muggle.
The length of this project failure is cause-

' 27 '
Able Underage suspension led to your expulsion from Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry.
Representatives of the department will call at your place of residence briefly to drop off your bag.
As you have already received a formal warning to a
Past misconduct under Article 13 of the International Confederation of Astronauts' Privacy Act, we regret to say
You that your presence is required at the disciplinary hearing on
Recreation Department at 9 a.m. Aug. 12.
I hope you are well.
Yours sincerely,
Improper use of the magical office
Ministry of Magic
Harry read the letter twice. He was only vaguely aware of
Uncle Vernon and Aunt Petunia are talking in the neighborhood. Inside it
Mind, everything was icy and still. One truth penetrated his consciousness like a sweeping knife. He was expelled from Hogwarts. It’s all
over. He wasn't coming back.
He glanced at the Dursleys. Uncle Vernon was gray-faced.
Slowly, her muscles were still trembling; Aunt Petunia had her arms around Dudley, who nodded again.
Harry's momentarily dimmed mind seemed to wake up. department
The agents will call your place of residence nearest to drop
Your wand. There was only one thing about it. He had to run —
now. Where to go, Harry didn't know, but he was sure
of one thing: In or out of Hogwarts, he needed his wand. In a
Almost like a dream, he drew his wand and turned to leave
kitchen.

' 28 '
“Where d'you think you're going?” shouted Uncle Vernon. when
Harry didn't answer, pushing against the counter to block the hall door. “I’m not done with you baby!”
“Get out of the way,” Harry growled.
“You’re going to sit here and explain how son —”
“If you don’t get out of the way I’ll jinx you,” Harry said,
By raising taxes.
“You can’t pull that one on me!” said Uncle Vernon. "I know
You have no right to use it outside of that dorm you call school!”
“The witch house blew me away,” Harry said. “So I can do
All I care about. You have three seconds. One — two —”
A roaring CRACK filled the dirt; cried Aunt Petunia,
Uncle Vernon screamed and threw himself, but for the third time that night
Harry was staring at the source of a growl he hadn't made. he
I saw it all of a sudden: There was a little barn sitting there, looking cute, smiling
outside on the kitchen counter, when it just matched the attached
window.
Never mind Uncle Vernon’s shouts of “OWLS!” Harry passes.
room in one go and broke the window open again. The platform
He put out his thumb, to which he stuck a small paper note, bent his thumb
Rich, and reveals the moment Harry took the letter.
Hands shaking, Harry unfolded the second message, written very quickly and neatly in black ink.
Harry —
Dumbledore has just arrived at the Ministry, and is trying to
Hide it all. Don't let your aunt and
MOTHER'S HOUSE. DO NOT MAKE A SUGGESTION.
DO NOT MOVE YOUR CASE.

' 29 '
Dumbledore was trying to figure it all out. . . . What does this mean?
How much power did Dumbledore have to influence the Ministry of
Magic? Was there a chance they'd let him back into Hogwarts, then? A small beat of hope flashed in Harry's chest, almost
He was immediately taken aback — how he should refuse
He paid his taxes without magic? I have to fight with
representatives of the Ministry, and in doing so, he would be lucky to escape
Azkaban, except for the south.
His head was racing. . . . He can either run away from it and avoid being caught by the Ministry, or he can stay put and wait for them to find him here.
He was much more tempted by the old method, but he knew that
Mr. Weasley had her best interests at heart . . . And, after all, Dumbledore had planned an awful lot of this before. . . .
“Of course,” Harry said, “I changed my mind and stayed.”
He positioned himself at the kitchen table and faced Dudley and
Aunt Petunia. The Dursleys were obviously taken aback by his sudden
A change of mind. Aunt Petunia looked worriedly at Uncle Vernon.
The vein in Uncle Vernon’s gray mask was pulsating faster than
ever.
“Who are all these black bears from?” he said.
“The first one was from the Memory Ministry, firing me,” he said .
Harry calmly; He was training his ears to keep outside noises out if
Ministry representatives approached, and it was easier and
Quiet enough to answer Uncle Vernon’s questions rather than starting to squirm and squirm. “The second one was from my friend Ron’s dad, he
Work in the ministry.”
“The Ministry of Magic?” said Uncle Vernon. “People like you in
government? Oh that explains everything, everything, not surprising
The country is going to the dogs. . . .”
When Harry didn't answer, Uncle Vernon winked at him, then
Shout, “And why were you fired?”

' 30 '
“Because I did magic.”
"go ahead!" exclaimed Uncle Vernon, rubbing the top of the
the refrigerator, which was busted open; Several of Dudley's poorly drained items fell and splattered on the floor. “So you’ve accepted it! What did you do to
Dudley?”
“No,” Harry said, a little hurriedly. “That wasn’t me —”
“He does,” Dudley murmured incredulously, and Uncle Vernon and .
Aunt Petunia instantly made up fancy letters for Harry to make him smile.
while they were both teasing Dudley.
“Go on, son,” Uncle Vernon said, “what did he do?”
“Tell me, my dear,” whispered Aunt Petunia.
“He showed me his trunk,” Dudley smirked.
“Yeah, I did, but I didn’t use —” Harry started angrily, but . . .
"shut up!" shouted Uncle Vernon and Aunt Petunia in unison.
“Go on, kid,” Uncle Vernon replied, his smile dripping .
With anger.
“All dark,” Dudley whispered, shuddering. “Everything is dark.
And then I heard . . . things. Inside my head . . .”
Uncle Vernon and Aunt Petunia exchanged looks of utter horror.
If their least favorite thing in the world is magic, they follow them closely
by neighborhoods that cost more than they did for gun control,
People who listened to voices were definitely in the bottom ten. They obviously thought Dudley was losing his mind.
“What kind of things do you hear, popkin?” said Aunt Petunia, very white-faced and with tears in her eyes.
But Dudley seemed unable to tell. He jumped again and
He shook his big red head, and though there was a hint of fear in him
It’s been on Harry since the first rabbit arrived, he felt somewhat
curiosity. Dementors enable a person to regain the worst moments of
Their lives. . . . What would Dudley, exposed, humiliated
Forced to listen?
“How did you fall, baby?” Uncle Vernon said in no uncertain terms.

' 31 '
Rally A quiet voice, the kind of voice that would stick to someone’s bedside
A very sick person.
“Trib,” Dudley sneered. “And then —”
He pointed to her ample breasts. Harry understood: Dudley was remembering the bitter cold that filled your lips as hope and joy were sucked out of you.
“That’s terrible,” Dudley said quietly. "Cool. It's really cold.”
“Okay,” Uncle Vernon said in a tone of forced concern, while Uncle .
Petunia placed her hand gently on Dudley's cheek to feel his warmth. “What happened then, Dudders?”
"It feels . . . feels . . . feels . . . like. . . like . . .”
“Looks like you’re unhappy again,” Harry complained tonelessly.
“Yeah,” Dudley whispered, still trembling.
“Okay,” Uncle Vernon said, his voice full and dignified .
volume as straight as possible. “So you put some crackpot magic on .
son to hear voices and believe he existed — condemned to suffering,
Or something, do you?”
“How many times do I have to tell you?” Harry said, angrily and
sound growing together. “It wasn't me! They’re two bastards!”
“The disease of— what’s this cod-wallop bacon?”
“De — men — tors,” Harry said softly and quietly. “Two of the
them."
“What the hell are dementors saying?”
"They're guarding the wizarding prison, Azkaban," Aunt Petunia said.
Two seconds of awkward silence followed these words and then my uncle
Petunia clamped her hand over her mouth as if to let a
Disgusting strong words. Uncle Vernon was looking at her. Harry’s
reached the mind. Mrs. Figg was one thing—but Aunt Petunia?
“How do you know that?” he asked her, surprised.
Aunt Petunia muttered awkwardly to herself. She looked at the
Uncle Vernon in a fearful apology, then lowered his hand slightly to show his horse teeth.

' 32 '
“I’ve heard — that naughty boy — tell him about them — years ago,”
She said sarcastically.
“If you mean mom and dad, why not use their names?”
Harry said loudly, but Aunt Petunia ignored him. She seemed shocked.
Harry was surprised. Although a fan released years ago, in
The course in which Aunt Petunia shouted that Harry's mother had
He was curious, he hadn't heard her mention his sister. He was surprised she remembered this bit of information about
The magical world a long time ago, when she typically put all her energies into
They pretend it doesn’t exist.
Uncle Vernon opened his mouth, closed it again, opened it once
More, tie him up, and then, he seems to struggle to remember how to talk,
He opened it for the third time and declared, “So — so — they — er — .
Are they — er — are they right, are they — er — an addiction-what-tsits?”
Aunt Petunia frowned.
Uncle Vernon looked from Aunt Petunia to Dudley to Harry as if
Hoping someone would shout “April Fool!” When no one did,
He opened his mouth again, but was spared from struggling to find
More words with the arrival of the third monster of the evening, i
See in the still-open window like a feather butterfly and
landed with a thud on the kitchen table, bringing the three
The Dursleys would shiver in fear. Harry printed a second official-looking envelope from the vase's neck and ripped it open when the
She went back out at night.
“Enough — effing — monsters . . .” murmured Uncle Vernon, bending the knob and throwing it down again.
Hi Mr. Peter,
Further to our letter of about twenty-two minutes.
Already the Ministry of Magic has used its decision to destroy
your potatoes quickly. You can keep your wand until

' 33 '
disciplinary hearing on Aug. 12, during which an official
A decision will be taken.
According to a conversation with the Headmaster of Hogwarts
Preschool and preschool, department approved
That your withdrawal request will also be rejected at this
time. You should therefore consider yourself barred from
The school are waiting for further investigations to take place.
Best wishes,
Yours sincerely,
Improper use of the magical office
Ministry of Magic
Harry read this letter three times in a row. the
The painful defense in his chest lightened slightly as he remembered that he
He is not literally thrown out, though his fear is in no way discredited. Everything seems to be connected to this twelve-day conversation of
august.
"Well?" Uncle Vernon said, pointing at Harry's shoulder.
“What now? Were you charged with something? Do you have your share
The death penalty?” He added as a beacon of hope.
“I have to go to the hearing,” Harry said.
“And you’re going to be prosecuted there?”
“I think so.”
"I'm not giving up hope, then," Uncle Vernon said innocently.
"Well, if that's all," Harry said, getting to his feet. He was confused.
To be alone, to think, maybe to send a letter to Ron, Hermione, or .
Sirius.
“NO, IT’S RUDDY WELL NOT AT ALL!” said Uncle Vernon.
“STAY OUT!”

' 34 '
“What now?” Harry said calmly.
“BOY!” said Uncle Vernon. “I want to know what exactly
It happened to my son!”
"fine!" Harry yelled, and in his anger, red and gold fireflies were released.
From the end of his ordeal, she was still clutching his hand. The three Dursleys froze, looking confused.
“Dudley and I were on the street between Magnolia Bridge .
and the Wisteria Walk,” Harry said, speaking slowly, struggling to control his breathing .
temper. “Dudley thought he was being polite with me, I offered .
Wand but he doesn't use it. Then two prisoners burst out—”
“But what are demons?” Uncle Vernon asked excitedly.
“What are they doing?”
“I told you — they suck all the joy out of you,” Harry said,
“And if they get a chance, they’ll kiss you—”
“Shall I kiss you?” Uncle Vernon said, his eyes widening slightly. “Shall I kiss you?”
“That’s what they call it when they suck the soul out of your mouth.”
Aunt Petunia let out a giggle.
“His spirit? They didn’t bring—he still has his—”
She grabbed Dudley by the shoulders and shook him, as if trying to see if she could hear his soul stirring within her.
"Of course they didn't get his soul, you'd know if they did," he said .
Harry, angry.
“You killed them, did you, kid?” Uncle Vernon said aloud, s
The behavior of a man struggling to turn the conversation to a
The plane understood. “You gave them the old one-two, did you?”
“You can’t give an old bear a one-two,” Harry said with .
Closed teeth.
“Why is it good, then?” said Uncle Vernon. “Why wasn't he
All empty, then?”
“Because I’m using the Patronus —”
WUS. With the flapping, flapping of the wings, and the fall of the
Fog, a fourth monster came emerging from the kitchen fire.

' 35 '
“For GOD’s sake!” yelled Uncle Vernon, pulling the large cigarettes
of hair from his head, which was never plucked in a
A lot of time. “I HAVE NO SHOTS HERE, NO MORE
DO THIS, I’LL TELL YOU!”
But Harry had already pulled a paper scroll from the hero's
foot. He was very convinced that this letter must be from Dumbledore,
She explained everything—the wizards, Mrs. Figg, what the Ministry was up to, how he, Dumbledore, intended to coordinate everything .
out — that for the first time in his life he smiled when he saw Sirius' handwriting. We won’t ignore Uncle Vernon’s talk about monsters
And blinking his eyes at a second cloud of dust as the last of the lightning flickered overhead, Harry read Sirius' message.
Arthur just told us what happened.
Never leave the house again, no matter what.
Harry found that an inappropriate response to everything
It happened tonight that he had turned in that piece of paper,
I looked for the rest of the letter, but there was nothing there.
And now his excitement was growing. There’s no telling
“Well done” for fighting two intruders single handed? Either sir.
Weasley and Sirius were pretending it wasn't working right and they
They were keeping their voices down until they could determine how much
There was damage.
“— one peck, I mean, a ball of rats shooting in and out of my house .
And I ain’t got it, kid, I ain’t —”
“I can’t stop the monsters from coming,” Harry whispered, dropping Sirius’s letter in his hand.
“I want the truth about what happened tonight!” Uncle said
Vernon. “If it was the vigilantes who hurt Dudley, how did you get
Dumped? You do-you-know-what, you accept it!”
Harry took a deep, slow breath. His mind started

' 36 '
Pain again. He wants more than anything to get out of the kitchen,
Away from the Dursleys.
"I did the Patronus Charm to get rid of the bastards," he said,
He forced himself to stay calm. “It’s the only thing that works against
them."
“But what were the dementors doing in Little Whinging?” Uncle said
Vernon was in a somber tone.
“I can’t tell you,” Harry said sadly. “No idea.”
His head was throbbing in the glow of the clock light now. his
The anger was overwhelming. He felt tired and exhausted. The Dursleys were
They all looked at him.
“You are,” Uncle Vernon said firmly. “There is something to do
With you, boy, I know it. Why else would they appear here? Why else
Will they be on that path? You have to just be you — and
No —” He apparently couldn’t bring himself to say the word “wizard.”
“It’s just you-know-what for miles.”
“I don’t know why they’re here. . . .”
But at these words of Uncle Vernon, Harry's mind exhausted
Earth returns to action. Why the Villains Come to Little
Do you like? How could it be an event that they reached the
The way where Harry was? Were they sent? Had the Department of
Magic lost control over the dementors, if only they had left Azkaban and
Did they join Voldemort, as Dumbledore said they would?
“Do these assholes care about locking up some rascals?” Uncle Vernon said, looking at the confusion of Harry's emotions.
“Yeah,” Harry said.
If only his head would stop hurting, if only he could just let
food and reached his dark bedroom and meditated. . . .
“Oh no! They’re coming to arrest you!” Uncle Vernon said, s
the air of male triumph that had come to an inevitable end.
“That's it, isn't it, kid? You’re breaking the law!”

' 37 '
“Of course I’m not,” Harry said, shaking his head as if to .
They had disturbed a hero, his mind was spinning now.
“Then why — ?”
“Maybe he brought them up,” Harry said quietly, more to himself .
Thanks to Uncle Vernon.
“What’s that? Who authenticates them?”
"Lord Voldemort," Harry said.
He smugly declared how strange it was that the Dursleys, the
They cringe, panic, and freak out if they hear words like “witch,”
“Magic,” or “Wand,” might hear the name of the worst Sorcerer .
time without the slightest effect.
“Lord — stop,” said Uncle Vernon, his face softening, the look .
of understanding twilight in his elephant eyes. “I heard that name
. . . That’s who . . .”
“They killed my parents, yes,” Harry said.
"But he's gone," Uncle Vernon said sternly, without the slightest hint that the death of Harry's parents might be a hot topic for .
each. “The old man said so. He’s gone.”
“He’s back,” Harry insisted.
It feels so strange to be standing here in Aunt Petunia’s house with a smile on her face .
Clean kitchen, next to a first class refrigerator and a large display
Television, and rants about Lord Voldemort to Uncle Vernon.
The arrival of the Little Whinging warriors seemed to have .
He led to a hole in the Great Invisible Wall, which separated the unstoppable
The non-magical world of Privet Drive and the world beyond. Two Harrys
Life was suddenly off and everything turned upside down: The Dursleys were demanding details about the magic spell .
The world and Mrs. Figg knew Albus Dumbledore; The witch lovers were flying around the youngest Whinging and he would probably never return to Hogwarts.
Harry's head throbbed more painfully.
"back?" said Aunt Petunia.

' 38 '
She was looking at Harry like she had never seen him before.
And suddenly, for the first time in his life, Harry was completely convinced that Aunt Petunia was his mother's sister. He cannot have
He says why this hit him so powerfully in this moment. All he knew
He wasn’t the only person in the room who had a vision
of what Lord Voldemort might say if he returned. Aunt Petunia had
She had never seen him like this before in her life. Her big, blue eyes (so
Unlike her sister’s) they are not wavering in displeasure or anger: they are
It’s big and scary. The possibility that Aunt Petunia had completely taken over Harry’s life — that there was no magic and no other world .
Beyond the world she lives in with Uncle Vernon — it turns out she has .
He fell.
“Yes,” Harry said, speaking directly to and to Aunt Petunia now. “He came .
He returned a month ago. I saw him.”
His hands found Dudley's leather clad broad shoulders and
He caught them.
“Hold on,” Uncle Vernon said, looking from his wife to Harry and .
afterwards, they seemed convinced and convinced by the shallow understanding that had emerged between them. "stop.
This Mr. Voldything is back, you say.”
"Yes."
“The one who killed your parents.”
"Yes."
“And now he’s sending dismembers after you?”
“Looks like it,” Harry said.
“I see,” said Uncle Vernon, looking from his white-faced wife to .
Harry is patting his pants again. He seemed to be fuming, his
A large owl face flashed before Harry's eyes. “Well, that fixes it,”
He said, the front of his pants twitching as he dried himself, “you can leave .
of this house, my son!”
"what?" Harry said.
“You heard me — OUTSIDE!” Uncle Vernon screamed, and so did Uncle

' 39 '
Petunia and Dudley jumped. "Out! Out! I should have done it for years
early! Animals treat the place like a shelter, guns explode, half
The break room disappeared, Dudley's voice, Marge stared at the
The roof, and that flying Ford anglia — OUTSIDE! out! You have it!
You are history! You wouldn’t stay here if there were some assholes behind you, you
Don't be afraid of my wife and child, don't cause trouble.
On us, if you’re going the way your useless parents are going, I’ve got it!
out!"
Harry stood rooted to the spot. Ministry correspondence,
Mr. Weasley, and Sirius were slashed on his left arm. Don't let
Home again, whatever you do. Don't let your aunt and
MOTHER'S HOUSE.
“You heard me!” Uncle Vernon said, leaning forward now, as
His big red face was so close to Harry's, that Harry actually
I felt splinters hit his face. “Go! You all wanted to go.
Half an hour ago! I’m right behind you! Get out and never regret it
The door again! Why we didn’t take care of you in the first place I don’t know.
Marge was right, it was supposed to be an orphanage, and so were we
It's soft for our benefit, I thought we could squeeze it out of you,
I thought we could make you normal, but you fell out of
First, and I’ve had enough — OWLS!”
The fifth wave rocked the flamethrower so fast that it actually collapsed
ground before summing up into the air again with a lightning bolt. Harry
He raised his hand to grab the letter, which was in a black envelope, but
It flew right over his head, flying straight at Aunt Petunia, who
They let out a sob and huddled together, her hands on his face. The line dropped
A black hood over her head, she turned around and went straight up
again.
Harry ran forward to get the letter, but Aunt Petunia disappeared
had.
“You can open it if you want,” Harry said, “but I’m going to hear what he says .
anyway. That’s Howler’s.”
“Burn it, Petunia!” said Uncle Vernon. “Don't touch it, it's
It could be dangerous!”
"It was addressed to me," Aunt Petunia said in a shaky voice. "is
repeats, Vernon, look! Mrs. Petunia Dursley, Girl,
Number Four, Privet Street —”
She held her breath, scared. The black envelope begins
smoke.
“Open it!” Harry urged her. “Fix it with! It will happen
anyway -"
"No -"
Aunt Petunia's hand was trembling. Looking nervously around.
Kuchine seems to be looking for an escape route, but it’s too late — the plate has caught fire. Aunt Petunia yelled and dropped her.
A panicked voice filled the dirt, echoing in the cramped space, rising from the burned letter on the table.
“REMEMBER MY LAST, PETUNIA.”
Aunt Petunia looked as if she might melt. She drowned in
A chair beside Dudley, his face in his hands. The line drawings crumble into ashes in silence.
"what is this?" Uncle Vernon said with a grin. “What — don’t — .
Pitunya?”
Aunt Petunia said nothing. Dudley was looking defensively at his.
Mom, her mouth open. The silence grew awkward. Harry
He was watching his uncle, he was so surprised, his head was bobbing properly
bust.
“Bitunia, darling?” Uncle Vernon said with a chuckle. “Pythonia?”
She raised her head. She’s still growing. She ate.
"The bastard—the bastard stay, Vernon," she said sadly.
"what is?"
“He stayed,” she said. She wasn't looking at Harry. She reached him.
Legs too.
"He . . . but Petunia . . .”
“If we took it out, the neighborhood would talk,” she said. She was slowly coming back slowly, slowly, though she was still
It's very soft. “They’ll ask awkward questions, they’ll want to know where
gone. We have to keep it.”
Uncle Vernon was as bright as an old car.
“But Petunia, dear —”
Aunt Petunia ignored him. She turned to Harry.
“You stay in your room,” she said. “You shouldn’t let
house. Now get to bed.”
Harry didn't move.
“Who’s that Howler from?”
“Don’t ask,” Aunt Petunia said simply.
“Are you in touch with witches?”
“I told you to go to bed!”
“What does it mean? Remember last what?”
"go to bed!"
"how is - ?"
“YOU LISTENED TO YOUR Aunt, NOW GET TO BED!”

Chapter Three
ADVANCED GUAR D

I’ve just been attacked by dementors and they can free me from
Hogwarts. I want to know what’s going on and when I can reach
Get out of here.
Harry drew these words on three different pieces of paper.
the moment he reached for the desk in his upstairs bedroom. called
the first for Sirius, the second for Ron, and the third for Hermione. his
The secretary, Hedwig, was out of hunting; His cage stood empty on the desk.
Harry paced the bedroom waiting for her to return, his head
He shivered, his mind clouded with sleep even though his eyes were closed and
He whimpered in pain. His back hurt from carrying Dudley home.
and the two splinters in his head where he hit the window and Dudley .
They were red with pain.
Up and down he goes, consumed with anger and frustration,
He grits his teeth and clenches his fists, staring angrily at
The sky was blue, filled with stars every time he passed the bridge. Fishermen are dispatched to fetch him, Miss Figg and Mundungus Fletcher in charge
With secrecy, then suspension from Hogwarts and a conversation at the Ministry of Magic — and still no one telling him what was going on.
I

' 43 '
And what, what, was that Howler? Who has his own voice
sounded scared, threatening, dismissive?
Why is he still trapped here without information? Why is there
Everyone treats him like some asshole? Don’t overwork it.
Magic, stay home. . . .
He grabbed his school bag as he drove past her, but he was far from satisfied with it
Anger felt overwhelming, as he now had severe pain in his shoulder to deal with
In addition to the pain in the rest of her body.
As soon as he crossed the threshold, Hedwig jumped out of it with
the line of wings is like a little paradise.
“About time!” Harry yelled, as she flew down
cage. “You can put that away, I have a job for you!”
Hedwig’s big blue eyes looked at him with contempt for
The dead knots tied around his neck.
“Come here,” Harry said, picking up three small ribbons of ribbon and a leather strap, and fastening the ribbons to his tanned leg. "get
These go straight to Sirius, Run, and Hermione and never come back here
Without nice long answers. Keep flipping them until they w
Good length windows if you have them. understand?"
Hedwig gave a muffled noise, her head still full of hair.
“Go, then,” Harry said.
She took off immediately. When she left, he dropped Harry
Himself collapsed on his bed without taking off his clothes and stared into the darkness.
top. In addition to every other horrible feeling, he now felt guilty
that he was worried about Hedwig; She was the only friend he had in
Number four, Privet Drive. But he answers her when she comes
He came back with answers from Sirius, Ron and Hermione.
They are bound to write quickly; They cannot dodge the dementor attack. Maybe he’ll wake up tomorrow with three skeletons.
Letters filled with anxiety and plans for his immediate removal to
The platform. And with that comforting idea, sleep fell upon him, he stopped
All in a different way.

' 44 '
' ' '
But Hedwig did not return the next morning. Harry spent the day in his
bedroom, leaving her alone to go to the bathroom. Three times that day
Aunt Petunia shoves food into her room with a cat litter Uncle
Vernon had been established for three years. Every time Harry hears her
He was about to ask her about the Howler, but he could
They also asked the doorman about all the answers he received.
At least the Dursleys kept well out of his bedroom. Harry couldn’t
see the benefits of forcing his company on them; There will be another level
He gained nothing except maybe yelling at him until he made
More illegal magic.
This went on for three whole days. Harry was full of
The restlessness that makes it impossible to settle on anything, during
Back in his bedroom again, angry at several of them
Because you let him stew in this mess, and with such perfect pain
That he could lie in his bed for an hour at a time, staring contemplatively at
ground, shuddering with fear at the thought of hearing from the ministry.
What if they controlled it? What if he gets dumped and his
Wand broken in half? What will he do, where will he go?
He couldn't go back to living full-time with the Dursleys, not now .
that he knew of another world, the one in which he actually belonged.
. . . He might be able to get into Sirius's house,
As Sirius said a year ago, before he was forced to flee
From the Ministry itself? He would be allowed to live there alone,
Because he’s still underage? Or would there be an issue where there
He went on to be criticized for it; It has its own international risk
Secret status was hard enough to put him in a cell in Azkaban? Whenever this thought popped up, Harry snapped back
bed and started moving again.
On the fourth night after Hedwig left, Harry was sleeping in the
One of his restless phases, staring at the ceiling, his tired mind

' 45 '
Slowly, when his uncle entered his room. Harry looked
Quickly to him. Uncle Vernon was wearing his best clothes and
talk of the great storm.
“We’re leaving,” he said.
"Sorry?"
“We — that means your uncle, Dudley, and I — are leaving.”
“Fine,” Harry shrugged and looked up at the ceiling.
“You don’t have to leave your bedroom while we’re gone.”
"okay."
“You’re not supposed to touch the TV, the stereo, or any of our appliances .
property."
"right."
“You shouldn’t steal food from the fridge.”
"okay."
“I’ll kick your door in.”
“You do that.”
Uncle Vernon glared at Harry, obviously suspicious of this lack of judgment, and then stormed out of the room, closing the door behind him .
he. Harry heard a loud crash and Uncle Vernon's footsteps going heavy in the clearing. A few minutes later, he hears
Slamming car doors, engine noise, and the inevitable
The sound of a tire flying off the car.
Harry didn't have a distinct feeling about the Dursleys' attitude. did
It makes no difference whether they are home or not. can
He didn’t even summon the strength to get up and turn on his bedroom light.
The room slowly vibrated around him as he sat listening to
Night calls through the ever-open window, waiting
For that terrible moment when Hedwig came back.
The empty house rushed past him. The forests gurgled. Harry
He sits there in a kind of trance, thinking of nothing, absorbed in
misery.
And then, suddenly, he heard a rustle in the bathroom downstairs.

' 46 '
He sat bolt upright and listened. The Dursleys couldn't be
later, he arrived much faster, and anyway he didn’t hear their footsteps.
There was silence for a few seconds, then he heard voices.
The robbers, he thought, were shooting from the bed at his feet — but it was a butterfly .
A second later it occurred to him that the shepherds would keep their
downstairs, and whoever was looking around the kitchen was right
It doesn’t hurt to do that.
He took his wand off his bedside table and stood facing
door of her room, she listened with all her might. Next time he
He chuckled as he gave a loud knock and his door opened.
Harry stood motionless, staring through the open doorway into the darkness.
Upstairs, he strains his ears for more sounds, but none came.
He hesitated for a moment, then slowly and silently walked away from
His room at the head of the stairs.
His heart pounded in his chest. There are standing people.
In the shadow cell below, reflected against a flickering streetlight
through the glass door; Eight or nine of them, in all, as far as possible
See, he's looking at him.
“Drop your wand, baby, before you gouge someone’s eyes out,” one said .
A small, grumbling voice.
Harry's heart was beating uncontrollably. He knew that voice.
But he didn’t lower his taxes.
“Master Moody?” He said he didn't know.
“I don’t know much about 'Professor,’ ” said the voice, “I don’t know .
It amounts to a lot of teaching, doesn’t it? Come down here, we want to see you
properly."
Harry lowered his wand slightly but didn't rest his hand, even.
Is moving. He had very good reason to suspect. He recently spent nine months in what he thought was MadEye .
The Moody Company only to discover that it’s not Moody at all, but a
Thief; A robber, moreover, who tried to kill Harry before

' 47 '
He was dismissed. But before he made a decision on what to do
do next, a second, slightly slower voice comes out on top.
“It’s okay, Harry. We have come to take you away.”
Harry's heart jumped. He also recognized the voice, though he didn't
They’ve been listening for over a year.
“Master Lupine?” He said in disbelief. “Are you?”
“Why are we all standing in the dark?” said the third voice, this
It is not at all known, of the woman. “Lums.”
A light bulb lit up, illuminating the room with a magical light. Harry
far away. The people below were crowded on the foot of the stairs.
They watched him closely, some cocking their heads to get a better look.
Remus Lupine stood nearby. Although still very young,
Lupine looked tired and a little sick; He had more gray hair than when
Harry says goodbye to her, and her clothes are even more decorated
And it’s more dangerous than ever. Still, he was mostly focused on Harry.
who tried to answer in his own way.
“Oooh, it looks exactly how I thought it would,” the model told I .
She was holding his engorged cock to the ground. She looked small there; She has
Smooth heart-shaped face, dark sparkling eyes, and short wavy hair
He was a violent shadow of gray. “Speak, Harry!”
“Yeah, I know what you mean, Remus,” said a dwarf black wizard
standing farthest back; He has a deep, young voice and wears a
gold hoops in his ear. “He looks exactly like James.”
“Only the eyes,” said a low-pitched, silver-haired wizard in
back. “Lily’s eyes.”
Madee Moody, who has long blonde hair and a big boob
Part of his nose missing, he was looking suspiciously at Harry
With his eyes they didn't match. One of her eyes was small, blue, and
Beady, the other large, round, and electric blue — that magic eye that
He could see through the walls, the doors, and the back of Moody's own head.
“You’re pretty sure it’s him, Lupine?” he said. "It'll be great

' 48 '
See if we pick up any Death Eater looking at him. we
They had to ask him something the only real Kid would know. unless
Did anyone get any Veritaserum?”
“Harry, what form does your Patronus take?” Lupine said.
“It’s a beast,” Harry said in shock.
"That's him, MadEye," Lupine said.
Harry walked down the stairs, realizing everyone was still staring.
to him, stuffing his wallet into the back pocket of his jeans as he came.
“Don’t leave your wallet there, kid!” shouted Modi. “What if it burns? Better wizards than you have tails, you know!”
“Who do you know who’s gone missing?” The woman with the gray hair
Mad-Eye asked excitedly.
“You don’t have to, you just grabbed your shield off your shoulder .
Pocket!” exclaimed MadEye. “Primary gun safety, nobody’s concerned
About that a lot. . . .” He hurried out to the bathroom. “And I know
That,” he added excitedly, as the woman fixed her eyes on the ceiling.
Lupine reached out and brushed Harry's hand.
"how are you?" he asked, watching Harry closely.
“Flux . . .”
Harry couldn't believe this was real. Four weeks without anything,
Not the least of a plan to remove it from Privet Drive, and
Suddenly, a group of wizards was actually standing in the
The house seems to have been built for a long time. he
She looked at the people around Lupine; They still looked proud.
had. He felt very ashamed for not moving his hand.
Hair for 4 days.
“I — you’re really lucky that the Dursleys are gone . . .” he said.
“Damn, ha!” said the pink-haired woman. “It was I who raised
Get them out of the way. I sent a letter through the Muggle post telling them to
Voted for England’s best kept suburban garden
competition. They’re going to the awards show right now. . . .
Or they think they are.”

' 49 '
Harry had a glimpse of Uncle Vernon’s face when he realized
There is no competition for rural gardens in England at all.
“We’re leaving, aren’t we?” he asked. "soon?"
"Almost simultaneously," Lupine said, "we just waited for the most obvious."
“Where are we going? The ring?” Harry asked hopefully.
"Not the Burrow, no," Lupine said, pointing Harry towards the
kitchen; The small circle of wizards followed, all of whom were still looking at Harry curiously. “Very risky. We set up camp somewhere unknown.
It took some time. . . .”
Madey Moody was currently sitting at the kitchen table looking
From a chin plate, her magical eye scans in all directions, taking in
Many of the Dursleys' tactics had worn off.
"This is Alastor Moody, Harry," Lupine continued, pointing in the direction of
moody.
“Yes, I know,” said Harry calmly; It felt weird being introduced to someone he thought he knew for a year.
“And this is Nymphadora—”
"Don't call me Nymphadora, Remus," the young woman said with a .
Rough. “It’s Tonks.”
“— Nymphadora Tonks, who preferred to be known by her maiden name .
No,” Lupine finished.
“So would you if your motherfucker had called you 'Nymphadora' ” Tonks grinned.
“And this is Kingsley Shacklebolt” — pointing to the tall redhead .
The Magician, Who Conjured up — “Elphias Doge” — The Sorcerer with the Radiant Voice .
He reaches up with his head—“Dedalus Diggle—”
“We’ve met before,” an excited Diggle said, shrugging .
the top of the head.
“— Emmeline Vance”—a regal-looking witch with an emerald shawl lowered her head—“Sturgis Podmore”—a woman with a charm
A magician with curly, auburn hair — “that’s Hestia Jones.” a
With a sleek, red-topped smile, she peeked out from the sidelines.

' 50 '
Harry tilted his head nervously at each of them as they were revealed. He hoped they would look at something beyond him; it
It was like he was suddenly thrust onto the stage. He also wondered why there were so many of them there.
“An amazing number of people have offered to come get you,”
Lupine said, seeming to read Harry's mind; Its corners
His mouth twitches slightly.
“Yeah, well, the better you get,” Moody chuckled. “We are your
Watcher, Potter.”
“We were just waiting for a sign to tell us it was safe to go,” he said .
Lupine, staring out the kitchen window. “We have about five
minutes."
“Pretty clean, aren’t they, these Muggles?” The witch said.
Tonks, who was looking around the table in great amusement. "my
My father is Muggleborn and a damn old slob. I think it varies, no
Like with witches?”
“Er — yes,” said Harry. “Look” — back to Lupine — .
“What’s going on, I haven’t heard anything from anyone, what’s Vol — ?”
Several of the younger and smaller ones made odd whistling noises;
Dedalus Diggle put down his hat again, and Moody growled, “Shut up!”
"what?" Harry said.
"We're not talking about anything here, it's too complicated," Moody,
He glared back at Harry; His magic eye remained focused.
Up in the roof. “Damn it,” he repeated angrily, turning his hand towards .
The magic eye, “ever wandering — ever since the monster wore it —”
and with a squeaky sound very similar to the Spider-Man
He pulled from a breath and wiped his eyes.
“Madeye, you know this is disgusting, right?” Tunks said
with conversation.
“Get me a glass of water, will you, Harry?” Moody asked.
Harry walked over to the dishwasher and took out a clean glass and filled it

' 51 '
With water to the pool, the group of witches still watched in interest.
Their relentless gazes were beginning to tire him.
“Hello,” Moody said, handing Harry the glass. he
He dipped the magic eyeball into the water and blew it up and
down; Turning the eye, she looked at them all in turn. "I want
Thirty-six degrees turn on the return trip.”
“How do we get — where do we go?” Harry asked.
“Roads,” Lupine said. “Just the way. You are too young to Apparate,
They’ll watch the Floo stream, and it’s more of our lives
rather than setting an unauthorized Portkey.”
"Remus said he was a good archer," Kingsley Shacklebolt said in his book .
A deep voice.
"It's handsome," said Lupine, who was checking his watch. “Anyway, you better go get packed, Harry, we want to be ready to go .
When the storm comes.”
"I'll come and help you," Tonks whispered.
She followed Harry back into the hall and upstairs, looking
of the district with a lot of knowledge and enthusiasm.
“Amazing place,” she said, “it’s a little clean, you know what
mean? A bit unnatural. Oh, that’s better,” she added, as they entered .
Harry's bedroom and turned on the light.
Her room was definitely a lot dirtier than the rest of the house.
Trapped in it for four days in very bad conditions, Harry didn't bother to clean up after himself. Most of the books he has are scattered
On the ground where he tried to pleasure himself with everyone in turn and
He pushed it aside. Hedwig’s cage needed cleaning and he started
smell, and his trunk opens, revealing a Muggle mix
Clothes and rags strewn on the floor around him.
Harry began to pick up the books and toss them randomly across his desk.
content. Tonks paused in her open compartment to look curiously in the mirror inside the door.

' 52 '
“You know, I don’t think my color is really my color,” she murmured, tossing a lock of gray hair. “You think it makes me look
A little top?”
“Er —” Harry said, looking at her over the top of the Quidditch cap .
Great Britain and Ireland teams.
“Yes, there is,” Tonks insisted. She damaged her eyes in a
In summary she seemed to be struggling to remember anything. A second later, his hair turned a powder blue.
“How did you do that?” Harry said, watching as she opened it
Allen too.
“I’m a Metamorphmagus,” she said, looking back at her reflection .
And she turns her head so she can see her hair from all sides.
"It means I can change my appearance whenever I want," she added, smiling .
Harry's shocked gaze in the mirror behind him. “I was born one.
I found the first results in hiding and stealth during Auror training.
Without any education at all, she was great.”
“Are you an Auror?” Harry said, excited. Be a dark witch
Catcher was the only job he remembered after Hogwarts.
“Yeah,” Tonks said, looking surprised. “Kingsley is the same; He’s a little
He’s better than me, though. I just did a year ago. Almost lost
In secrecy and pursuit, I'm dead stupid, you hear I broke that
plate when we got to the bottom?”
“Can you learn how to be a Metamorphmag?” Harry asked her.
Right away, he forgot all about the bathroom.
Tonks laughed.
“Bet you don’t mind hiding that smile sometimes, eh?”
His eyes found the shadow of Harry's cock.
“No, I don’t mind,” Harry smirked and turned around. It didn’t work.
Like people looking at her butt.
"Well, you'll learn the hard way, I'm afraid," Tonks said.
“These metamorphs are really rare, they are formed, not made. Most witches have to use a stick or beads to change their shape. . . .

' 53 '
But we’ve got to go, Harry, we’ve got to keep cooking,” she said .
He added humbly, looking at all the dirt on the floor.
“Oh — yeah,” Harry said, grabbing a few more books.
“Don’t be stupid, it’ll be a lot faster if — pack!” yelled Tonks,
She swung her bat in one long, sweeping motion across the floor.
Books, clothes, telescopes, and scales all flew into the air and blew
pellmel in the body.
"It's not very comfortable," Tonks said, walking over to the box and looking down at the blanket inside. “My mom had this knack for getting
things to make her nervous — she even gets the girls to dance — but I never learned how to do it — it’s kind of
wipe -"
She shrugged her shoulders hopefully; One of Hari’s socks gave off a challenge.
Kind of wiggle and flopped with an empty heel inside.
"Oh, well," Tonks said, putting the lid on the couch, "At least it's everything . . ."
In. That could do with a little cleaning, too—Scourgify—” She .
She pointed her wand at Hedwig's cage; Some muscles and joints disappeared. “Well, that’s a little weird — I don’t have the whole idea of ​​.
These kinds of home remedies. Right — got everything? cup?
broom? nice! A fire?”
His eyes widened as they landed on the scar on Harry's right
hand. It was his pride and joy, a gift from Sirius, an international-sized slingshot.
"And I'm still riding the Comet Two Sixty," Tonks said enviously. "Oh
Well . . . Is it still in your jeans? Both wheels are still there? So, let’s go.
The Locomotive Beast.”
Harry's fist rose a few inches in the air. She holds her wand as if
the president's baby, Tonks made her wander around the room and out of the
door in front of them, Hedwig's cage in her left hand. Harry followed
Down the stairs he carried his paintbrush.
At home, Moody changed his eyes, which were
A quick look after his cleaning made Harry feel sick. Kingsley

' 54 '
Shacklebolt and Sturgis Pudmur were investigating the microwave and
Hestia Jones was laughing about a potato chip she found while she was
They look at the shelves. Lupine was sending a letter addressed to
The Dursleys.
“Good,” Lupine said, looking up as Tonks and Harry entered.
“We have about a minute, I think. We should probably go out to
The garden so we were ready. Harry, I left a letter I say your uncle and
Uncle don’t worry —”
“They won’t,” Harry said.
“That you’re safe —”
“It’s just going to get them excited.”
“— and you will see them next summer.”
“Should I work?”
Lupine smiled but didn't give an answer.
“Come here, kid,” Moody cooed, motioning Harry towards the .
With his staff. “I needed to comfort you.”
“You need what?” Harry said nervously.
"Fake charm," Moody said, raising his wand. “Lubin
He says you have an invisibility cloak, but it won’t sleep while we
flying; This will fuel you better. Here you go —”
He cut Harry hard on the top of his head and Harry felt a tingle as if Moody had just cracked an egg there; cold
Sparks seemed to run down his body from the point of the pin
There was one.
“A good one, Mad-Eye,” Tonks said cheerfully, glancing at Harry’s .
intermediate.
Harry looked down at his body, or rather, what was his body,
Because it doesn’t look anything like his. He was not invisible; have
Just taken for the beauty and functionality of the kitchen counter after
he. It’s like he’s become a human truck.
“Come on,” Moody said, unlocking the back door with his key.
They all went outside on Uncle Vernon’s beautifully kept lawn.

' 55 '
“Clear night,” Moody said, his magical eyes scanning the heavens. “It can work with a little bit of cloud infrastructure. Of course you are,” he said
said Harry, "We're going to go out in the rehearsal." thank you
Be in front of you and stay close to her nose. Lupine will be taking
You from below. I’ll be right behind you. The rest will surround us.
We’re not breaking anything, you understand me? If one of us is killed—”
“Is that possible?” Harry asked fearfully, but Moody was unimpressed
he.
“— Others keep pouring, they don’t stop, they don’t break wheels. whether
Take us all off and go, Harry, the rear guard is standing
s to take up space; Keep flying east and they’ll join you.”
“Stop being so happy, MadEye, he’ll say we’re not taking this .
Seriously,” Tonks said, as she packed Harry’s and Hedwig’s luggage .
caged in a noose tied around his neck.
“I’m just telling the kid the program,” Moody snapped. “Our job is
Get him safely to the base and if we die in the attempt—”
"No one is going to die," Kingsley Shacklebolt said in his palace,
A calming voice.
“Put down your lanterns, that’s the first sign!” Lupine said firmly,
He looks at the sky.
Far, far above them, a cluster of red orbs appeared between
The stars. Harry recognized them at once as familiar shadows. He hurried
His right foot on his Firebolt, he clenched his fist tightly, and he felt it
He shrugs a little, as if he’s as anxious as he is to be in
air again.
“Second signal, let’s go!” Lupine said aloud, as the lights grew brighter, red
This time, it exploded far above them.
Harry forced himself off the couch. The cold wind of the night blew
With his hair when the square trees of Privet Drive fell,
They quickly approach a pile of greens and blacks, and
Any thought of hearing ministry was pushed from his mind as if
though the scream of air knocked him out of his throat. It feels like

' 56 '
His heart would burst with joy; He’s flying again, flying off Privet Drive as he’s been planning all summer,
He was walking home. . . . For a few glorious moments, all his troubles
He seemed to vanish into nothingness, insignificant in the vast, starry sky.
“Dark left, dark left, there’s a Muggle looking up!” shouted Moody.
from behind him. Tonks turned and Harry followed, watching
His trunk pulsed gently under her touch. “We need more heart.
. . . Give him another quarter!”
Harry's eyes flashed in the cold as they snapped upwards; He can see
There was nothing down now except for the little beams of light that were the car’s headlights.
and streetlights. Two of the few handles could have belonged to Uncle Vernon’s car. . . . The Dursleys would go back to their mess
House right now, full of anger over a non-existent weed contest
. . . And Harry laughed aloud at the thought, though his voice was
He drowned out the rustling of the others' clothes, the rustling of the rope that held his trunk as a cage, the rustling of the wind in their lungs .
Nails as they spin through the air. Didn't feel this alive in a month,
Or this happy. . . .
“He’ll take the South!” shouted MadEye. “City ahead!”
They glowed cautiously, so as not to pass directly over the flickering beam of light below.
“Bear southeast and keep walking, there is some low cloud ahead
We could lose ourselves in it!” His name is Modi.
“We don’t walk in the sky!” Tonks shouted angrily. "Well
You’re welcome, MadEye!”
Harry froze to hear her say that; His hands were growing
Numb about the Firebolt arm. He hopes he will consider putting on a
coat; He was beginning to vomit.
They change their course every so often according to MadEye’s instructions. Harry's eyes lost against the speed of the ice
The wind was starting to assault his ears. He could remember being this cold on the mat only once before, during Quidditch .

' 57 '
Match against Hufflepuff in his third year, which was held in a
wind. The guard next to him was perpetually dressed like a king.
Birds of prey. Harry was lost in time. He wondered how long they had
He was getting better; It felt like an hour at least.
“Turning to the southeast!” shouted Modi. “We want to stop .
The driveway!”
Harry was now so cool that he thought calmly for a moment.
of the inside of the bottom-facing cars, and then, too,
More fun, than traveling with Floo powder; It might not have been pretty looking in the fireplace but at least it was warm in the fireplace.
. . . Kingsley Shaklbult circled her, and her nose and ear.
They sparkled slightly in the moonlight. . . . Now there’s Emlin Vans in
His right, his trunk sticking out, his head turning left and right . . . Then she
often succeeded upon it, so that Sturgis might follow Podmore. . . .
“We need to run a little deeper, just to make sure we’re not being followed!” Moody shouted.
“YOU like it, DO YOU?” Tonks yelled from the front.
“We all disperse to our suits! If we keep going off the wrong path
I’ll get there by next week! We’re almost there now!”
“Time to start descending!” came Lupine's voice. “Follow Tonks, .
Harry!”
Harry followed Tonks on the same breath. They were looking at the great
Collection of lights is invisible, powerful, vibrant, adaptive
The mass, shimmering in lines and grooves, is united by touches of deep black. Down and down they flew, until Harry could see the person
silver is street lamps, blinds, and TV tubes. he
He wanted to get to the ground so much, though he felt sure that someone was going to pull him out of his shield.
“Here we go!” Tonks said, and a few seconds later she collapsed.
Harry stumbled behind him and knocked over a desk.
of intact grass in the middle of a small square. Tonks was already
She unzipped Harry's wallet. Frowning, Harry looked away. The animal
Chapter Three
' 58 '
the roofs of the neighboring houses do not match; Some of them
windows were broken, glistening faintly in the light of the street-lights, paint peeling from many windows, and heaps of rubbish .
lay outside several of the front bumpers.
“Where are we?” Harry asked, but Lupine simply said, "In a minute."
Moody was fidgeting with his hair, his calloused hands clenched with
cold.
“I understand,” he murmured, picking up what looked like a silver cigarette .
Lighter in the air and on his sleeve.
A nearby streetlight flickered on. He took out the unlighter again; The next flash is off. He kept cheating until every
The light in the venue is off and the only light in the venue
He came through the cracks of the ball and the crescent moon overhead.
“Borrow it from Dumbledore,” Moody said, rummaging through his pockets .
Put Outside. "That'll take care of any Muggles looking out the window, see?" Now, come on, quickly.”
He took Harry by the arm and led him away from the grass section.
off the street, and on the pavement. Lupine and Tonks followed,
He carried Harry’s wand between them, the rest of the Guard, all s
their backpacks are off, flanking them.
The deafening sound of a stereo was coming from an upper window in the nearby house. There came a sweet smell of rotting garbage.
From the pile of binbags that had just emerged inside the closed door.
“Here,” Moody smiled, shoving a piece of paper toward the .
Harry’s sweaty hand gripped his flailing wand closer to him, as
To speed up the writing. “Read slowly and memorize.”
Harry looked at the piece of paper. The handwriting is beautiful.
He was easily recognizable. He said:
The Order of the Phoenix headquarters can be found at
Number Twelve, Grimmauld Place, London.

Chapter Four
ISSUE TWELFTH
GRIMULD'S PLACE

What’s the effect of — ?” Harry began.
“Not here, baby!” said Mudi. “Wait until we’re inside!”
He yanks the piece of paper out of Harry's hand and lights it on fire.
at him with a flick of his wrist. As the message turned to shrapnel and floated
Back on the floor, Harry looked at the houses again. are
standing outside number eleven; He looked to the left and saw number ten; To the right, however, is number thirteen.
“But where is — ?”
"Think about what you just memorized," Lupine snapped.
Harry thought, and he hadn't gotten to the part about number twelve, Grimmauld Place, a covered door emerged from the
Nowhere between numbers eleven and thirteen, immediately following
Dirty walls and dirty windows. Looks like there was an extra house that had
it raged, attacking those in either direction from its path. Harry stared at her.
The stereo in Number Eleven hummed. Apparently, the Muggles inside didn't notice anything either.
“Come on, quick,” Moody said, nudging Harry in the groin.
Harry walked up the polished stone staircase and stared at the newly repaired entrance. Its black paint was chipped and chipped. The Silver Gate
the knocker was in the form of a coiled snake. There is no key hiding or
A box of letters.
Lupine drew his wand and knocked on the door once. Harry heard
Lots of loud, metallic stuff and what sounded like someone’s drumming
chain. The door creaked open.
“Come in quickly, Harry,” Lupine growled. “But don’t go too far inside .
And don’t touch anything.”
Harry pushed through the portal into the near-complete darkness of
The room. He could smell musty, dusty odors, and sweet, musty odors; the
Place has the feel of a derelict building. He looked over his shoulder and saw the others filing in behind him, Lupine and Tonks carrying .
His trunk is Hedwig’s cage. Moody was standing on the top step and
They threw out the light-boxes that Put-Outer stole from the streetlights; They flew back to their mats and the space above them glowed.
moment with the orange light before Moody went inside and
They closed the front door, so that the darkness in the hall continued.
"here -"
He held Harry firmly over the head with his collar; Harry felt like
though something warm was dripping from her back this time and
He knew that he had to pick up the Discipline Charm.
“Now stay still, everyone, while I shine a little light for us here,”
Moody whispered.
The hushed expressions of the others were giving Harry an odd feeling of anxiety; Looks like they just walked into the house of a dying
man. He heard a soft hissing sound, and then the old-fashioned glass.
The lamps flared to life all over the walls, casting innocent light flickering across the shattered wallpaper and the blackened surface of a
A long, dark corridor, where a bamboo chandelier glints overhead and age-bleached paintings hang upside down on the walls. Harry
They hear something shuffling behind the sideboard. Both chandeliers
And the candles on a cracker table nearby were in the shape of snakes.
There were quick steps with Ron's mother, Mrs. Weasley,
they exited through a door in the back of the hall. She was shining in
Greetings as she turned towards them, though Harry noticed that she
He was paler and thinner than he had been the last time she had seen him.
her.
“Hey Harry, it’s great to see you!” She kissed him and pulled him to
Touch his hair before grabbing his arms length and looking
to him accidentally. “You look at the top; You need to eat, but you will
I'll have to wait a bit for dinner, I'm afraid. . . .”
She turned to the group of wizards behind her and whispered, “Just arrived, the match has started. . . .”
The wizards behind Harry made all the noises of joy and happiness and began to fly past Harry towards the portal through .
Mrs. Weasley has just arrived; Harry made to follow Lupine, but Ms.
Weasley took him into custody.
“No, Harry, the meeting is only for members of the Order. Run d
Hermione is upstairs, you can wait with them until the reunion
Then we’ll have dinner. And keep your voice in
hall,” she added quickly.
"why?"
“I don’t want to miss anything.”
“What do you say — ?”
“I’ll explain to you later, I have to paint, I have to be in a meeting — I’ll just show you where you’re sleeping.”
She placed her finger on his lips and brought him to his knees in front of both
Long strides fed by waves, after which Harry thought he must be
Be the next door, and before climbing through the big spider web that moves
Like it was made from a severed troll leg, they started to breathe
The dark ladder, circling a series of brown heads mounted on
Posters on the wall. On closer inspection, Harry sees that the heads belong to house elves. All of them have a tail as wide as a sledgehammer.
Harry's shock grew with every step he took. What was
floor were working on a house that looked like it belonged to
The Darkest of witches?
"Ms. Wesley, why — ?”
'Ron and Hermione will explain everything, dear, I really should have .
Dash,” Mrs. Weasley said with a curious smile. “There” — they have .
He reached the second corner — “You are the door on the right. I'll call.
You when it’s over.”
And it slid down again.
Harry crossed the wall of fire and turned the handle of the bedroom door.
which has the shape of a snake’s head and opens the door.
He took a brief look at a high shed, which had two beds
room, and then there was a twitter boo, followed by a
loudly, and his view was completely obscured by a huge amount of very fluffy hair — Hermione threw herself at him in a
Hug that nearly choked him, while Ron’s miniature horse, Pigwidgeon,
zoom proudly around and around their heads.
“HARRY! Ron, he's here, Harry's here! We didn't hear you arrived!
Oh, how are you? Are you okay? Are you angry with us? I
Bet you have, I know our letters are useless — but we can’t tell
You something, Dumbledore made us swear we didn't, oh, we had
I have much to tell you, and you must tell us — the dementors! when
We heard — and that ministry conversation — it was just shocking, I had
They all looked at it, they can’t kick you out, they just can’t, there’s a right
in the Underage Protection Act for the purpose of using
Magic in life-threatening situations —”
“Let him breathe, Hermione,” Ron muttered, closing the door .
After Harry. He seemed to have grown several more inches in
Their moons are opposite, which makes it wider and more moving than
Every time, though her long nose, bright red lips, and eyebrows are the same.
Hermione, still beaming, pushed Harry away, but before she could say
Other words there was a tinkling sound and something white.
He jumped off the top of a staircase and landed gently on Harry's.
shoulder.
“Hidwig!”
The snowy owl grabbed his head and nibbled his ear lovingly.
As Harry ruffled his feather.
"She's in good shape," Ron said. “Pecked us half to death .
When she got your last letters, look at this—”
He showed Harry the ring finger of his right hand, which made
Half light but seemed normal.
“Oh sure,” Harry said. “Sorry about that, but I want answers, .
You know. . . .”
"We wanted to give them to you, mate," Ron said. “Hermione was
You were going great, she kept telling you to do something stupid if you were
you guess all about yourself without information, but Dumbledore made us —”
“— I promise you won’t tell me,” said Harry. “Yes, Hermione is already
said."
A warm light erupted inside him when he saw his two
His best friends disappeared because some ice filled his pool.
stomach. Suddenly — after I wanted to see them so badly .
A month — he felt compelled to leave Ron and Hermione alone.
There was an awkward silence in which Harry hugged Hedwig himself, looking at none of the others.
“Sounds like a great deal,” Hermione said with a light smile. “Dumbeldur, I mean.”
“Right,” Harry said. He noticed that his hands also had scales.
of Hedwig's taste and found that he didn't mind it at all.
“I think he thought you were the safest with Muggles —” Ron .
begin.
"Yes?" Harry said, raising an eyebrow. “If any of you
Get attacked by the Dementarians this summer?”
“Well, no — but that’s why he had people from the Order of .
Phoenix stalks you all the time —”
Harry felt a heavy feeling in his gut as if he had just lost a step.
I'm going downstairs. So everyone knew he was being followed but him.
“It doesn’t quite work, though, does it?” Harry said, doing his
utmost to hold his voice too. “I have to take care of myself after all,
Wasn’t it me?”
“He was so angry,” Hermione said in a voice almost choked.
“Dumbledore. We've seen it. When Mundungus found out he
before he finishes his shift. It was scary.”
"Well, I'm glad he's gone," Harry said coldly. “If he didn’t, I wouldn’t
It worked magic and Dumbledore would probably leave me in
Privet Drive all summer long.”
“It’s not you . . . Don't you worry about the Ministry of Magic?
Do you hear?” Hermione said suddenly.
“No,” Harry said hesitantly. He walked over them, looking
front, with Hedwig running proudly over his shoulder, but this
The room was not meant to raise his spirits. It was gray and dark. bladder
A line of canvas in a beautiful picture frame is just something that reduces
naked horrible walls and when he walked past Harry thought he was
I hear someone eating blindly snigger.
“Then why was Dumbledore so keen to keep me in the dark?”
Harry asked, still trying hard to remain composed. “Did you —
Er — care to ask it all?”
He looked up just in time to see them exchange a look that said .
to him he was behaving as they feared he would. He did nothing.
To improve his mood.
“We told Dumbledore we wanted to tell you what’s going on,”
Run said. “We did, baby. But he’s definitely moved on now, we just know
Twice since we came here and he didn’t have a lot of time, he just
It made us decide I won’t tell you important things when we write, he said
Animals can be tamed—”
"He could still give me information if he wanted to," Harry said .
s duration. “Don’t tell me he doesn’t know how to send a message .
Without taxes.”
Hermione looked at Ron and then said, “I thought so too. but
He didn’t want you to know anything.”
"Maybe he thinks I can't be trusted," Harry said, smiling at their exchange.
“Don’t worry,” Ron said, looking very confused.
“Or that I can’t take care of myself—”
“Of course he doesn’t think so!” Hermione said anxiously.
"So how am I going to stay in the Dursleys while you two get to
Participate in whatever is going on here?” Harry said, words tumbling over one another rapidly, his voice growing weaker with each
word. “How are you two allowed to know everything that’s going on — ?”
“We’re not!” Run interrupted early. “My mother won’t let us near the meetings, she says we’re too young —”
But before he knew it, Harry was speaking.
“THEN YOU’RE NOT IN THE PROBLEMS, BIG THING!
YOU'RE STILL HERE, ARE YOU? STILL
ALL OF US! I AM, I'M GOING TO THE DURSLEYS' FOR A MONTH! And I HAVE MORE than
YOU TWO ARE NOT GOING TO MEET DUMBLEDORE
HE KNEW IT — WHO SAVE THE CORNER STONE?
WHO RELEASES THE STATES? Who saved TWO
SHOTS FROM THE MEDENTORS?”
Every bitter and sad thought Harry had in the past
The moon was beaming down from it; his frustration at the lack of information,
He’s upset that they’re all alone without him, his anger that he’s
followed and never told him about it: All the feelings he’s half ashamed of
Eventually they broke their boundaries. Hedwig was frightened by the noise and
up to the top of the car again; Pigwidgeon tweeted at
Alarm and zoomed further over their heads.
“WHO SHOULD GO THROUGH DRAGONS AND SPHINCS .
AND EVERYTHING ELSE TOUGH LAST YEAR? Who sees
IS SHE GOING BACK? WHO SHOULD RUNNING FROM HIM? we!"
Ron was standing there with his mouth half open, looking shocked
And she couldn't tell, while Hermione looked around .
n tears.
“BUT WHY SHOULD I KNOW WHAT’S GOING ON? why
SOMEBODY HAD TO TELL AND TELL ME WHAT THEY ARE
HAPPENED?”
“Harry, we wanted to tell you, we really —” Hermione began.
“I CAN’T WANT MORE, CAN YOU, OR
YOU WILL SEND ME THE CROWN, BUT DUMBLEDORE
IT MAKES YOU FALL —”
“Well, it did —”
“FOR FOUR WEEKS I WAS IN PRIVATE DRIVE,
AND PAPERS FROM THE DEAD TO TRY TO FIND
WHAT IS DONE —”
“We want to —”
“I THINK YOU WERE REALLY JOKE,
DON’T GO, ALL YOU STOP HERE ALL —”
“No, really —”
“Harry, we’re really sorry!” Hermione said nervously, her eyes now
glistening with tears. “You’re right, Harry — I’ll be mad .
If only I were!”
Harry glared at her, still breathing heavily, then turned to
They were again, looking up and down. Hedwig yelled desperately from
the top of the stairs. There was a long pause, which he only broke
the rustling of the floor beneath Harry's feet.
“What is this place anyway?” He shot at Ron and Hermione.
"The head of the Order of the Phoenix," Ron said suddenly.
“Is someone going to try to tell me what the rules of
Phoenix — ?”
"It's a secret society," Hermione said flatly. "Dumbledore in
charge, set it up. They’re the people who fought YouKnow-Who last time.”
“Who’s in it?” Harry said, coming to a stop with her hands in his .
Pocket.
“A lot of people —”
“— We’ve met about twenty of them,” Ron said, “but we think .
There are more. . . .”
Harry glared at them.
"Well?" he demanded, looking from one to the other.
“Er,” Ron said. “Well what?”
"Voldemort!" Harry said excitedly, and Run and Hermione
got. "What's going on?" What's he reading? Where is he? What
Are we working to stop it?”
"They told you, the Order won't let us into their meetings," he said .
Hermione was shocked. “So we don’t know the details — but we have a
The general idea —” she added quickly, seeing the look on Harry’s face.
"Fred and George made extended ears, see," Ron said.
“They’re really useful.”
“Can it be extended — ?”
“Ears, yes. No we had to stop using them eventually because
My mom finds out and freaks out. Fred and George had to hide them
All to stop my mother from strangling them. But we have a nice little usage from
Sen before Mom realized what was happening. We know some of the
The Order are tracking down known Death Eaters, keeping tabs on them, you
know -"
“— some of them are working to recruit more people to .
The figure —” Hermione said.
“— and some of them are standing in defense of something,” he said .
run. “They’re always talking about safe work.”
“It can’t be me, can it?” Harry said with a chuckle.
“Oh yeah,” Ron said, nodding to the morning’s understanding.
Harry sighed. He walked around the room again, looking anywhere but Ron and Hermione. “So what are you two doing,
Are you missing out on meetings?” he demanded. “You said you’d
It was done.”
“We have,” Hermione said flatly. “We were having fun
This house, has been empty for ages and things are getting worse here.
We managed to clean the mall, most of the bedrooms, and I
You think we’re doing a design room tomo — AARGH!”
With two loud belts, Fred and George, Ron’s older brothers,
It was made from thin air at room temperature. Pigwidgeon tweeted faster than usual and leaned to join Hedwig .
On the top of the stairs.
“Stop that!” Hermione said sadly to the twins, who were as
With the same red face as Ron, though he was thinner and a little older.
“Hi, Harry,” George said, grinning at him. “We thought we
He hears your dulcet tones.”
“You don’t want to fuel your anger like that, Harry, leave it all alone .
they’re gone,” Fred said, also beaming. “There might be two fifty .
miles away from anyone who hasn’t heard you.”
“You two passed your Apparation tests, then?” Harry asked.
With anger.
“Exception,” said Fred, who was holding what looked like a .
Very long, flesh-coloured section of stalk.
“It will take you about thirty more seconds to walk down .
wall,” Ron said.
“Time is Galleons, little brother,” Fred said. “Anyway, Harry, you
involved in the development. Extended ears,” he added in response to
Harry's eyebrows raised and he touched the screen, which Harry now saw
He was teetering on the edge of the field. "We're trying to hear what's going on
In the basement.”
“You want to be careful,” Ron said, nibbling on the ear. “If my mother sees
One of them is also . . .”
"They should, it's a great match they're having," he said
Fred.
The door opened, and a long coat of red hair appear ed.
“Oh hello, Harry!” Ron's little sister Ginny said with a grin. "I
I think I heard your voice.”
Turning to Fred and George she said, “It wasn’t a walk with extended ears, she went and put an Imperturbable charm on the table .
gate."
“How did you know?” George said, looking confused.
"Tonks told me how to find him," Ginny said. “You just suspect things
at the portal and if it fails to make contact, the portal is Imperturbed.
I drop Dungbombs at him from the top of the stairs and they
Just move away from it, so there's no way extended ears are
It can get under load.”
Fred drew in a deep breath. "South. I'm eager to find what
Old Snape was up to.”
“Snap?” Harry said quietly. “Is he here?”
“Yeah,” George said, closing the door gently and sitting on the .
one of the beds; Fred and Ginny followed. “Forwarding the report. top
private."
“Git,” Fred growled.
“He’s beside us now,” Hermione whispered.
Run snarled. “It doesn’t stop him from being a git. The way he looks at us
When he sees us. . . .”
"Neither does Bill," Ginny said, as if that fixed it .
matter.
Harry wasn't sure his anger had subsided yet; But his thirst for
The news was now competing with his desire to keep screaming. drowned
On the bed opposite the others.
“Is Bill here?” he asked. “I think it works in Egypt.”
“He applied for a desk job to come home and work for
Place,” Fred said. “He says he needs graves, but,” he smirked, .
“There are criminal charges. . . .”
“What do you mean?”
“Do you remember old Fleur Delacour?” George said. “She has a job at
Gringotts will improve 'er English —”
“— and Bill used to give him a lot of private lessons,” he quipped .
Fred.
“Charlie is in the Order too,” said George, “but he is still in Romania,
Dumbledore wanted them to bring in as many foreign wizards as possible, so
Charlie tries to make connections on his days off.”
“Can’t Percy do that?” Harry asked. The last he heard from him, was
The third Weasley brother worked for the Office of International Meteorological Cooperation at the Ministry of Meteorology.
At these words, all the Weasleys and Hermione agreed through the darkness .
Important steps.
"Anyway, don't mention Percy in front of my mother and . . ."
Dad,” Ron said to Harry in a low voice.
"why not?"
"Because every time Percy's name is mentioned, my dad drops everything he's holding and my mom starts crying," Fred said.
“That’s awful,” Ginny said sadly.
"I think we connect it pretty well," George said with an unsure look on his face.
“What happened?” Harry said.
“Percy and my dad were different,” says Fred. “I’ve never seen my dad smoke
With everyone like that. It was my mother who yelled normally. . . .”
"It was the first week back after the fall season ended," Ron said. “We were
He was about to come into power. Percy came home and told us to
he is exalted.”
“Are you kidding?” Harry said.
Though he knew full well that Percy had strong intentions,
Harry's impression was that Percy hadn't been very successful in his career.
First job in the Ministry of Engineering. Percy did a very big deal.
The controller is unaware that its manager is controlled by
Lord Voldemort (not that the Ministry believed that — all
t think that Mr. Crouch has gone mad).
“Yeah, we’re all surprised,” George said, “because Percy got into .
verdict of trouble on Crouch, there was an investigation and all.
They say that Percy needs to realize that Crouch is off his rocker and
said one president. But knowing Percy, Crouch left him in charge,
He wasn't going to complain. . . .”
“So how did they do it?”
“That’s exactly what we asked,” said Ron, who seemed .
I want to continue the casual conversation now that Harry has stopped
He's screaming. “He came home really pleased with himself — even better .
I’m happier than ever if you can imagine this — and told my father that there was
He offered a seat in Fudge's own office. A really good one for someone just a year out of Hogwarts—the minister's little assistant.
He was waiting for my father to love him all, I think.”
“Only my father isn’t,” Fred said sadly.
"why not?" Harry said.
“Well, apparently fudge has been wandering around the Ministry .
They assume that no one has anything to do with Dumbledore,” he said
George.
"Dumbledore's name is rocky with the Ministry these days, see," he said .
Fred. “They all think it just makes it difficult to say YouKnowWho is back.”
“Dad said Fudge proved that everyone who was in the ring with
Dumbledore can clear their cupboards,” George said.
"The problem is, Fudge is suspicious of my father, he knows he's Dumbledore's friend, and he always thought my father was a bit of a jerk because of his
Muggle curiosity —”
“But what does this have to do with Percy?” Harry asked, confused.
“I’m coming to that. Dad thought Fudge just wanted Percy in his apartment
office because he wanted to use it to see family — and
Dumbledore.”
Harry let out a soft chuckle.
“Bet Percy likes that.”
Ron laughed sort of wryly.
“He went completely berserk. He said — well, he said panic attacks. He says that he was supposed to fight my father’s abuse.
reputation since he joined the ministry and my father had no
ambition and that’s why we’ve always — you know — never had a
A lot of money, I mean —”
"what?" Harry said in disbelief, as Ginny made a noise like an angry cat.
“I know,” Ron said quietly. “And it got worse. Dad said
He was foolish to run with Dumblur, that Dumblur was
heading into big trouble and dad would hang out with her, and
that he — Percy — knew where her truth lay and that was .
Ministry. And if mom and dad become employees of
The Ministry was going to emphasize that everyone knew he didn't belong to her.
For our family often. And packed his bags that same night and
left. He lives here in London now.”
Harry swears under his breath. He always liked Percy the youngest
Ron’s brothers, but he never thought he’d say that
to Mr. Wesley.
“My mom’s in great shape,” Ron said. “You know — crying is .
stuff. She came to London to try and talk to Percy but he stopped
The door in his face. I don’t know what he’d do if he bumped into my dad at work —
Wouldn't mind, s'pose.”
"But Percy must know Voldemort's back," Harry said quietly. "he
He’s not a coward, he needs to know your mom and dad don’t risk everything without proof —”
“Yeah, well, your name’s drawn in the stamp,” Ron said, throwing Harry a quizzical look. “Percy said the only proof is your word .
and . . . I don't know. . . He didn’t think it was right.”
"Percy takes Every Christmas Seriously," Hermione whispered, and .
The others all shook their heads.
“What are you talking about?” Harry asked, looking at the
in all of them. They were all looking at him intently.
“You don’t — you weren’t getting Everyday Christmas?” Hermione asked confused.
“Yes, I have!” Harry said.
“Did you — er — read it properly?” Hermione asked.
Still more passionately.
“It’s not tattoo to tattoo,” Harry said defensively. “If they would go .
To say anything about Voldemort would be gossip,
It doesn’t work!”
Others cringed at the sound of the name. Hurry Hermione.
on, “Well, you’d have to read it from cover to cover to pick it up, but .
They were — um — calling you twice a week.”
“But I’ll see—”
“Not if you just read the first page, you don’t,” he said .
Hermione, shaking her head. “I’m not talking about great articles. they
Just hearing you, it’s like a standing joke.”
“What do you say — ?”
"It's quite rare, actually," Hermione said in a concerned tone.
“They just built on Rita’s stuff.”
“But she wouldn’t write them, would she?”
“ⴰⵀ ⴰⵍⴰ, ⵜⴻⵟⵟⴻⴼ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵍⴻⵡⵚⴰⵢⴰⵜⵉⵙ — ⵎⴰⵞⵞⵉ ⴷ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵜⴻⵙⵄⴰ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵍⵅⵉⵔ,”
Hermione added proudly. “But it laid the foundation for
What they’re trying to do now.”
“ⴰⵏⵡⴰ ⵉ ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ?” Harry said calmly.
“So, you know by now that you’re falling all over the country .
ⴰⵎⴽⴰⵏ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵜⴻⵏⵏⵉⴹⴷ ⵍⵃⵉⵔⴼⴰⵉⵏⴻⴽ ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵃⴰⵣ ⴷ ⵡⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⴰⴽⴽ?”
"Yeah," Harry said, unable to forget Rita Skeeter's stories about him easily.
“Well, they write about you as if you were so persecuted,
An attention seeker who thinks he’s a big fucking hero or something,” Hermione said, very softly, as if she didn’t care .
For Harry to hear these things sooner. “They keep driving in the snide .
Comments about you. If there is a far out story say something like 'a story worthy of Harry Potter' and if someone has a fairytale
Accident or something 'hopefully he doesn't have a gem in his attitude
or we shall be asked to bow before him —' ”
“I don’t want anyone to worship —” Harry began impatiently.
“I know you don’t,” Hermione whispered, looking scared.
“I know, Harry. But do you see what they do? They want to turn.
You are in one that no one believes. Fudge is next, I bet
anything. ⴱⵖⴰⵏ ⵉⵙⴻⵃⵃⴰⵔⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⴱⵔⵉⴷ ⴰⴷ ⵃⴻⵙⴱⴻⵏ ⴽⴻⵞⵞ ⴷ ⴽⵔⴰ ⴽⴰⵏ
A smart boy who was a bit of a joke, who told tall nonsense stories because
He likes to be adventurous and wants to keep moving.”
“I didn’t ask—I didn’t want to—Voldemort killed my parents!”
Harry shouted. “I realized because he killed my family but .
He can’t kill me! Who wants to be known for that? They don’t think
I hope he doesn’t —”
“We know, Harry,” Ginny insisted.
"And they certainly haven't uttered a single word about the dementors attacking you," Hermione said. “Somebody told them to keep that .
quiet. That should be a really big story, out-of-control dementors. They didn’t even mention you broke international
Secret status — we thought they would, it would tie in nicely
With this picture of you as some stereotypes — we’re sure
They bide their time until they release you, then they actually go
to the city — I mean, if they get thrown out, obviously,” she continued abruptly,
“You don’t have to be honest, not if they’re following their own rules, there’s no
the odds are against you.”
They went back to talking and Harry didn't want to think
therefore. He turned for another change of subject, but was saved
We had to find someone by the sound of footsteps coming
stairs.
“Uh.”
Fred gives the augmented performer a heartfelt refusal; There was another louder voice.
Crack and he and George disappeared. After a few seconds, Mrs. Weasley appeared in the bedroom doorway.
“The meeting is over, you can come down and have dinner now,
Everyone is dying to see you, Harry. And who left all those Dungbombs outside the kitchen door?”
“Across-shanks,” Ginny said without hesitation. “He likes to play with
them."
"Oh," Mrs. Weasley said, "I think it might be Kreacher, . . ."
He always does such odd things. Now don't forget to keep
Noise down the hall. Ginny, your hands are dirty, what have you
Were you working? Go wash them before dinner, please. . . .”
Ginny turned to the others and followed her mother out of the house
room, leaving Harry alone with Ron and Hermione again. In both
They were looking at him suspiciously, as if they were afraid he would be
He would start yelling again now that everyone else had gone. That view
In them he looked so sweet he felt a little ashamed.
"look . . ." he murmured, but Ron shook his head, and Hermione
He said out loud, “we knew you’d be mad, Harry, we really didn’t care .
You are, but you must understand, we tried to convince Dumbledore —”
“Yeah, I know,” Harry sighed.
He drops the subject to change the subject from Dumbledore — the mere thought of it makes Harry's insides burn with .
Anger too.
“Who the hell is Kreacher?” he asked.
“The housekeeper who lives here,” Ron said. “Nutter. I’ve never met anyone.
Like him.”
Hermione looked up at Ron.
“Not stupid, Ron —”
“His ideal of survival is to have his throat cut off and thrown on a
plate like his mother,” Ron said bitterly. "correct,
Hermione?”
“Well—well, if he’s a little clumsy, it’s not his fault—”
Ron rolled his eyes at Harry.
“Hermione still hasn’t given up on the needle—”
“It's not 'sucking'!” Hermione said anxiously. “It is an association that
Promoting the Elven Guild, and I’m not the only one, Dumbledore says we
It must be kind to Kreacher, too—”
“Yeah, yeah,” Ron said. “C'mon, I'm starving.”
He led the way out of the portal to the exit, but before
They can hold the stairs—“Hold it!” Run took a deep breath and walked out
One hand to stop Harry and Hermione from walking any further. “They
We’re still in the hall, maybe we can hear something—”
The three looked cautiously over the shoulder. pity
The underworld is full of witches and wizards, including all
Harry's guardian. They were having fun together. In many
across the group Harry noticed the dark, olive-haired mustache and prominent beard of his least favorite teacher at Hogwarts, Professor Snape.
Harry leaned against the window even more. He was very grateful for what
Snape worked for the Order of the Phoenix. . . .
A thin piece of flesh color landed in front of Harry's
eyes. Looking up, he saw Fred and George on the far ledge, cautiously lowering the expanding ear to the human throat .
below. After a while, though, they started to move away .
The door is out of sight.
“Dammit,” Harry heard Fred whisper, as he duplicated the Extendable .
The ear went back up.
They heard the front door open and then close.
“Snape doesn’t eat here,” Ron told Harry quietly. “Thank God.
Come on.”
“Don’t forget to keep your voice down, Harry,”
Hermione whispered.
As they passed the row of pet pig heads on the wall they saw
Lupine, Mrs. Weasley, and Tonks at the front door, magically blocking her door .
Lots of switches and switches after the ones that just came out.
“We were eating in the kitchen,” Mrs. Weasley whispered,
Meeting them in the middle of the park. “Harry, dear, if you would just
tiptoe across the hall, this is the door here —”
fall.
"thank you!" Mrs. Weasley said bitterly, turning to look behind her
her.
"I'm sorry!" exclaimed Tonks, who was lying flat on the floor. "That's
the whistle blows, and that’s the second time I’ve thrown —”
But the rest of his words were drowned out by a deafening, deafening,
Squeeze the blood.
The stains of eaten velvet that Harry had passed earlier vanished lightly.
in a different direction, but there is no door behind them. For a split second, Harry
he thought looking out the window, the window behind him
An older woman in a black hat was screaming and yelling like
She had been tortured — and then he realized it was just a life-size painting, but it was real, and it was the most unpleasant thing he had ever seen .
in his life.
The old woman was lying down, her eyes moving, white
The skin on her face tensed violently as she screamed, and throughout the hall
Behind them, the other figures got up and started cheering too, as
Harry actually averted his eyes at the noise and clenched his hands.
on his ears.
Lupine and Mrs. Weasley stepped forward and tried to push the curtains around the old woman, but they wouldn't budge and she .
They squealed louder than ever, waving their hands wildly as if they were trying to smack them in their faces.
“Thought! Scum! Fake products are fake! Half types, variables,
Freaks, start from this place! How dare you miss my house
Fathers —”
Tonks apologized repeatedly, at one point pulling
A large, gray troll foot reappeared from the ground. Mrs. Weasley left him
Trying to close the curtains and rush up and down the hall,
Stunning all other paintings with its magic. Then a man tall
Black hair came charging through a doorway around Harry.
“Shut up, you dirty old hag, shut up!” he shouted, grabbing
Curtin Mrs. Weasley ignored her.
The woman’s face went pale.
“Aaah!” She screamed, her eyes widening when she saw the man.
“Bloody treason, shame, despise of my flesh!”
“I said — shut up — UP!” the man said, and with great effort he and Lupine managed to force the curtains closed again.
The old woman’s voices died down and a stunning silence fell.
He smiled slightly and pushed his long dark hair out of his eyes.
Harry's father, Sirius, turned to face him.
“Hi, Harry,” he called out, “I saw you met my mother.”

Chapter Five
Decree of PHOENIX

your - ?"
“Dear old mother, yes,” Sirius said. “We were tryin
It took her a month but we think she cast a Permanent Sticking Charm on the back of the canvas. Let’s go down, quickly.
Before they all wake up.”
“But what’s a painting of your mother doing here?” Harry asked.
They were shocked, when they came in through the door from the hall and made
Way down a series of narrow stone steps, others just behind them.
“Didn’t someone tell you? This is my parents’ house,” Sirius said.
“But I’m the last Cowboy left, so it’s mine now. I gave it to Dumbledore.
For shopping—for the only useful thing I get to do.”
Harry, who was expecting a good reception, noticed how nervous and
Sirius's voice broke. He followed his godfather to the crossroads.
of the toilet and through the door leading to the upper deck.
Hardly as cozy as the room above, a cave chamber
With thick stone walls. Most of the light came from a large fireplace.
in the middle of the room. A plume of vapor smoke hung in the air as if
The battle scars, through which heavy hard forms appear
iron pots and pans hung from the low ceiling. Many chairs have
They were ushered into the room for the meeting and a long wooden table.
He stood in the middle of the room, cluttered with glass candles, food, empty wine glasses, and a stack of what appeared to be glass dishes. Sir.
Weasley and his eldest son, Bill, were quietly nodding their heads .
All at the end of the pool.
Mrs. Weasley cleared her throat. Her husband, a thin, bald, green man wearing bejeweled glasses, looked around and
He jumped to his feet.
“Harry!” Mr. Weasley said, stepping forward to greet him and
He shakes his hand vigorously. “Good to see you!”
Over his shoulder he saw Harry Bill, still wearing his long hair in a
ponytail, practically tossing lengths of leftover paper onto the table.
“Good trip, Harry?” Bill called out, trying to gather twelve
He falls down suddenly. “Madeye won’t let you come by way of Greenland,
so?"
“He promised,” Tonks said, rushing over to help Bill and slowly .
by sending cotton wrapped around the last piece of paper. "Oh
No — I’m sorry —”
"Here, dear," Mrs. Weasley said, in a low voice, and marked the paper with a flick of her wrist: In the beam of light .
Because of Mrs. Weasley's beauty, Harry caught a glimpse of what
It looks like a building program.
Mrs. Weasley saw him smile. She copied the plan from
A plate and placed it in Bill's broad arms.
“This kind of thing should definitely be fixed in late 2019.
Meetings,” she said quietly before disappearing into an old stall .
From it she started taking out dinner plates.
Bill pulled out his wand and called out “Evanesco!” and books
He fell.
“Sit down, Harry,” Sirius said. “You met Mundungus, don't
you?"
The object Harry took as a bucket of hair gave an elongated,
Grunting snorted and then jerked the score.
“Did anyone say m' name?” Mundungus looked sleepy. “I agree
and Sirius. . . .”
He raised his very limp arm in the air as if to fly, his hand
droopy, bloodshot eyes are unfocused. Ginny laughed.
"The meeting is over, Dung," Sirius said, when they were all seated .
front to the table. “Harry has arrived.”
"Yes?" Mundungus said, peering sternly at Harry through his eyebrows .
Bleached ginger hair. “Blimey, then 'e 'as. Yes . . . Are you okay, 'arry?”
“Yeah,” Harry said.
Mundungus rummaged nervously through his pockets, still rummaging through the
Harry, and pulled out a dirty black pipe. He put it in his mouth,
He finally poked his finger in and took a deep breath. great
Clouds of billowing grass smoke engulfed it in seconds.
“I’m going to issue you an ‘apology,’” a voice said from the back of the smelly kitchen .
cloud.
“For the last time, Mundungus,” said Mrs. Weasley, “I will .
Please don’t smoke that thing in the kitchen, especially not if we
She’s about to eat!”
“Oh,” said Mundungus. "Right. I'm sorry, Molly.”
The cloud of smoke cleared as Mundungus turned his bow back.
in his pocket, but the smell of garbage can lingered.
“And if you want dinner before midnight I’ll need a hand,” said Miss.
Weasley said to the room at large. “No, you can stay where you are,
Harry dear, you’ve had a long journey —”
“What can I do, Molly?” Tonks said proudly, looking forward.
Mrs. Weasley was shocked.
“Er — no, it's okay, Tonks, you got rest too, you did .
Enough today —”
“No, no, I want to help!” Tonks said sarcastically, sinking into a chair
As you hurried to the kitchen Ginny was collecting
Photographs.
Soon, they were consuming the meat and vegetables of
Of their own free will, led by Mr. Weasley, while Mrs. Weasley .
Introduce a pot thrown over the fire, others take out plates,
More cookies, and food from the pantry. He left Harry at the table.
With Sirius and Mundungus, who still looked sadly on
he.
“Have you seen old Figgy since?” he asked.
“No,” said Harry, “I don’t see any.”
“Look, I won’t,” said Mundungus, leaning forward, a
in his voice, “but 'ad opportunity for duty —”
Harry felt something tug at his knuckles and started, but it was
Only Crookshanks, the gingerbread cat with Hermione’s claws, was hurt
Himself once on Harry's shoulders, grinning, then collapsing on Sirius's
lap and short. Sirius rubbed it viciously after the
His ears widened as he turned, still bare-faced, to Harry.
“Have you had a good summer so far?”
“No, it’s worse,” Harry said.
For the first time, something like a smile spread across Sirius' face.
“I don’t know what you’re complaining about, myself.”
"what?" Harry said in disbelief.
“Personally, I would welcome a dementor attack. A death struggle for my soul would break the monotony nicely. Do you think
You have it bad enough, at least you can go out for a walk,
Roll up your sleeves and get into some fights. . . . I used to hold inside a lot of
month."
"how is?" Harry asked, frowning.
“Because the Ministry of Magic is still after me, and Voldemort will
They all know about me being an Animagus now, Wormtail would have
He said, then my big ass is useless. There’s not much I can do
the Order of the Phoenix . . . Or so Dumbledore feels.”
There was something about the tone of voice that was a bit soothing in
said Sirius the name of Dumbledore who told Harry that Sirius
The Headmaster wasn’t too happy either. Harry worried for a moment.
upsurge of anger at his stepfather.
“At least you know what’s going on,” he insisted.
“Oh yeah,” Sirius chuckled. "Hearing Snape's news,
He had to take away all his delusional thoughts that he was out there risking his life
While I’m sitting on my butt here feeling pretty good . . .
They asked me how the cleaning went—”
“What cleaning?” Harry asked.
“Trying to make this place fit for human habitation,” Sirius said,
She looked at her hand in the trash can. “No one lives here for
Ten years, not since my dear mother died, unless you count her as old
house-elf, and went around the corner, cleaning nothing in the
Never —”
“Sirius?” said Mundungus, who did not seem to have paid anything .
attention to this conversation, but he was definitely looking one
The cup is empty. “This solid silver, my son?”
“Yeah,” Sirius said, examining him gently. “The finest fifteenth-century silver forged with goblins, embossed with the Black family’s coat of arms.”
“That will work out, though,” Mundungus said, correcting him .
With his smile.
“Fred—George—NO, JUST LEAVE THEM AWAY!” Mrs. Weasley
he screams.
Harry, Sirius, and Mundungus looked around, surprisingly
later, he falls off the table. Fred and George Shake One
A large roasting pan, a cast iron pot of butter beer, and a heavy
A wooden breadboard, complete with knife, to float in the air
next to them. The strip runs the length of the table and reaches a
They stopped just before the end, leaving a long black stain on the wood finish, the beer lid fell off with a thud, spilling its contents
Everywhere, and the bread knife slipped off the plate and disappeared,
They pointed down and they squirmed wildly, where's Sirius's right
The hand was seconds earlier.
“For HEAVEN’S sake!” said Mrs. Weasley. "there
NO NEED — I GOT THIS OFF — JUST BECAUSE YOU ARE SUPPOSED TO USE THE STATEMENTS NOW YOU ARE
You don’t have to wave your wand at everyone
LITTLE THING!”
“We were just trying to kill a little time!” exclaimed Fred, stepping forward and snatching the bread knife from the table. “I’m sorry Sirius,
Mate — he didn’t want to —”
Harry and Sirius were both laughing. Mundungus, who had fallen heavily from his chair, was swearing as he got to his knees. Crookshanks gave an angry bark and shot out from under the table, from
From it his big blue eyes glowed in the darkness.
“Boys,” Mr. Weasley said, raising the blade towards the middle of
The line, “it’s your mother’s fault, you should show a sense of responsibility now that you’re old —”
“— none of your brothers have caused this kind of trouble!” madam.
Weasley yelled at the twins, throwing a fresh vial of rain beer at them
the kitchen and bathrooms are close as well. “Bill didn’t feel ashamed .
It will Apparate every few feet! Charlie doesn't Charm everything he encounters!
Pierce —”
She stopped dead and caught her breath with a frightened glare at him
A man, whose appearance is simply a tree.
“Let’s eat,” Bill said quickly.
“It looks delicious, Molly,” Lupine said, pouring hot soup onto a plate .
to him and offering it on the table.
For a few minutes there was silence but for the clinking of windows and
Coffee and shuffling chairs so everyone is seated
food. Then Mrs. Weasley turned to Sirius, "I've been meaning to tell you, there's something stuck in that writing desk in . . ."
The living room, kept stirring and stirring. Of course, it can only
Be a jerk, but I thought we should ask Alastor to take a look at
Before we release it.”
“As you wish,” Sirius said with a nonchalant smile.
“The drawers over there are full of doxies too,” said Mrs. Weasley .
on. “I think we might try to fly them tomorrow.”
"I'm looking forward to it," Sirius said. Harry heard the question in her words
sound, but he wasn't sure anyone else had done it.
Opposite Harry, Tonks was feeding Hermione and Ginny with
shifting her nose between mouths. She narrowed her eyes each
moment with the same sad look she used to have on Harry
The bedroom, his nose protruding like Snape's.
It shrinks to something that looks like a balloon, then
A lot of hair came out of each nipple. Apparently this was a
daily meal break, because after a while, Hermione and
Ginny started sucking their favorite nose.
“Do that one like a pigtail, Tonks . . .”
Tonks obliged, and Harry, looking up, had a distinct feeling
that a Dudley woman was staring at him from across the table.
Mr. Weasley, Bill, and Lupin were having serious conversations.
About animals.
“They don’t give anything away yet,” says Bill. “I still can’t do
out whether they believe he’s back or not. 'Of course, they can be happy
It doesn't touch the whole side. Move on from it.”
“I’m sure they’re not going to YouKnow-Who,” Master said.
Weasley, shaking his head. “They got lost too. remember
The same family of monsters he killed last time, somewhere near
Nottingham?”
"I think it was offered to them," Lupine said. “And I’m not
They talk about gold; If they are promised freedoms, we deny them
Of them thousands will be tested. You still don’t have
Anything wrong with Ragnok, Bill?”
“He’s feeling pretty anti-wizard at this point,” Bill says. "he
He hasn’t stopped arguing over the Bagman case, recounting
The Ministry made a fuss, those monsters never got their gold,
You know -"
ⵜⴰⴹⵙⴰ ⵏ ⵜⴰⴹⵙⴰ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵜⵍⴻⵎⵎⴰⵙⵜ ⵏ ⵟⵟⴰⴱⵍⴰ ⵜⴻⵖⵔⴻⵇ ⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵉⴷ ⵢⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎⴻⵏ ⵏ
Bill's words. Fred, George, Ron, and Mundungus were looking
in their places.
“. . . and then,” said Mundungus, tears streaming down his face,
“And then, will you believe it, 'e told me, 'e told me, 'ere, Dung, where .
Didja do I get all of them worms from? 'Cos some Bludger's son went d
Nicked all mine!' And I said, "Nicked all your socks, Will, what's next?"
So you would want something else, then? And will you believe me, children,
The naked gargoyle bought all 'and his monsters up my ass twice what
'e paid in the first place —”
“I don’t think we need to hear any more of your business insights,
Thank you very much, Mundungus,” Mrs. Weasley said softly, as .
Ron fell forward onto the table, howling with laughter.
"I'm sorry, Molly," Mundungus said suddenly, wiping his eyes and .
She looked at Harry. “But, you know, Will interrupted them with Warty Harris .
in the first place so I wasn’t really doing anything wrong —”
"I don't know where you learned about right and wrong, Mundungus, but you seem to have missed out on some great lessons," said the Lady.
Wesley coldly.
Fred and George buried their faces in their pots of cheese beer;
George ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵃⴻⵇⵔⵉⵇ. ⵖⴻⴼ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵙⵙⴻⴱⴱⴰ, Massa Weasley ⵜⴻⵙⵙⴻⵔⵙⴷ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ
She looked kindly at Sirius before getting to her feet and going to get a big
Rhubarb pudding mixture. Harry looked up at his godfather.
"Molly doesn't approve of Mundungus," Sirius said in a
under the sound.
“How is he in the Authority?” Harry said quietly.
“Useful,” Sirius muttered. “He knows all the idiots—well, he does .
Will, looks like one himself. But he is also very loyal to Dumble-
dore, who helped him out of a tight spot once. It pays to have someone like Dung around, hearing things we don’t. But Muli thinks
Trying to keep for dinner is something that goes a long way. She didn't forgive him.
Because he quit his job when he was supposed to be chasing you.”
Three bites of rhubarb crumble and custard later and Harry’s cock was feeling uncomfortable (which was
he said something, as that Dudley jinn used to be). sleeps
His food on a break in the general conversation. Mr. Weasley was leaning back in his chair, looking pissed off, Tonks was hovering
Often, his nose was now back to normal, and Ginny, who had
Crookshanks crawled out from under the table, he was sitting cross-legged on the
ground, tossing a can of butterbeer to follow.
“ⵇⵔⵉⴱ ⴰⴷ ⴷⵢⴰⵡⴻⴹ ⵡⴰⴽⵓⴷ ⵏ ⵓⵙⵓ, ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵍⵉⵖ,” ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ Massa Weasley ⵙ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ.
“Not just, Molly,” Sirius said, pulling out his empty wallet and .
He turned to look at Harry. “You know, I was surprised at you. I thought
The first thing to do when you get here is to start asking
Questions about Voldemort.”
The atmosphere in the room quickly changed Harry which attributed to the arrival of the dementors. Where she knew before she had
She had been relaxed with sleep, and now she was awake, even sleepy. There went a roar.
across the table at the mention of Voldemort's name. Lupine, who
He was about to take a sip of wine, downing his glass upright, looking solemn.
“I did!” Harry said excitedly. 'I asked Ron and Hermione but .
They say we’re not interested in Government, so —”
"And they're right," Mrs. Weasley said. “You’re too young.”
She was sitting upright in her chair, her feet stuck in her
arms, any trace of stinging is gone.
“Since when does someone have to be in the Order of the Phoenix to .
Ask questions?” Sirius asked. “Harry is trapped in that Muggle
Village for a month. He has a right to know what happened —”
“Wait!” interrupted George loudly.
“How did Harry get his questions answered?” Fred said angrily.
“We tried to get stuff out of you a month ago and you .
You haven’t told us a single damn thing!” George said.
“ 'You're too young to be in the Order,' ” Fred said, in a low voice that reminded him of his mother's voice. “It’s not Harry
Heart of age!”
“It’s not my fault they didn’t tell you what the Order does,”
Sirius said casually. “It’s your parents’ decision. Harry, on the other hand
hand -"
“It’s not up to you to decide what’s best for Harry!” said Mrs.
Wesley hurried. His normally ugly face looked horrible. "you
Don’t forget what Dumbledore said, I suppose?”
“Which bit?” Sirius asked politely, but with air as if preparing himself for a fight.
“Why I won’t tell Harry more than he needs to know,” he said .
Mrs. Weasley, placed great emphasis on the last three words.
The heads of Run, Hermione, Fred, and George backed away from Sirius and into the
Mrs. Weasley seemed to be chasing a tennis match. Ginny was sweating.
Between an abandoned beer can, I watched the conversation
with his mouth slightly open. Lupine's eyes locked on Sirius.
“I have no intention of telling him more than he needs to know, Molly,” she said .
Sirius. "But as he was the one who saw Voldemort return" (again,
There was a collective chuckle at the table at the name), “he’s got .
More fair than most to —”
“Not a member of the Order of the Phoenix!” said Mrs.
Wesley. “He’s only five and —”
“— and worried as many in the Order are,” said Sirius,
“It’s more than a few —”
“No one denies what he did!” Mrs. Weasley said, her voice cracking, her fingers trembling on the arms of the chair. “But still —”
“Not a child!” Sirius said casually.
“It’s not great either!” Mrs. Weasley said, color creeping into her
Collections. “Not James, Sirius!”
"I know exactly who he is, thank you, Molly," Sirius said coldly.
“I don’t think you are!” said Mrs. Weasley. “Sometimes, as i
Talk about it, like you think you have a best friend
back!"
“What’s wrong with that?” Harry said.
“What a pity, Harry, that you are not your father, though .
You can tie in so much!” Mrs. Weasley said, her eyes still fixed on Sirius. “You are still in school and you are supported by adults .
You mustn’t forget it!”
“Does that mean I’m an irresponsible stepfather?” demanded Sirius, his
The voice rises.
“It means you were identified quickly, Sirius, and that's why .
Dumbledore reminds you to stay home and —”
"Let's leave my Dumbledore's advice out of this, unless . . ."
Please!" Sirius said quietly.
"Arthur!" said Mrs. Weasley, looking at her husband. “Arthur,
Put me up!”
Mr. Weasley didn't speak at once. He drew his sword and
He cleaned them slowly on his desk, not looking at his wife. Only when
He had changed them affectionately on his nose if he said, “Dumbledore .
She knows the place has changed, Molly. He agreed that Harry would
It must be filled up to a certain degree now that it sits in the lease—”
“Yeah, but there’s a difference between that and inviting him to ask .
Whatever pleases him!”
“Personally,” Lupine whispered, looking at Sirius at last, as .
Mrs. Weasley turned to him quickly, hoping to finally reach the
To get a boyfriend, “I think it’s better if Harry gets the real — not all .
True, Molly, but the general picture — from us, not least .
version from . . . other."
Her expression was mean, but Harry felt sure that Lupine, at least,
He knew that some enhanced wizards had survived Mrs. Weasley's purging.
“Okay,” Mrs. Weasley said, breathing deeply and looking around .
help never came, “perhaps . . . I can see going.
He will be tortured. I’ll just say this: Dumbledore probably has his own reasons for not wanting to know Harry too well, and he’s speaking as someone who has Harry’s best interests at heart —”
“He’s not your son,” Sirius said flatly.
“Good as,” Mrs. Weasley sighed. “Who else does he have?”
“He caught me!”
“Yes,” said Mrs. Wesley, with a smile. “The thing is, it was
It’s hard for you to take care of it while you’re busy.
In Azkaban, wasn’t he?”
Sirius started to rise from his chair.
“Molly, you’re not the only person at this table who cares about .
Harry,” Lupine said quietly. “Sirius, sit down.”
Mrs. Weasley's bottom lip was trembling. Sirius slowly went down into the
His chair, his face yellow.
"I think Harry should be allowed a say in this," Lupine continued.
“He’s old enough to admit himself.”
“I want to know what happened,” Harry said suddenly.
He didn't look at Mrs. Weasley. He was touched by what she said
He spoke of her kindness as a son, but he was also impatient with
She loved it. . . . Sirius was right, he wasn't a child anymore.
“All right,” Mrs. Weasley said, her voice cracking. “Ginny —
Run — Hermione — Fred — George — I want you out of this
food, now.”
There was instant confusion.
“We’re of age!” Fred and George shouted together.
“If Harry tried, why can’t I?” shouted Run.
“Mom, I want to!” said Ginny.
"No!" said Mrs. Weasley, standing up, her eyes wide. "I
it is absolutely forbidden —”
"Molly, you can't handle Fred and George," Mr. Weasley said sadly.
“And the elderly —”
“They’re still at school —”
"But they're legitimately adults now," Mr. Weasley said in shock .
sound.
Mrs. Weasley was now red in the face.
“I—oh, well then, Fred and George can stay, but Ron—”
“Harry will tell me and Hermione whatever you say anyway!” said
Ron's hot. “You didn’t — didn’t you?” He added without a doubt, meeting
Harry's eyes widened.
For a split second, Harry considered telling Ron that he wouldn't
Tell him one word, that he can try and be kept in
Dark to see how nice it is. But that negative vibe disappeared as they
They looked at each other.
“ 'Course I will,” Harry said. Ron and Hermione flinched.
"fine!" said Mrs. Weasley. "Sword! Genie — COME!”
Ginny didn't move faster. They could hear his screams and explosions.
to her mother all the way up the stairs, and when she got to the hall
Ms. Black’s ear-splitting comments moved in there. Lupine insisted.
off to the plate to regain momentum. Only when he returned,
He closed the kitchen door behind him and took his seat at the table.
Also, that Sirius had spoken.
“Okay, Harry . . . What do you want to know?”
Harry took a deep breath and asked the question that had plagued him for a month.
“Where is Voldemort? What does he do? I was trying to find out.
Muggle news,” he said, ignoring the renewed chuckles and chuckles .
In that name, “and there was nothing like it,
No dramatic deaths or anything —”
"That's because there have been no suspicious deaths," he said
Sirius, “Not as far as we know, anyway. . . . And we know a lot.”
"More than he thinks we do anyway," Lupine said.
“How come he stopped killing people?” Harry asked. recognize
that Voldemort had killed more than once in the past year alone.
"Because he didn't want to draw attention to himself right now," Sirius said. “It’s going to be awkward for him. His return
It didn’t work out the way he wanted, you see. He spoiled it.
up."
"Or rather, you've ruined it," Lupine smirked .
smile.
"how?" Harry asked confused.
“You didn’t have to go!” Sirius said. “No one else .
His Death Eaters must have known he would be back. But you live to testify.”
"And the last person he wanted to be informed of his return the moment he did was Dumbledore," Lupine said. “And you’re sure .
Dumbledor knew at once.”
“How does that help?” Harry asked.
“Are you kidding?” Bill said in disbelief. “Dumbledur was a .
Only one you-know-who fucked him before!”
“Thank you, Dumbledore was able to confirm the order of
Phoenix about an hour after Voldemort returned,” Sirius said.
“So what does the Order do?” Harry said, looking at the
in all of them.
“We will do our best to make sure that Voldemort cannot
His plans,” Sirius said.
“How do you know what his plans are?” Harry asked quietly.
"Dumbledore has an idea of ​​the mind," Lupine said, "that's Dumbledore's
Rational thoughts logically seem correct.”
“So what is Dumbledore supposed to be thinking?”
"Well, first, he wants to rebuild his army," Sirius said. "in
In the old days he had great numbers in his command; Wizards and witches who he intimidated or manipulated into following him, His true death
Eaters, a great variety of Dark creatures. You heard him thinking he would
Recruit agents; Well, they’ll be the only band he follows. He’s not trying to take over the Department of Magic with just a
a dozen Death Eaters.”
“So you’re trying to stop him from gaining more followers?”
"We did what we could," Lupine said.
"how?"
“Well, the main thing is to try and convince as many people as possible that YouKnowWho is really back, to put them on their feet .
safety,” Bill said. “However, it looks dangerous.”
"why?"
"Because of the ministry's attention," Tonks said. “You saw Cornelius Fudge after he got back you-know-who, Harry. So, he doesn’t have
He changed his position completely. He completely refused to believe that
happened."
“But why?” Harry said calmly. “Why is he being so stubborn? whether
Dumbledore—”
“Oh, well, you put your finger on the problem,” said Mr. Weasley .
With a crooked laugh. “Drum.”
"Fudge was afraid of him, you see," Tonks said sadly.
“Are you afraid of Dumbledore?” Harry said in disbelief.
"He's afraid of what he's up to," Mr. Weasley said. “You see, Fudge .
He thinks Dumbledore's secret to throw him off. He thinks Dumbledore wants to be Minister of Magic.”
"But Dumbledore wouldn't—"
"Of course not," Mr. Weasley said. " won't
A ministerial job, although many people want to get it when
Millicent Bagnuld retired. Fudge came to power instead, but he
I will never quite forget how much public support Dumbledore had.
Although Dumbledore never asked for the job.”
“Deep down, Fudge knew Dumbledore was smarter than he was,
A much more powerful sorcerer, and in the early days of his ministry he
He was forever asking Dumbledore for help and advice,” Lupine said. "but
He seemed to be enjoying the power again now, and much more confident. He loved being the Minister of Magic, and managed to convince
Himself that he was the virtuous one and Dumbledore just shrugs
suffering because of it.”
“How could he think that?” Harry said angrily. “How can he think
Dumbledore would just make it all up—that I would make it all up?”
“Because accepting that Voldemort’s size would cause problems like .
The department should not have to deal with nearly fourteen years of this,” he said
Sirius snorted. “Fudge just couldn’t bring himself to face it. It’s a lot
More evil to convince himself of Dumbledore’s lies to fool him.”
"You see the problem," Lupine said. “While the department insists
There’s nothing to fear from Voldemort, it’s hard to convince people
It came back, mainly because they never really wanted to believe in the first
place. What’s more, the Ministry relied heavily on the Daily .
The Prophet doesn’t talk about any of Dumbledore’s so-called scandals, so most of the Wizarding public are completely unaware of anything that happened, and that makes them easy targets for
Death Eaters if they use the Imperius Shield.”
“But you tell people, don’t you?” Harry said, looking around.
In Mr. Weasley, Sirius, Bill, Mundungus, Lupine, and Tonks. "you
Will they let people know he’s back?”
They were all emotionlessly silent.
“Well, as everyone thinks I’m a serial killer and the ministry puts a ten thousand pound price on my head, I can barely walk .
away and I’ll start handing out flyers, may I?” Sirius said casually.
"And I'm not the most popular dinner guest with most of the community," Lupine said. “It’s a witch’s part of the job.”
“Tonks and Arthur would lose their jobs at the Ministry if .
They start shooting their mouths,” Sirius said, “and it’s very precious .
So that we have spies within the Ministry, because you can bet Voldemort will.”
“We did manage to convince a couple of people, though,” Master said.
Wesley. “Tonks here, for one — she’s too young to be in .
The Order of the Phoenix one last time, and we'll have Aurors on our side and
Great advantage — Kingsley Shacklebolt was a real gem too. is in the
charge of arresting Sirius, which is why he fed on Ministry information that Sirius was in Tibet.”
“But if none of you leaks information that Voldemort
later —” Harry began.
“Who says none of us leaks information?” Sirius said. "why
D'you think Dumbledore is in trouble like that?”
“What do you mean?” Harry asked.
"They're trying to discredit him," Lupine said. “You don’t know
Everyday Christmas last week? It is said that he was selected from
The Presidency of the International Confederation of Consultants because
He’s getting better, loosing his grip, but not really, he’s tortured
by Ministry spies after making a speech involving Voldemort
return. They demoted him from Chief Warlock in the Wizengamot — the supreme Wizard body — and talk about
He was even stripped of the Order of Merlin, First Class.”
“But Dumbledore said he didn’t care what they did as long as they
Don’t get rid of the Chocolate Frog cards,” Bill said, smirking.
“It’s no laughing matter,” Mr. Weasley said quietly. “If he continues .
He treats the ministry like that, he might end up in prison and
The last thing we want is Dumbledore locked up. While you know-who
He knew Dumbledore was out there and he was serious about what he meant, he would go
Going cautious for a while. If Dumbledore got off track — well,
You knowWho will have a clear field.”
“But if Voldemort is trying to recruit more Death Eaters, it depends .
To make it clear that he’s back, isn’t it?” Harry asked anxiously.
“Voldemort doesn’t march into people’s houses and stomp on their houses .
Front doors, Harry,” Sirius said. “He barks, barks, and barks .
them. He specializes in working undercover. After all, gathering followers is just one thing he cares about, he has other plans
Even then, plans that he can put into effect really quickly, and he’s focusing on them right now.”
“What did he pursue besides his followers?” Harry asked quietly.
He thinks he knows Sirius and Lupine share the past all of
she blinked before Sirius said, “Things he can only get by stealing.”
When Harry continued to look puzzled, Sirius said, "It's like . . ."
A weapon. Something he didn’t have last time.”
“When was he serious before?”
"Yes."
“Like what kind of weapon?” Harry said. “Something more .
of Avada Kedavra — ?”
“That’s enough.”
Mrs. Weasley called from around the corner in the doorway. He had Harry
He hadn't seen his return from Ginny's run upstairs. His hands were
She passed and looked relieved.
“I want you in bed, now. All of you,” she added, looking at .
Fred, George, Ron, and Hermione.
“You can’t control us —” Fred began.
“Look at me,” Mrs. Weasley said. It was getting a little bit like
She looked at Sirius. “You gave Harry too much information. any
More and you can implicate it in Government
through."
"why not?" Harry said quietly. “I’m going to participate, I want to participate, I want to .
fight -"
"No."
It wasn't Mrs. Weasley who spoke this time, but Lupin.
"This pattern only applies to female pilots," he said. “Wizards out of school,” he added, as Fred and George opened up .
Mouth. “There are risks in it that you can’t have an idea about, .
Each of you . . . I think Molly is right, Sirius. We’ve said enough.”
Sirius half shrugged but didn't argue. Mrs. Weasley whispered to her children and Hermione. One by one they got up and
Harry, familiar with the horror, followed.

Chapter Six
THE OLDEST BLACK HOUSE

Mrs. Weasley followed them upstairs with a smile.
“I want you all to go straight to bed, no words,” she said .
He said when they reached the first station. “We have a busy day tomorrow.
I expect Ginny to fall asleep,” she added to Hermione, “so try not to wake up .
Her up.”
“Sleep, yes, of course,” Fred said in a low voice, behind Hermione .
He told them goodnight and they were descending to the next floor. "whether
Ginny wasn't going to wait for Hermione to tell her everything.
They said down, and then I was a flobber bug. . . .”
"All right, Ron, Harry," Mrs. Weasley said on the second ship,
by visiting their bedroom. “Off to bed with you.”
“ 'Night,'' Harry and Ron said to the twins.
“Sleep tight,” Fred said, muttering.
Mrs. Weasley closed the door behind Harry with a soft sigh. the
The bedroom looks, if anything, even smaller than it has
In the first theory. The blue picture on the wall was now breathing heavily.
Slowly and deeply, as if her invisible captor had fallen asleep. Harry
He put on his pajamas, took off his coat, and got into his car.
bed while Run put Owl Treats up in the toilet to cool off
Hedwig and Pigwidgeon, who were freaking out and giggling
Their wings are restless.
“We can’t have them out hunting every night,” Ron explained when he
He pulled on his purple pajamas. "Dumbledore didn't want much
the fox freezes in place, thinking he'll look suspicious. Oh
Yes . . . forget. . . .”
He rushed to the door and locked it.
“What are you doing this for?”
“Kreacher,” Ron said as he turned on the light. “The first night I was
Here he came staying at three o'clock in the morning. Trust me, you
You don’t want to wake up to find him pacing around your room.
anyway . . .” He climbed into his bed, lay under the covers, and
He turned to look at Harry in the dark. Harry could see his class.
By the moonlight streaming in through the sash window. “What are you
count?”
Harry didn't have to ask what Ron thought.
“Well, they didn’t tell us much we couldn’t figure out, did they?”
He said, thinking about everything said below. “I mean, all
They actually said that the poster is trying to stop people from joining
text -"
There was a sharp intake of breath from Ron.
“— demort,” Harry insisted. “When do you start using .
His name? Sirius and Lupine do.”
Ron ignored this last comment. “Yeah, you’re right,” he said. "we
They already knew almost everything they told us, from using the extended ears. The only new bit was —”
crack.
“ME!”
“Keep your voice down, Ron, or Mom’s going to come back up here.”
“You two just Apparated at my feet!”
“Yeah, well, it’s harder in the dark —”
Harry saw the vague shapes of Fred and George jump down.
from Run's bed. There was a bed and breakfast for Harry.
He got a few steps away as George sat down at his feet.
“So, you got there?” George said excitedly.
“The weapon Sirius mentioned?” Harry said.
“Let him rest, even better,” Fred said excitedly, now sitting next to Ron.
“We never heard about that in the old Extendables, did we?”
“What do you think?” Harry said.
“It could be anything,” Fred said.
“But there can be nothing wrong with the sacrifice of Avada Kedavra,
Is it possible there?” Run said. “What’s worse than death?”
“Maybe it’s capable of killing multiple people at once,” George suggested.
"It's probably some pattern of killing humans that's particularly interesting," he said .
Ron with fear.
"He has a cruciatus curse for causing pain," Harry said. "he
It doesn’t need anything more complicated than that.”
There was a pause and Harry knew that the others, like him, were
They wondered what horrors this weapon could do to them.
“So who’s got it now?” George asked.
“I hope it’s our side,” Ron said, sounding a little worried.
"If that's the case, Dumbledore is probably responsible for it," Fred said.
"where?" Ron said quietly. “Hogwarts?”
“Bet he is!” George said. “There he hides the Sorcerer’s Stone!”
“A weapon would be much bigger than a rock, though!” said
run.
“It’s not fair,” Fred said.
“Yeah, height is no guarantee of health,” George says. “Look at the
Jinny.”
“What do you mean?” Harry said.
“You’re not going to be on the receiving end of one of his Bat-Bogeys .
Hexes, have you?”
“Chch!” Fred said, half getting out of bed. "listen!"
They were silent. Footsteps were slowly rising again.
“Mother,” George said, and without further ado, there was a loud cry .
Crack and Harry felt the weight lift off the end of his bed. some
seconds later and they hear the floorboard slamming outside their door;
Mrs. Weasley was casually calling to see if they were talking or
not.
Hedwig and Pigwidgeon exclaimed in pain. The floor plate is cracking.
Another time and I heard her look up to see Fred and
George.
"She doesn't trust us at all, you know," Ron said sheepishly.
Harry was finding it impossible to sleep; The afternoon has
He’s so full of things to think about that he expects to lie
They end up spending hours thinking about it together. He wants to continue talking with
Ron, but Mrs. Weasley was now crouching down again, and .
When she was gone he heard the others make their way upstairs. . . . In fact, people with multiple fingers were slowly moving upwards and
Down outside the bedroom door is Hagrid, the Magic Keeper
The mentor, was saying, “beautiful ones, aren’t they, eh, Harry? We will be
Studyin' weapons in this word. . . .” And Harry saw that those people had
cannons to heads and were determined to meet it. . . . grasp. . . .
The next thing he knew, he was disappearing into a warm ball beneath his skin
the bed sheets closed, and George’s loud voice filled the room.
“My mom says get up, your breakfast is in the kitchen, then she needs
You in the drawing room, there are a lot more girls than she thought
And she found a dead monkey baby under the sofa.”
Half an hour later, Harry and Ron, who had dressed and had a quick breakfast, entered the living room, a long, high-ceilinged room .
On the first floor with dark oak walls covered in dirt stains. the
The carpet kicks up little clouds of dust every time someone puts a foot down.
Around her were long velvet curtains, dark as a grave, that flickered as if
stitches with invisible needles. It was around this point that Mrs. Weasley said,
Hermione, Gin, Fred, and George lined up, all looking fast
peculiar, in that they tie strings about their noses and mouths. Everyone in the
They were also holding a large bottle of black fuel with a straw in the
eventually.
“Cover your faces and take a nap,” Mrs. Weasley told Harry .
and Ron The moment she saw them, she was looking at two more bottles of
A black hermit standing on a table with bare feet. “It’s Doxyside. I have
I’ve never seen a sandwich that bad — what’s that housekeeper doing
The last ten years —”
Hermione's face was half hidden by the tea mask but Harry noticed she was shooting a confused look at Mrs. Weasley at these remarks .
mandatory.
“Kreacher is really big, he probably can’t manage —”
“You would be amazed at what Kreacher can manage when he wants to,
Hermione,” said Sirius, who had just entered the room with a
Blood stains of what appeared to be dead animals. "I was just feeding Buckbeak," he added, in response to Harry's questioning look. “I kept it
Upstairs in my mom’s bedroom. anyway . . . This writing desk. . .”
He set the bag of cereal down on a chair, then bent down to see the locked cupboard that Harry now noticed for the first time,
He was a little nervous.
"Well, Molly, I think that's stupid," Sirius said, smiling .
with a sly grin, “but maybe we should let MadEye have a
shifty at before we let it out — I know my mom can be
Something much deeper.”
"Of course, Sirius," Mrs. Weasley said.
They were both speaking in soft, gentle tones that meant
Harry was clear that neither of them had forgotten their disagreement n
The night before.
A loud, piercing thud came from below, followed suddenly by
the cacophony of moans and groans that Tonks had caused the previous night falling on the soundtrack.
“I keep telling them not to ring the doorbell!” Sirius said irritably and stormed out of the room. They heard him crying.
Down the stairs when Mrs. Black was knocked into the house
Once again: “Fortunes, filthy half-sex, bloody workers, children .
of the market . . .”
"Close the door, please, Harry," Mrs. Weasley said.
It took harry as long as he could to lock the cloning room.
gate; He wanted to hear what was going on around. Sirius has
Obviously he managed to close the curtains on his mother’s painting because she stopped crying. He heard Sirius walk into the
hall, then a chain link on the front door, then a
The deep voice he recognized as Kingsley Shacklebolt’s words, “The words of Hestia .
She just distracted me, so she had Moody's brain now, she thought I'd leave a report for Dumbledore. . . .”
Feeling Mrs. Weasley's eyes in the back of his head, Harry sheepishly closed the dining room door and rejoined the doxy party.
Mrs. Weasley was bent over to check the doxies page in
The Gilderoy Lockhart Museum of Pets, which remained open on
The canvas.
“Of course, you very, you need to be careful, because doxies are biting and .
Their teeth are venomous. I have a breathing bottle here, but I will
But no one needs it.”
She straightened up, leaned back in front of the curtains, and called them all forward.
“When I say that word, start smiling immediately,” she said.
“They’re going to come flying at us, I expect, but he said about single guns .
A good squirt will satisfy them. When they are no longer moving, just throw
of them in this bottle.”
She carefully stepped out of the line of their fire and picked up her own.
Buzzing. “All right — check!”
Harry was only awake for a few seconds when someone woke up
Doxy flew from a tail in the air, wings sparkling like a bell
It snarled, sharp little razor-like teeth bared, its kitten-like body bent
With stiff black hair and his four little arms clasped frantically. Harry
He caught him filled in the face with a spray of Doxycide; He gathered in the air.
and landed, with a surprisingly sounding thunk, on the crumpled car underneath.
Harry picked it up and threw it in the trash.
“Fred, what are you doing?” Mrs. Weasley said suddenly. “Switch this
At once and throw it away!”
Harry looked to his side. There was Fred holding a duke fighting between
His index finger and thumb.
“Righto,” Fred grinned, and shoved doxy squarely in the face .
To faint, but the moment Mrs. Weasley's foot turned, he
produced with a smile.
"We'd like to test the doxy poison for our Skiving Snackboxes," George said to Harry under his breath.
Deftly spraying two doxies at once as they rise straight for his
Nose, Harry moved closer to George and smiled from the closeness.
of his mouth, “What Are Skiving Snackboxes?”
“Range of sweetness to make you sick,” George chuckles, holding a
A menacing eye on Mrs. Weasley's shoulder. “Not terribly ill, head, just sick .
It’s supposed to pull you out of class when you feel like it. Fred and I have
They were adding them this summer. They are bi-coloured, brightly colored plants. If you eat half an orange of Puking Pastilles, you
Put up. Moment you’re rushed out of the lesson for the hospital flight, you eat that half-assed —”
“ '— that restores you to your full health, that allows you to follow .
recreational activities of your choice in an hour that could be wasted on unnecessary pain. That’s what we are
They’re putting on news, anyway,” Fred said quietly, who had .
Out of Mrs. Weasley's line of sight and she was currently hunting down some horses
doxies from the floor and added them to his pocket. “But they still
I need a little work. Nowadays, our testers have a bit of trouble holding the shell down long enough to swallow the sharp end.”
“Testers?”
“We are,” Fred said. “We take it in turns. George made belly parties — we both tried the Belly Bread Nougat —”
"Mom thinks we're dueling," George said.
“The comic shop is still going, then?” Harry grinned, pretending to turn on the bridge of his nose.
“Well, we didn’t get a chance to get seats,” said Fred, 1990.
He lowered his voice further as Mrs. Weasley shook her head s
scarf before returning to crime, “so we run it as a mail-order service at the moment. We put entries in the Daily
Christmas last week.”
“Thank you all, buddy,” George said. “But don’t worry . . . mom
He doesn't have a book. She no longer reads Everyday Christmas, due to
She told lies about you and Dumbledore.”
Harry smiled. He had forced the Weasley twins to take the thousand Galleon prize money he had won in the Triwizard Tournament .
to help them fund their dream of opening a comic shop, but he was
He’s still happy to know that his contribution to the success of their plans goes unrecognized
For Mrs. Weasley, she didn't think that running a fairy shop was
enough work for two of his sons.
Dedoxing the curtains took most of the morning. compliance
It was past midnight when Mrs. Weasley finally removed her protective hood,
She sank into a rolling chair, and reappeared gently again, for she sat on the carpet of dead chickens. No more doors
longevity; They are rendered passive and restrained from blowing the whistle; Unconscious doxies remain trapped in the tub next to them
The bowl of their dirty eggs, in which Crookshanks was now lurking
And Fred and George were painting the baby eye.
“I guess we’ll deal with those after lunch.”
Mrs. Weasley pointed to the dusty glass-fronted couch.
on either side of the table. they were fraught with the same concerns.
Assortment of accessories: selection of earrings, lashes, necklaces
Snakeskin, lots of language-inspired silver chalices
Harry couldn't understand and, what he didn't like at all, an ornate crystal bowl with a large opal set at the top was filled with whatever Harry was .
Sure there was blood.
The shrill doorbell rang again. Everyone looked at Mrs. Weasley.
“Stay here,” she insisted, carrying the bag of cereal like Mrs.
Black screeches started up again from down below. “I’ll bring
Some sandwiches.”
She left the room and closed the door gently behind her. Suddenly,
Everyone rushed to the window to look down at the door.
They could see the top of a crude gingerbread head and an unbalanced stack of cookies.
“Mondungus!” Hermione said. “What did he get all the balls for?”
“He’s probably looking for a safe place to keep them,” Harry said. “Not
that what he did that night must cover me?
Would you pick up a dodgy pot?”
“Yeah, you’re right!” Fred said, as she opened the front door; Mundungus threw his pitchers into it and disappeared from sight.
“Blimey, my mom didn’t like that. . . .”
He and George walked over to the door and stood nearby and listened
willingly. Mrs. Black's voice stopped again.
"Mundungus is talking to Sirius and Kingsley," Fred smirked, .
stories with a twist. “I can’t hear right . . . Have you counted
Can we blame extended ears?”
“It’s probably worth it,” George said. “I can sneak upstairs and get a
pair -"
But at the same moment there was an explosion of sound from the
The bottom covered with Extendable Ears is not necessary. All of the
They could clearly hear what Mrs. Weasley was screaming at the top of the
His voice.
“WE DO NOT PROTECT ANYONE WHO IS STOLEN .
commodity!"
“I like to hear my mom yell at somebody else,” Fred said, s
The satisfied smile on his face as he opened the door an inch or so to let
Mrs. Weasley's voice to spread across the room better. “He acts like that .
Good change.”
“— WE DON’T COMPLETE AT ALL, LIKE WE DON’T EVEN
DESIGNED TO TAKE OVER WITHOUT TRANSPORTATION OF THE PINTS STOLEN INTO THE HOME —”
“The obstacles make her get into her behavior,” George says, shrugging .
his head. “You have to take her out early, otherwise she will build a
The boiling head and lasts for hours. And she was dying to have
Go to Mundungus ever since he left quickly when he had to
I’ll follow you, Harry—and there goes Sirius’ mother again—”
Mrs. Weasley's voice dropped between fresh sobs and moans from
The portraits in the cell. George made to close the door to drown
noise, but before he could do so, a house elk stormed into the room.
Despite the dirty rag hanging like a rag around his middle, he
He was completely naked. It looks very old. Her skin looked very
Times were too big for him and although he was as thin as all the house idiots, there
He was a measure of white hair sticking out of his large ears like a potato. is
His eyes were red with blood and water, and his fleshy nose was huge.
and through the nose.
The elf completely ignored Harry and the rest. They act like
Although she cannot see them, she moves slowly, quickly and
Carefully, towards the far end of the room, he mutters under his breath
All the while in a low voice, deep as a rattlesnake, “. . . Smells like
Shit and murderer to begin, but not good, dirty old blood
The kidnapper and his sons are defiling the house of my Lord, my poor
A woman, if she knew, if she knew of the mess left in her house,
What was she going to say to old Kreacher, his bastard, the Mudbloods
and wolves and servants and butchers, poor old Kreacher, what can
did. . . .”
“Hello, Kreacher,” Fred said very loudly, shutting the door with a .
snap.
The house boar froze in his tracks, stopped the muzzle, then gave
A very bright and very unconvincing surprise premise.
“Kreacher didn’t see young master,” he said, turning and .
You bow to Fred. Still facing the car, he added, in perfect tone,
“Nasty brat of a bloody betrayer he is.”
"Sorry?" George said. “He didn’t take that last step.”
“Kreacher didn’t say anything,” said the stranger, with a double whistle to George,
He added in a clear voice, “and there’s his twin, the younger unnatural .
The animals are.”
Harry didn't know whether to laugh or not. The elf is straight.
Upstairs, he’s looking at them all kindly, and he seems convinced that
They couldn’t hear as he continued to move.
“. . . And there was Mudblood, standing there bold as steel, oh if
My wife knew, oh how she would cry, and there was a new baby, Kreacher
He didn't know his name, what he was doing here, Kreacher didn't
know . . .”
"This is Harry, Kreacher," Hermione whispered. “Harry
network.”
Kreacher's bright eyes blinked faster and more furiously than before.
"Mudblood is talking to Kreacher like she's my friend, . . ."
If she had seen Mrs. Kreacher in such company, oh what would she have done
say -"
“Don’t call him Mudblood!” Said Run and Ginny together, very
With anger.
“It doesn’t matter,” Hermione whispered, “he’s not in his right .
mind, it doesn’t know what it is —”
“Don’t kid yourself, Hermione, he knows exactly what he’s talking about,”
Fred said, looking at Kreacher with extreme disgust.
Kreacher was still smiling, his eyes fixed on Harry.
" true? Is it Harry Potter? Kreacher can see the wounds, he must be
Of course it was the boy who stopped Mr. Dark, he asked Kreacher
How he did it—”
“Aren’t we all, Kreacher?” Fred said.
“What do you want anyway?” George asked.
Kreacher's big eyes looked up at Georg e.
“Kreacher is cleaning up,” he said softly.
“The most likely story,” said a voice behind Harry.
Sirius returned; He was staring at the box from the window. The noise in the hall stopped; Maybe Mrs. Weasley is
Mundungus moved their charge down towards the kitchen. in
looking at Sirius, Kreacher dressed himself in a dark cloak with embarrassment
He scratched his nose like a toad on the floor.
“Stand up straight,” Sirius growled. “Now, what are you
I?"
“Kreacher is cleaning up,” the fox replied. “Kreacher lives to serve the .
Black’s mansion—”
“— and it’s getting filthier every day,” Sirius said.
“Master always liked his little jokes,” Kreacher said, and again he shrugged, .
And he continued in a small voice, “The Master was an immature pig .
The one who broke his mother’s heart —”
"My mother is heartless, Kreacher," Sirius growled. "she
She kept herself alive out of pure greed.”
Kreacher got down again and said, “Whatever Master says,” and then .
he exclaimed, “Master should never wipe the dirt off his mother .
Dolls, my poor wife, what if she saw Kreacher
You served him, how he hated it, how he despised it—”
“I asked what you were wearing,” Sirius said coldly. " whenever .
You look like you cleaned up, you accidentally stole something
Your room so we can’t hurt her.”
“Kreacher wasn’t going to move anything from his position in 2012.
The master’s house,” said the Stag, and then he sighed very quickly, “The wife shall .
Wouldn’t forgive Kreacher if that mouse was thrown, seven centuries
He's in the family, Kreacher has to save him, Kreacher won't let
The masters and the bloodthirsty servants and their brothers have ruined it —”
“I think it probably is,” Sirius said, casting a warning look at .
The bottom wall. “She will put on another permanent control spell .
In the middle of it, I don’t doubt it, but if I can get rid of it I certainly will.
Now go, Kreacher.”
It seemed Kreacher couldn’t disobey direct orders; However, the look he gave Sirius as he passed him was confusing
of deep regret and looks all the way out of the room.
“— he’s back from Azkaban beating Kreacher around, oh my .
Poor Mistress, what if she saw the house now, scum living in it, her treasures lying around, she swore it wasn't her son
And he came back, they say he was the last one too —”
“Keep looking I’ll be a waiter!” Sirius said bitterly, and
He slammed the door shut.
“Sirius, he’s not right in the head,” Hermione whispered, “I .
Don’t think he realized we could hear him.”
“He’s been alone for a long time,” Sirius said, “taking instructions from .
picture of my mom and talking to himself, but he was always mean
little -"
“If you just let him go,” Hermione said hopefully, “maybe —”
“We can’t take him out, he knows too much about the Order,” he said .
Sirius snapped. “And anyway, the anxiety is going to kill him. It suggests that
Whoever leaves this house, see how he gets it.”
Sirius walked across the room, where Kreacher's
He was trying to control the length of the line. Harry and the others followed.
The painting looks very old; It was swollen and looked like
although doxies have crowded it in places; However, the gold thread
with which it was forged still shines well enough to show
They had a family tree that went back a long time (as far as Harry could tell) to
Middle Ages. The big words at the top of the post read:
Black’s Oldest House
“Tojur Pur”
“You’re not here!” Harry said, before scanning under the
tree.
“I used to be there,” Sirius said, pointing to a small, dark, hairy creature .
a hit in the nose, often like cigarette smoke. “Sweet Grandma
They put up with me after I ran away from home — Kreacher loves so much
He mutters a story under his breath.”
“Did you run away from home?”
“When I was about sixteen,” Sirius said. “I’ll have enough.”
“Where did you go?” Harry asked, looking at him.
“Your father’s place,” Sirius said. “Your grandparents were really good .
therefore; They had me adopted as a second child. Yes, I changed clothes.
at your father's during the school holidays, then when I was seventeen I got my own place, Uncle Alphard left me a nice place
Bit of gold — it’s sprayed here too, maybe that’s why —
Anyway, after that I took care of myself. I was always welcome at Mass.
and Mrs. Potter for Sunday lunch, though.”
"But . . . why did you . . ?”
"leave?" Sirius smiled bitterly, and ran a hand through his long unruly hair. “Because I love all of them so much: my parents, s
Their pureblood mania, convinced that being Black makes you king . . . My idiot brother, too soft to believe them . . .
he is."
Sirius tapped a finger at the base of the tree, in the name
Regulus is black. The date of death (approximately five years earlier) follows the date of birth.
'He was younger than me,' Sirius said, 'and a very good son, like .
I was constantly reminded.”
“But he’s dead,” Harry said.
“Yeah,” Sirius said. “Stupid . . . He joined the Death Eaters.”
“You’re kidding!”
“Come on, Harry, you haven’t seen enough of this house to say .
What kind of wizards is my family?” Sirius said casually.
“Are they — are your parents Death Eaters too?”
“No, no, but believe me, they thought Voldemort had the right .
The idea is, they’re all for spreading Wizarding Womanhood, getting
Enter the Muggle-born and pureblood in the ranks. They weren’t
Alone too, there were a few people, before Voldemort showed
his true form, who claimed to have a better idea of ​​things. . . .
got cold feet when they saw what he was prepared to do to get
The power, though. But I think my parents thought Regulus was a nice little puppy when he first came in.”
“Was he killed by an Auror?” Harry asked quietly.
“Oh no,” Sirius said. “No, he was killed by Voldemort. or on
Voldemort’s effects, maybe even more, I doubt Regulus was significant
he got killed by Voldemort in person. From what I found
After his death, he got so far, and then got frustrated with what was
They asked to work and promised to show up later. So, you don’t just give your
confession to Voldemort. It’s life of service or death.”
“Breakfast,” Mrs. Weasley’s voice said.
She was holding her cane proudly in front of her, balancing a large balance
a cupboard full of sandwiches and cake in his lap. She was very black in
Face and still looking happy. Others joined her, eager to
Some food, but Harry stayed with Sirius, who was closer to
The table.
“I haven’t looked at that in years. There was Finas Nigellus . . . my
Great-grandfather, see? The Most Infamous Hogwarts Headmaster
had . . . and aramint multiflua . . . my mother's cousin. . . I tried
backed by a departmental bill to make Muggle hunting a crime . . . and
Dear Aunt Iladura . . . She started a family tradition of beheading.
house-elves when they get too old to carry cups of tea . . . sure,
Each time the family produced one-half entitlement they were rewarded. I take it Tonks isn't here. Maybe that’s why Kreacher wouldn’t
Take his advice — he has to do what everyone wants in
the family asked. . . .”
“Are you and Tonks related?” Harry asked, surprised.
“Oh yes, his mother, Andromeda, is my favorite cousin,” she said .
Sirius, looking carefully at the table. "No, Andromeda isn't here
Ama, look —”
He pointed to another shot of the crossfire between two names,
Bellatrix and Narcissa.
“Andromeda’s sisters are still here because they made lovely and respectable pureblood marriages, but Andromeda married a Muggleborn, Ted Tonks, so —”
Sirius mimed shyly at the kiss and laughed heartily.
Harry, however, didn't laugh; He had been looking at those names a lot.
Right along with Andromeda’s ring. Two lines of gold
The note links Narcissa the Scarlet to Lucius Malfoy, a
the vertical gold line from their names earned Draco's name.
“You’re related to the Malfoys!”
"The pureblood families are all related to each other," Sirius said. “If you
Only allow your sons and daughters to marry pureblood
The selection is so small, there are hardly any of us left. Molly and I
cousins ​​by marriage to Arthur something like a second cousin
Once removed. But there’s no use looking for them here — unless .
Some family was a bunch of bloodhounds and Weasleys.”
But Harry was currently staring at the name to the left of Andromeda's .
By fire: Bellatrix Black, who is connected by a double line to Rodolphus Lestrange.
“Lestrange . . .” Harry said aloud. The name is somewhat confusing.
In his memory; He noticed it from somewhere else, but for once he
He couldn’t think where, though it gave him a strange feeling
In the pit of his stomach.
"They're in Azkaban," Sirius whispered.
Harry looked at him curiously.
“Bellatrix and her husband Rudolf entered with Barty Crutch, .
Junior,” Sirius said in a low voice. “Brother of Rudolphus,
Rabastan, he was with them too.”
And he remembered Harry: He had seen Bellatrix Lestrange inside .
Dumbledore's Pensieve, that strange device in which thoughts and
Studies can be observed: tall blonde woman with sharp eyes,
who stood at his trial and declared his continued loyalty to
Lord Voldemort, her pride in trying to find him after his
The downfall is her belief that one day she will be rewarded for
His truth.
“You didn’t say it was yours —”
“Does it matter if he’s my cousin?” exclaimed Sirius. “As I am
I’m worried, it’s not my family. She wasn’t my family. I
I haven’t seen her since I was your age, unless you count a reference to her
He was admitted to Azkaban. You think I’m proud to have neighbors like
her?"
“I’m sorry,” Harry stammered, “I didn’t mean to—I was just surprised, .
That’s all —”
“It doesn’t matter, don’t apologize,” Sirius said with a sudden smile. he
He turned from the table, hands deep in his pockets. "I don't
Looks like he’s back here,” he said, looking around the living room. "I
I don’t think I’ll ever be stuck in this house again.”
Harry understood completely. He knew how he would feel if
They forced, when he grew up and thought he was out of place
Forever, to come back to live in the fourth square, Privet Drive.
"It's good for the headquarters, of course," Sirius said. “My father reacted .
Every security code known to Wizardkind on him when he was alive
here. It’s never done, so Muggles can’t come and chat — it seems .
They'd want to — and now Dumbledore had increased his protection, you'd be hard-pressed to find safe shelter anywhere. Dumbledore's
SecretKeeper of the Government, you know — nobody can find a copy unless he tells them himself where he is — that’s what Moody pointed out .
They showed you yesterday, it was from Dumbledore. . . .” Sirius offered a
A short, whisper-like laugh. “If only my parents could see the use they put me through .
so far. . . Well, my mom’s personality should give you some clue. . . .”
He frowned for a moment, then sighed.
“I don’t mind if I can just get out occasionally and do something useful. I asked Dumbledore if I could walk you home
I’m listening — like Snuffles, obviously — to give you a little insight .
Together, what do you think?”
Harry felt like his stomach had ground into dust.
carpet. He never once thought about talking from dinner n
Last evening; In the joy of giving back to the people he
I liked it so much, of hearing everything that was going on, it had all
His mind went blank. However, in Sirius’s words, the tone of the
Fear returned to him. He glanced at Hermione and the Weasleys, all
He looked at their sandwiches, and thought about how he would feel if
He went back to Hogwarts without him.
“Don’t worry,” Sirius said. Harry looked up and saw that Sirius
He was watching him. “I’m sure they’ll fire you, there was .
Definitely something in secret international law about allowing you to use magic to save your own life.”
“But if they release me,” Harry said, quietly, “I can come back .
Here to live with you?”
Sirius smiled sadly.
“Let’s see.”
“I would have felt a lot better about the conversation if I had known I wouldn’t have to go .
Back to the Dursleys,” Harry warned him.
"They must be bad if you like this place," Sirius growled.
“Hurry, both of you, or there’ll be no food left,” Mrs. Weasley said .
called.
Sirius let out another big sigh and turned a dark gaze to the screen,
And he and Harry went to walk with the others.
Harry tried his best not to think about the conversation while they poured the iced tea that evening. Luckily for him, it was work
This one requires a lot of attention, as a lot of things are there
Turns out not many want to leave their leather couches. Sirius grabbed a
bad moisture from silverware; Within seconds, his trapped hand had
She developed a dish that was as useless as a cup of heavy coffee.
“It’s okay,” he says, inspecting the hand in appreciation before lightly grabbing it and turning his head back to normal, “I have to .
Be Wartcap powder there.”
He put the box aside in the basket where they had put
heating cabinets; Harry saw George clench his fist.
carefully into a cloth a few moments later and sew the purse into his already
a pocket full of doxy.
They found an unattractive silver tool, something
Like the multi-legged dragon, who bit Harry’s arm
like a spider when he picked it up, and tried to bite his
chest; Sirius grabs her and smothers her with a heavy book called .
The Nobility of Nature: A Biography of Women. There was a music box.
which emits a rattling, rattling noise when wounded, and all
They find themselves becoming increasingly aggressive and arguing that Ginny
He’s entitled to get that head closed; Also a heavy asshole is none of these
They can open, many conventional locks and, in a lock box, a
The Order of Merlin, First Class, awarded to Sirius’s grandfather for “Services to the Ministry.”
“It means he gave them a gold rod,” Sirius said contemptuously, .
Throw a trophy in the garbage bag.
Several times, Kreacher sneaks into the room and tries to
He pulls things out from under his shirt and looks smart
Every time they caught him in it. When Sirius brought a large gold
A black ringed ring from his hand Kreacher actually appeared in
Tears in anger and he left the room crying under his breath and calling.
Sirius' names Harry had never heard before.
"It's my father's," Sirius said, pocketing the ring.
“Kreacher wasn’t as fond of him as my mother was, but I still
Caught him ripping through an old pair of my dad’s pants last week.”
Mrs. Weasley kept them all very busy over the next few days.
The dining room took three days to paint; The conclusion is the same
Unwanted items left in include the Black family wooden plaque,
who resisted all their attempts to take him off the air, and
a shaky writing desk; Moody didn’t go down to the front of the station, so
They couldn’t be sure what was inside.
They moved from the drawing room to the dining room about
Earth where they found giant spiders like hats roaming in
Dresser (Run rushes out of the room to make a cup of tea and doesn’t
Return for an hour and a half). China, which gets the red line
and motto, gets thrown all unceremoniously into a sack by Sirius, and
One case met a set of antique pictures in tarnished silver frames,
All occupants screamed hysterically as they were covered in gas
He was crushed.
Snape may have referred to their activities as “cleansing,” but according to Harry, they were actually waging war on the house, which a
Very good conflict, aided and abetted by Kreacher. The house elephant took
They show up wherever they gather, his obsession becomes
with a lot of aggression as he tries to remove anything that is
It can from smoking houses. Sirius went so far as to threaten him.
with clothes, but Kreacher steers him away from the water and says,
“Master should do whatever Master wants,” before turning and declaring very loudly, “but Master didn’t turn Kreacher, no, because .
Kreacher knew what they were thinking, oh yes, he was thinking against
Dark Lord, yes, with these Mudbloods and villains and villains. . . .”
At this, Sirius, ignoring Hermione's protests, attacks Kreacher with
the hem of his robe and threw him lightly from the room.
The doorbell rang several times a day, which was a sign of Sirius
Mom would start screaming again, and for Harry and the others to try to hear the woman coming, though they realized little of
Key takeaways and expressions they can make
Minimize before Mrs. Weasley reminds them of their assignments. Snape leaves
And they left the house several more times, though to Harry's surprise they did
He did not come face to face; He also keeps an eye on his transformation
The Headmaster, Professor McGonagall, looks so ridiculous in Muggle clothes
and dress, though she also appears to be working hard to keep up.
Sometimes, however, visitors stay to help; Tonks joined them.
For a memorable afternoon discovering a veteran
ghoul lurking in a shack upstairs, and Lupine, who was staying in the
Home was Sirius but who left him for long periods to make a fortune
Worked for the Authority, helped them run a grandfather clock that had
It developed the unpleasant habit of firing heavy machine guns at passers-by.
Mundungus did himself a favor in Mrs. Weasley's eyes by saving Ron from a bunch of old grunts he'd tried to put out when he'd taken them off their couch.
Even though he was still sleeping badly, he still had dreams
Over the locked hallways and doors that made his cock twitch, Harry
He had dared to have fun for the first time all summer. As long as he
He was done he was happy; When the action stops, however, whenever the
He puts his guard down, or lies exhausted in bed watching vague shadows move across the ceiling, the next Ministry thought .
Slide came back to him. Fear clenched inside him like vibrations when he
He wondered what would happen to him if he was pushed away. the
The idea was so terrifying that he couldn’t say it out loud, even
Ron and Hermione, though he often saw them talking together and throwing a worried look in his direction, followed in
I didn’t mention it. Sometimes he can't stop imagining
shows him a faceless department official rocking his shirt
Both and ordered him back to the Dursleys . . . But he didn’t want to
go. He was determined for that. He would return here to Grimmauld Place and live with Sirius.
He felt like a brick dropped in his stomach when Mrs. said.
Weasley turned to her at dinner on Wednesday evening and said .
Quietly, “I got your best clothes ready for tomorrow morning, Harry,
And I want you to wash your hair tonight too. Good first impression
He can do wonders.”
Ron, Hermione, Fred, George, and Ginny all stopped talking and
Look at him. Harry nodded and tried to keep eating his pastries.
But his mouth became dry and he could not swallow.
“How do I get there?” Mrs. Weasley asked, trying to sound
It doesn't hurt.
"Arthur will take you to work with him," Mrs. Weasley said sternly.
Mr. Weasley smiled proudly at Harry across the table.
“You can wait in my office until it’s time to speak,” he said.
Harry looked at Sirius, but before he could ask the question,
Mrs. Wesley replied.
"Professor Dumbledore doesn't think it's a good idea for Sirius to
Go with you, and I must say I—”
“— think he’s right,” Sirius said through clenched teeth.
Mrs. Weasley pursed her lips.
“When did Dumbledore tell you that?” Harry said, looking at the
Sirius.
"He came last night, when you were in bed," Mr. Weasley said.
Sirius carefully poked at a potato with his fork. Harry put down his
His eyes are on his screen. Thinking that Dumbledore was in
house on the night of his broadcast and didn't ask to see him do it
I feel, if that were possible, too.

Chapter Seven
Ministry of Magic

Harry woke up at half past five the next morning in a rush and
Completely like someone screamed in his ear. For some
For those moments he lay motionless as the sight of hearing filled every
A little piece of his mind, and then, unable to swallow it, he climbed out of bed
And he put on his glasses. Mrs. Weasley put her soaked
jeans and t-shirt at the foot of his bed. Harry leaned into them.
The blank image on the wall moved again.
Ron was sprawled on his back with his mouth wide open, slowly
asleep. He didn't move as Harry crossed the room and went out to
floor, and shut the door gently behind him. I’m trying not to
Think about the next time he saw Ron, when they were probably no longer
Be with your fellow students at Hogwarts, Harry walked silently down the corridor,
He passed the heads of Kreacher's ancestors and entered the dungeon.
He had expected it to be empty, but it wasn't. When he reached
The door hears the echo of voices on the other side and
When he pushed it open he saw Mr. and Mrs. Weasley, Sirius, Lupine,
and Tonks sat there almost as if they were waiting for him.
They all wore their clothes except for Mrs. Weasley, who was wearing a suit,
Gray leather jacket. She sprang to her feet the moment he entered.
“Yesterday,” she said as she pulled up her wand and hurried over to the .
Fire.
“Mm-morning, Harry,” Tonks whispered. His hair was red and
Curly this morning. “Slept well?”
“Yeah,” Harry said.
“I’ve been up all night,” she said, with another tear .
yawn. “Come sit down. . . .”
She pushed out a chair, knocking over the one next to her in the process.
“What do you want, Harry?” Mrs. Weasley called out. "mass?
Muffins? Kippers? Bacon and eggs? bread?"
“Just — just warmth, thanks,” Harry said.
Lupine looked at Harry and then at Tonks, "What do you say . . ."
About Scrimgeour?”
"Oh . . . yeah . . . well, we should be a little more careful, there's
They asked me and Kingsley rhetorical questions. . . .”
Harry felt vaguely relieved that he wasn't being forced into the
conversation. His insides were churning. Mrs. Weasley had placed before her two slices of fire and marble; He tried to eat,
But it was like a blackboard. Mrs. Weasley sat on her other
side and started to mess with his t-shirt, labeling in it and
With a thin layer on the legs. He hopes she doesn’t blame him.
“. . . And I’ll tell Dumbledore I can’t do night duty tomorrow, I’m just taking it easy,” Tonks finished, swallowing hard.
“I’ll spare you,” Mr. Weasley said. “I’m fine, I have a report for
Keep going no matter what. . . .”
Mr. Weasley wasn't wearing a suit of armor but he was wearing a pair of striped trousers and an old bomber jacket. He turned from Tonks to
Harry.
“How are you feeling?”
Harry shrugged.
“It will all be over soon,” Mr. Weasley insisted. “In a few hours'.
Time to clear it up.”
Harry didn't say anything.
“The interview was on my floor, in Amelia Bones’ office. She is the head of
The magical law enforcement agency and it will
Be asked you.”
"Amelia Bones isn't well, Harry," Tonks insisted. “She’s fair,
She’ll listen to you.”
Harry frowned, still unable to think of anything to say.
“Don’t worry,” Sirius whispered. “Be smart and take
to things.”
Harry nodded again.
"The law is on your side," Lupine growled. “Even underaged wizards are allowed to use magic in life-threatening situations.”
Something very cold ran down the back of Harry's neck; for one
At that moment, he thought someone had placed a warning shot.
on him again, and then he knew that Mrs. Weasley was insisting on him .
Hair with damp scalp. She pressed hard on the top of his head.
“Doesn’t it get soft?” She said calmly.
Harry shook his head.
Mr. Weasley checked his watch and glanced at Harry.
“I think we’ll go now,” he said. “We’re a little early, but I think we’ll
You’re better off there than trapped here.”
“Okay,” Harry said automatically, putting on his flamethrower and reaching for the .
His feet.
"Good luck, Harry," Tonks said, tugging at his arm.
“Good morning,” Lupine said. “I’m sure it will be fine.”
“And if it’s not,” Sirius growled, “I’m going to see Amelia Bones for
you. . . .”
Harry smiled sadly. Mrs. Weasley hugged him.
“We all get our feet wet,” she said.
“Right,” Harry said. "Then . . . see you later then.”
He followed Mr. Weasley up and down the hall. He can hear
Sirius' mother groaned sleepily behind her curtain. Mr. Weasley
They locked the door and walked out into the cold, gray evening.
“You don’t normally go to work, do you?” Harry asked, as
They started walking briskly across the platform.
"No, specifically Apparate," Mr. Weasley said, "but obviously you can't, . . ."
And I think it’s great to reach out in a non-magical way . . .
It made a good impression, depending on what they were being punished for. . . .”
Mr. Weasley kept his hand inside his pants as they walked. Harry
He knew she was wrapped around his neck. The damaged roads are
It was almost dark, but when they reached the wretched little Underground tunnel they found it already packed with early morning passengers.
Like every time he found himself near Muggles walking .
For their daily chores, Mr. Weasley was too busy to contain his excitement
enthusiasm.
“By the way it’s beautiful,” he whispered, pointing to the bus ticket .
The machines. “Intelligently amazing.”
“They’re out of order,” Harry said, pointing to the spell.
“Yes, but even so . . .” Mr. Weasley said, looking angry at them.
They buy their gifts instead from a sleepwalking guard
(Harry handled the issue, as Mr. Weasley wasn’t much better
with Muggle money) and five minutes later they were riding in a
an underground train whisked them away to central London.
Mr. Weasley sat up grimly and examined the map of the Underground above the windows again.
“Four packs, Harry . . . Three stops left now . . . Two stops to go,
Harry . . .”
They stopped at a station in the heart of London and were dropped off from
train in a line of orderly men and women carrying placards. up
The escalators are gone, through the ticket booth (Mr. Weasley
He was pleased with how stile ate his ticket), and left
On a main street full of great looking buildings, already
It’s full of action.
“Where are we?” Mr. Weasley said dryly, and for a heart-wrenching moment, Harry thought that they had gotten off at the wrong clock even though Mr. Weasley kept referring to the map; But a
The second later said, “Oh yes . . . This way, Harry,” and led him down .
side street.
“I’m sorry,” he said, “but I didn’t come by train and everything looks fine
It was different from Muggle thought. Of course never
They even used the visitor gate before.”
The further they walked, the more the buildings became more and more unstable, until at last they came to a corridor with many stairs .
dilapidated-looking offices, a closet, and an exposed toilet bowl.
Harry had expected a more suitable position for the Ministry.
of Magic.
“Here we are,” Mr. Weasley whispered, pointing to an old black .
a telephone exchange, which had few glass windows and stood against a heavily graffitied wall. “Behind you, Harry.”
He opened the door to the telephone booth.
Harry joins in, wondering what on earth this is about. Sir.
Weasley stepped to Harry's side and closed the door. He was a
fits are tough; Harry was hunched over against the mobile device, i
She was peering desperately at the wall as if someone was trying to
Open it. Mr. Weasley arrived in front of Harry for the key.
" Sir. Weasley, I think this might be illegal too,” Harry said.
“No, no, I think it’s fine,” Mr. Weasley said, holding the headphone .
above his head and looking down at the watch. “Let’s see . . . six . . .” called
percent, “two . . . Four. . . and four more . . . and another
two . . .”
As the knife was gently returned to its place, a cold female voice
It rings inside the phone box, not from the notification on Mass.
Weasley's hand, but so loud and clear as to be invisible
A woman was standing in front of them.
“Welcome to the Ministry of Entertainment. Please state your name and
business."
“er . . .” Mr. Weasley said, apparently unsure if he should speak .
online or not; He agreed with a kiss
to his ear, “Arthur Weasley, misuse of muggle things, here .
to help Harry Potter, who was asked to attend a disciplinary hearing
Original. . . .”
“Thank you,” the woman said coldly. “Seer, please give
Badge and pinned to the front of your coat.”
There was a click and a buzz, and Harry saw something go off
of metal piping where usually visible closed loops. He chose
It up: It’s the Silver Pyramid Mystery with Harry Potter, the Punishment series on it. He ties it to the front of his T-shirt like a girl’s necklace
He spoke again.
“Ministry visitor, you need to submit to a research and
use your badge for registration at the security desk, located on the ground floor of the Atrium.”
The top of the telephone exchange broke. They were falling.
Quickly on the ground. Harry watched in awe as the driveway disappeared past the glass panes of the phone screen until darkness fell over their heads. Then he could see nothing at all; can
I just heard a loud click as the phone box flew its way out.
Underground. After a minute, though she felt very
Towering at Harry, a beam of golden light illuminated his shoulders and,
By extension, he reared his fist, until it hit him in the face and he had to
She looked to stop her eyes from watering.
“The entertainment department wishes you a great day,” said u
A woman's voice.
The door to the phone box swung open and Mr. Weasley
He stepped out of it and was followed by Harry, whose mouth fell open.
They were standing at one end of a very long and beautiful hall with a
A very light, hardwood floor. The poppy-green roof was torn
With glittering gold lights that keep rotating and changing like some giant celestial painting. Ships on all sides
They were trimmed in gleaming hardwood and had several gold bulbs set in the
them. Every few seconds a female orphan would emerge from one of the
left hemispheric shot with a sharp edge; On the right side, short
Witches lined up in front of each fire, waiting to go off.
Halfway down the hall was a fountain. Goldsmithing Group,
Larger than life, he stood in the middle of a labyrinth of wreckage. The longest in
They were all a normal looking wizard with his straight looking wand.
Up in the air. There was a beautiful lady, a centaur,
An animal, a domestic animal. The last three were all looking terrible.
In pregnancy and childbirth. Puddles of sparkling water were gushing from the
The results of both needles, the point of the centaur’s nail, the point of
mouse cap, and each of the pet mouse ears, to ring
The silence of falling water was added to the Apparators’ shrills and whistles
and fingerprinting like hundreds of witches and wizards, mostly
Of these they wore early morning glasses and went to a range
of golden doors in the center of the hall.
“Exactly,” Mr. Weasley said.
They entered the crowd, finding their way among the ministry
workers, some of them carrying discarded paper bags,
Others were hit by cars, still others read the Daily Prophet as they
He walked. As they passed the spring, Harry saw silver Sickles and
bronze Knuts gleams at him from under the hood. a
A small sign, placed next to it reads:
All proceeds from the Magical Brothers Fund will be donated to
St. John's Hospital; Mungo for magical diseases and injuries
If I don’t get kicked out of Hogwarts, I’ll put down ten galleons, Harry
He found himself thinking strangely.
“Here, Harry,” Mr. Weasley said, and they walked out of the
A stream of ministerial staff heads to the golden gates, to a
the desk on the left, over which hangs a sign that says security. badly
The shaved wizard in the blue almond coat looked up as they approached
And he installed his Daily Prophet.
“I’m taking a stranger,” Mr. Weasley said, pointing at Harry.
“Come out here,” the Wizard said in a low voice.
Harry approached him, the wizard holding out a long golden staff.
A wand, as thick and thick as a car seat belt, and slid it up and down Harry's
front and back.
“Wand,” the wand wizard said to Harry, waving his
Golden tool and keeps his hand warm.
Harry pulled out his wand. The Wizard dropped him on an awkward spot.
A brass instrument, which looks somewhat like a set of scales with
Just one button. He started rubbing. A thin sheet of paper came.
Simply from an elevator basically. The magician copied this and read
Writing about it.
“Eleven inches, thick feather cap, was in use for four years. that
correct?"
“Yeah,” Harry said nervously.
“I’ve kept this,” the Wizard said, draping the paper tape over a
a small brass knob. “You’ll take that back,” he added, tossing the blade to .
Harry.
"thank you."
"stop. . . .” The Wizard said quietly.
His eyes went wide from the silver visitor's badge on Harry's chest.
to his chin.
“Thank you, Eric,” Mr. Weasley said firmly, grabbing Harry by the .
shrug, he pushed it off the desk and returned it to
Witches and wizards walking through the golden gates.
Slightly disturbed by the crowd, Harry followed Mr. Weasley through
stairs to a small hall above, where at least twenty projects
Behind wrought gold grills. Harry and Mr. Weasley enter the
the crowd on one of them. A large, bearded wizard holding a large
The cardboard box stands nearby. The dome was making a rattling noise.
“Alright, Arthur?” the wizard said, nodding at Mr. Weasley.
“What do you have there, Bob?” Mr. Wesley asked, looking at the
box.
“We don’t know,” the Wizard insisted. “We thought it was
bogstandard pig until it starts breathing fire. It looks to me like a huge violation of banning experimental sterilization.”
With a huge splash and splash, a lift fell in front of the
them; The golden grille disappeared back and Harry and Mr. Weasley moved inside it with the rest of the crowd. Harry found himself pinned against
the back wall of the lift. Many witches and wizards were focused on
with a sense of knowledge; He looks at his feet to avoid catching anyone's eye, flicking his torch as he does so. The grilles slid closed by an accident and
I picked up slowly, the chains vibrated the whole time, and one was cold
The sobbing voice Harry had heard on the phone box came back.
“Seventh floor, Department of Exciting Games and Sports, incorporating the British and Irish Quidditch League Committee, official
Gobstones Club, and the Ludicrous Post Office.”
the elevator doors opened; Harry noticed an unrepaired hallway.
With various numbers of Quidditch teams ranked randomly on
ships; One of the magicians in the elevator, brought an arm full of
Earrings, he pulled himself out with difficulty and landed under
That way. The doors closed, the elevator came back up, and
She said in a low voice, “Layer Six, the Ministry of Magical Transportation, which encompasses the Floo Network Administration, Broom Regulatory Control, .
The Portkey Office, and the Magic Testing Center.”
Once again the elevator doors opened and four or five wizards and
the magicians came out; At the same time, they launched several paper airplanes
In the elevator. Harry watched as they slowly flew away.
above his head; They were a dark blue and he could see the department.
of magic imprinted on the edges of their wings.
“They’re just interdepartmental comparisons,” Mr. Weasley smirked.
“We’ve been paying taxes, but the waste is unacceptable . . . All hats
On the tables . .”
As they curved upwards again, the signs flashed across the
painted silver in the ceiling of the elevator.
“The fifth tier, the Department for International Standard Cooperation, which includes the International Standards Authority for Standardization, is
International Bureau of Magical Law, and International Confederation of Magicians, Feet of Great Britain.”
When the doors opened, two of the patrons jumped down to some
More witches and wizards, but many more expanded roles, as
The light from the lamp in the ceiling flickered and flickered as they
Darted into it.
“Level four, Department of Regulation and Supervision of
Magical creatures, combining the Beast, Beast, and Spirit factions,
Veterinary Survey Office, and Veterinary Survey Department.”
“ 'S'cuse,” said the wizard who had taken the fire-spewing chicken and .
He left the flat followed by a little choreographer. The doors are closing.
Connect again.
“Third Rank, Department of Accidents and Magical Rituals,
including the Magical Dispelling Task Force, the Obliviator Foundation, and the Muggle-Worthy Vetting Council.”
Everyone left the elevator on this floor except Mr. Weasley, Harry, and
A witch who was reading a very long paperback
He was lying on the ground. The remaining tokens continue to grow
in front of the flat when the flat turned upside down again, then the doors
It opened, and the voice said, “Second floor, Magical Law Department .
Enforcement, including inappropriate use of the Department of Magic, Auror
The municipality, and the administrative services of the Wizengamot.”
“This is us, Harry,” Mr. Weasley said, following the wizard .
exit the elevator to a corridor lined with doors. “My office is in
the other side of the earth.”
" Sir. Weasley,” Harry said, as they passed a window that .
The sunlight was bright, “weren’t we underground?”
“Yes, we are,” said Mr. Weasley, “these are sliding doors;
Magical Maintenance breaks down what opportunities we get every day.
We had a two month hurricane last time they were looking for a
increased wages. . . . Right here, Harry.”
They turned a corner and walked through a pair of heavy bamboo doors.
And he went out into an open area, separated from the houses, which
They were buzzing with talk and laughter. The memos were coming and going
of the cup as small containers. A one-sided window in the nearby cubicle read the auror's crew.
Harry looked surreptitiously through the doorways as they passed.
The Aurors covered the walls of their cubicles with everything from pictures of wanted spies and photos of their families, to quilts .
of their favorite Quidditch teams and regular Christmas articles.
A man in a red suit with a ponytail longer than Bill’s was sitting with
his boots on top of his desk, taking a report for his nose. A little further.
By the way, a witch with a patch over her eye was talking on her roof
cup holder for Kingsley Shacklebolt.
“Morning, Weasley,” Kingsley said mischievously, as they approached.
“I’ve been wanting a word with you, do you have a second one?”
"Yeah, if it's honestly a second," Mr. Weasley said, "I'm in a .
hurry."
They were talking to each other as if they didn’t know each other.
the other, and when Harry opened his mouth to say hello to Kingsley, Master.
Weasley stood to his feet. They chase Kingsley over the edge and
In the very last cup.
Harry got a small chuckle; Sirius’s face was looking into
to him from all sides. Newspaper clippings and old photos
— Even Sirius's was the best man at the Potters party —
paper of the walls. The only space without Sirius was a world map
In it were little black lights glinting like jewels.
“Here,” Kingsley hurried to Mr. Weasley, pulling out a stack of .
parchment in her hand, “I need as much information as possible about .
flying Muggle cars seen in the last twelve months. We have information that Black may still be using his old motorcycle.”
Kingsley gave Harry a big smile and added, sarcastically,
“Give him the magazine, he might find it interesting.” Then he said in
the commanding tone, “And don’t worry too much, Weasley, worrying about that .
Firelegs report took up our investigation for about a month.”
“If you had read my report you would have known that this statement is .
'Firearms,' ” Mr. Weasley whispered. “And I'm afraid you'll have to wait
For information on motorbikes, we’re very busy at the moment.” Lowering his voice, he said, “If you can leave first .
Seven, Molly makes meatballs.”
He calls Harry and leads him out of Kingsley's room,
Through double bay gates, to another lane, turn left,
Coming down another corridor, he turned right into a poorly lit and seemingly gloomy corridor, and finally reached a nondescript corridor, where a door
On the left stands ajar, showing a grave yard, and a door on
The right has a dirty copper plate that incorrectly reads Muggle usage
Objects of art.
Mr. Weasley's empty office seemed a little smaller than
Structural Table. Two cushions were crammed inside it and there was
There’s almost no room to move them around because of all the spilled file
Coffees lined the walls, topped with ornate file cabinets.
The small amount of wall that existed testified to Mr. Weasley's sensitivity;
There are several versions of the vehicles, including a painted engine,
Two drawings of postcards he seems to have ripped off from Muggle
children’s books, and a screenshot showing you how to use the power cord.
Sitting on top of Mr. Weasley's prominent sofa was an old
The toast that was ruling in a very uninspired way was two skin
leather gloves that were tightening their legs. picture of
The Weasley family stood next to the inner screen. Harry noticed that Percy seemed to be out of it.
“We don’t have a memory,” Mr. Weasley snapped, taking
He takes off his bomber jacket and throws it over the back of his chair. “We have
They asked, but they didn’t seem to think we needed one. Stay, Harry,
It doesn’t look like Perkins is in yet.”
Harry leaned back in the chair behind Perkins' desk while
Mr. Weasley poked his nose through the paper clip Kingsley Shacklebolt had handed him.
“Oh,” he said, smiling, as he produced from his lap a magazine called The Quibbler, “yes . . .” He gave in.
'Yes, he was right, I'm sure Sirius would find that very amusing—oh dear, .
What is that now?”
Poetry has just expanded through the open door and is pouring
It will rest on the top of the tin. Mr. Weasley unwrapped it and
read aloud, “ 'The third type of mass explosion reported in bethnal .
Green, please check in immediately.' This is getting ridiculous. . . .”
“A creepy crawl?”
"Wizards vs. muggles," Mr. Weasley said, smirking. “We have
Two weeks ago, one at Wimbledon and the other at the Elephant and the Palace. Muggles pull the trigger and instead of everything disappearing —
Well, you can imagine. The poor things kept ringing in those — those .
pumbles, I think they’re called — you know, pipe-repairers
and things —”
“Plumbing?”
“— Exactly, yes, but really flummoxed. I just hope we
He can catch whoever did it.”
“Will the Aurors be holding them?”
“Oh no, this is too ordinary for Aurors, it would be ordinary Magical .
Law enforcement — oh, Harry, this is Perkins.”
A stout, feminine-looking old wizard with bushy white hair who had only
He entered the room, panting heavily.
“Arthur!” He said nervously, without looking at Harry.
“Well, I don’t know what to do for good, either to
wait for you here or not, I just delivered a bug to your house but you
He obviously lost it—a voicemail came in ten minutes ago—”
"I know about the locker room," Mr. Weasley said.
'No, no, it's not the prison, it's hearing the Potter boy—they're done .
The time and place has changed — it starts at eight o’clock now and it’s
down in the old courthouse ten —”
“Down in the past—but I’m told—Merlin’s tail—”
Mr. Weasley looked at his watch, let out a sigh, and jumped up from his latch
chair.
“Quickly, Harry, we should have been there five minutes ago!”
Perkins eased himself against the cabinet of papers like Mr. Weasley .
He stormed out of the office, Harry on his heels.
“Why did they change the times?” Harry said breathlessly as they
He rushed past the Auror cubes; People stuck their heads out and
They smiled as they passed. Harry felt like he had completely released his insides back to Perkins' desk.
“I have no idea, but well, we got here early, if you want
To lose it would be disaster!”
Mr. Weasley hurried over to the side of the controls and carefully tapped the bottom switch.
"series!"
The elevator is closer than expected and getting in is quite easy. whenever
He stopped Mr. Weasley, cursed angrily, and dialed the number.
Nine buttons.
"Those courtrooms haven't been used in years," Mr. Weasley said .
With anger. “I can’t think why they do it down there — if —
But no . . .”
The older witch took a cup of smoke and entered the hotel at that.
time, and Mr. Weasley did not elaborate.
“Atrium,” said a cold feminine voice and the golden walls sailed .
It opened, showing Harry a peek away at the golden statue in the
station. The old witch and a dark-haired wizard came out with
A very sad face came in.
“Morning, Arthur,” he whispered as the elevator began .
Hlu. “I don’t see you down here often. . . .”
"Quick thing, Bode," said Mr. Weasley, who was leaning in .
the tuft of his lips and a look of lust creeping over Harry.
"Oh, yes," Bode said, looking at Harry without blinking. "sure."
Harry barely has any sympathy to spare for Bode, but his affection never wavers
The sight only made him feel more comfortable.
“The secret part,” said a cold female voice, leaving her at
that.
“Quickly, Harry,” Mr. Weasley said as the elevator doors slid open, and .
They managed to blaze a trail very different from those above. the
The walls were bare; There are no windows or doors except one
plain black one mounted at the end of the hallway. Harry is waiting
They would have walked past him, but instead Mr. Weasley grabbed his arm .
and drew it to the left, where there was an opening leading to a
Foot walking.
“Down here, down here,” Mr. Weasley said, tapping two fingers in .
One time. “The lift won’t even come down that far . . . Why are they doing it there . . .”
They reached the bottom of the stairs and ran into each other.
The path, which bears a striking resemblance is the one that led to Snape's
Hogwarts prison, with dark stone walls and pillars in the maze.
The doors passed here are heavy wooden ones with steel frames .
and container ships.
“The courtroom . . . ten . . . I think . . . We’re close. . . Yes."
Mr. Weasley stopped outside the front door with a
A huge steel box and it hit the wall, hitting a point
in his chest.
“Go on,” he whispered, pointing towards the door. "enter
there."
“Aren’t you — aren’t you coming with — ?”
“No, no, I have no clue. good luck!"
Harry's heart was beating a violent rhythm against his Adam's profile.
He swallowed hard, turned the heavy iron door handle, and pushed
Inside the courtroom.

CHAPTER EIGHT
ORIGINAL

Harry yelled; He couldn't help himself. The main hall is
He had entered was strangely familiar. He just didn’t see it.
Before, He's Been Here Before : It's the place he visited inside Dumbledore's Pensieve, it's the place where he saw the ghost of
Lestrange was sentenced to life imprisonment in Azkaban.
The walls were made of dry stone, smoothed with paint. empty
banks rose up on all sides of him, but in front of him, in high banks
In all, there are a lot of background characters. They were talking in a small voice.
exclamations, but when the heavy door closed and closed behind Harry one good
There was silence.
A cold male voice rang through the courtroom.
“You’re late.”
“I’m sorry,” Harry said nervously. "I don't know what time has
shift."
"It's not the Wizengamot's fault," the voice said. “One animal was
It was sent to you this morning. Stay put.”
Harry glanced at the chair in the corner of the room,
Their hands were covered in chains. He saw the chains flying
for life and connect who remains between them. His legs were shaking.
loudly as he walked on the stone floor. When he sat calmly on
The side of the chair clasps the chains menacingly but does not clasp.
Connect it. Feeling sick, he looked around at the people sitting in the
the bench above.
There were about fifty of them, all, as he observed, dressed .
wearing silver colored clothes with a silver W embroidered on the left side of the chest and all eyes turned to him, some
With extremely serious expressions, others looked genuinely curious.
At the front row sat Cornelius Fudge, the Minister of Public Affairs. Fudge was a mild-mannered man who often wore a sledgehammer.
bowler hat, though today he has discontinued it; He gave
Even with the goofy smile he once had when he talked to her
Harry. A square-chested witch with very short gray hair remained.
Fudge's Left; She wore a monocle and looked right. In Fudge
Of course there was another witch, but she was sitting way back on the bench
that his face was in shadow.
"All right," Fudge said. “The accused who was there — finally — .
Let's begin. Are you ready?” He called out suddenly.
“Yes, sir,” said a calm voice that Harry knew. Run’s brother Percy was
They sit at the end of the front bench. Harry looked at Percy, waiting for some reaction of understanding from him, but none came. of Birch
Allen, behind his shadowy eyelids, looked at his paper, a
Quill settled in his hand.
"Security hearing on August Twelfth," Fudge said in a
in a low voice, and Percy started taking notes simultaneously, “in the vacuum .
It was filed under the Prevention of Underage Act and the International Statute of Secrecy by Harry .
James Butter, resident at No. Four, Privet Street, Little Winging,
Sury.
“Interviewers: Cornelius Oswald Fudge, Minister of Engraving;
Amelia Susan Bones, Director of the Department of Law En-
coercion; Dolores Jane Umbridge, Executive Secretary of the
Minister. Secretary of Court, Percy Ignatius Wesley —”
“— witness for the murder, Albus Percival Wulfrik Brian Dumbledore,” said a soft female voice from behind Harry, who turned his head like this .
He quickly shaved his head.
Dumbledore was pacing casually around the room, wearing a long gown.
Midnight wear is a perfect turn of phrase. His long silver
Beard and hair gleamed in the fluorescent light as he made contact with Harry.
And he looked at Fudge with relaxed half-moon eyes .
Halfway down his very crooked nose.
The members of the Wizengamot were murmuring. All eyes were on
Now onto Dumbblower. Some looked confused, others a little frightened; The two elder wizards in the back row, however, raised their hands
And it arrived happily.
A strong feeling rose in Harry's chest at the sight of Dumbledore, a reserved, phoenix-like hopeful figure .
The song gave him. He wanted to catch Dumbledore's eye, but Dumbledore wasn't looking his way; He kept looking to
Obviously Fudge relieved.
“Oh,” said Fudge, who looked very relieved. “Dumbledore. Yes. You — er — have our — er — message that the time is — .
Er — the place of hearing had been changed, then?”
"I guess I do," Dumbledore said cheerfully. "however,
Due to an unfortunate mistake, I reached the department three hours early, so
Nothing bad happened.”
“Yeah—well—I think we’ll need another chair—I—.
Weasley, can you — ?”
"Don't worry, don't worry," Dumbledore said cheerfully; He took
Pulling out his trunk, he gave it a little squeeze, and out of nowhere a squashy chintz chair appeared next to Harry. Dumbledore sat down and answered
the nails of his longest fingers together, and he looked at Fudge over them with .
It’s an expression of the benefits of knowledge. The Wizengamot is still looking
and restless emotions; It was only when Fudge spoke again that they braced themselves
down.
“Yeah,” Fudge said again, stifling his emotions. “Well, then. so. the
right. Yes."
He took out a piece of paper from the table in front of him and took
A deep breath, and read: “The charges against the accused are: that he did so knowingly, deliberately, and with full knowledge of .
The seriousness of his actions, having received a written warning in advance
From the Ministry of Magic for such an order, retrieve a Patronus
Charm in an area inhabited by Muggles, in front of a Muggle, on
August the second at twenty-three minutes past nine, a felony under Article C of the Decree of Probation .
Prohibition of underage sex, 1875, and also under Article III of the International Confederation of Wizards of the Secret Order.
“You are Harry James Potter, of No. 4, Privet Drive, junior
Are you okay, Surrey?” Fudge said, eyeing Harry with the top of his eyebrows .
paper.
“Yeah,” Harry said.
"You received an official warning from the Ministry for using illegal magic three years ago, didn't you?"
“Yeah, but —”
“And yet you cast a Patronus on the night of the second of
August?" Fudge said.
“Yeah,” Harry said, “but —”
“Just so you know that you’re not allowed to use magic outside of school .
While you’re not yet seventeen?”
“Yeah, but —”
“Did you know you were in an area full of Muggles?”
“Yeah, but —”
"You're fully aware that you were close to a Muggle in
time?
“Yeah,” Harry said angrily, “but I’m only using it because we —”
The witch with the monocle on Fudge's left cut him into a
The voice of the horn.
“Did you cast the Patronus completely?”
“Yeah,” Harry said, “because —”
“A Patronus of space?”
“Oh — what?” Harry said.
“Does your patronus have a clear form? I mean, there was
More steam or smoke?”
“Yeah,” Harry said, feeling impatient and a bit flustered,
“He’s a kid, he’s always a kid.”
"always?" said Mrs. Bones. “You cast a Patronus .
before now?”
“Yeah,” Harry said, “I’ve been doing it for over a year—”
“And you’re fifteen?”
“Yeah, and —”
“Did you learn that in school?”
“Yeah, Professor Lupine trained me in third year, because of —”
“Fascinating,” Mrs. Bones said, winking at him, “of course .
The patronus at that age . . . Very satisfying indeed.”
Some of the pilots and pilots around him were moving again;
Some shook their heads, but others nodded and shook their heads.
"It's not a question of how scary the smell was," Fudge said .
in a repeated sound. “In fact, the higher the pressure, the more
They thought, because that boy did it in full view of a Muggle!”
Those who were angry now smiled in agreement, but
It was the sight of Percy's little smile that set Harry off
In the word.
“I did it for the insane!” He said loudly, in front of everyone
He could cut it again.
He was expecting more hints, but the silence that descended seemed
It will somehow be worse than before.
“Prisoners?” Mrs. Bones said after a moment, raising her brow
his determination to look at his monocle in danger of falling off. "what
You mean it, boy?”
“I mean there were two assailants on that block and they were
He walked on me and my cousin!”
“Oh,” Fudge said again, looking uncomfortable as he turned .
In the Wizengamot, it seemed to invite them to share gossip. "Yes.
Yeah, I thought we were going to hear something like that.”
“Prisoners in the Little Hole?” Mrs. Bones said in a tone of
big surprise. "I don't understand -"
“Aren’t you, Amelia?” Fudge said, still smiling. “Let me explain.
He was thinking about it and decided that dementors would make a
very good little cover story, very good indeed. Muggles can't see dementors, can they, huh? So many things, so many things . . . so
Your word alone and no witnesses. . . .”
“I’m not lying!” Harry said loudly, over another outburst of attention from the court. “There were two of them, they came from the opposite end of the bridge, everything went dark and cold and my cousin
I felt them and he ran for it —”
“Enough, enough!” Fudge said with a smug look of his own .
face. “I’m sure I’m going to miss what I think will be a lot of fun .
A well-rehearsed story —”
Dumbledore cleared his throat. The Wizengamot fell silent again.
“We do, in fact, have witness to the presence of victims in this .
way," he said, "other than Dudley Dursley, I mean."
Fudge’s handsome face looked shocked, as if someone had left him
air from it. He glanced at Dumbledore for a moment or two,
Then, with a man pulling back,
He said, “We don’t have time to hear more taradiddles, I’m afraid,
Dumbledore. I want this to be clearly understood —”
“I may be wrong,” Dumbledore said cheerfully, “but I’m sure .
Under the Wizengamot’s code of rights, an accused has the right to
They interviewed witnesses about her case? Isn’t that a policy of the Wizarding Law Enforcement Bureau, Madam Bones?” he continued, addressing the woman in the monocle.
“Of course,” said Mrs. Bones. “It’s absolutely true.”
“Oh, okay, okay,” Fudge chuckled. “Where is this person?”
"I brought it with me," Dumbledore said. “She was just outside the
gate. Should I — ?”
“No — Weasley, you go,” Fudge growled at Percy, who had gotten up at
Once he dashed across the stone railing from the captain's balcony and sneaked past Dumbledore and Harry without sparing a glance.
A moment later, Percy returned, followed by Mrs. Figg. Look
Scared and more batty than ever. Harry hoped she'd thought
changed out of her cardigan slippers.
Dumbledore stood up and offered Mrs. Figg her chair, which a
The second for himself.
“Your full name?” said Fudge aloud, as Mrs. Figg leaned nervously on the edge of her chair.
"Arabella Doreen Figg," Mrs. Figg said in her tired voice.
“And who exactly are you?” Fudge said, in a low and sarcastic voice.
"I'm a resident of Little Whinging, which is close to where Harry Potter is ."
He lives,” Ms. Figg said.
"We have no record of any witches or wizards living in Little Whinging except Harry Potter," Mrs. Bones suddenly said. “The situation has always been closely monitored, because . . . given past events.”
"I'm a Squib," said Miss Figg. “So don’t record me,
Will you?”
“A Squib, yes?” Fudge said, looking at her suspiciously. “We will fix that. You will leave details about your parents with my assistant.
Wesley. By the way, can Squibs see the magic leaders?” he added, looking
Left and right on the bench where he sat.
“Yes, we can!” exclaimed Mrs. Figg excitedly.
Fudge looked back at her and raised an eyebrow. “So much,”
He said coldly. “What’s your story?”
“I went out to buy cat food from the corner store in late 2016.
Wisteria Walk, shortly after nine o’clock on the second day of
August,” said Mrs. Figg suddenly, as if she had learned what .
She was speaking from the heart, “when I heard an argument in the street between Magnolia Crescent and Wisteria Walk. In approaching
The mouth of the corner of the street I saw fools running —”
"running?" Mrs. Bones said suddenly. “Prisoners do not run,
They fall.”
"That's what I mean," Mrs. Figg said softly, the balls of .
pink showing on her hot cheeks. “I’m going to run down the street to what looks like two kids.”
“How do they look?” Mrs. Bones said, narrowing her eyes.
so that the edges of the monocle disappeared into his flesh.
“Well, one’s too big and one’s a little narrow —”
“No, no,” cried Mrs. Bones, “the bastards . . . Encourage them.”
“Ah,” said Mrs. Figg, the blush on her cheeks thickening now.
“They were great. He’s big and wears a hat.”
Harry felt an excited growl in the pit of his stomach. whatever
Miss Figg said vaguely, it seemed to her like more
She had never seen a picture of a doctor, and a picture might
They never deliver the truth of how these people are: way off
They’re moving, looking meters away from the ground, or the faint smell of
in them, or the creepy, sickening noise they made as they sucked on
the surrounding air . . . The crooked wizard with the big black mouth in
The second wall came closer to its neighbor, a dark-haired witch, and
she whispered something in his ear. She smiled and shook her head.
“He’s big and he wears a hat,” Madam Bones whispered, while .
Fudge smiled sarcastically. "I see. Anything else?”
“Yes,” said Mrs. Figg. “I feel for them. Everything went cold, and this
It was a very hot summer night, mark you. And I felt . . . equal
All happiness is gone from the world . . . And I remembered . . .
Amazing stuff. . . .”
His voice grew weak and dead.
Madam Bones' eyes widened slightly. Harry could see the red flags.
Under his nose where he dug a monocle.
“What did the invaders do?” she asked, and Harry felt a rush of
hope.
“They went for the boys,” said Mrs. Figg, her voice stronger and .
She’s even more excited now, a blush sliding off her face. "one
from which they fell. Another was leaning back, trying to push
Dementors. It was Harry. He tried twice and fired the silver bullet.
On the third attempt, he unleashes a Patronus, which
first dementor and then, with his expansion, followed
the second from his cousin. And this . . . That’s what happened,” Madame said.
Figg finishes, somewhat sarcastically.
Madame Bones gazed at Mrs. Figg in silence; There was no Fudge
He looks at it all, but fiddles with his papers. He finally picked up his
his eyes and said, simply “That’s what you see, right?”
“That’s what happened,” Ms. Figg said.
"All right," Fudge said. “You can go.”
Mrs. Figg shot a frightened look from Fudge to Dumbledore, and then
He stood up and headed for the door again. Harry heard her whisper.
Tie up afterwards.
"Not a very convincing witness," Fudge grumbled.
"Oh, I don't know," Mrs. Bones said in a booming voice. "she
quickly explaining the dementor attack's effectiveness.
And I can’t imagine why she would think they were there if
They weren’t —”
“But dementors wander into a Muggle neighborhood and they just happen .
Will you come across as a witch?” exclaimed Fudge. “There must be something about that .
Very, very long, not even Bagman was going to bet —”
“Oh, I don’t think any of us believed that the fans were there by
Secrets,” Dumbledore said lightly.
The witch sat to Fudge's right with her face in shadow.
It looked a little off, but everyone else was calm and quiet.
“What does that mean?” Fudge asked rhetorically.
"It means I think they're meant to be there," Dumbledore said.
“I think we might have had a report on it if one person had applied .
lovers to go strolling around Little Whinging!” exclaimed Fudge.
“Not if dementors are taking orders from someone other than
The Ministry of Magic these days,” Dumbledore said quietly. "I have
I have already given you my thoughts on the matter, Cornelius.”
"Yes, you have," Fudge said firmly, "and I have no reason to believe your looks are anything but bilge, Dumbledore. the
The astronauts stay put in Azkaban and do everything we do
Ask them to do it.”
"Then," Dumbledore said, quietly but clearly, "we must wonder why someone within the Ministry ordered a pair of mages .
On that street the second of August.”
In the complete silence that greeted these words, the Witch who
Fudge's right stepped forward so Harry could see her for the first time.
He thought it just looked like a big, gray mouse. It was great.
Squat with a big, soft face, a small head like Uncle Vernon, and
His mouth is very big. Her eyes were big, blue, and slightly
compass. Even that little black velvet dress sitting on top of her
The dark hair brought to mind a giant bug she was about to catch in a
Long tongue holding.
"The president recognizes Dolores Jane Umbridge, the chief secretary to the minister," Fudge said.
The witch spoke in a seductive, seductive, high-pitched voice that caught
Harry recoiled; He was waiting for a ship.
"I'm sorry, I may have misunderstood you, Professor Dumbledore,"
She said with a grin that left her big, blue eyes as cold as ever. "so
Stupid of me. But it sounds somewhat teenage like you’re suggesting that the Ministry of Magic has ordered an assassination on this boy!”
She gave a silver smile that made Harry's lips
His head stood still. A few other members of the Wizengamot laughed s
her. It cannot be more certain that none of them really exist .
exciting.
“While it is true that dementors only take orders from the Ministry of Magic, it is also true that two dementors attacked Harry .
It’s been his cousin for a week, and then he decides that someone in the
The Ministry probably ordered the attacks,” Dumbledore said politely. “Of course, these particular dementors could be out there .
Ministry oversight —”
“There are no dementors outside of the Ministry’s jurisdiction!” is interrupted.
Fudge, which turned brick red.
Dumbledore shook his head with a small smile.
“Then, no doubt, the department will conduct a full investigation into
Why two dementors were so far away from Azkaban and why they killed without permission.”
“It’s not up to you to decide what the Ministry of Magic does or doesn’t do .
Don’t do it, Dumblur!” Fudge said, now a pale shadow of
with what Uncle Vernon would have made available.
"Of course he isn't," Dumbledore said quietly. "I was simply expressing my confidence that this matter will not go unchecked."
He glanced at Madam Bones, who nodded and
She looked back at him and smiled slightly.
“I would like to remind everyone that the conduct of these attackers,
While they certainly aren’t the focus of this boy’s emotions, it’s not
The topic of this conversation!” Fudge said. “We are here to check on Harry .
Potter’s convictions under the Reasonable Prevention Act of
Ageless magic!”
“Of course we are,” Dumbledore said, “but the presence of wizards on that street is very significant. Seventh paragraph of the Decree
She states that magic can be used in front of Muggles in exceptional circumstances, and since those exceptional circumstances include situations where
Threaten the life of a wizard or wizard himself, or witches, wizards, or
Muggles were in the age of —”
“We know the seventh phrase, thank you very much!” shouted
Fudge.
“Of course you are,” Dumbledore said politely. “Then we .
In agreement that Harry’s use of the Patronus magic in these circumstances did fall into the category of magic circumstances that
Do you explain?”
“If there are prisoners, which I doubt—”
“You heard an eyewitness,” Dumbledore interrupted. "whether
If you still doubt her veracity, call her and ask again. I am
It’s really incredible.”
“I — that — not —” Fudge stammered, crunching the papers in front of him. “It’s — I want this to end by today, Dumbledore!”
“But naturally, you don’t care how many times you’ve heard .
from a witness, whether the waiver constitutes a gross miscarriage of justice,”
Dumbledore said.
“Too much fucking time, my top!” Fudge said at the top of his voice.
"Have you ever been obsessed with racking up the number of sex toys that have come out with this witch, Dumbledore, while trying to
His sneaky mischief outside of school? I think you forgot
The Hover Charm he used three years ago—”
“It’s not me, it’s a pet!” Harry said.
“TERRID?” Fudge said, grinning mischievously in Harry's direction. “Oh boss of the house! In a Muggle house! I ask you—”
“The pet in question is currently in the service of Hogwarts .
The school,” Dumbledore said. “I can call him here in an instant to .
Give proof if you will.”
"I—not—have no time to listen to house elves!" anyway,
Not only that — he shot his uncle, for God’s sake!” Fudge
he shouted, hitting the judge’s bench with his fist and knocking over a bottle
of ink.
“And thank you for not pressing charges in that case, admitting, I suppose, that even the best wizards can’t always judge .
their thoughts,” Dumbledore said quietly, as Fudge tried to .
Scrub the ink from his magazines.
“I haven’t even gotten started on what’s growing in school —”
“— but since the Ministry doesn’t have the power to punish Hogwarts .
students for disorder at the school, Harry’s behavior there is irrelevant to this investigation,” Dumbledore said, as polite as ever, but now
With a smile behind his words.
“No!” Fudge said. “It’s none of our business what he does at school, eh?
Do you think so?”
“The Ministry does not have the power to expel students from Hogwarts, Cornelius, as I reminded you on the night of the second
August,” Dumbledore said. “Nor does she have the right to keep
taxes until the charges are proved successful, again, as I reminded you on the night of the second of August. At your wedding
Simply to ensure the law is enforced, you see, on the contrary I
Sure, you’ll have to worry about some plans yourself.”
"Laws can be changed," Fudge said mischievously.
"Of course they can," Dumbledore said, shaking his head. "and
It certainly looks like you’ve made a lot of changes, Cornelius. Why, in
A few short weeks after I was asked to leave the Wizengamot, she had
It has already become a common practice to hold entire criminal trials to confront a
A simple matter of wizard magic!”
Some of the wizards above shivered nervously in their
Chairs. Fudge turned a little puce box. Like a dog.
The witch on his right, however, just stared at Dumbledore, his face
He had no words.
"As far as I know, however," Dumbledore continued, "there was
No law states that the job of this court is to punish Harry for
Every bit of magic he did. He was charged with a
the chaos itself and presents its protector. All he and I can do is
Now it’s your turn.”
Dumbledore shrugged again, saying no more.
Fudge stared at him, visibly annoyed. Harry looked sideways at the
Dumbledore, looking for clues; He wasn't entirely sure that Dumbledore was right when he told the Wizengamot, of course, that it was something like
time take a decision. Again, though, Dumbledore appears
He had forgotten about Harry's attempt to catch his eye. He continued to look up.
In the boards where the entire Wizengamot collapsed into sharp detail,
With voicemails.
Harry looked at his feet. His heart, which seemed to melt
With an unnatural weight, it was throbbing loudly under his ribs. He had expected the conversation to last longer. It’s not entirely denied that
He had made a good impression. He didn’t really say much. he
He should have explained more about the inmates, about how
Growled, about how close he and Dudley were
kiss. . . .
Twice Fudge nodded, opening his mouth to speak, but .
His swollen heart was now constricting his airways and twice
He just took a deep breath and looked back at his feet.
Then the shaking stopped. Harry wanted to look at the
judges, but he found that it was actually much, much easier to keep checking his clothes.
“The one in favor of clearing the accused of all charges?” said Ms.
Bones' booming voice.
Harry's head snapped up. There are hands in the air, lots of
them . . . More than half! Breathing fast, he tried to calculate, but
Before he could finish Madam Bones said, "And those who love
right?”
Fudge raised his hand; So did half a dozen others, including
The wizard on his right is a heavily armored wizard and a spiky-haired wizard on the second floor.
Fudge looked at them all, looking like he was
Something big pressed against his throat, and then he lowered his own hand. he
He took a couple of deep breaths and then said, in a voice softened by strained emotion, “All right, a lot . . . He has been cleared of all charges.”
“Excellent,” Dumbledore growled softly, getting to his feet and pulling .
They unloaded his trunk, and let two chintz chairs fly away. “Well, I
He must be getting along. Good day to you all.”
And without even once looking at Harry, he pulled out of the closet.

CHAPTER NINE
MASTER'S SCREAM. Weasley

Dumbledore's abrupt behavior caught Harry off guard. He remained sitting where he was in the chained chair.
He struggles with his feelings of loss and failure. Those of the Wizengamot were
They all rose to their feet, chattered, gathered their papers and
it holds them at a distance. Harry stood up. No one seems to be paying.
Paying little attention to her except for the witch like the pumpkin in Fudge
right, who was now staring down at him instead of at Dumbledore. Ignoring her, he tried to catch Fudge's, or Madam Bones's, eye, wanting to .
He’ll ask if he’s free to go, but Fudge seems pretty determined
She didn't see Harry, and Mrs. Bones was working on her bakery,
So he took some tentative steps towards coming out and when no one
he called, breaking into a very quick pace.
He quickly took the last few steps and slowly opened the door, barely bumping into Mr. Weasley, who was standing directly outside, .
Looking pale and scary.
“Dumbledore didn’t say—”
“Exhausts,” Harry said, pulling the door closed behind him, “of all .
trial!"
With a growl, Mr. Weasley grabbed Harry by the shoulders.
“Harry, this is wonderful! Well, of course, they can’t find
You’re guilty, not on the evidence, but even so, I can’t pretend I’m not—”
But Mr. Weasley interrupted, because the door to the courtroom only had
It opened again. The Wizengamot were filing.
"Merlin's nose," Mr. Weasley said nervously, pulling Harry away .
aside to let them all pass, “are you sentenced to full prison?”
“I suppose so,” Harry said quietly.
One or two of the passing wizards nodded to Harry as they passed
And some, including Mrs. Bones, said, “Hello, Arthur,” to the Hon.
Weasley, but most averted their eyes. Cornelius Fudge and the witch were about to be the last to leave the prison. Fudge did like
Although Mr. Weasley and Harry were part of the wall, but again, the wall
the witch looked almost respectful to Harry as she walked away. Last of all to
Tends to be with Percy. Like Fudge, he abandoned his father along with
Harry; He went through a big roll of paper and a
A handful of spare pillows, his head hard and his nose in the air. The lines
In front of Mr. Weasley his mouth was slightly tight, but other than that he
He gave no indication that he saw his third son.
“I’ll take you right back to tell the others
Good news,” he said, beckoning Harry forward as Percy’s fingers slowly rolled back to level nine. I’ll walk you through the process to
of that cemetery in Bethnal Green. series. . . .”
“So what are you going to have to do about the bathroom?” Harry asked, smirking. Everything suddenly seemed five times more interesting than before. it
It began to sink in: He was discharged, he was returning to Hogwarts.
“Oh, it’s pretty easy against a jinx,” Mr. Weasley said as they .
added to the store, “but it’s not so much urgent to repair the damage,
It’s more the circumstance behind the curse, Harry. The Muggle Voice
It may sound funny to some wizards, but it’s an example of something much deeper and more sinister, and I for one—”
Mr. Weasley broke off mid-sentence. They have just arrived at
Street on the ninth floor, and Cornelius Fudge was standing a few feet
Away from them, they were talking quietly with a tall man with gray hair
and the sads, a number.
The second man has married to their legs. Also he
She approached a midfielder, Itals Tinisarian Tibestied and the foundation
1920s of Hari.
“Well, well, well . . . Patronus Potter,” said Lucus Malfoy in the ears.
Harry felt winded, like he had just stepped into something
heavy. The last time they have oiled with women's greenloves in Lut
Eater's hood, and the last is heard for the man's fire approach to a mid-scene merchandise while Lord Voldort takes. You cannot believe this
Lucius Malfoy can vary in the face; You cannot believe he
He was Dagi, in the Ministry of Practice, or that Cornelius Fodge was talking to him, when Harry told Foodge just a few weeks this is that Malfoy .
He was a lecture of the death.
“The minister was just talking about the slaves of good, a Potter,”
smirked Mr. Malfoy. “It’s very good, how you’ve been angry .
Wriggle out of very sharp potholes. . . . Like a snake, actually . . .”
Mr Weasley took on Harry’s leg.
“Yes,” Hari said, “Yes, I like to go back. . . .”
Lucyus Malfoy rendered Allenness to Mass Wsli.
“And Arthur Wesley too! What are you doing here, Arthur?”
“I’ve been working Dagi,” said Mass Wesley quickly.
“What is you here, really?” Mr. Malfoy said, raising his eyebrows and looking over Mr. Weasley's shoulder at the door. “I thought you were
With a good at the second place. . . . You don’t work with someone with
With the Muggle things to home and in the ear?”
“Let,” said Mass Weasley quickly, the legs are now closer to Harry .
shoulder.
“What are you doing here anyway?” Harry asked Lucius Malfoy.
“I don’t believe that private issues Gary and the minister is .
Something, A Potter,” said Malfoy, succeeds in front of his wife .
furniture; Harry was quietly silly for the ears of what he’s demonstrating
One king was filled with unencourse. “Only, just because you’re a kid for the boys loved Doumbledore, you shouldn’t be leaned by the ear from those of 1990.
we. . . . Let the bureaucracy i.
“I really,” Fudge said, and returned to Harry and Mass.
Wesley. “Right, Lucius.”
Few, all speaks to the desire of women. Mr. Weasley did not
Sursend of the Harry Alumam were intensified in l'ascenseur.
“They’re there’s no longer waiting outside of the Fudge bureau if they have all work?” Harry left happiness. “What is he worked?
Just below?”
“The try will really get back to the courtroom, if you’re asking for me,” Mass said.
The specialty, joined the great court away from theestry of the Holy Province.
Even if they guarantee they can’t hear. “You try to get
Whether they are ill or even. I will leave a letter to Doumbldur.
Once I get to know, the name of Malfoy is talking to Fodge
again."
“What private practice do they have in common anyway?”
“Gold, I expect,” Mr. Weasley said angrily. "Malfoy was giving
Fortunately for all sorts of things for years. . . . He entered it with
Good people . . . Then he can ask for a favor . . . Enforce unwanted rules
passed . . . Oh, well connected, Lucius Malfoy. . . .”
the elevator came down; It was empty except for a bunch of souvenirs
flew over Mr. Weasley's head as he pressed the button of the
The atrium and doors are closed; He gently pushed them away.
" Sir. Weasley,” Harry said quietly, “if Fudge meets Death .
Fools like Malfoy, if he watched them alone, how would they know
Didn’t they put the Imperius seal on it?”
"Don't think it hasn't occurred to us, Harry," the Master smirked.
Wesley. “But Dumbledore thinks Fudge is acting willingly .
At the moment — which, as Dumbledore said, was very unlikely.
. . . So don't talk to him right now, Harry. . . .”
The doors opened with a creak and stepped out into the now almost empty Atrium. Eric the security guy hides behind his Daily
Christmas too. They walked right past the golden bridge before Harry remembered.
"wait. . . ." he told Mr. Weasley, and pulled his wallet from the
his pocket, back to the body.
Looking into the handsome, yet stern wizard's face, Harry
Thought he looked stupid and stupid. The witch was wearing a
An awkward smile like a beauty pageant, and from what Harry knew
Goblins and centaurs, were impossible to catch them looking at this
soppily at people of all descriptions. Only the domesticated state of
the shrug of the shoulders looked convincing. laughing at the thought of
What would Hermione say if she saw the pig statue, Harry
He turned his bag of money upside down and created not just ten.
Galleons, but the whole contents on board at the feet of the structures.
“I know it!” Ron yelled, grabbing air. “You always worry about .
stuff!"
“They should fire you,” said Hermione, who looked
He groaned as Harry walked into the kitchen and
She was now holding a hand rubbing over her eyes. “It’s okay .
Against you, no one. . . .”
“Everyone seemed pretty relieved, though, considering they all knew .
I’ll stop,” Harry said, smiling.
Mrs. Weasley was resting her face on her pillow, and Fred, George,
and Ginny were doing a sort of war dance with a chant that went “He .
He’s out, he’s out, he’s out —”
“That’s about it, settle down!” shouted Mr. Weasley, though he too
He was smiling. “Listen, Sirius, Lucius Malfoy is at the Ministry—”
"what?" Sirius said quietly.
“He’s out, he’s out, he’s out —”
“Shut up, you three! Yes, we saw him interacting with Fudge in the series
Nine, and then they moved into Fudge's office together. Dumbledore must
You’ll know.”
“Sure,” Sirius said. “We’ll tell him, don’t worry.”
“Well, I’d better get going, there’s a massage parlor in Bethnal .
The flower is waiting for me. Molly, I'm going to be late, I cover for Tonks, but
Kingsley is probably going out to dinner—”
“He’s out, he’s out, he’s out —”
“It’s about—Fred—George—Ginny!” Massa Wezli said.
As Mr. Weasley left the dining room. “Harry dear, come sit down, have
Some of the sounds, almost you don’t eat coffee. . . .”
Run and Hermione remain in front of the
He was very happy to work from the first time to Otton 10.
Twelve, Amkan of Grimmaold, and the sensitivity of Harry with a woman’s body, for
He was somewhat influenced by his encounter with Lucius Malfoy,
He froze again. The home of the season is clear that he remains afraid and at one time; Even Kreacher wasn't cheap when he let out his own.
The immigrants banning the independent to the truck to see the source of everything
noise.
“ 'Of course, when Dumbledore appeared at your side, nothing .
How they wanted to judge you,” Ron said angrily, now smirking .
The most beautiful bath is around the nights of each one.
“Yeah, he sucked it up for me,” Harry said. He felt that it would be
Not very interested, not to mention sexually, he’d say, “I wish he’d talk
To me, but. Or even he is keen.”
As well as all these, archives are in custody I’ve been a lot.
that he gave the arms on it.
"what's up?" Hermione said, looking confused.
“Skar,” Harry shrugged. “But it’s nothing. . . . It all happened
Lawan says. . . .”
None of the other’s informed someone; All were now helping themselves to food while pining for Harry's narrow escape;
Fred, George, and Ginny were still singing. Hermion is very smooth
She loved, but before someone say, Ron said with happiness, “I bet .
Dumbledore came out this evening to celebrate with us, you know.”
“I don’t think it’s going to be able to be able to, A Ron,” said Massa Weasley, you’ve changed a
The greatest slot of the designed Eve under Harry. “He’s definitely very
Bossy in Lawana.”
“YEFFE and YEFFE, YEFFE. —”
"shut up!" said Mrs. Weasley.
In the next few days, Harry couldn’t try to see that he was
One person inside number twelve, Grimmauld Place, didn't
You seem to be great to go back to Hogwarts. Sirius put a good film of Tomot as he heard for the first time for
Isana, approaching the Harry's hand and discovered as well as the other;
Soon, however, he became quieter and quieter than ever, talking less to
Each, even Hari, and he’s passed through a lot of time safe
Upstairs in his grandmother's room with Buckbeak.
“Don’t go and I felt sorry!” Hermiyun said, after Hari
said some of the Hullans and Run at the time there are
I tore up a floor hole on the third floor a few days later.
“You are at Hogwarts and Sirius knows it. Personally, I think it is
It will be a hole.”
"That's a bit harsh, Hermione," Ron said, frowning as he tried to push out a bit of dirt that had stuck firmly in his throat .
Learning, “You don’t want to stay inside the port of the portal .
company."
“ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵙⵄⵓ ⵜⴰⴷⵓⴽⵍⵉ!” Hermione said. “It’s the headquarters of
Ordre ⵏ Phoenix, ⵎⴰⵞⵞⵉ ⴰⴽⴽⴰ ? He has just won hope that Harry
He’s coming to live here with her.”
« ⵓⵔ ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵍⵉⵖ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷ ⵜⵉⴷⴻⵜ », ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Harry, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⴼⴻⵖⴷ ⴰⴹⴻⴱⵙⵉⵉⵏⴻⵙ. "he
He doesn’t give me a straight answer when I ask him if I can.”
“He didn’t just want hope for more mathematics,” he said .
Hermione ⵙ ⵜⵎⵓⵙⵏⵉ. “And perhaps he felt a little with memass, because I was .
Think part of him really sought to get you. ⵙⵢⵉⵏ ⴰⴷ
They will be all the gates.”
“Get out of it!” Harri and Run say, but Hermion said only
He intended to destroy.
“ⵙⵓⴹⴻⵜ ⵉⵎⴰⵏⵏⵡⴻⵏ. But the Tiks I think is that Ron’s mother has the sentence, and Sirius is worried if you’re a full or father, Harry.”
“So you think it’s hugged in the head?” Harry said calmly.
“Let, I just think it’s a lot of that it was a lot,” he said.
Hermiyun quickly.
In the moment, Massa Weasley entered the back room behind them.
“It’s still not about?” She said, she entered the story in prison.
“I thought you might be here to tell us to have a break!” Run said
ⵙ ⵔⵥⴰⵃ. “Do you have you seen how many sermons have taken away since it’s coming back to after?
“There’s a lot you love to get Ordre,” said Massa Weasley, “You can .
Working with the majority of buildings a souls for life.”
“I feel like a pet,” Ron whispered.
“ⴰⵀⴰ, ⵜⵓⵔⴰ ⵉⵎⵉ ⵜⴻⴼⵀⵉⵎⴻⴹ ⴷ ⴰⵛⵓ ⵏ ⵜⵓⴷⴻⵔⵜ ⵏ ⵜⴽⴻⵔⴽⴰⵙ ⴰⵢ ⵜⵜⴳⴻⵏ, ⴰⵀⴰⵜ ⴰⴷ ⵜⴽⴻⵎⵍⴻⴹ ⵛⵡⵉⵟ ⵏ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵙⵉⵡⵉⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ SPEW!” Hermiyun said with hope,
As Massa Weasley left for another time. “You have seen, perhaps not that
It would have been a bad idea to show people how hard it was to clean all
moment — we can do a focused review of the Gryffindor room,
All money will be released for SPEW, they will develop the same as to increase money —”
“I’m going to fuck you so you suck on the towel,” Ron growled,
ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⴰⵍⴰ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⴰⵙⵉⵙⵍⵉ Harry.
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⵓⴼⴰⴷ ⵉⵎⴰⵏⵉⵙ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴰⵔⴳⵓ Hogwarts ⵙ ⵡⴰⵟⴰⵙ
As the end of the holidays approaches; He couldn't wait to see Hagrid.
Once again, to play Quidditch, even walking through cornfields to
of Herbological herbs. It will be good if you just leave that this is the god,
The Lmusterian house, ANIDAia have still accused with a bomb, and
ⴽⵔⴻⴰⵛⵀⴻⵔ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⴼⴻⵖⴷ ⵍⵃⴻⵇ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵜⵉⵍⵉ ⵎⵉ ⵜⴻⵄⴹⵉⵍ, ⵖⴰⵙ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ
Harry was careful not to say any of that in Sirius's ear.
The truth was that the liver in the magazine of the fight against Voldemort .
The movement wasn't as exciting or thrilling as Harry would have done.
They waited before the benefit. Though members of the Order of the Phoenix come and go on a regular basis, sometimes staying for
food, sometimes only for a few minutes of scornful conversation,
Mrs. Weasley made sure Harry and the others were well taken care of
The port of ports (as Extendable or notormal) and none, even Sirius, is unfortunate that Harry should know anything more .
ⵜⴻⵙⵍⴰ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⴹ ⵏ ⵓⵙⵙⵉⵡⴻⴹⵉⵙ.
On the last day of the holidays, Harry was spraying Hedwig's potion from the top of the wardrobe when Ron walked in .
Their bedroom holds two shelves.
“The book orders have arrived,” he says, holding one of the envelopes up .
to Harry, who was standing on a stool. “About time, I thought I would .
Forgotten, they usually arrive much earlier than that. . . .”
Harry emptied the last of the beads into a trash bag and threw it away
The bag on Run’s head to the empty paper basket in the nearby,
I swallowed it and pushed hard. He then opened his letter: D
It consists of two pieces of paper, one is a constant reminder of the word
He started on the first of September, and someone else told him which books to
They will be needed for next year.
“Only two new ones,” he said, reading the list. “The gradebook .
spells, 5th level, by Miranda Goshawk and the Magical Theory of the Warrior,
by Wilbert Slinkhardt.”
crack.
Fred and George Appear alongside Harry. He was very tempted
They were doing that now because he hadn't even fallen from his chair.
“We were just wondering who the book was for Slinkhard ,” he says.
Fred exclaimed.
"Because it means Dumbledore got a new defense against
Master of the Dark Arts,” George said.
“And about time too,” Fred said.
“What do you mean?” Harry asked, kneeling next to them.
“Well, we heard mom and dad talking about extended ears .
A few weeks ago,” Fred told Harry, “and from what they say, .
Dumbledore had a real problem finding someone to do this job.
year."
“Unsurprising, isn’t it, when you look at what happened with the last one .
Wednesday?” George said.
“One was dismembered, another died, another was stripped of his corpse, and another was imprisoned .
potatoes for nine months,” Harry said, counting them on his fingers. “Yeah, I know what you mean.”
“What’s wrong with you, Ron?” Fred asked.
Ron didn't answer. Harry looked to his side. Run was very stand
His mouth was still slightly open, staring at his letter from Hogwarts.
“What’s wrong?” Fred said impatiently, looking at Ron to
Look over his shoulder at the paper.
Fred’s mouth fell open as well.
"principal?" He said, staring at the letter in disbelief. "principal?"
George leapt forward, grabbed the ball from Ron’s other hand, and
He nodded his head. Harry saw something red and gold fall into his
George's body.
“No way,” George said in a quiet voice.
“There was a mistake,” Fred said, pulling the letter out of the .
Ron grabbed it and held it up to the light as if checking for a watermark. “No one in their right mind would make Ron a prefect. . . .”
The twins heads turned in unison and both stared at the
Harry.
“We thought it was cert!” Fred said in a reassuring tone
Harry was insulting them in some way.
“We thought Dumbledore was supposed to choose you!” George said
With anger.
“We’re going to win Traizard and all!” Fred said.
“I’m saying all the woman’s attention should be kept for her,” he said .
George to Fred.
“Yeah,” Fred said quietly. “Yeah, you cause a lot of trouble,
colleague. Yes, at least anyone has their predecessors properly.”
He walked to Harry, he took in the head while giving
Ron a somber look.
"persistent . . . Ickle Ronnie is the president . . .”
“Oh, my mother’s going to get nervous,” George said, releasing .
the prefect badge went back to Ron as if he could destroy it.
Ron, still not saying, the banner, he has been injured in 100 years.
For a while, Sinn gave Harry Ammonary insisted with the
Recognizing that it’s true. Harry took it. The Great P was based on Gryffindor’s message. An such government was in
Percy's creatures on the first day in Hogarts.
The door creaked open. Hermine is close to the room, she
his eyebrows arched and his hair flapped. There is a minister in hand.
“Do you — you’ve gotten —?”
She saw the guidance in the hand of Haarry, and found a Solo.
“I know it!” she exclaimed, hanging up her letter. "me too,
Harry, too!”.
“But,” Harry said quickly, and the banner went back to the Ron’s hand.
“It’s Ron, not me.”
“And — and what?”
"It's Ron's prefect, not me," Harry said.
“Run?” Hermione said, tugging at the chin. "But . . . Are you sure? I
mean -"
She was married to a black when Ron was supposedly slammed in the slavery in the character.
He said: “D name in the letter.”
"I . . ." said Hermionee, it’s accustomed to silly. . . Well
. . . nice! Hey, Ron! true -"
“I didn’t expect it,” George said, smiling.
“No,” Hermione said, blushing harder than ever, “no, it’s not . . .
Ron did a lot of . . . He really is. . .”
The door behind the culture a little with Massa Weasley .
He returned to a house taken in a century from the new lamb.
“Genny said it’s what the books haven’s ending,” she said, the Omeel .
At the middle of the statistics all when you come to this acquisition and
They started sorting the clothes into two piles. “If they’ve got these .
Take them to Diagon Alley this afternoon and get your books.
At the time when you are hurting. Ron, I had to bring more of the pizza, Wige and
At least six long-term symptoms, I can’t like us how to grow quickly . . .
And what was told to tell you?”
“The gold and gold to meet with the Government,” said George with a woman’s view.
“Mahishs? said Massa Weasley with we have no more sight of
heels of blue and placed them on top of Ron's.
“His badge,” Fred said, with an air of gracious encouragement .
quickly. “The new prefekt division is guilty of guilt.”
Fred’s words took a time to enter into Massa Weasley on tpijama.
"Well . . . But . . . Ron, aren't you. . . ?"
Ron held up his wand.
Mrs. Weasley let out a scream similar to Hermione's.
“I don’t believe it! I don't believe it! Oh, Ron, how wonderful! a
executive! It’s all in the family!”
“What are Fred and I, next-door neighbors?” George said excitedly, as his mother pushed him aside and threw her arms around him .
His youngest son.
“Wait until your father hears! Ron, you’re very happy, and why smooth data, you can get the Head Boy like Bill and Percy, and
The first step! Oh, what’s going to happen in the middle of all this
You’re right, I’m just excited, Ronnie —”
Fred and George were in both the ears of ears behind them
Learning but Massa Wesley is not seen; Heavier hands than Run’s
His head, she was kissing all over his face, which had turned blonde
Scarlet her boss.
"mom . . . don't . . . Mom, hold on. . . .” he said, trying to
Suck it up.
She pushed him away and whispered, "What will it be?" we
It gave Percy a head, but you already have, it’s true.”
“Anda what you want to get a monastery?” Run said, looking oblivious
He would believe his own ears.
“You’ve got to have a balance on that!” Mrs. Weasley said excitedly.
“How can you say with a good new brilliant of the season?”
“We’ve already bought her some,” says Fred, who looks like .
Although he truly regretted this loss.
“Or is a new ship, the old Charlie affects, or new .
Rat, you’ve always loved Skabbers —”
“Mays,” Ron said with hope, “Istained to have a new body?”
Mrs. Weasley's face fell slightly; The toilet bowls were expensive.
“Not a really good one!” Ron tried to add. “Right — just new .
One for a change . . .”
Ms. Weasley feels like, Synnessus was.
“Of course you can. . . . So, I better go if I have a body.
They will also buy. See you all later. . . . Little Ronnie, he's so damn good! And don't
It will be introducing the pedestrian. . . . A prefect . . . Oh, I’m the craziest!”
She was given to Ron another squad in the course, she strongly known, and fell out with a squad from the room.
Fred and George agreed on views.
“You don’t mind if we don’t kiss you, do you, Ron?” Fred said in a
The salvation of the neighbors of entrepreneurs.
“We can course, if you want,” George said.
“Oh, shut up,” Ron said, looking at them.
“Or what?” Fred said, an evil grin spreading across his face. "going
To put in jail?”
“I’d love to see him try,” George quipped.
“It can if you’re not careful!” Hermionee said for a sick, on
Fred and George and Ron started with the woman’s vision, “Ssers,
Hermione.”
“We need to see our way, A George,” said Fred, the Ammon work, “With Sinai about our situation. . . .”
“Yeah, the same as our days of the laws of the laws have done the end of the end,” he said .
George, protects historic.
Another mystery also in a high, satellite, Disaparated kines.
“Both!” Hermione said with a tip, and buried at the SX,
through which they could now hear Fred and George singing with
Laughter in the upper room. “Pay no attention to them, Ron, .
They’re just jealous!”
“I don’t think they are,” Ron said dubiously, even glancing up at the spider .
top. “They always say only praetors become prefects. . . . Still,” he said
He added even more excitedly, “they don’t have new bodies! bid
He can go with my mother and choose. . . . She can’t have a
Nimbus, but there’s a new Cleansweep coming out, that would be nice. . . .
Yeah, I guess I’ll go tell her I love Cleansweep, just so she’s
He knows. . . .”
He stormed out of the room, leaving Harry and Hermione alone.
For some reason, Harry found he didn't want to look at
Hermione. He walked over to his bed and picked up the clean linen
Mrs. Weasley put on it and crossed the room to her car.
“Harry?” Hermione said with a frown.
“Hello,” Harry said, as heartless as his voice .
All, and he still wouldn't look at her. "Bright. Boss. Very good."
“Thank you,” Hermione said. “Erm — Harry — I could borrow .
Hedwig so I can tell Mom and Dad? They would really care — I
rather, a prefect is something they can understand—”
“Yeah, no problem,” Harry said, still sounding hopelessly heartbroken .
It wasn't his. “Take it!”
He leaned against his jacket, tucked the blanket down on his bottom, and pretended to whisper something while Hermione rushed to .
his clothes and called Hedwig down. A few moments passed; Harry
I heard the door close but she kept double closing it, listening; Only one
The only sounds he could hear was the ghostly image on the wall clicking again.
and the empty paper bag in the middle removes a thin layer of wax.
He straightened up and looked behind him. Hermione and Hedwig walked away. Harry hurried back to his bed and collapsed on it, staring unseeingly at the foot of the wardrobe.
He had forgotten all about the election of prefects in
The fifth year. He was too worried about the possibility of his expulsion to stop thinking about the fact that the balloons were supposed to have wings .
Their way to some people. But if he remembered . . . If he
He was thinking about her . . . What would he expect?
It’s not that, a small and truthful voice said inside his head.
Harry brought his face down and buried it in his hands. unable
He lied to himself; If he knew the president’s secret was on his way, he
She would wait for him to come to her, not Ron. Does this do it?
Like Draco Malfoy? Does he think he is better than everyone else? Did he really believe he was better than Ron?
No, said the little voice with a grin.
Is that true? Harry asked, desperately searching for her feelings.
I’m obsessed with Quidditch, the voice said. But I wasn’t better than anything.
else.
It was certainly true, Harry thought; It was no better than Run.
In lessons. But what about external lessons? What about those memories he, Ron, and Hermione had together all along .
At Hogwarts, it often gets a lot worse than expulsion?
Well, Ron and Hermione were with me most of the time, the voice said .
In Harry's head.
Not all the time, though, does Harry argue with himself. They didn’t fight .
Kurrel with me. They didn’t take Riddle and the baby. They don’t do it.
get rid of all those bastards on the night Sirius escaped. They’re not into that
shelter with me, the night Voldemort returned. . . .
And it was that feeling of being misused that overwhelmed him in
The night he arrived he woke up again. I’ve definitely done more, Harry
He thought bitterly. I’ve done more than two of them!
But maybe, the little voice thought correctly, maybe Dumbledore didn't know .
They chose the prefects because they got themselves into a load of dangerous situations. . . . He may have chosen them for other reasons. . . . should have Run
Something you don’t do. . . .
Harry opened his eyes and looked at the padded seats with his fingers, remembering what Fred had said.
“No one in their right mind would make Ron a prefect. . . .”
Harry gave a small snort of laughter. A moment later, he felt ill.
By himself.
Ron didn't ask Dumbledore to give him the prefect badge. this
It wasn't Ron's fault. There was he, Harry, Run's best friend in the world,
Going mad because he didn't have a note, laughing with the twins
Behind Ron’s back, they screwed this up for Ron when, for the first time, he had
Did he hit Harry in anything?
At this moment, Harry heard Ron's footsteps on the stairs again. he
He stood up, cleared his teeth, and plastered a smile on his face as if
Ron walked back through the door.
“He just took it!” he said proudly. “She said she’d bring Cleansweep if she could.”
“Cul,” Harry said, and he was relieved to hear that his voice had .
Stop with a heartbeat. “Listen — Ron — okay, baby.”
The smile left Ron's face.
“I never thought it would be me!” He said, shaking his head, “I .
You thought it would be you!”
"No, I've made too much trouble," Harry said, answering Fred.
“Yeah,” Ron said, “yeah, I guess. . . . So, we better keep our
The backpack is full, isn’t it?”
It was odd how their wealth was distributed.
themselves since their arrival. She took them most of the afternoon.
They will bring their books and belongings from all over the house and
They settled inside their school bags. Harry knew that Run
Continuing to scan his boss’s badge, he initially placed it next to his bed
table, then put it in his jeans pocket, then took it out and put it on his folded stockings, as if to see the effect of red on
black. It was only when Fred and George landed and offered to tie
He tied it to her chin in a permanent pin
with a knife in his suitcase and locked in his trunk.
Mrs. Weasley returned from Diagon Street at six in the morning, loaded
with books and holding a long parcel wrapped in dark brown paper that Ron removed with a grateful grin.
“Never mind now, people come over for dinner, I .
Want you all down,” she said, but the moment she left the
Theory Ron tore through the paper furiously and examined every inch of the
his new weapon, the happy expression on his face.
At the bottom of the house, Mrs. Weasley had hung a black banner.
On the overcrowded dinner table, he wrote thank you
ron and Hermione — the new owners. She looked in good spirits.
Than Harry had seen him all Christmas.
“I thought we were going to have a small party, not a sit-down dinner,” she said.
When Harry, Ron, Hermione, Fred, George, and Gin entered the
room. “Your dad and Bill are on their way, Ron, I got them both .
babies and they’re excited,” she added, beaming.
Fred rolled his eyes.
Sirius, Lupine, Tonks, and Kingsley Shacklebolt are already there
and Mad-Eye Moody walked in shortly after Harry found himself
Cheese beer.
"Oh Alastor, I'm glad you're here," Mrs. Weasley whispered, as .
Madeye pulled out his travel bag. “We wanted to ask
You of the ages — can you look at the writing desk in the living room and tell us what’s inside? We don’t want to just open it
Unless it’s really bad.”
“No problem, Molly . . .”
Moody's electric blue eye turned up and stared intently
with the top of the tank.
“The living room . . .” he said, as the student snorted. “Desk in
Corner? Yes, I saw it. . . . Yes, it’s an animal. . . . You want me to go
Get up and pee, Molly?”
“No, no, I’ll do it myself later,” Mrs. Weasley said cheerfully. "possess
Your drink. We had a bit of a fun, actually. . . .” she
marked with a red banner. “He’s the fourth in the family!” She said
Gently, he strokes Ron's lips.
“Director, yes?” Moody said, his normal eyes on Ron and his magic eyes moving to look at the side of his head. He had Harry
A very uncomfortable feeling as he looked at her and left her.
With Sirius and Lupine in tow.
"Well, congratulations," Moody said, still glaring at Ron .
normal eye, “Power figures always attract trouble, but I think .
Dumbledore thinks you can face a lot of great jinn or he
He didn’t blame you. . . .”
Run looked shocked at this turn of events but was saved.
The difficulty of answering questions about the father and the elder
brother. Mrs. Weasley was in such a good mood she didn't even notice
They complain that they have brought Mundungus with them as well; was
He wears a long coat that seems gross in the most unlikely of places.
And he declined the offer to withdraw it and return it to Moody's traveling .
The coat.
“Well, I suppose a toast is in order,” Mr. Weasley said, when everyone was .
He has some sweat. He raised his cup. "To Ron and Hermione, the new
They’re Gryffindor nobles!”
Ron and Hermione sparkled as they each drank and then
He got a hand.
"I'm not a prefect myself," Tonks whispered from behind .
Harry as everyone heads to the table to help themselves
food. His hair was tomato-red and shoulder length today; It looks like
Ginny’s elderly sister. “My Head of House says I lack some necessary qualifications.”
“Like what?” ” said Ginny, which was hidden in the potatoes.
"Like being able to heal myself," Tonks said.
The sensitive; Hermione looks like not seen.
Whether or not to breastfeed and continue with taking an extra adult
gulp ⵏ ⵍⴱⵉⵔⵔⴰ ⴷ ⵜⵎⴻⵇⴱⴻⵔⵜ ⴼⴻⵍⵍⴰⵙ.
“What is you, A Sirius?” The Ginni asked, and Hermion is surrounded by
foot.
Sris, belongs to Harry, and found the sight of the ears of anniversary.
“No one is going to make me a prefect, I spent a lot of time in
ⵍⵃⴻⴱⵙ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⴷ James. Lupine is a good boy, he got a secret.”
"I think maybe Dumbledore hoped I'd be able to exercise some control over my best friends," Lupine said. “I barely need
Tell that I’ve been silent with the house.”
At once, the case of Harry. ⴱⴰⴱⴰⵙ ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴷ prefet. ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵉⴽⴽⴻⵍⵜ, ⵉⴱⴰⵏⴷ ⴷ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵜⴰⵎⴻⵖⵔⴰⵏⵏⵉ ⵜⴻⵙⵄⴰ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ ⵏ ⵍⴼⴻⵕⵃ; full
His painting, he feels unusually calm for everyone in the room.
Ron was talking about his new haircut to anyone who would
listen.
“. . . Nopeed until the tents, he is heavenly and true, it’s truth? When you
Think Comet Two Ninety is just a few to sixty and that’s with a
A good idea based on Anwa Broomstick?”
Hermione ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵎⴻⵙⵍⴰⵢ ⵙ ⵍⴵⴻⵀⴷ ⴷ Lupin ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉⵙ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵢⵉⵍⴻⴼ.
leaves.
“I want to say, and the kind of things that aren’t like the chicks, .
What are you these ? It took everything from what the worst forth they have advocacy of thoughts.
they are higher than other creatures. . . .”
Mrs. Weasley and Bill were talking like each time on Bill
hair.
“. . . You really came out of hand, and you seem so good, and
It will be a very good, so food that, A Harry?”
“Ah — I dounno —” Harry said, with luxury for a little bit sick about Winnis .
opinion; He stepped out of them towards Fred and George,
ⵉ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵃⴻⴱⵙⴻⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⵍⴻⵎⵎⴰⵙⵜ ⴷ Mundungus.
Mundungus ⵢⴻⵃⴱⴻⵙ ⴰⵡⴰⵍ ⵎⵉ ⵉⵡⴰⵍⴰ Harry, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ Fred ⵉⵄⴻⴳⴳⴻⴹ
ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵉⴳⴻⵔⴷ ⴰⴼⵓⵙ ⵉ Harry ⴰⴷ ⵉⵇⴻⵔⵔⴻⴱ.
“Not on it,” he told Mundungus, “We can give confidence in Harry, he is our financial guard.”
"Look what Dung got us," George said, holding out his hand .
For Harry. It was filled with what looked like glowing black feathers. stomach
ⵍⵃⴻⵙⵙ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵢⴻⵜⵜⴰⵙⴷ ⵙⴻⴳⵙⴻⵏ, ⵖⴰⵙ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵜⵜⴱⴻⴷⴷⵉⵍⴻⵏ ⴰⴽⴽ.
“Tentacula’s roots are poisonous,” George said. « ⵏⴻⵃⵡⴰⴵⵉⵜⴻⵏ ⵉ ⵍⵎⴻⵏⴷ ⵏ
Skiving Snackboxes ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⴷ ⵜⴰⵖⴰⵡⵙⴰ ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⵙⵙⴻⵏⵣ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵓⵙⵡⵉⵔ C ⵉⵀⵉ
We were having a little trouble getting hold of them.”
“ⵎⵔⴰⵡ ⵏ ⵢⵉⴳⴰⵍⵉⵢⵓⵏⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵍⵇⵓⵜ, ⵉⵀⵉ, ⴰ Dung?” Fred said.
“Wiv all the trouble I went to get them?” said Mundungus, Winnis
ⵙⴰⴳⴳⵢ, ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵉⴷⴰⵎⴻⵏ ⵜⵜⵏⴻⵔⵏⵉⵏⵜ ⵓⴳⴰⵔ. “ⵙⵙⵓⵔⴻⴼⵉⵢⵉ, ⴰ ⵡⴰⵔⵔⴰⵛ, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵏⴻⴽⴽ
It doesn’t take Knut less than twenty.”
« ⴷⵓⵏⴳ ⵉⵃⴻⵎⵎⴻⵍ ⵍⵃⴻⵇⵉⵙ ⴰⵎⴻⵥⵢⴰⵏ », ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Fred ⵉ Harry.
“Yeah, wet, so far and six Sckles for a Knarl skirt .
The Gulf,” George said.
“ⵃⴰⴷⵔⴻⵜ ⵉⵎⴰⵏⵏⵡⴻⵏ,” ⵉ ⵜⴻⵏⵉⵃⴻⵜⵜⴻⵎ Harry ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ.
"what?" Fred said. “My mother is worried about Prefect Ron, we .
okay."
"But Moody might have his eye on you," Harry pointed out.
Moondungos was malignantly on the village.
“Good point, this,” he chuckled. “Okay, kids, it's ten, if you want
They are going to learn with them.”
“Good morning, Harry!” Fred said with happiness, when Mundungus had
He emptied his pockets into the twin's frozen hands and disappeared
off towards the food. “Foy if we’ve got the Wigy on the right. . . .”
Harry watched them go, feeling a little uneasy. It had only occurred to her that Mr. and Mrs. Weasley would want to know how .
Fred and George were finishing their comic shop business when, as it was
Inevitably, they eventually find out about it. Giving the company its Triwizard success seemed the easy thing to do at the time, but .
What if it leads to further family strife and revenge like Percy?
Would Mrs. Weasley still feel that Harry was as good as her son if
Did she find out he got Fred and George to start a business she thought wasn’t so good?
He stands where the twins left him with nothing but a prisoner
Visual in the liver ship for the Union, Harry took the satellite
of his name. Kingsli Shaklbull’s story was even heard
about the surrounding conversation.
“. . . Why didn’t Dumbledore make Potter a hero?” Kingsley said.
"He would have had his reasons," Lupine replied.
“But she would have shown confidence in him. That’s what I’m going to do,”
It told Kingsley with strong, “ 'There with the Nnbi of every day has a way in .
Have it every few days. . . .”
Harry did not meet the side; Lupin or Kingsli did not want to
They knew he heard. He followed Mundungus back backward,
Having not been absent. His interest in the party is gone.
Usually that it was; He wished he was upstairs in bed.
Madeye Moody was enjoying a chicken breast with leftovers
of his nose; As obviously no smell’s foot can find, because
Both suspected a prison with Thursday.
“. . . The hand was made with the Spenyul potatoes with lvernis vs. jeans and
the built-in charm —” Ron was telling Tonks.
Ms. Weasley has snapped with a lot.
“Well, I think I’ll sort that rat out before I go inside. . . . Arthur,
I don’t want this much coming out, okay? “Yest, A Hari, Ahpi.”
She walked out of the kitchen. Harry put down his briefcase and asked himself
If you can follow if the guarantee stands.
“Are you alright, Potter?” said Mudi.
“Yeah, with good,” he made Harry.
Moody took a drink from his hip mug, electric blue eyes watching
Right along with Harry.
“Come here,” he said, “I have something for you.”
From an inside pocket of his clothes Moody pulled a very tattered old .
The Magic Moment.
“Phoenix’s temporary text,” Moody said quickly. “I found it the last
The night when I was looking for the incredible sharps, I think the likes of
Podmore doesn’t have to be afraid to resemble the wounds. . . . thought
People probably like to watch it.”
Harry took the picture. A small group of people, some looking
At him, the others raised their cloaks and stared back at him.
"There's me," Moody said unnecessarily, pointing to himself. the
Moody in that picture is incredible, though his hair was a bit
Less gray and his nose was broader. "And there's Dumbledore next to me, . . ."
Dedalus Diggle On The Other Side . . . This is Marlene McKinnon, she
He was murdered two weeks after this was taken, and his whole family were sent away.
That’s Frank and Alice Longbuttum—”
Harry's stomach, already unsettled, clenched as he watched
Long Brows; He knew too well his friendly, friendly, even
Although he never met her, because she was the image of his son,
Nephilim.
“Poor devils,” said Moody. “Better die than what happened .
to them . . . And that’s Emmeline Vance, you’ve met her, that’s wa
There’s Lupine, obviously . . . Benji Fenwick, he got it too, we just
He never found parts of it . . . set aside there,” he added, and held out the picture, and the little shadowy creatures stepped aside, so that those
which were temporarily depressed could move to the front.
“It was Edgar Bones . . . Brother of Amelia Bones, found to be
Even his family, he was a great magician . . . Sturges Budmore, blimey, he
He looks young. . . Caraduc Dirborn, disappeared six months after that, we
He never found her body . . . Hagrid, of course, looks like
ever . . . Elphias Doge, did you meet him, I forgot he was wearing
That ball of bubbles. . . Gideon Prewett, It Takes Five Death Eaters To Kill
He and his brother Fabian, fought like heroes . . . Budget aside,
Budge on longevity . . .”
The little people in the picture are kissing each other, and
The one hidden straight back appears at the top of the picture.
"It was Dumbledore's brother, Aberforth, I only met him once, . . ."
Poor man. . . It was Dorcas Meadows, Voldemort killed her himself . . . Sirius, when he still had gray hair . . . and . . . There you
Go, I thought you’d like this!”
Harry's heart twisted. His mother and father were flying
To him, perched on either shoulder of a small, watery-eyed man, Harry recognized him at once as Wormtail: He was the one who had done their shit .
Where he was to Voldemort and thus helped bring about their deaths.
"Yes?" Modi said.
Harry looked at Moody's pale and worried face. Obviously, Moody was under the impression that he just gave Harry a little.
of the same treatment.
“Yeah,” Harry said, trying to regain composure. “er . . . Listen, I have
Just remember, I didn’t check . . .”
is protected from the problem of creating an object that doesn't have
He was crushed; Sirius simply said, "What's that you got there, MadEye?"
And Moody had turned to her. He ran Harry across the kitchen.
He walked out the door and slipped out of the suit before anyone could ring
later.
He didn't know why he got such anxiety; He saw his
Pictures of the parents before, after all, and he met Wormtail . . . But to
They made them slide like that, when he least expected it . . .
No one would care about that, he thought angrily. . . .
And then, you see them surrounded by all the other happy faces .
. . . Benji Fenwick, who was picked in the wings, was Gideon Priwett,
The one who died like a beast was the Longbottoms, who were tortured to a crisp . . . They all look happy from the picture
Forever, they didn’t know they were trapped. . . . So, Mudi
You may find this interesting . . . He, Harry, found it amusing. . . .
Harry tiptoed down the hall, past the stuffed elves heads.
He was glad to go back by himself, but as he approached the first ridge,
I heard noises. Someone was relaxing in the living room.
"Hello?" Harry said.
There was no answer but the shouting continued. He left on
He sat down the crew two at a time, walked across the deck, and opened
The door to the living room.
Someone was leaning against the heavy wall, his shirt in
A hand, her whole body trembling with convulsions. Spreads on the old dusty
carpeted in a pool of moonlight, clearly dead, was Ron.
All the air seemed to leave Harry's lungs; He felt like he
they were falling through the floor; Her mind turned cold as ice—Ron was dead,
No, it can’t be —
But wait a minute, it can’t be — Ron is down — .
"Miss. Weasley?” Harry shouted.
"Rridiculous!"
In Ron's body.
crack.
Ron's body turned into Bill's, smeared with an eagle on his back, his eyes
Wide open and empty. Mrs. Weasley was quieter than ever.
“Ridiculous!” She screamed again.
crack.
Mr. Weasley's body replaced Bill's, his balance slightly, the
Blood running down his face.
"No!" Mrs. Weasley smirked. "No . . . Ridiculous! Ridiculous!
RIDICULUS!”
crack. Technically dead. crack. Percy died. crack. Harry died . . .
"Miss. Weasley, just get out of here!” Harry shouted, looking down.
in his dead body on the floor. “Let the other —”
“What’s going on?”
Lupine came running into the room, followed closely by Sirius,
with Moody crouching behind them. Lupine looked up from Mrs.
Weasley to Harry dead on the floor and he seemed to understand in
One time. He drew his wand and said, loud and clear,
“Ridiculous!”
Harry's body went limp. A silver lining hung in the air above the place.
Where she was staying. Lupine flicked his wand again and the spell disappeared in a puff of smoke.
“Oh — oh — oh!” said Mrs. Weasley, and broke into a
bubble wrapped around him, his face in his hands.
“Molly,” Lupine growled, walking over to her, “Molly, don’t . . .”
The next moment she was pressing her heart against Lupin's throat.
“Molly, it’s just a boggart,” he whispered, patting her on the cheek .
head. “He’s just a stupid boggart . . .”
“I see them dm all the time!” Mrs. Weasley stares into his face
shoulder. “All the time! I dreamed about him . . .”
Sirius was staring at the window of the car where the boggart was sitting, pretending to be Harry's body. Mudi was lying in Hari.
who averted his gaze. He had a funny feeling Moody's magical eye.
I followed him all the way out of the kitchen.
“Don’t tell Arthur,” Mrs. Weasley scowled now, smirking .
His eyes were pleased with his orbs. “I don’t want him to know. . . .
It is a fool. . .”
Lupine gave her a handkerchief, and she blew her nose.
“Harry, I’m so sorry, what did you have to tell me?” She said slaves.
“Can’t even get rid of a boggart . . .”
“Don’t be sick,” Harry said, trying to satisfy.
“I’m just so sorry,” she said, tears streaming down her cheeks .
again. “The Fuffy family at Udabu will be BBD Llojiza if we were all .
The process with this. . . . and PPPercy does not speak to us. . . . What if
Something dddreadful happened and we never got mmmad up?
And what happens to be if we are Arthur are called, who is the
Would you keep Ron and Ginny?”
“Molly, that’s the right thing,” Lupin said with strong. “That’s not as time last time.
The singer was designed, we have a tasty, watch and what is.
Voldemort has reached —”
Mrs. Weasley gave a little squeak of fear at the sound of that name.
“Molly, come on, time to get used to hearing it—
No, I can’t help one unresponsive, one could not be surprising
This is, but we’re so much busier than we were last time, you’re not in
The number, you don’t understand, the last time they were very much
Twenty to one by the Death Eaters and they were picking us off one by one
one. . . .”
Harry thought back to that image, to his parents' smile
faces. He knew Moody was still watching him.
“Don’t worry Percy,” Sirius whispered. “Let’s going quickly.
It was a matter of time before Voldemort broke into the open; Once he
It works, the entire department will be begging us to forgive them.
and I didn’t think I’m going to accept their own,” which was with good.
“And and about who would live on Ron and Ginny if you’re full .
Arthur died,” said Loupin, he knows a little bit, “What’s true to work .
He did, let them die for lazy?”
Mrs. Weasley smiled sarcastically.
“You’d be a jerk,” she said again, rolling her eyes.
But Hari, he closed the door of the room behind about tens of ten minutes
Follow, unable to think Massa Weasley is a horrific. He can still look at parents.
He leaves him from the beautiful old image, and he doesn’t see that
Their lives, like a lot of those for the circles, almost ending.
An image of a boggart pretending to be the incarnation of any member of the Lady.
The Weasley family with the sight is shortened in front of the lens.
Without warning, the muscles in his neck twitched painfully again
And his stomach churns oddly.
“Green,” he said with a defensive, he constraints on the ears that he returned.
again.
“The first sign of bullying, you’re talking to your boss,” says a sarcastic voice .
From that weird picture on the wall.
Harry didn't notice. He felt taller than he had ever felt in his life, and
It seemed so unusual to him that it had been there for almost an hour.
They worry about the memory shop and who got the prefect badge.

Chapter Ten
LUNA LOVES

Harry had trouble sleeping. Her parents are cooking outside.
of his dreams, he does not speak; Mrs. Weasley cried about
Kreacher's body was seen by Ron and Hermione, who were wearing masks, and Harry too found himself walking down a corridor that ended with a locked door. He slowly stood up with his hair.
prickling to find Ron already dressed and talking with him.
“. . . Better hurry up, mom is going ballistic and says let’s go
The ship is wrecked. . . .”
There was a lot of arguing at home. From what he heard as
Dressed with great care, Harry gathered that Fred and George stretched their legs to fly lower to save the trouble of loading
To them, as a result of them contacting Ginny directly and
He knocked a couple of blows down the hall; Black lady is
Mrs. Weasley was both yelling at the top of her voice.
“— COULD HAVE GREATLY INJURED, YOU
JEWS —”
“— HALF OLD MENDERS, OWNING A HOUSE
of my fathers —”
Hermione came storming into the room, looking nervous as
Harry was dodging his teachers; Hedwig was floating on her back, and she had a grinning Crookshanks in her arms.
“Mommy and Daddy just carried Hedwig back”—the umbrella popped free and sat on its heels—“you ready yet?”
“Almost — Ginny all right?” Harry asked, rubbing his temples.
"Miss. Weasley is ready," Hermione said. "But now Mad-Eye is complaining that we can't leave unless Sturgis Podmore is here, .
Otherwise, the guard will be the same.”
"guard?" Harry said. “Should we go to King's Cross with an escort?”
“You should go to King's Cross with an escort,” Hermione explained .
he.
"why?" Harry said calmly. “I think Voldemort should be .
Would he be sleeping downstairs, or are you telling me to jump off
Behind the scenes to try to seduce me?”
"I don't know, that's just what MadEye said," Hermione said .
Hesitantly, she glances at her watch. “But if we don’t get out quickly, we are
Surely the machine will be disappointed. . . .”
“LEAD IN HERE NOW, PLEASE!” madam.
Weasley yelled and Hermione jumped like she was shocked and
He quickly left the room. Harry grabs Hedwig, throws her shamelessly into her cage, and disappears down behind Hermione, dragging her .
his potatoes.
Mrs. Black’s body was shaking with rage but no one dared to close the bandages over it; All the noise in the hall was turned off.
She will be involved again anyway.
“Harry, you’re coming with me and Tonks,” Mrs. Weasley said .
On the repeated cries of “MUDBLOODS ! ASCUM! BUYERS
N LEQDIC!” “Leave your boat and oars, Alastor will deal .
The products. . . . Ah, on the sky of heaven, a Sirius, Dumbledree Ala!”
One black jewel like Orree beside the Harry when he recalls Harry.
Berbred of vehicles gathering for skates to reach Massa.
Wesley.
“Oh honestly . . .” Massa Weslae khrecole, “Net, women .
His head will be!”
She opened the front door and stepped out onto the grounds.
Toper sunlight. Harry and the john follows. gate
They were punished and the Massa Blk's slot
At the same time.
“Where’s Tonks?” Harry said, looking around as they went down
Twenty-two, slopes in Lawan is
He reached the store.
"She's just waiting for us up here," Mrs. Weasley whispered, tearing her eyes away from the black dog pacing in Harry's direction.
An older woman greeted them in the background. She was tightly bound.
Dark hair and wearing a blue hat in the shape of a pigtail.
“Warter, A Hari,” said, the coordinator. “For does not have, not to eat it,
Moly?” She said, she was still in the sight.
“I know, I know,” said Massa Wesley, ran the way, .
“But MadEye wants to wait for Sturgis. . . . Limmers can Artur
We got cars from the ministry again . . . But Fudge wouldn’t give up
Listen to buried like the spoilers of bunch for days. . . . how
Muggles can stand travel without magic . . .”
But the big black casino has given a joy with happiness and clean.
ten, she feeds the animals, and follows her tail. Harry couldn’t
Help laughter. Sirius had been trapped inside for a long time.
Ms Weasley has signed up with almost like a Khali Petunia.
The minutes of minutes to get to King's Cross with foot and
Nothing happened at the time more than Sirius
Two cats for Harry's comfort. Once inside the station
They sat calmly next to the barrier between the ninth and 10th floors.
The zero to the middle of the sea, both each of them sat on in
turn and land easily on the thirteenth step,
Where Hoogarts Express stands close to the fire on a serial for a long-term survivors and their families. accomplished Hari
Resistant Ryah and he felt the growing spirit. . . . He was really going.
back. . . .
“I hope to bring others in time,” said Massa Weasley with the hill, .
Looking behind her at the towering steel canopy,
With the latest.
“Gody good, Hari!” called out a tall boy with a grin.
“Thank you, Lee,” said Harry, he was succeeded, as he felt Sirius with the ear.
With pleasure.
“Ah Lhir,” said Massa Wesley, with the body of body, “Atan Alastor .
With potato, see . . .”
A passenger Cup was removed by the uncertainty about the unsuccessfully, Moody
They crawled down the sidewalk pushing a cart full of their boots.
“You need to,” he said with Massa Weasley and Tonks. “Don’t think
We are being watched. . . .”
Any series is aside, Mass Weasley ended back to the Ron and Ron .
It was Hermione. They are almost uploading the Moody products.
When Fred, George and Ginny showed up with Lupine.
"no problem?" said Mudi.
"Nothing," Lupine said.
"I'll still be reporting through Sturgis to Dumbledore," Moody said. “This is
The second time it’s never left in life. The
Mundungus.”
“However, protect yourself,” Lupin said, gave the whole arm.
He reached Harry last and gave him a pat on the back. "you too,
Harry. slow."
“Yeah, protect the rice so with this and with the lucky,” said Moody, .
She loves Harry’s hand too. “Don’t forget, y’all — be careful .
What you put into writing. If in doubt, don’t put it in a letter at all.”
“It’s good as you’ve met all,” said Toks, kept Hermione .
and Ginni. “We’ll see you soon, I expect.”
and is the ears of the ongoing ear; Students are still on stage
They started to return to the machine.
“Assively, quickly,” said Massa Wesley with the sight of the skirt, smoking quickly and took Harry twice. "Aru. . . . Ilik is Ahnin. . . . if she takes something to get to you.
For a short season, the big black haunt knocked on the back legs
And she put the in front of Harry feet, but Massa Weasley .
He sent Harry to the machine door by ear, “I for the sky .
She’s more like a dog, Sirius!”
"bye!" Harry called through the open window as the train started.
He would move, while Ron, Hermione and Ginny looked in his direction. the
Photos of Tunks, Lupine, Moody, and Mr. and Mrs. Weasley have been confirmed
In adventure but black punk was stopping the side of the ship, hunting the story; We did not see in the play are guilty as they rejected.
They took control of the train, then turned the corner, and Sirius was
gone.
“They shouldn’t come with us,” Hermione said with a mess .
sound.
“Thince,” Ron said, “The number of months ago did not see the day light, .
Poor man.”
“Well,” said Fred, and he snapped the whole hands, “it couldn’t stop .
Speaking the day Cameel, we had the work to meet with Lee. see you soon,"
He and George were able to leave the shop with the right side.
The car was still injuries, as well as outdoor houses
The ruined and trash were injured where they were to stand.
“We’re going to go to find part, yes?” Harry asked Ron and
Hermione.
Ron and Hermione exchanged looks.
“Er,” Ron said.
“We—well—Ron and I have to join the prefect .
The creature,” Hermione said with Liver.
Ron was not singing in Harry; The Amazon was becoming a guard.
Please love the left sand left.
“Oh,” Harry said. "The hands. The phrase."
“I don’t think we should stay there all the behavior,” said Hermione .
quickly. “Our letters you say that we only get the instructions from Head Boy .
and Taqict both do the behavior in the streets from time to another.”
“Yes,” Harry said again. “Have, I I can be of you soft, yes.”
“Yes, of course,” Ron said, and he turned the view of the view of the view to Harry.
“It was a pain to go down there, I hated—but I had to—I
I mean, I don’t care, I’m not Percy,” he finished dryly.
“ⵙⵙⵏⴻⵖ ⵓⵔ ⵜⴻⵍⵍⵉⴹ ⴰⵔⴰ”, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Harry ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⵓⵙⴻⵎ. But like Hermione
and Roon Idea stands their legs, Crookshanks, and a Pigardgeon is in the short .
They went out to the machine of the machine, Harry was designed with a non-Leahur.
There was no talk in the Hogarts Meble Ron.
“The day,” said Ginny, “If we have the way we can .
They slaughtered the places.”
“It’s true,” Harry said, and Hedwig’s depths have sought with a phosphate and .
The hand of the car in the other. They fought in the street,
from the doors of the preservation to homes are associated with
They passed, which were already full. ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵣⵎⵉⵔ ⴰⵔⴰ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵄⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⴰⴷ ⵉⵥⴻⵔ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴰ
A lot of people are joyful with greatest and many
They nudged their neighbors and reminded him. When she met
This trip on five consecutive runs, he remembered that
Daily Prophet was listening to readers all summer and why
ⵏ ⵜⵎⵓⵖⵍⵉ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ. suffered from himself, whether he cry crashed and are now speaking, fought, they were spoken.
In the most recent circumstance they met Neville Longbottom, the Harry’s friend of Griffindor of the year’s fifth-year-old, a long face sings with the dating
ⵉⵊⴻⴱⴱⴻⴷ ⵍⴱⴰⵟⴰⵟⴰⵉⵏⴻⵙ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵟⵟⴻⴼ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵓⴼⵓⵙⵉⵙ
of the woman who is fighting, Trevor.
“Hi, Harry,” he whispered. “Hi, Ginny. . . . ⵢⴰⵍ ⴰⵎⴽⴰⵏ ⵢⴻⵞⵞⵓⵔ. . . . I
I can’t find a place. . . .”
“What are you talking about?” ⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰⴷ Ginny, ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵣⴳⴰⵏ ⵢⴻⵣⴳⴻⵔ
Neville will look at the store behind. « ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵡⴻⵎⴽⴰⵏ ⴷⴻⴳ
Aging, only Loony Lovego which is here to here —”
Nevillle believed something about it didn’t want to make one.
“Don’t be afraid,” Ginny said, laughed, “it’s been good.”
ⵜⴻⵍⴷⵉ ⵜⴰⵡⵡⵓⵔⵜ, ⵜⴻⵊⴱⴻⴷⴷ ⵍⴱⴰⵟⴰⵟⴰⵉⵏⴻⵙ ⴷⴰⵅⴻⵍⵉⵙ. Harry d
Nevil follows.
“ⴰⵣⵓⵍ, ⴰ Luna,” ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ Ginni. “If we have the magnestics?”
The boy to a talk to a campaign to day. ⵜⴻⵙⵄⴰ ⴰⵛⴻⴱⴱⵓⴱ ⴷ ⴰⵣⴻⴳⴳⴰⵖ, ⴷ ⴰⵖⴻⵣⴼⴰⵏ, ⴷ ⴰⵣⴻⴳⴳⴰⵖ, ⵜⵉⵟⵟⴰⵡⵉⵏ ⴷ ⵜⵉⵣⴻⴳⵣⴰⵡⵉⵏ, ⴷ ⵡⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⴼⴼⵖⴻⵏ.
It’s what he’s given the sight of the invasion for forever. Harry saw in a singer Achimi
Neville was chosen to pass over the store. The girl gave one
A different rising aura. Maybe she really caught
Alain after the left ear for the preservation, or that they chose it
The story of beer's shirts, or that there is a magazine
with his head. ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏⵉⵙ ⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⴻⵏⵜ ⵖⴻⴼ Neville, ⵓⵙⴰⵏⴷ ⴰⴷ ⵙⴳⵓⵏⴼⵓⵏⵜ ⵖⴻⴼ Harry.
She thanks studies.
“Thank you,” Ginny said, you know about it.
Harry and Neville placed the three dishes as Hedwig's cage in
the potato load and stayed. The girl called Luna watches them.
ⵖⴻⴼ ⵜⴻⵙⵖⵓⵏⵜⵉⵙ ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ, ⵉⵙⴻⵎⵉⵙ The Quibbler. she
It is unclear that they should be relieved as the people of the alphabet. She looks
And he looks at Harry, who's taken a seat next to him and now
I’m not sick.
“Did you have a good summer, Luna?” Question Ginni.
“Yeah,” Luna said dreamily, without taking her eyes off Harry. "Yes,
It was very interesting, you see. You’re Harry Potter,” she added.
“I know I,” Harry said.
Nevil laughed. Luna rolled her blue eyes at him instead.
“Oh I don’t see who you are.”
“I’m nobody,” Neville said flatly.
“There’s no more,” Ginny said quickly. “Nephilim Chest —
Luna good love. Luna in my year, but in Ravenclaw.”
"Wit beyond measure is man's greatest asset," Luna said in a
The voice of singing.
She lifted her magazine up high enough to hide her face.
And he smiled. Harry and Nevelle are continuing in the same through the vision of the pregnancy. They were locked up a rest.
The train jerked forward, speeding them off into the open country. it
It was a carefree, carefree kind of day; At one point the van was filled with
The sunlight is the gods are riding under the ears of the ears.
clouds.
“Guess what I got for my birthday?” Nibil said.
“Another reminder?” Hari said, he remembers what is princes that are reflected in
Equipment sent to him by Neville’s mother in an effort to improve
false memories.
“Now,” Neville said, “I can work with one, however, I’ve been asking the old one .
The age. . . . Even, see this. . . .”
He bit the hand that wasn’t holding Trevor tightly in the
his school bag and after a bit of hesitation produced what appeared to be a small purple cactus in a pot, except it was stuck .
What something flows to she blesss not to be sold.
“Mimbulus of the owl,” he says proudly.
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵉⵥⴻⵔⵔⴷ ⵜⴰⵖⴰⵡⵙⴰⵏⵏⵉ. He was a little bit smooth, giving.
With the sinister vision of some sick inner soul.
“It’s true, it’s true, it’s absurd,” Neville said, flying. “I don’t see what
There was one in the Hogwarts dungeon, too. I can’t wait to show off
It is for Professor Spro. My great uncle Algie brought it to me in Assyria.
I’ll see if I can spell it.”
ⵀⴰⵔⵔⵢ ⵢⴻⵥⵔⴰ ⴱⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴰⵙⴻⵏⵜⴻⵍ ⵉ ⵜⵉⵃⴻⵎⵎⴻⵍ Neville ⴷ Herbology, ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵉ
For the life of him he couldn’t see what he would want with this woman
A small plant.
“Did he — er — do anything?” he asked.
“That’s things!” Neville said excitedly. “He’s got an amazing defensive mechanic — take me Trevor. . . .”
ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⵔⵙ ⵜⴰⵖⴻⵔⵖⴻⵔⵜⵏⵏⵉ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢ ⵏ Harry, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⴽⴽⴻⵙⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵓⵇⴻⵔⵔⵓⵢ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵡⵉⵏⵉⵙ.
ⵜⴰⵇⴱⵓⵛⵜ ⵏ ⵓⵖⴻⵔⴱⴰⵣ. Lona Lovegoo nosess out on the
her head station again, watching what Neville was doing.
Neville held Mimbulus mimbletonia up to his eyes, his tongue between his teeth, selected his spot, and gave the plant a quick lick with .
Archaon of the Trahite.
The railing from all vessels on the forests, and the harvesting, slaves, and greens; They hit the ceiling, the windows, and spray Luna
Love magazine. Ginny, who threw her hands in front of the
Her face while, it just looks like she’s wearing a bathing suit
green tea, but Harry, whose hands were straining to stop Trevor's escape, got a full face. It smells like dark grass.
Neville, his face and body also bruised, shook his head to
Cast out the evil from His sight.
“I’m sorry,” he whispered. “I’ve never tried that before. . . . I don’t understand
It will be so . . . Don’t worry, though, the Stinksap isn’t poisonous,” he added nervously, as Harry wiped his mouth on the floor.
At the same moment, their car door swung open.
"Oh . . . hello, Harry,” said a feminine voice. “Um . . . bad times?”
Harry wiped the lens of his glasses with his non-Trevor hand. a
A very beautiful girl with long shiny black hair was standing in the doorway.
Looking forward to: Cho Chang, Researcher at the Ravenclaw Auditorium
staff.
"Oh . . . hi," Harry said with a smile.
“Um . . .” Cho said. "So . . . I just thought I'd say hello. . . . 'Bye
so."
She closed the door again, with a smug look on her face, and left.
Harry returned to his seat and sighed. He would like it
Cho you will find sitting with a group of very cool people laughing
Their heads went off over a joke he had just told; He cannot choose
They sat down with Neville and Luni Lavgood, caught a squirrel and
They shit in the Stinksap.
“No need,” Ginny insisted. “Look, we can finish together .
This is easy.” She drew her wand. “Scorgy!”
The stinksap is gone.
“I’m sorry,” Neville said again, in a smaller voice.
Ron and Hermione didn't show up for almost an hour, so
the time of the food truck has already gone. Harry, Ginny, and Neville
They took out their Pumpkin Pasties and were exchanging Chocolate Frog Cards when the door to the car opened and they were
He walked away, accompanied by Crookshanks and a Pigwidgeon squirming around in his cage.
"I'm starving," Ron said, setting Pigwidgeon down next to Hedwig,
He grabbed a Chocolate Pumpkin from Harry and threw himself into the
Stay by her side. He opened the box and ate the Dog's head.
And he sat back with his eyes closed as if he had had a very enjoyable evening.
"Well, there are two fifth year prefects from each House," he said .
Hermione, blinking in disapproval as she took her seat. "boy
and the girl out of everyone.”
“And guess who the Slytherin heir is?” Run said, still with his eyes
Closed.
“Malfoy,” Harry replied at once, his worst fear evident.
“ 'Course,” Ron growled, and shoved what was left of the Dog into his
Because it’s taking someone else.
"And the cow is perfect for Pansy Parkinson," Hermione protested mischievously. “How dare she be a prefect when she’s older than a nurse .
Troll . . .”
“Who’s a Hufflepuff?” Harry asked.
"Ernie McMillan and Hanna Abbot," Ron whispered.
“Oh Antonie Goldstein and Badma Pateil for Ravenclaw,” he said .
Hermione.
"You went to the Yule Ball with Padma Patil," said a unidentified voice.
Each one would like the Lea Lovegood, in which Ron succeeds in front of The Quibbler Cup. He ate his
Frog’s Mouth.
“Yeah, I know I did,” he said, looking a little surprised.
"Not too long," Luna told him. “You don’t work
You are smooth, because you don’t eat with it.
I don’t think I’ll ever,” she adds with a smile, “I don’t care .
They dance a lot.”
She appeared after The Quibbler again. Read the blend to the book
with his mouth open for a few seconds, then looked away
At Ginny for some sort of explanation, but Ginny filled it out
she bit into her mouth to stop herself from giggling. Run succeeded in his answer.
Bemosed, Sine inspected the slain.
“We need to work on the streets every time,” he said .
Harry and Neville, “and we can provide punishment if people .
He doesn’t speak well. I can’t get on Crabbe and Goyle about anything. . . .”
“You shouldn’t have abused your position, Ron!” Hermione said
for the ceremony.
“Yes, it’s true, because Malfoy doesn’t affect all,” Ron said .
total.
“Al’t stop level?”
“No, I’ll just make sure I get his friends before he does .
mine."
“For heaven’s sake, Ron —”
“I’ll get Goldle to work, say, hatred,” Ron said .
delighted. He sent the voice to the Goyle corner and, he entered the voice .
Face in a pained expression, writing mime in the air. "I . . .
must . . . not . . . look . . . as . . . a . . . of the pub . . . The back side. . . .”
Everyone laughed, but there was no one-buils with the depression of Loa Lovedo. I am sorry for a joy that allowed Hedweig to take.
And she flaps her wings proudly with Crookshanks to jump in
A rack of potatoes, he hisses. She laughed so hard her magazine fell off.
From his grasp, she slipped from her knees and fell to the ground.
"weird!"
Allenes who fell to tears as she feels intimidating, grows
in Run. He didn’t all stop, the best to others, who is .
Now she’s laughing at the look on Ron’s face and the smirk
The Luna Lovegoo’s room, which is satisfying back and
In front, she held onto her sides.
“You’re a good time?” said Ron, nodding.
“Babon . . . ahead!" She stopped and bit her lips.
Everyone else is seen Lona has seen, but Harry, is succeeded in
magazine on the ground, he saw something that made him fall for
it. With his head up, it was hard to tell what the picture was in front.
He was, but Harry had already understands that it was the grain of Cornelius
Fudge; Harry just knows about the steady ball guard
hat. One of the hands of Fudge was close to a golden bow; the
Another hand was stroking a mouse. The movie was titled: How
Far Ad Fudge will take Gringts?
Below this were listed the titles of other articles within the journal.
SCENE IN THE QUIDDITCH COMPETITION:
How tornadoes track
A SELECTION OF ANCIENT RUNES REVEALED
SIRIUS BLACK: Villain or villain?
“Can I take a look at that?” Harry asked Luna excitedly.
She shook her head, still staring at Ron, breathless with laughter.
Harry opened the magazine and scanned the index; By this time he had completely forgotten the magazine Kingsley had given him .
Mr. Weasley to give to Sirius, but it must have been this edition of The .
Cooperation. He found the page, and flipped through the article curiously.
This too is shown with a slightly worse performance; In fact, Harry
I don’t know that it was supposed to be Sirius if he wasn’t
with the title. Sirius was standing over a pile of human bones with his
Outer ring. The headline of the article reads:
SIRIUS - Black As well as it sounds?
Serving the Famous Master OR Singing Sensation Innocent?
Harry had to read this sentence several times before he was convinced that he had misunderstood it. Since when was Sirius
A sense of music?
Fourteen years ago Sirius Black was believed
He was accused of killing twelve innocent Muggles and a wizard. Black’s daring escape from
Azkaban two years ago led to the biggest manhunt ever at the Ministry of Magic. nothing
Of us he never questioned that he deserved to be taken and handed over to the devotees.
BUT HER?
Startling new evidence has recently come to light.
Sirius Black probably didn't commit the murders.
As a result he was sent to Azkaban. In fact, Doris said
Purkiss, of 18 Akanthia Road, Little Norton, Black May
They weren’t even involved in the attacks.
“What people don’t realize is that Sirius Black is
False name,” Ms. Purkiss said. “That man people .
It is believed that it was Sirius Black who was actually Stubby Boardman, the lead singer of the popular singing group The
Hobgoblins, who retired from public life after the
He hit him in the ear with a pitchfork during a concert at Little Norton church hall nearly five years ago. I know
to him the moment I saw his picture in the paper. now,
Stubby can’t do those
crimes, because on the date in question
You’ll enjoy the bachelorette party dinner with me. I
I’ve written to the Minister of Fiction and expect him to give Stubby, nicknamed Sirius, a full apology for every
Day now.”
Harry finished reading and stared at the page in disbelief. might
Funny, he thought, maybe that magazine always drew laughs
things. He flipped back a few pages and found the quote about Fudge.
Cornelius Fudge, minister of engineering, denied that
He had some plans to take over the governorship of the Wizarding Bank, Gringotts, when he was elected Minister .
of the Magic for five years. Fudge has always insisted
that he wanted nothing more than “to get along .
in peace” with our Golden Guards.
BUT HER?
Sources close to the minister revealed recently that Fudge’s greatest ambition is to destroy the
The Goblin gold gold meals is this
Don’t worry to use goodness if necessary.
“It wasn’t the first time, either,” said a
Department of the Interior. “Cornelius ‘GoblinCrusher’ Fudge,
That is, the books are about to be sucated
When he thinks no one is listening, oh, always
Immuning about the dogs he worked for them; have
They drowned, and he threw them off the building.
Funding, smokes in
Campaigns. . . .”
Harry didn’t read so much. Fodge can have a lot of a palm but
Harry found it a lot to remember that they gave the vegetables to be
Cook in tins. He ripped out the rest of the magazine. pause
Every few pages read a doubt that Tutshill of Totshil were .
Quidditch League wins with offensive, illegal combination
The ears of the ears, and harassment; Technology is a complaint
He said he left to the month with a Cleansweep Six and earn
followed by a bag of mooncakes to top it all off; and the article on the old Tarons,
That at least explained why Luna was reading The Quibbler upside down. According to the magazine, if Iron is changed .
Passengers have shown a guilty to resume ears and
Kumquat. In fact, if we compare other articles that appear in The Quibbler,
The suggestion that Sirius might actually be the lead singer of The Hobgoblins was reasonable.
“It’s something good there?” ” told Ron when Harry closed the magazine.
“It’s true,” Hermione said in accord, before he returns Harry, “With of Quibbler, each knows that.”
“Supportings,” she told Luna; The voices fell in a dream time.
quality. “My father is an editor.”
“I’m — oh,” said Hermione, the magician with a time. "Therefore . . . has
Some amazing things. . . I want to say, and what . . .”
“I’m going to answer, thank you,” said Louna with smoking, and feels before .
She yanked it out of Harry's hands. Rifling through it to page fifty-seven, she turned it over and over again and lost .
Behind her, just as the kitchen door opened for the third time.
Harry looked around; He was waiting for that, but that doesn’t
Draco Malfoy’s visions from friends
Crabbe and Goyle are otherwise pleased.
"what?" He said on a nomination, before Malefoy Aqmoschi.
“Manners, a Potter, or I have to give jail,” it’s the name .
Malfoy, with the Red Revolution and Legislative such
n father. “That’s time, I, not like you, I’m glad and prefekt, which is for .
The Messenger, unless you, I I Irah the strength to give me.”
“Yeah,” said Harry, “but you, unlike me, are a git, so get out and .
Leave us alone.”
Ron, Hermione, Ginny, and Neville laughed. Malfoy's legs were read.
“Tell me, how does it feel to be second to the Weasleys, Potter?” he
asked.
“She’s silent, A Malfoy,” Hermione said quickly.
“Looks like I touched a nerve,” Malfoy said, smiling. “Ahha, only
Hahadre Ighik, a Potter, because I will follow the leaks if
You’re out of line.”
“It’s out. told Hermionee, standing.
With a grin, Malfoy gave Harry one last evil look and left,
Crabbe and Goyle looked at his shoulder. Hermione collapsed.
The door of the household behind them of their exploitation of Harry, those
She knew suddenly that she, like him, had registered what Malfoy had said .
And it was just as unnerved by.
“I chucked another Chicken,” said Ron, who smiled briefly .
nothing.
Harry couldn’t speak freely in front of Neville and Lona. Another view of Lherr and Hermione, was launched with historic from
stones.
He was thinking Srius to come with him with a little
Funny, but it suddenly seems unlikely, if not outright dangerous.
. . . Hermione was right. . . . Sirius shouldn't have come. what
If Mr. Malfoy had seen the black dog and told Draco, what would have happened if
They managed to understand that Wesli, Lupin, Toks, and Mudi know .
Where was Sirius hiding? Or had Malfoy used the word “dogging” .
Was it an event?
The weather remained unsettled as they continued their journey north. Adfelt put doors with a half heart, two
The sun turned a purple hue before the clouds darkened once more.
When darkness fell, torches were lit inside the vehicles, Luna .
she picked up The Quibbler, placed it carefully in her bag, and drove to
A deal at each one is in the company in place.
Harry was sitting with his elbows pressed against the train window, trying to get a first look away from Hogwarts, but it was
It was a moonless night and the rain-covered darkness was pitch black.
“Feet what we change,” said Hermione end. It and Run close
their prefect flag carefully to their chests. Harry saw Run stare.
How has been seen in the black slave.
Eventually the train started to slow down and they heard the usual horn.
Up and down as everyone scrambles to get their luggage and pets
Assembled, ready to go. Run and Hermione had to
following all this; They fell from the Lark again, they left
Harry and the others to take care of Crookshanks and Pigwidgeun.
“I’ll get the fox, if you want,” Luna told Harry, holding out his hand .
For Pigwidgeon to Neville put Trevor with LHIR in a insider lake.
"Ah — er — thanks," Harry said, handing over the cage and lifting Hedwig's more securely in his arms.
They left the block and felt the first whiff of
the night air on their faces as they joined the crowds in the hallway. slow
They made the gates. Harry can use forest trees
They set up a way to the center of the sea. He went out on the roof.
And looking around, he hears the familiar call of “Years of Firs than
here . . . The first years . . .”
But he never came. Instead, a very different, distinctly female voice
One, he was saying, “First years line up here, please! ⵉⵙⴻⴳⴳⴰⵙⴻⵏ ⵉⵎⴻⵣⵡⵓⵔⴰ ⴰⴽⴽ ⴰⵔ
we!"
ⵜⵓⵙⴰⴷ ⵢⵉⵡⴻⵜ ⵏ ⵜⴻⴼⵜⵉⵔⵜ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍ ⵖⴻⵔ Harry, ⵙ ⵜⴰⴼⴰⵜⵉⵙ ⵉⵡⴰⵍⴰ
Specialized and resort of Professor GrubblyPlank, of
ⵜⴰⵙⴻⵃⵃⴰⵔⵜ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵟⵟⴼⴻⵏ ⵜⵉⵎⵙⵉⵔⵉⵏ ⵏ ⵀⴰⴳⵔⵉⴷ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵓⵃⴰⵔⴻⴱ ⵖⴻⴼ ⵢⵉⵎⴷⴰⵏⴻⵏ ⵉⵙⴻⵃⵃⴰⵔⴻⵏ
ⵉ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵍⵡⴻⵇⵜ ⴷⴻⴳ ⵓⵙⴻⴳⴳⴰⵙ ⵢⴻⵣⵔⵉⵏ.
“Where’s Hagrid?” He said out loud.
« ⵓⵔ ⵥⵔⵉⵖ ⴰⵔⴰ », ⵉ ⴷⵜⴻⵏⵏⴰ Ginny, « ⵎⴰⵛⴰ ⵢⵉⴼⵉⵜ ⵎⴰ ⵏⴻⴼⴼⴻⵖ ⵙⴻⴳ ⵓⴱⵔⵉⴷ, .
ⵏⴻⴽⵏⵉ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⵃⴻⴱⴱⴻⵙ ⵜⴰⵡⵡⵓⵔⵜ.”
"Oh . . .”
Harry and Ginny shared when they were open on the
Platform and the outside with the illustration. ⵢⴻⵜⵜⵡⴰⴹⴹⴻⴼ ⵙⵖⵓⵔ ⵍⵖⴰⵛⵉ, Hari
She was in Tamly to see Hagrid; supposed
Here, Harry was confident — seeing Hagrid again was
One of the things he was most looking forward to. but
ⵓⵔ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵍⴱⴻⴹⵏⴰ ⴼⴻⵍⵍⴰⵙ ⴰⴽⴽ.
He couldn't leave, Harry thought to himself as he slowly looked around
ⵜⴰⵡⵡⵓⵔⵜ ⵥⵥⴰⵢⴻⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵡⴻⴱⵔⵉⴷ ⵏ ⴱⴻⵔⵔⴰ ⴷ ⵍⵖⴰⵛⵉ ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵇⵇⵉⵎⴻⵏ.
He just had a cold or something. . . .
He looked at Ron or Hermione, wanting to know what .
Consider the professor of Professor GrobePlank, but .
Even one of them was nowhere near, yes he left the sights to be .
facing forward to the rain-washed dry path outside Hogsmeade
station.
ⴷⴰⴳⵉ ⴱⴻⴷⴷⴻⵏⴷ ⵎⴻⵢⵢⴰ ⵏⴻⵖ ⴰⵣⴰⵍ ⵏ ⵢⵉⴽⴰⵎⵢⵓⵏⴻⵏ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵣⴳⵓⵏⵜ ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵙⵄⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵉⵄⴻⵡⴷⵉⵡⴻⵏ ⵉ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⴷⵉⵎⴰ .
He led the first year students up to the castle. He glanced at Harry
Sprinting over to them, he turned to stare at Ron and
Hermione, two are two hundred.
Teachers remained to the chief efs. There are standing between the legs of the fraud; ⵍⵉⵎⵎⴻⵔ ⵢⴻⵙⵙⴻⴼⴽ ⴰⴷ ⴰⵙⴻⵏⵢⴻⴼⴽ ⵉⵙⴻⵎ, ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ
ⵉⵅⴻⵎⵎⴻⵎ ⴰⴷ ⴰⵙⴻⵏⵢⵉⵏⵉ ⵉⵄⴻⵡⴷⵉⵡⴻⵏ, ⵖⴰⵙ ⴰⴽⴽⴻⵏ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⴽⵔⴰ ⵏ ⵜⵎⴻⵥⵥⵓⵖⵜ ⴷⴻⴳⵙⴻⵏ ⵓⵍⴰ ⴷ ⵏⵓⵜⵏⵉ. They were sickly and they had no meat, and their
black cloth stuck in their hair, in which every hair stood out. ⵉⵇⴻⵔⵔⴰⵏⵙⴻⵏ ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⴰⵎ ⵓⴷⴼⴻⵍ, ⴷ ⴰⵍⵍⴻⵏⵏⵙⴻⵏ ⵓⵔ ⵏⴻⵙⵄⵉ ⴰⵔⴰ ⵉⵏⴻⵍⵎⴰⴷⴻⵏ ⴷ ⵜⵉⵎⴻⵍⵍⴰⵍⵉⵏ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ
He's looking. The fragrance left every corner — he was big, black
Wings that look like they must belong to large mammals.
Standing still and silent in the darkness, the people looked tense and
vicious. Harry cannot understand Achimie had been tested
ⵜⵜⵡⴰⵊⴻⴱⴷⴻⵏ ⵙⵖⵓⵔ ⵉⵢⵙⴰⵏⴰⴳⵉ ⵉⵅⵓⵚⵚⴻⵏ ⵎⵉ ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵣⴻⵎⵔⴻⵏ ⴰⵟⴰⵙ
ⵜⵜⵎⵓⵇⵓⵍⴻⵏ ⵙ ⵢⵉⵎⴰⵏⵏⵙⴻⵏ.
“ⴰⵏⵉⴷⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ Yilef?” » ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ ⵚⵚⵓⵜ ⵏ Ron, ⴷⴻⴼⴼⵉⵔ ⵏ Harry.
« ⵜⴰⵇⵛⵉⵛⵜⵏⵏⵉ ⵏ Luna ⵜⴻⵍⵍⴰ ⵜⴻⵜⵜⴰⵡⵉⵜ », ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Harry, ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵣⵣⵉⴷ ⵙ ⵜⵖⴰⵡⵍⴰ, ⵢⴻⵙⵄⴰ ⵍⵃⵉⵔ ⴰⴷ ⵢⴻⵙⵜⴻⵇⵙⵉ Ron ⵖⴻⴼ Hagrid. “Anada for you’re feeling —”
“— Hagrid ⴷ ⵏⴻⵜⵜⴰ? ⵉ dunno », ⵉ ⴷⵢⴻⵏⵏⴰ Ron, ⵙ ⵚⵚⵓⵜ ⵏ ⵜⴽⴻⵔⴽⴰⵙ. « ⵢⵉⴼⵉⵜ
ⵜⵉⵍⵉⴹ ⵎⵍⵉⵃ. . . .”
Shortly after, Draco Malfoy, followed by a small group of
ⵉⵎⴻⴷⴷⵓⴽⴰⵍⵏⵙⴻⵏ ⴳⴰⵔⴰⵙⴻⵏ Krabbe, Guyle, ⴷ Pansi Parkinsun, ⵍⵍⴰⵏ ⵜⵜⵃⴻⵜⵜⵉⵎⴻⵏ
Some second years looking carefully out of the way so they can get
Training for themselves. Sein v. Head Hermiion sat down and feels good from
crowd.
“Malfoy was a young man with a leather in the first year there, I’m afraid .
ⴰⴷ ⴰⵙⴷ-ⵙⵙⵉⵡⴹⴻⵖ ⵍⴻⵅⴱⴰⵔ, ⵢⴻⵙⵄⴰ ⴽⴰⵏ ⵍⴱⴰⴹⵏⴰⵉⵏⴻⵙ ⴽⵔⴰⴹ ⵏ ⵜⴻⴷⵇⵉⵇⵉⵏ ⵢⴻⵔⵏⴰ ⵢⴻⵍⵍⴰ
They use it to torture people more than ever. . . . Where’s Cruikshanks?”
“Ginny’s got it,” Harry said. “There it is. . . .”
Ginny just walked out of the crowd and grabbed a question
The brain of lies.
“Thanks,” Hermione said, pulling Ginny away from the cat. "series,
Let’s get a car together before they’re all full. . . .”
“I don’t have an Elephant yet!” Ron said, but Hermione was already heading towards the approaching unoccupied van. Harry sat behind
and Run.
“What are those things, guess?” Ron asked, nodding
Running horses as other students ran ahead of them.
“What things?”
“That horse —”
Luna came out holding Pigwidgeon's cage in her arms; Small platform
He was tweeting fervently as always.
“Here you are,” she said. “He’s a sweet little kid, isn’t he?”
“er . . . Yes . . . He’s fine,” Ron said reluctantly. “Well, come on
Then, let’s enter. . . . What do you think, Harry?”
“I was saying, what are those horse things?” Harry said, as he, Run,
And Luna made for the car that Hermione and Ginny were in
He's already sat down.
“What horse things?”
“Horse things pulling carts!” Harry said casually;
they were, after all, about three feet from the nearest; compliance
They were seen with empty white eyes. However, Ron gave Harry a
A look of horror.
“What are you talking about?”
“I’m talking about — look!”
Harry grabbed Ron's arm and twisted it so he was
Face to face with the winged horse. Ron looked straight at her for a second and then back at Harry.
“What should I be looking at?”
“In — there, between the chapters! Harness for the trainer! is
Right there in front —”
But as Ron continued to stare in awe, an odd thought occurred
For Harry.
"I can't . . . can't you see them?”
“See what?”
“Don’t you know what attracts cars?”
Ron looked serious now.
“Are you feeling alright, Harry?”
"I . . . yes . . ."
Harry felt completely panicked. The horse was right there in front of him,
It gleamed brightly in the dim light coming through the station window.
Behind them, steam rose from his lips into the cool night air. still
Unless Ron was wrong — and it’s a pretty heavy dish if he was —
Ron couldn't see it at all.
“Shall we go in, then?” Ron said uncertainly, looking at Harry as if
even though they are concerned about it.
“Yeah,” Harry said. “Yes, perfect . . .”
"It's okay," a dreamy voice came from Harry's side as Ron appeared inside the coach's basement. “You don’t get nervous or anything.
I can see them too.”
"you can?" Harry said nervously, and turned to Luna. He could see.
Butterfly-winged birds reflected his large, silver eyes.
“Oh yes,” Luna said, “I’ve been able to see them since my first .
day here. They’re always pulling cars. Don't worry. You just
Like me for sure.”
She smiled slightly and climbed into the beautiful cottage.
After the Run. Completely unfazed, Harry followed her.
